1000
722,and from the house of Millo, and devour Abimelech. 
And Jotham ran away, and fled, and went to Beer, and dwelt there, for fear of Abimelech his brother. 
When Abimelech had reigned three years over Israel, 
Then God sent an evil spirit between Abimelech and the men of Shechem; and the men of Shechem dealt treacherously with Abimelech: 
That the cruelty done to the threescore and ten sons of Jerubbaal might come, and their blood be laid upon Abimelech their brother, which slew them; and upon the men of Shechem, which aided him in the killing of his brethren. 
And the men of Shechem set liers in wait for him in the top of the mountains, and they robbed all that came along that way by them: and it was told Abimelech
1060,n: but the wicked shall fall into mischief. 
Rejoice not when thine enemy falleth, and let not thine heart be glad when he stumbleth: 
Lest the LORD see it, and it displease him, and he turn away his wrath from him. 
Fret not thyself because of evil men, neither be thou envious at the wicked: 
For there shall be no reward to the evil man; the candle of the wicked shall be put out. 
My son, fear thou the LORD and the king: and meddle not with them that are given to change: 
For their calamity shall rise suddenly; and who knoweth the ruin of them both? 
These things also belong to the wise. It is not good to have respect of persons in judgment. 
He that saith unto the wicked, Thou are righteous; him shall the people curse, nations shall abhor him: 
But to them that rebuke him shall be delight, and a good blessing shall come upon them. 
Every man shall kiss his lips that giveth a right answer. 
Prepare thy work without, and make it fit for thyself in the field; and afterwards build thine house. 
Be not a witness against thy neighbour without cause
1040,us unto this land, and unto this house? 
And it shall be answered, Because they forsook the LORD God of their fathers, which brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, and laid hold on other gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath he brought all this evil upon them. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, wherein Solomon had built the house of the LORD, and his own house, 
That the cities which Huram had restored to Solomon, Solomon built them, and caused the children of Israel to dwell there. 
And Solomon went to Hamathzobah, and prevailed against it. 
And he built Tadmor in the wilderness, and all the store cities, which he built in Hamath. 
Also he built Bethhoron the upper, and Bethhoron the nether, fenced cities, with walls, gates, and bars; 
And Baalath, and all the store cities that Solomon had, and all the chariot cities, and the cities of the horsemen, and all that Solomon desired to build in Jerusalem, and in Lebanon, and throughout all the land of his dominion. 
As for all the people 
730,h him, and set captains of thousands, and captains of hundreds over them. 
And David sent forth a third part of the people under the hand of Joab, and a third part under the hand of Abishai the son of Zeruiah, Joab's brother, and a third part under the hand of Ittai the Gittite. And the king said unto the people, I will surely go forth with you myself also. 
But the people answered, Thou shalt not go forth: for if we flee away, they will not care for us; neither if half of us die, will they care for us: but now thou art worth ten thousand of us: therefore now it is better that thou succour us out of the city. 
And the king said unto them, What seemeth you best I will do. And the king stood by the gate side, and all the p
790, excuse. The first said unto him, I have bought a piece of ground, and I must needs go and see it: I pray thee have me excused. 
And another said, I have bought five yoke of oxen, and I go to prove them: I pray thee have me excused. 
And another said, I have married a wife, and therefore I cannot come. 
So that servant came, and shewed his lord these things. Then the master of the house being angry said to his servant, Go out quickly into the streets and lanes of the city, and bring in hither the poor, and the maimed, and the halt, and the blind. 
And the servant said, Lord, it is done as thou hast commanded, and yet there is room. 
And the lord said unto the servant, Go out into the highways and hedges, and compel them to come in, that my house may be filled. 
For I say unto you
826,he word which came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Arise, and go down to the potter's house, and there I will cause thee to hear my words. 
Then I went down to the potter's house, and, behold, he wrought a work on the wheels. 
And the vessel that he made of clay was marred in the hand of the potter: so he made it again another vessel, as seemed good to the potter to make it. 
Then the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
O house of Israel, cannot I do with you as this potter? saith the LORD. Behold, as the clay is in the potter's hand, so are ye in mine hand, O house of Israel. 
At what instant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning a kingdom, to pluck up, and to pull down, and to destroy it; 
If that nation, against whom I have pronounced, turn from their evil, I will repent of the evil that I thou
1022,verthrow the throne of kingdoms, and I will destroy the strength of the kingdoms of the heathen; and I will overthrow the chariots, and those that ride in them; and the horses and their riders shall come down, every one by the sword of his brother. 
In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, will I take thee, O Zerubbabel, my servant, the son of Shealtiel, saith the LORD, and will make thee as a signet: for I have chosen thee, saith the LORD of hosts. 
In the eighth month, in the second year of Darius, came the word of the LORD unto Zechariah, the son of Berechiah, the son of Iddo the prophet, saying, 
The LORD hath been sore displeased with your fathers. 
Therefore say thou unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Turn ye unto me, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will turn unto you, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Be ye not as your fathers, unto whom the former prophets have cried, saying, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Turn ye now from your evil ways, and from your evil doings: but they did not hear, nor hearken unto m
905,ency is of God; 
Who also hath made us able ministers of the new testament; not of the letter, but of the spirit: for the letter killeth, but the spirit giveth life. 
But if the ministration of death, written and engraven in stones, was glorious, so that the children of Israel could not stedfastly behold the face of Moses for the glory of his countenance; which glory was to be done away: 
How shall not the ministration of the spirit be rather glorious? 
For if the ministration of condemnation be glory, much more doth the ministration of righteousness exceed in glory. 
For even that which was made glorious had no glory in this respect, by reason of the glory that excelleth. 
For if that which is done away was glorious, much more that which remaineth is glorious. 
Seeing then that we have such hope, we use great plainness of speech: 
And not as Moses, which put a vail over his face, that the ch
750, lay mine hand upon my mouth. 
Once have I spoken; but I will not answer: yea, twice; but I will proceed no further. 
Then answered the LORD unto Job out of the whirlwind, and said, 
Gird up thy loins now like a man: I will demand of thee, and declare thou unto me. 
Wilt thou also disannul my judgment? wilt thou condemn me, that thou mayest be righteous? 
Hast thou an arm like God? or canst thou thunder with a voice like him? 
Deck thyself now with majesty and excellency; and array thyself with glory and beauty. 
Cast abroad the rage of thy wrath: and behold every one that is proud, and abase him. 
Look on every one that is proud, and bring him low; and tread down the wicked in their place. 
Hide them in the dust together; and bind their fa
906,hab. And there was a sore famine in Samaria. 
And Ahab called Obadiah, which was the governor of his house. (Now Obadiah feared the LORD greatly: 
For it was so, when Jezebel cut off the prophets of the LORD, that Obadiah took an hundred prophets, and hid them by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water.) 
And Ahab said unto Obadiah, Go into the land, unto all fountains of water, and unto all brooks: peradventure we may find grass to save the horses and mules alive, that we lose not all the beasts. 
So they divided the land between them to pass throughout it: Ahab went one way by himself, and Obadiah went another way by himself. 
And as Obadiah was in the way, behold, Elijah met him: and he knew him, and fell on his face, and said, Art thou that my lord Elijah? 
And he answered him, I am: go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here. 
And he said, What have I sinned, that thou wouldest 
1001,ickedness: they shall be burnt with fire, both he and they; that there be no wickedness among you. 
And if a man lie with a beast, he shall surely be put to death: and ye shall slay the beast. 
And if a woman approach unto any beast, and lie down thereto, thou shalt kill the woman, and the beast: they shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them. 
And if a man shall take his sister, his father's daughter, or his mother's daughter, and see her nakedness, and she see his nakedness; it is a wicked thing; and they shall be cut off in the sight of their people: he hath uncovered his sister's nakedness; he shall bear his iniquity. 
And if a man shall lie with a woman having her sickness, and shall uncover her nakedness; he hath discovered her fountain, and she hath uncovered the fountain of her blood: and both of them shall be cut off from among their people. 
And thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of thy mother's sister, nor of thy father's sister: for he uncovereth his nea
732,, and of them that sit on them, and the flesh of all men, both free and bond, both small and great. 
And I saw the beast, and the kings of the earth, and their armies, gathered together to make war against him that sat on the horse, and against his army. 
And the beast was taken, and with him the false prophet that wrought miracles before him, with which he deceived them that had received the mark of the beast, and them that worshipped his image. These both were cast alive into a lake of fire burning with brimstone. 
And the remnant were slain with the sword of him that sat upon the horse, which sword proceeded out of his mouth: and all the fowls were filled with their flesh. 
And I saw an angel come down from heaven, havi
796,, which was the fifth year of king Jehoiachin's captivity, 
The word of the LORD came expressly unto Ezekiel the priest, the son of Buzi, in the land of the Chaldeans by the river Chebar; and the hand of the LORD was there upon him. 
And I looked, and, behold, a whirlwind came out of the north, a great cloud, and a fire infolding itself, and a brightness was about it, and out of the midst thereof as the colour of amber, out of the midst of the fire. 
Also out of the midst thereof came the likeness of four living creatures. And this was their appearance; they had the likeness of a man. 
And every one had four faces, and every one had four wings. 
And their feet were straight feet; and the sole of their feet was like the sole of a calf's foot: and they sparkled like the colour of burnish
970,is brethren the priests, and Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and his brethren, and builded the altar of the God of Israel, to offer burnt offerings thereon, as it is written in the law of Moses the man of God. 
And they set the altar upon his bases; for fear was upon them because of the people of those countries: and they offered burnt offerings thereon unto the LORD, even burnt offerings morning and evening. 
They kept also the feast of tabernacles, as it is written, and offered the daily burnt offerings by number, according to the custom, as the duty of every day required; 
And afterward offered the continual burnt offering, both of the new moons, and of all the set feasts of the LORD that were consecrated, and of every one that willingly offered a freewill offering unto the LORD. 
From the first day of the seventh month began they to offer burnt offerings unto the LORD. But the foundation of the temple of the LORD was not yet laid. 
They gave money als
840, 
And it came to pass after this, that the king of the children of Ammon died, and Hanun his son reigned in his stead. 
Then said David, I will shew kindness unto Hanun the son of Nahash, as his father shewed kindness unto me. And David sent to comfort him by the hand of his servants for his father. And David's servants came into the land of the children of Ammon. 
And the princes of the children of Ammon said unto Hanun their lord, Thinkest thou that David doth honour thy father, that he hath sent comforters unto thee? hath not David rather sent his servants unto thee, to search the city, and to spy it out, and to overthrow it? 
Wherefore Hanun took David's servants, and shaved off the one half of their beards, and cut off their garments in the middle, even to their buttocks, and sent them away. 
When they told it unto David, h
865,as I have done to Shiloh. 
And I will cast you out of my sight, as I have cast out all your brethren, even the whole seed of Ephraim. 
Therefore pray not thou for this people, neither lift up cry nor prayer for them, neither make intercession to me: for I will not hear thee. 
Seest thou not what they do in the cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem? 
The children gather wood, and the fathers kindle the fire, and the women knead their dough, to make cakes to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto other gods, that they may provoke me to anger. 
Do they provoke me to anger? saith the LORD: do they not provoke themselves to the confusion of their own faces? 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, mine anger and my fury shall be poured out upon this place, upon man, and upon beast, and upon the trees of the field, and upon the
825,s the nation whose God is the LORD; and the people whom he hath chosen for his own inheritance. 
The LORD looketh from heaven; he beholdeth all the sons of men. 
From the place of his habitation he looketh upon all the inhabitants of the earth. 
He fashioneth their hearts alike; he considereth all their works. 
There is no king saved by the multitude of an host: a mighty man is not delivered by much strength. 
An horse is a vain thing for safety: neither shall he deliver any by his great strength. 
Behold, the eye of the LORD is upon them that fear him, upon them that hope in his mercy; 
To deliver their soul from death, and to keep them alive in famine. 
Our soul waiteth for the LORD: he is our help and our shield. 
For our heart shall rejoice in him, because we have trusted in his holy name. 
Let thy mercy, O LO
870,e thee my loves. 
The mandrakes give a smell, and at our gates are all manner of pleasant fruits, new and old, which I have laid up for thee, O my beloved. 
O that thou wert as my brother, that sucked the breasts of my mother! when I should find thee without, I would kiss thee; yea, I should not be despised. 
I would lead thee, and bring thee into my mother's house, who would instruct me: I would cause thee to drink of spiced wine of the juice of my pomegranate. 
His left hand should be under my head, and his right hand should embrace me. 
I charge you, O daughters of Jerusalem, that ye stir not up, nor awake my love, until he please. 
Who is this that cometh up from the wilderness, leaning upon her beloved? I raised thee up under the apple tree: there thy mother brought thee forth: there she brought thee forth that bare thee. 
Set me as a seal upon thine he
907,bore his ear through with an aul; and he shall serve him for ever. 
And if a man sell his daughter to be a maidservant, she shall not go out as the menservants do. 
If she please not her master, who hath betrothed her to himself, then shall he let her be redeemed: to sell her unto a strange nation he shall have no power, seeing he hath dealt deceitfully with her. 
And if he have betrothed her unto his son, he shall deal with her after the manner of daughters. 
If he take him another wife; her food, her raiment, and her duty of marriage, shall he not diminish. 
And if he do not these three unto her, then shall she go out free without money. 
He that smiteth a man, so that he die, shall be surely put to death. 
And if a man lie not in wait, but God deliver him into his hand; then I will appoint thee a place whither he shall flee. 
But if a man come presumptuously upon his neighbour, to slay him w
919,hold, there is a feast of the LORD in Shiloh yearly in a place which is on the north side of Bethel, on the east side of the highway that goeth up from Bethel to Shechem, and on the south of Lebonah. 
Therefore they commanded the children of Benjamin, saying, Go and lie in wait in the vineyards; 
And see, and, behold, if the daughters of Shiloh come out to dance in dances, then come ye out of the vineyards, and catch you every man his wife of the daughters of Shiloh, and go to the land of Benjamin. 
And it shall be, when their fathers or their brethren come unto us to complain, that we will say unto them, Be favourable unto them for our sakes: because we reserved not to each man his wife in the war: for ye did not give unto them at this time, that ye should be guilty. 
And the children of Benjamin did so, and took them wives, according to their number, of them that danced, whom they caught: and they went a
744,l keep the watch of the LORD. 
And the Levites shall compass the king round about, every man with his weapons in his hand; and whosoever else cometh into the house, he shall be put to death: but be ye with the king when he cometh in, and when he goeth out. 
So the Levites and all Judah did according to all things that Jehoiada the priest had commanded, and took every man his men that were to come in on the sabbath, with them that were to go out on the sabbath: for Jehoiada the priest dismissed not the courses. 
Moreover Jehoiada the priest delivered to the captains of hundreds spears, and bucklers, and shields, that had been king David's, which were in the house of God. 
And he set all the people, every man having his weapon in his ha
834,l, and pour it into the palm of his own left hand: 
And the priest shall dip his right finger in the oil that is in his left hand, and shall sprinkle of the oil with his finger seven times before the LORD: 
And of the rest of the oil that is in his hand shall the priest put upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot, upon the blood of the trespass offering: 
And the remnant of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall pour upon the head of him that is to be cleansed: and the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD. 
And the priest shall offer the sin offering, and make an atonement for him that is to be cleansed from his uncleanness; and afterward he shall kill the burnt offering: 
And the priest shall offer 
802,of the mountains. 
Now will I shortly pour out my fury upon thee, and accomplish mine anger upon thee: and I will judge thee according to thy ways, and will recompense thee for all thine abominations. 
And mine eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity: I will recompense thee according to thy ways and thine abominations that are in the midst of thee; and ye shall know that I am the LORD that smiteth. 
Behold the day, behold, it is come: the morning is gone forth; the rod hath blossomed, pride hath budded. 
Violence is risen up into a rod of wickedness: none of them shall remain, nor of their multitude, nor of any of their's: neither shall there be wailing for them. 
The time is come, the day draweth near: let not the buyer rejoice, nor the seller mourn: for wrath is upon all the multitud
776,d appointed, speaking unto Moses, that he should make it according to the fashion that he had seen. 
Which also our fathers that came after brought in with Jesus into the possession of the Gentiles, whom God drave out before the face of our fathers, unto the days of David; 
Who found favour before God, and desired to find a tabernacle for the God of Jacob. 
But Solomon built him an house. 
Howbeit the most High dwelleth not in temples made with hands; as saith the prophet, 
Heaven is my throne, and earth is my footstool: what house will ye build me? saith the Lord: or what is the place of my rest? 
Hath not my hand made all these things? 
Ye stiffnecked and uncircumcised in heart and ears, ye do always resist the Holy Ghost: as your fathers did, so do ye. 
Which of 
922,l: he openeth not his mouth in the gate. 
He that deviseth to do evil shall be called a mischievous person. 
The thought of foolishness is sin: and the scorner is an abomination to men. 
If thou faint in the day of adversity, thy strength is small. 
If thou forbear to deliver them that are drawn unto death, and those that are ready to be slain; 
If thou sayest, Behold, we knew it not; doth not he that pondereth the heart consider it? and he that keepeth thy soul, doth not he know it? and shall not he render to every man according to his works? 
My son, eat thou honey, because it is good; and the honeycomb, which is sweet to thy taste: 
So shall the knowledge of wisdom be unto thy soul: when thou hast found it, then there shall be a reward, and thy expectation shall not be cut off. 
Lay not wait, O wicked man, against the dwelling of the righteous; spoil not his resting place: 
For a just man falleth seven tim
802,m his father, and said, My father: and he said, Here am I, my son. And he said, Behold the fire and the wood: but where is the lamb for a burnt offering? 
And Abraham said, My son, God will provide himself a lamb for a burnt offering: so they went both of them together. 
And they came to the place which God had told him of; and Abraham built an altar there, and laid the wood in order, and bound Isaac his son, and laid him on the altar upon the wood. 
And Abraham stretched forth his hand, and took the knife to slay his son. 
And the angel of the LORD called unto him out of heaven, and said, Abraham, Abraham: and he said, Here am I. 
And he said, Lay not thine hand upon the lad, neither do thou any thing unto him: for now I know that thou fearest God, seeing thou hast not withheld thy son, thi
1009,kewise all the men that were with him: 
And they mourned, and wept, and fasted until even, for Saul, and for Jonathan his son, and for the people of the LORD, and for the house of Israel; because they were fallen by the sword. 
And David said unto the young man that told him, Whence art thou? And he answered, I am the son of a stranger, an Amalekite. 
And David said unto him, How wast thou not afraid to stretch forth thine hand to destroy the LORD's anointed? 
And David called one of the young men, and said, Go near, and fall upon him. And he smote him that he died. 
And David said unto him, Thy blood be upon thy head; for thy mouth hath testified against thee, saying, I have slain the LORD's anointed. 
And David lamented with this lamentation over Saul and over Jonathan his son: 
(Also he bade them teach the children of Judah the use of the bow: behold, it is written in the book of Jasher.) 
The beauty of Israel is slain upon thy high places: how are the mighty fallen! 
Tell it not in Gath, pu
996,ea, be thou confounded also, and bear thy shame, in that thou hast justified thy sisters. 
When I shall bring again their captivity, the captivity of Sodom and her daughters, and the captivity of Samaria and her daughters, then will I bring again the captivity of thy captives in the midst of them: 
That thou mayest bear thine own shame, and mayest be confounded in all that thou hast done, in that thou art a comfort unto them. 
When thy sisters, Sodom and her daughters, shall return to their former estate, and Samaria and her daughters shall return to their former estate, then thou and thy daughters shall return to your former estate. 
For thy sister Sodom was not mentioned by thy mouth in the day of thy pride, 
Before thy wickedness was discovered, as at the time of thy reproach of the daughters of Syria, and all that are round about her, the daughters of the Philistines, which despise thee round about. 
Thou hast borne thy lewdness and thine abominations, saith the LORD. 
For thus
739,e and Bethany, at the mount of Olives, he sendeth forth two of his disciples, 
And saith unto them, Go your way into the village over against you: and as soon as ye be entered into it, ye shall find a colt tied, whereon never man sat; loose him, and bring him. 
And if any man say unto you, Why do ye this? say ye that the Lord hath need of him; and straightway he will send him hither. 
And they went their way, and found the colt tied by the door without in a place where two ways met; and they loose him. 
And certain of them that stood there said unto them, What do ye, loosing the colt? 
And they said unto them even as Jesus had commanded: and they let them go. 
And they brought the colt to Jesus, and cast their garments on him; an
764, a king over you. 
If ye will fear the LORD, and serve him, and obey his voice, and not rebel against the commandment of the LORD, then shall both ye and also the king that reigneth over you continue following the LORD your God: 
But if ye will not obey the voice of the LORD, but rebel against the commandment of the LORD, then shall the hand of the LORD be against you, as it was against your fathers. 
Now therefore stand and see this great thing, which the LORD will do before your eyes. 
Is it not wheat harvest to day? I will call unto the LORD, and he shall send thunder and rain; that ye may perceive and see that your wickedness is great, which ye have done in the sight of the LORD, in asking you a king. 
So Samuel called unto the LORD; and the LORD sen
1007,f Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, beside that which she had brought unto the king. So she turned, and went away to her own land, she and her servants. 
Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was six hundred and threescore and six talents of gold; 
Beside that which chapmen and merchants brought. And all the kings of Arabia and governors of the country brought gold and silver to Solomon. 
And king Solomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six hundred shekels of beaten gold went to one target. 
And three hundred shields made he of beaten gold: three hundred shekels of gold went to one shield. And the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon. 
Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with pure gold. 
And there were six steps to the throne, with a footstool of gold, which were fastened to the throne, and stays on each side of the sitting place, and two lions standing by the stays: 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side a
861, down, and shalt speak out of the ground, and thy speech shall be low out of the dust, and thy voice shall be, as of one that hath a familiar spirit, out of the ground, and thy speech shall whisper out of the dust. 
Moreover the multitude of thy strangers shall be like small dust, and the multitude of the terrible ones shall be as chaff that passeth away: yea, it shall be at an instant suddenly. 
Thou shalt be visited of the LORD of hosts with thunder, and with earthquake, and great noise, with storm and tempest, and the flame of devouring fire. 
And the multitude of all the nations that fight against Ariel, even all that fight against her and her munition, and that distress her, shall be as a dream of a night vision. 
It shall even be as when an hungry man dreameth, and, behold, he eateth; but he awaketh, and his soul is empty: or as when a thirsty
855,all send unto me every thing that ye can hear. 
So Hushai David's friend came into the city, and Absalom came into Jerusalem. 
And when David was a little past the top of the hill, behold, Ziba the servant of Mephibosheth met him, with a couple of asses saddled, and upon them two hundred loaves of bread, and an hundred bunches of raisins, and an hundred of summer fruits, and a bottle of wine. 
And the king said unto Ziba, What meanest thou by these? And Ziba said, The asses be for the king's household to ride on; and the bread and summer fruit for the young men to eat; and the wine, that such as be faint in the wilderness may drink. 
And the king said, And where is thy master's son? And Ziba said unto the king, Behold, he abideth at Jerusalem: for he said, To day shall the house of Israel restore me the kingdom of my father. 
Then said the kin
1057,g and his servants coming on toward him: and Araunah went out, and bowed himself before the king on his face upon the ground. 
And Araunah said, Wherefore is my lord the king come to his servant? And David said, To buy the threshingfloor of thee, to build an altar unto the LORD, that the plague may be stayed from the people. 
And Araunah said unto David, Let my lord the king take and offer up what seemeth good unto him: behold, here be oxen for burnt sacrifice, and threshing instruments and other instruments of the oxen for wood. 
All these things did Araunah, as a king, give unto the king. And Araunah said unto the king, The LORD thy God accept thee. 
And the king said unto Araunah, Nay; but I will surely buy it of thee at a price: neither will I offer burnt offerings unto the LORD my God of that which doth cost me nothing. So David bought the threshingfloor and the oxen for fifty shekels of silver. 
And David built there an altar unto the LORD, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings. So the LORD was intreated for the land, and the
1052,thers; and there shall ye serve other gods day and night; where I will not shew you favour. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be said, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt; 
But, The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of Israel from the land of the north, and from all the lands whither he had driven them: and I will bring them again into their land that I gave unto their fathers. 
Behold, I will send for many fishers, saith the LORD, and they shall fish them; and after will I send for many hunters, and they shall hunt them from every mountain, and from every hill, and out of the holes of the rocks. 
For mine eyes are upon all their ways: they are not hid from my face, neither is their iniquity hid from mine eyes. 
And first I will recompense their iniquity and their sin double; because they have defiled my land, they have filled mine inheritance with the carcases of their detestable and abominable things. 
O LORD, my strength, and my fortress, and 
939, at Jerusalem heard that Samaria had received the word of God, they sent unto them Peter and John: 
Who, when they were come down, prayed for them, that they might receive the Holy Ghost: 
(For as yet he was fallen upon none of them: only they were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus.) 
Then laid they their hands on them, and they received the Holy Ghost. 
And when Simon saw that through laying on of the apostles' hands the Holy Ghost was given, he offered them money, 
Saying, Give me also this power, that on whomsoever I lay hands, he may receive the Holy Ghost. 
But Peter said unto him, Thy money perish with thee, because thou hast thought that the gift of God may be purchased with money. 
Thou hast neither part nor lot in this matter: for thy heart is not right in the sight of God. 
Repent therefore of this thy wickedness, and pray God, if perhaps the thought of thine heart may be forgiven thee. 
For I perceive that tho
721,which took me from my father's house, and from the land of my kindred, and which spake unto me, and that sware unto me, saying, Unto thy seed will I give this land; he shall send his angel before thee, and thou shalt take a wife unto my son from thence. 
And if the woman will not be willing to follow thee, then thou shalt be clear from this my oath: only bring not my son thither again. 
And the servant put his hand under the thigh of Abraham his master, and sware to him concerning that matter. 
And the servant took ten camels of the camels of his master, and departed; for all the goods of his master were in his hand: and he arose, and went to Mesopotamia, unto the city of Nahor. 
And he made his camels to kneel 
981, Darius the king, in the sixth month, in the first day of the month, came the word of the LORD by Haggai the prophet unto Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, governor of Judah, and to Joshua the son of Josedech, the high priest, saying, 
Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, saying, This people say, The time is not come, the time that the LORD's house should be built. 
Then came the word of the LORD by Haggai the prophet, saying, 
Is it time for you, O ye, to dwell in your cieled houses, and this house lie waste? 
Now therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts; Consider your ways. 
Ye have sown much, and bring in little; ye eat, but ye have not enough; ye drink, but ye are not filled with drink; ye clothe you, but there is none warm; and he that earneth wages earneth wages to put it into a bag with holes. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Consider your ways. 
Go up to the mountain, and bring wood, and build the house; and I will take pleasure in it, and I will be glorified, saith t
933,eaven. 
And Jacob rose up early in the morning, and took the stone that he had put for his pillows, and set it up for a pillar, and poured oil upon the top of it. 
And he called the name of that place Bethel: but the name of that city was called Luz at the first. 
And Jacob vowed a vow, saying, If God will be with me, and will keep me in this way that I go, and will give me bread to eat, and raiment to put on, 
So that I come again to my father's house in peace; then shall the LORD be my God: 
And this stone, which I have set for a pillar, shall be God's house: and of all that thou shalt give me I will surely give the tenth unto thee. 
Then Jacob went on his journey, and came into the land of the people of the east. 
And he looked, and behold a well in the field, and, lo, there were three flocks of sheep lying by it; for out of that well they watered the flocks: and a great stone was upon the well's mouth. 
And thither 
856,ath day. 
So the merchants and sellers of all kind of ware lodged without Jerusalem once or twice. 
Then I testified against them, and said unto them, Why lodge ye about the wall? if ye do so again, I will lay hands on you. From that time forth came they no more on the sabbath. 
And I commanded the Levites that they should cleanse themselves, and that they should come and keep the gates, to sanctify the sabbath day. Remember me, O my God, concerning this also, and spare me according to the greatness of thy mercy. 
In those days also saw I Jews that had married wives of Ashdod, of Ammon, and of Moab: 
And their children spake half in the speech of Ashdod, and could not speak in the Jews' language, but according to the language of each people. 
And I contended with them, and cursed them, and smote certain of them, and plucked off their hair, and 
859, us; for we desire not the knowledge of thy ways. 
What is the Almighty, that we should serve him? and what profit should we have, if we pray unto him? 
Lo, their good is not in their hand: the counsel of the wicked is far from me. 
How oft is the candle of the wicked put out! and how oft cometh their destruction upon them! God distributeth sorrows in his anger. 
They are as stubble before the wind, and as chaff that the storm carrieth away. 
God layeth up his iniquity for his children: he rewardeth him, and he shall know it. 
His eyes shall see his destruction, and he shall drink of the wrath of the Almighty. 
For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the number of his months is cut off in the midst? 
Shall any teach God knowledge? seeing he judgeth those that are high. 
One dieth in his full strength, being wholly at ease and quiet.
836, generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him hither to me. 
And Jesus rebuked the devil; and he departed out of him: and the child was cured from that very hour. 
Then came the disciples to Jesus apart, and said, Why could not we cast him out? 
And Jesus said unto them, Because of your unbelief: for verily I say unto you, If ye have faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye shall say unto this mountain, Remove hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be impossible unto you. 
Howbeit this kind goeth not out but by prayer and fasting. 
And while they abode in Galilee, Jesus said unto them, The Son of man shall be betrayed into the hands of men: 
And they shall kill him, and the third day he shall be raised again. And they were exceeding sorry. 
And when they were come to Cap
913,n he looketh not for him, and in an hour that he is not aware of, 
And shall cut him asunder, and appoint him his portion with the hypocrites: there shall be weeping and gnashing of teeth. 
Then shall the kingdom of heaven be likened unto ten virgins, which took their lamps, and went forth to meet the bridegroom. 
And five of them were wise, and five were foolish. 
They that were foolish took their lamps, and took no oil with them: 
But the wise took oil in their vessels with their lamps. 
While the bridegroom tarried, they all slumbered and slept. 
And at midnight there was a cry made, Behold, the bridegroom cometh; go ye out to meet him. 
Then all those virgins arose, and trimmed their lamps. 
And the foolish said unto the wise, Give us of your oil; for our lamps are gone out. 
But the wise answered, saying, Not so; lest there be not enough for us and you: but go ye rather to them that sell, and bu
731, turneth away from his wickedness that he hath committed, and doeth that which is lawful and right, he shall save his soul alive. 
Because he considereth, and turneth away from all his transgressions that he hath committed, he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
Yet saith the house of Israel, The way of the LORD is not equal. O house of Israel, are not my ways equal? are not your ways unequal? 
Therefore I will judge you, O house of Israel, every one according to his ways, saith the Lord GOD. Repent, and turn yourselves from all your transgressions; so iniquity shall not be your ruin. 
Cast away from you all your transgressions, whereby ye have transgressed; and make you a new heart and a new spirit: for why will ye die
917,d appointed, went to Huldah the prophetess, the wife of Shallum the son of Tikvath, the son of Hasrah, keeper of the wardrobe; (now she dwelt in Jerusalem in the college:) and they spake to her to that effect. 
And she answered them, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Tell ye the man that sent you to me, 
Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, and upon the inhabitants thereof, even all the curses that are written in the book which they have read before the king of Judah: 
Because they have forsaken me, and have burned incense unto other gods, that they might provoke me to anger with all the works of their hands; therefore my wrath shall be poured out upon this place, and shall not be quenched. 
And as for the king of Judah, who sent you to enquire of the LORD, so shall ye say unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel concerning the words which thou hast heard; 
Because thine he
952,and a mother in Israel: why wilt thou swallow up the inheritance of the LORD? 
And Joab answered and said, Far be it, far be it from me, that I should swallow up or destroy. 
The matter is not so: but a man of mount Ephraim, Sheba the son of Bichri by name, hath lifted up his hand against the king, even against David: deliver him only, and I will depart from the city. And the woman said unto Joab, Behold, his head shall be thrown to thee over the wall. 
Then the woman went unto all the people in her wisdom. And they cut off the head of Sheba the son of Bichri, and cast it out to Joab. And he blew a trumpet, and they retired from the city, every man to his tent. And Joab returned to Jerusalem unto the king. 
Now Joab was over all the host of Israel: and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the Cherethites and over the Pelethites: 
And Adoram was over the tribute: and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was recorder: 
And Sheva was scribe: and Za
845,ORD, six covered wagons, and twelve oxen; a wagon for two of the princes, and for each one an ox: and they brought them before the tabernacle. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take it of them, that they may be to do the service of the tabernacle of the congregation; and thou shalt give them unto the Levites, to every man according to his service. 
And Moses took the wagons and the oxen, and gave them unto the Levites. 
Two wagons and four oxen he gave unto the sons of Gershon, according to their service: 
And four wagons and eight oxen he gave unto the sons of Merari, according unto their service, under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
But unto the sons of Kohath he gave none: because the service of the sanctuary belonging unto them was that they should bear upon their shoulders. 
And the princes offered for 
754,mained of the children of Kohath, even they had the cities of their lot out of the tribe of Ephraim. 
For they gave them Shechem with her suburbs in mount Ephraim, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Gezer with her suburbs, 
And Kibzaim with her suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Dan, Eltekeh with her suburbs, Gibbethon with her suburbs, 
Aijalon with her suburbs, Gathrimmon with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the half tribe of Manasseh, Tanach with her suburbs, and Gathrimmon with her suburbs; two cities. 
All the cities were ten with their suburbs for the families of the children of Kohath that remained. 
And unto the children of Gershon, of the families of the Levites, out of the othe
904,d that Uriah's wife bare unto David, and it was very sick. 
David therefore besought God for the child; and David fasted, and went in, and lay all night upon the earth. 
And the elders of his house arose, and went to him, to raise him up from the earth: but he would not, neither did he eat bread with them. 
And it came to pass on the seventh day, that the child died. And the servants of David feared to tell him that the child was dead: for they said, Behold, while the child was yet alive, we spake unto him, and he would not hearken unto our voice: how will he then vex himself, if we tell him that the child is dead? 
But when David saw that his servants whispered, David perceived that the child was dead: therefore David said unto his servants, Is the child dead? And they said, He is dead. 
Then David arose from the earth, and washed, and anointed himself, and changed his apparel, and came int
882, of Asnah, the children of Mehunim, the children of Nephusim, 
The children of Bakbuk, the children of Hakupha, the children of Harhur, 
The children of Bazluth, the children of Mehida, the children of Harsha, 
The children of Barkos, the children of Sisera, the children of Thamah, 
The children of Neziah, the children of Hatipha. 
The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the children of Sophereth, the children of Peruda, 
The children of Jaalah, the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel, 
The children of Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of Pochereth of Zebaim, the children of Ami. 
All the Nethinims, and the children of Solomon's servants, were three hundred ninety and two. 
And these were they which went up from Telmelah, Telharsa, Cherub, Addan, and Immer: but they could not shew their father's house, and their seed, whether the
847,ich thou gavest unto their fathers, and toward the city which thou hast chosen, and toward the house which I have built for thy name: 
Then hear thou from the heavens, even from thy dwelling place, their prayer and their supplications, and maintain their cause, and forgive thy people which have sinned against thee. 
Now, my God, let, I beseech thee, thine eyes be open, and let thine ears be attent unto the prayer that is made in this place. 
Now therefore arise, O LORD God, into thy resting place, thou, and the ark of thy strength: let thy priests, O LORD God, be clothed with salvation, and let thy saints rejoice in goodness. 
O LORD God, turn not away the face of thine anointed: remember the mercies of David thy servant. 
Now when Solomon had made an end of praying, the fire came down from heaven, and consumed the burnt offering and t
871,ighteously, and govern the nations upon earth. Selah. 
Let the people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise thee. 
Then shall the earth yield her increase; and God, even our own God, shall bless us. 
God shall bless us; and all the ends of the earth shall fear him. 
Let God arise, let his enemies be scattered: let them also that hate him flee before him. 
As smoke is driven away, so drive them away: as wax melteth before the fire, so let the wicked perish at the presence of God. 
But let the righteous be glad; let them rejoice before God: yea, let them exceedingly rejoice. 
Sing unto God, sing praises to his name: extol him that rideth upon the heavens by his name JAH, and rejoice before him. 
A father of the fatherless, and a judge of the widows, is God in his holy habitation. 
God setteth the solitary in families: he bringeth out those which are bou
954, LORD; now will I be exalted; now will I lift up myself. 
Ye shall conceive chaff, ye shall bring forth stubble: your breath, as fire, shall devour you. 
And the people shall be as the burnings of lime: as thorns cut up shall they be burned in the fire. 
Hear, ye that are far off, what I have done; and, ye that are near, acknowledge my might. 
The sinners in Zion are afraid; fearfulness hath surprised the hypocrites. Who among us shall dwell with the devouring fire? who among us shall dwell with everlasting burnings? 
He that walketh righteously, and speaketh uprightly; he that despiseth the gain of oppressions, that shaketh his hands from holding of bribes, that stoppeth his ears from hearing of blood, and shutteth his eyes from seeing evil; 
He shall dwell on high: his place of defence shall be the munitions of rocks: bread shall be given him; his waters shall be sure. 
Thine eyes shall see the king in his beauty: they shall behold the la
871,to year, and see that ye hasten the matter. Howbeit the Levites hastened it not. 
And the king called for Jehoiada the chief, and said unto him, Why hast thou not required of the Levites to bring in out of Judah and out of Jerusalem the collection, according to the commandment of Moses the servant of the LORD, and of the congregation of Israel, for the tabernacle of witness? 
For the sons of Athaliah, that wicked woman, had broken up the house of God; and also all the dedicated things of the house of the LORD did they bestow upon Baalim. 
And at the king's commandment they made a chest, and set it without at the gate of the house of the LORD. 
And they made a proclamation through Judah and Jerusalem, to bring in to the LORD the collection that Moses the servant of God laid upon Israel in the wilderness. 
And all the princes and all the people rejoiced, and br
969,in the congregation of the righteous. 
For the LORD knoweth the way of the righteous: but the way of the ungodly shall perish. 
Why do the heathen rage, and the people imagine a vain thing? 
The kings of the earth set themselves, and the rulers take counsel together, against the LORD, and against his anointed, saying, 
Let us break their bands asunder, and cast away their cords from us. 
He that sitteth in the heavens shall laugh: the LORD shall have them in derision. 
Then shall he speak unto them in his wrath, and vex them in his sore displeasure. 
Yet have I set my king upon my holy hill of Zion. 
I will declare the decree: the LORD hath said unto me, Thou art my Son; this day have I begotten thee. 
Ask of me, and I shall give thee the heathen for thine inheritance, and the uttermost parts of the earth for thy possession. 
Thou shalt break them with a rod of iron; thou shalt dash them in pieces like a potter's vessel. 
Be wise now therefore, O ye kings
740,and said, Let my lord speak; for thou hast strengthened me. 
Then said he, Knowest thou wherefore I come unto thee? and now will I return to fight with the prince of Persia: and when I am gone forth, lo, the prince of Grecia shall come. 
But I will shew thee that which is noted in the scripture of truth: and there is none that holdeth with me in these things, but Michael your prince. 
Also I in the first year of Darius the Mede, even I, stood to confirm and to strengthen him. 
And now will I shew thee the truth. Behold, there shall stand up yet three kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than they all: and by his strength through his riches he shall stir up all against the realm of Grecia. 
And a mighty king shall st
805,lone, of all the kingdoms of the earth: thou hast made heaven and earth. 
Incline thine ear, O LORD, and hear; open thine eyes, O LORD, and see: and hear all the words of Sennacherib, which hath sent to reproach the living God. 
Of a truth, LORD, the kings of Assyria have laid waste all the nations, and their countries, 
And have cast their gods into the fire: for they were no gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and stone: therefore they have destroyed them. 
Now therefore, O LORD our God, save us from his hand, that all the kingdoms of the earth may know that thou art the LORD, even thou only. 
Then Isaiah the son of Amoz sent unto Hezekiah, saying, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Whereas thou hast prayed to me against Sennacherib king of Assyria: 
This is the word which the LORD hath s
754,watered garden; and they shall not sorrow any more at all. 
Then shall the virgin rejoice in the dance, both young men and old together: for I will turn their mourning into joy, and will comfort them, and make them rejoice from their sorrow. 
And I will satiate the soul of the priests with fatness, and my people shall be satisfied with my goodness, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; A voice was heard in Ramah, lamentation, and bitter weeping; Rahel weeping for her children refused to be comforted for her children, because they were not. 
Thus saith the LORD; Refrain thy voice from weeping, and thine eyes from tears: for thy work shall be rewarded, saith the LORD; and they shall come again from the land of the enemy. 
And there is hope in thi
828,lso. 
At that day ye shall know that I am in my Father, and ye in me, and I in you. 
He that hath my commandments, and keepeth them, he it is that loveth me: and he that loveth me shall be loved of my Father, and I will love him, and will manifest myself to him. 
Judas saith unto him, not Iscariot, Lord, how is it that thou wilt manifest thyself unto us, and not unto the world? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, If a man love me, he will keep my words: and my Father will love him, and we will come unto him, and make our abode with him. 
He that loveth me not keepeth not my sayings: and the word which ye hear is not mine, but the Father's which sent me. 
These things have I spoken unto you, being yet present with you. 
But the Comforter, which is the Holy Ghost, whom the Father will send in my name, he shall teach you
789,oabitess said, He said unto me also, Thou shalt keep fast by my young men, until they have ended all my harvest. 
And Naomi said unto Ruth her daughter in law, It is good, my daughter, that thou go out with his maidens, that they meet thee not in any other field. 
So she kept fast by the maidens of Boaz to glean unto the end of barley harvest and of wheat harvest; and dwelt with her mother in law. 
Then Naomi her mother in law said unto her, My daughter, shall I not seek rest for thee, that it may be well with thee? 
And now is not Boaz of our kindred, with whose maidens thou wast? Behold, he winnoweth barley to night in the threshingfloor. 
Wash thyself therefore, and anoint thee, and put thy raiment upon thee, and get thee down to the floor: but make not thyself known unto the
1062,ns I may provoke to emulation them which are my flesh, and might save some of them. 
For if the casting away of them be the reconciling of the world, what shall the receiving of them be, but life from the dead? 
For if the firstfruit be holy, the lump is also holy: and if the root be holy, so are the branches. 
And if some of the branches be broken off, and thou, being a wild olive tree, wert graffed in among them, and with them partakest of the root and fatness of the olive tree; 
Boast not against the branches. But if thou boast, thou bearest not the root, but the root thee. 
Thou wilt say then, The branches were broken off, that I might be graffed in. 
Well; because of unbelief they were broken off, and thou standest by faith. Be not highminded, but fear: 
For if God spared not the natural branches, take heed lest he also spare not thee. 
Behold therefore the goodness and severity of God: on them which fell, severity; but toward thee, goodness, if thou continue in his goodness: otherwise thou also shalt be cut off. 
And they also, if they abid
1028,habiah, of the sons of Merari; 
And Bakbakkar, Heresh, and Galal, and Mattaniah the son of Micah, the son of Zichri, the son of Asaph; 
And Obadiah the son of Shemaiah, the son of Galal, the son of Jeduthun, and Berechiah the son of Asa, the son of Elkanah, that dwelt in the villages of the Netophathites. 
And the porters were, Shallum, and Akkub, and Talmon, and Ahiman, and their brethren: Shallum was the chief; 
Who hitherto waited in the king's gate eastward: they were porters in the companies of the children of Levi. 
And Shallum the son of Kore, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah, and his brethren, of the house of his father, the Korahites, were over the work of the service, keepers of the gates of the tabernacle: and their fathers, being over the host of the LORD, were keepers of the entry. 
And Phinehas the son of Eleazar was the ruler over them in time past, and the LORD was with him. 
And Zechariah the son of Meshelemiah was porter of the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
All these which we
974, man may see it; man may behold it afar off. 
Behold, God is great, and we know him not, neither can the number of his years be searched out. 
For he maketh small the drops of water: they pour down rain according to the vapour thereof: 
Which the clouds do drop and distil upon man abundantly. 
Also can any understand the spreadings of the clouds, or the noise of his tabernacle? 
Behold, he spreadeth his light upon it, and covereth the bottom of the sea. 
For by them judgeth he the people; he giveth meat in abundance. 
With clouds he covereth the light; and commandeth it not to shine by the cloud that cometh betwixt. 
The noise thereof sheweth concerning it, the cattle also concerning the vapour. 
At this also my heart trembleth, and is moved out of his place. 
Hear attentively the noise of his voice, and the sound that goeth out of his mouth. 
He directeth it under the whole heaven, and his lightning unto the ends of the earth. 
After it a voice roareth: he th
967,ims of gold, of beaten work shalt thou make them, in the two ends of the mercy seat. 
And make one cherub on the one end, and the other cherub on the other end: even of the mercy seat shall ye make the cherubims on the two ends thereof. 
And the cherubims shall stretch forth their wings on high, covering the mercy seat with their wings, and their faces shall look one to another; toward the mercy seat shall the faces of the cherubims be. 
And thou shalt put the mercy seat above upon the ark; and in the ark thou shalt put the testimony that I shall give thee. 
And there I will meet with thee, and I will commune with thee from above the mercy seat, from between the two cherubims which are upon the ark of the testimony, of all things which I will give thee in commandment unto the children of Israel. 
Thou shalt also make a table of shittim wood: two cubits shall be the length thereof, and a cubit the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the height thereo
1073,Darius king of Persia. 
Then the prophets, Haggai the prophet, and Zechariah the son of Iddo, prophesied unto the Jews that were in Judah and Jerusalem in the name of the God of Israel, even unto them. 
Then rose up Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son of Jozadak, and began to build the house of God which is at Jerusalem: and with them were the prophets of God helping them. 
At the same time came to them Tatnai, governor on this side the river, and Shetharboznai and their companions, and said thus unto them, Who hath commanded you to build this house, and to make up this wall? 
Then said we unto them after this manner, What are the names of the men that make this building? 
But the eye of their God was upon the elders of the Jews, that they could not cause them to cease, till the matter came to Darius: and then they returned answer by letter concerning this matter. 
The copy of the letter that Tatnai, governor on this side the river, and Shetharboznai and his companions the Apharsachites, which were on this side the river, sent unto Darius th
953,you Epaphroditus, my brother, and companion in labour, and fellowsoldier, but your messenger, and he that ministered to my wants. 
For he longed after you all, and was full of heaviness, because that ye had heard that he had been sick. 
For indeed he was sick nigh unto death: but God had mercy on him; and not on him only, but on me also, lest I should have sorrow upon sorrow. 
I sent him therefore the more carefully, that, when ye see him again, ye may rejoice, and that I may be the less sorrowful. 
Receive him therefore in the Lord with all gladness; and hold such in reputation: 
Because for the work of Christ he was nigh unto death, not regarding his life, to supply your lack of service toward me. 
Finally, my brethren, rejoice in the Lord. To write the same things to you, to me indeed is not grievous, but for you it is safe. 
Beware of dogs, beware of evil workers, beware of the concision. 
For we are the circumcision, which worship God
969,married, then his wife shall go out with him. 
If his master have given him a wife, and she have born him sons or daughters; the wife and her children shall be her master's, and he shall go out by himself. 
And if the servant shall plainly say, I love my master, my wife, and my children; I will not go out free: 
Then his master shall bring him unto the judges; he shall also bring him to the door, or unto the door post; and his master shall bore his ear through with an aul; and he shall serve him for ever. 
And if a man sell his daughter to be a maidservant, she shall not go out as the menservants do. 
If she please not her master, who hath betrothed her to himself, then shall he let her be redeemed: to sell her unto a strange nation he shall have no power, seeing he hath dealt deceitfully with her. 
And if he have betrothed her unto his son, he shall deal with her after the manner of daughters. 
If he take him another wife; her food, her raiment, and her 
907, 
Let my mouth be filled with thy praise and with thy honour all the day. 
Cast me not off in the time of old age; forsake me not when my strength faileth. 
For mine enemies speak against me; and they that lay wait for my soul take counsel together, 
Saying, God hath forsaken him: persecute and take him; for there is none to deliver him. 
O God, be not far from me: O my God, make haste for my help. 
Let them be confounded and consumed that are adversaries to my soul; let them be covered with reproach and dishonour that seek my hurt. 
But I will hope continually, and will yet praise thee more and more. 
My mouth shall shew forth thy righteousness and thy salvation all the day; for I know not the numbers thereof. 
I will go in the strength of the Lord GOD: I will make mention of thy righteousness, even of thine only. 
O God, thou hast taught me from my youth: and hitherto have I declared thy wond
1037, thee king over Israel? 
And the LORD sent thee on a journey, and said, Go and utterly destroy the sinners the Amalekites, and fight against them until they be consumed. 
Wherefore then didst thou not obey the voice of the LORD, but didst fly upon the spoil, and didst evil in the sight of the LORD? 
And Saul said unto Samuel, Yea, I have obeyed the voice of the LORD, and have gone the way which the LORD sent me, and have brought Agag the king of Amalek, and have utterly destroyed the Amalekites. 
But the people took of the spoil, sheep and oxen, the chief of the things which should have been utterly destroyed, to sacrifice unto the LORD thy God in Gilgal. 
And Samuel said, Hath the LORD as great delight in burnt offerings and sacrifices, as in obeying the voice of the LORD? Behold, to obey is better than sacrifice, and to hearken than the fat of rams. 
For rebellion is as the sin of witchcraft, and stubbornness is as iniquity and idolatry. Because thou hast rejected the word of the LORD, he hath also rejected thee from be
809, you good tidings of great joy, which shall be to all people. 
For unto you is born this day in the city of David a Saviour, which is Christ the Lord. 
And this shall be a sign unto you; Ye shall find the babe wrapped in swaddling clothes, lying in a manger. 
And suddenly there was with the angel a multitude of the heavenly host praising God, and saying, 
Glory to God in the highest, and on earth peace, good will toward men. 
And it came to pass, as the angels were gone away from them into heaven, the shepherds said one to another, Let us now go even unto Bethlehem, and see this thing which is come to pass, which the Lord hath made known unto us. 
And they came with haste, and found Mary, and Joseph, and the babe lying in a manger. 
And when they had seen it, they made known abroad the saying which
925,erefore wentest not thou with me, Mephibosheth? 
And he answered, My lord, O king, my servant deceived me: for thy servant said, I will saddle me an ass, that I may ride thereon, and go to the king; because thy servant is lame. 
And he hath slandered thy servant unto my lord the king; but my lord the king is as an angel of God: do therefore what is good in thine eyes. 
For all of my father's house were but dead men before my lord the king: yet didst thou set thy servant among them that did eat at thine own table. What right therefore have I yet to cry any more unto the king? 
And the king said unto him, Why speakest thou any more of thy matters? I have said, Thou and Ziba divide the land. 
And Mephibosheth said unto the king, Yea, let him take all, forasmuch as my lord the king is come again in peace unto his own house. 
And Barzillai the Gileadite came down from Rogelim, and went over Jordan with the king, to c
893,rees until the evening. 
And it came to pass at the time of the going down of the sun, that Joshua commanded, and they took them down off the trees, and cast them into the cave wherein they had been hid, and laid great stones in the cave's mouth, which remain until this very day. 
And that day Joshua took Makkedah, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof he utterly destroyed, them, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain: and he did to the king of Makkedah as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
Then Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, unto Libnah, and fought against Libnah: 
And the LORD delivered it also, and the king thereof, into the hand of Israel; and he smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain in it; but did unto the king thereof as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
And 
846,th executed my judgments, hath walked in my statutes; he shall not die for the iniquity of his father, he shall surely live. 
As for his father, because he cruelly oppressed, spoiled his brother by violence, and did that which is not good among his people, lo, even he shall die in his iniquity. 
Yet say ye, Why? doth not the son bear the iniquity of the father? When the son hath done that which is lawful and right, and hath kept all my statutes, and hath done them, he shall surely live. 
The soul that sinneth, it shall die. The son shall not bear the iniquity of the father, neither shall the father bear the iniquity of the son: the righteousness of the righteous shall be upon him, and the wickedness of the wicked shall be upon him. 
But if the wicked will turn from all his sins that he hath committed, and keep all my statutes, and do 
807, righteous over much; neither make thyself over wise: why shouldest thou destroy thyself ? 
Be not over much wicked, neither be thou foolish: why shouldest thou die before thy time? 
It is good that thou shouldest take hold of this; yea, also from this withdraw not thine hand: for he that feareth God shall come forth of them all. 
Wisdom strengtheneth the wise more than ten mighty men which are in the city. 
For there is not a just man upon earth, that doeth good, and sinneth not. 
Also take no heed unto all words that are spoken; lest thou hear thy servant curse thee: 
For oftentimes also thine own heart knoweth that thou thyself likewise hast cursed others. 
All this have I proved by wisdom: I said, I will be wise; but it was far from me. 
That which is far off, and exceeding deep, who can find
853, and two thousand and four hundred shekels. 
And therewith he made the sockets to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and the brasen altar, and the brasen grate for it, and all the vessels of the altar, 
And the sockets of the court round about, and the sockets of the court gate, and all the pins of the tabernacle, and all the pins of the court round about. 
And of the blue, and purple, and scarlet, they made cloths of service, to do service in the holy place, and made the holy garments for Aaron; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the ephod of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
And they did beat the gold into thin plates, and cut it into wires, to work it in the blue, and in the purple, and in the scarlet, and in the fine linen, with cunning work. 
They made shoulderpieces for it, to couple it to
1079, it up: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the children of Israel shall pitch their tents, every man by his own camp, and every man by his own standard, throughout their hosts. 
But the Levites shall pitch round about the tabernacle of testimony, that there be no wrath upon the congregation of the children of Israel: and the Levites shall keep the charge of the tabernacle of testimony. 
And the children of Israel did according to all that the LORD commanded Moses, so did they. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
Every man of the children of Israel shall pitch by his own standard, with the ensign of their father's house: far off about the tabernacle of the congregation shall they pitch. 
And on the east side toward the rising of the sun shall they of the standard of the camp of Judah pitch throughout their armies: and Nahshon the son of Amminadab shall be captain of the children of Judah. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were threescore and fourteen thousand and six hundred. 
And those that do pitc
757,nded: I brought forth my stuff by day, as stuff for captivity, and in the even I digged through the wall with mine hand; I brought it forth in the twilight, and I bare it upon my shoulder in their sight. 
And in the morning came the word of the LORD unto me, saying, 
Son of man, hath not the house of Israel, the rebellious house, said unto thee, What doest thou? 
Say thou unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; This burden concerneth the prince in Jerusalem, and all the house of Israel that are among them. 
Say, I am your sign: like as I have done, so shall it be done unto them: they shall remove and go into captivity. 
And the prince that is among them shall bear upon his shoulder in the twilight, and shall go forth: they shall dig through the wall t
820,ed, and all the house of Israel are uncircumcised in the heart. 
Hear ye the word which the LORD speaketh unto you, O house of Israel: 
Thus saith the LORD, Learn not the way of the heathen, and be not dismayed at the signs of heaven; for the heathen are dismayed at them. 
For the customs of the people are vain: for one cutteth a tree out of the forest, the work of the hands of the workman, with the axe. 
They deck it with silver and with gold; they fasten it with nails and with hammers, that it move not. 
They are upright as the palm tree, but speak not: they must needs be borne, because they cannot go. Be not afraid of them; for they cannot do evil, neither also is it in them to do good. 
Forasmuch as there is none like unto thee, O LORD; thou art great, and thy name is great in might. 
Who would not fear t
948, years. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
Then the word of the LORD came to Jehu the son of Hanani against Baasha, saying, 
Forasmuch as I exalted thee out of the dust, and made thee prince over my people Israel; and thou hast walked in the way of Jeroboam, and hast made my people Israel to sin, to provoke me to anger with their sins; 
Behold, I will take away the posterity of Baasha, and the posterity of his house; and will make thy house like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
Him that dieth of Baasha in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dieth of his in the fields shall the fowls of the air eat. 
Now the rest of the acts of Baasha, and what he did, and his might, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
So Baasha slept with his fathers, and was buried in Tirzah: and Elah his son reigned in his
1029,come might know them, even the children which should be born; who should arise and declare them to their children: 
That they might set their hope in God, and not forget the works of God, but keep his commandments: 
And might not be as their fathers, a stubborn and rebellious generation; a generation that set not their heart aright, and whose spirit was not stedfast with God. 
The children of Ephraim, being armed, and carrying bows, turned back in the day of battle. 
They kept not the covenant of God, and refused to walk in his law; 
And forgat his works, and his wonders that he had shewed them. 
Marvellous things did he in the sight of their fathers, in the land of Egypt, in the field of Zoan. 
He divided the sea, and caused them to pass through; and he made the waters to stand as an heap. 
In the daytime also he led them with a cloud, and all the night with a light of fire. 
He clave the rocks in the wilderness, and gave them drink as out of the great depths. 
He brought streams also out of the rock, and caused 
935,t stay them when his voice is heard. 
God thundereth marvellously with his voice; great things doeth he, which we cannot comprehend. 
For he saith to the snow, Be thou on the earth; likewise to the small rain, and to the great rain of his strength. 
He sealeth up the hand of every man; that all men may know his work. 
Then the beasts go into dens, and remain in their places. 
Out of the south cometh the whirlwind: and cold out of the north. 
By the breath of God frost is given: and the breadth of the waters is straitened. 
Also by watering he wearieth the thick cloud: he scattereth his bright cloud: 
And it is turned round about by his counsels: that they may do whatsoever he commandeth them upon the face of the world in the earth. 
He causeth it to come, whether for correction, or for his land, or for mercy. 
Hearken unto this, O Job: stand still, and consider the wondrous works of God. 
Dost thou know when God disposed 
940,vile work therein. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye be come into the land which I give unto you, and shall reap the harvest thereof, then ye shall bring a sheaf of the firstfruits of your harvest unto the priest: 
And he shall wave the sheaf before the LORD, to be accepted for you: on the morrow after the sabbath the priest shall wave it. 
And ye shall offer that day when ye wave the sheaf an he lamb without blemish of the first year for a burnt offering unto the LORD. 
And the meat offering thereof shall be two tenth deals of fine flour mingled with oil, an offering made by fire unto the LORD for a sweet savour: and the drink offering thereof shall be of wine, the fourth part of an hin. 
And ye shall eat neither bread, nor parched corn, nor green ears, until the selfsame day that ye have brought an offering unto your God: it shall be a statute for ever thro
745,hildren of Aaron. 
On that day they read in the book of Moses in the audience of the people; and therein was found written, that the Ammonite and the Moabite should not come into the congregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, that he should curse them: howbeit our God turned the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they separated from Israel all the mixed multitude. 
And before this, Eliashib the priest, having the oversight of the chamber of the house of our God, was allied unto Tobiah: 
And he had prepared for him a great chamber, where aforetime they laid the meat offerings, the frankincense, and the ve
947,
Thou didst strike through with his staves the head of his villages: they came out as a whirlwind to scatter me: their rejoicing was as to devour the poor secretly. 
Thou didst walk through the sea with thine horses, through the heap of great waters. 
When I heard, my belly trembled; my lips quivered at the voice: rottenness entered into my bones, and I trembled in myself, that I might rest in the day of trouble: when he cometh up unto the people, he will invade them with his troops. 
Although the fig tree shall not blossom, neither shall fruit be in the vines; the labour of the olive shall fail, and the fields shall yield no meat; the flock shall be cut off from the fold, and there shall be no herd in the stalls: 
Yet I will rejoice in the LORD, I will joy in the God of my salvation. 
The LORD God is my strength, and he will make my feet like hinds' feet, and he will make me to walk upon mine high places. To the chief singer on my s
1045,s the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he reared up the court round about the tabernacle and the altar, and set up the hanging of the court gate. So Moses finished the work. 
Then a cloud covered the tent of the congregation, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And Moses was not able to enter into the tent of the congregation, because the cloud abode thereon, and the glory of the LORD filled the tabernacle. 
And when the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle, the children of Israel went onward in all their journeys: 
But if the cloud were not taken up, then they journeyed not till the day that it was taken up. 
For the cloud of the LORD was upon the tabernacle by day, and fire was on it by night, in the sight of all the house of Israel, throughout all their journeys. 
And the LORD called unto Moses, and spake unto him out of the tabernacle of the congregation, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, If any man of you bring an offering unto the LORD, ye shall bring your offering of the cattle, 
787,hout all the tribes of Israel, saying, As soon as ye hear the sound of the trumpet, then ye shall say, Absalom reigneth in Hebron. 
And with Absalom went two hundred men out of Jerusalem, that were called; and they went in their simplicity, and they knew not any thing. 
And Absalom sent for Ahithophel the Gilonite, David's counsellor, from his city, even from Giloh, while he offered sacrifices. And the conspiracy was strong; for the people increased continually with Absalom. 
And there came a messenger to David, saying, The hearts of the men of Israel are after Absalom. 
And David said unto all his servants that were with him at Jerusalem, Arise, and let us flee; for we shall not else escape from Absalom: make speed to depart, lest he overtake us suddenly, and bring evil upon 
1026, the son of Pedaiah, the son of Kolaiah, the son of Maaseiah, the son of Ithiel, the son of Jesaiah. 
And after him Gabbai, Sallai, nine hundred twenty and eight. 
And Joel the son of Zichri was their overseer: and Judah the son of Senuah was second over the city. 
Of the priests: Jedaiah the son of Joiarib, Jachin. 
Seraiah the son of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok, the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, was the ruler of the house of God. 
And their brethren that did the work of the house were eight hundred twenty and two: and Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pelaliah, the son of Amzi, the son of Zechariah, the son of Pashur, the son of Malchiah. 
And his brethren, chief of the fathers, two hundred forty and two: and Amashai the son of Azareel, the son of Ahasai, the son of Meshillemoth, the son of Immer, 
And their brethren, mighty men of valour, an hundred twenty and eight: and their overseer was Zabdiel, the son of one of the great men. 
Also of the Levites: Shemaiah the son of Hashub
1060,avy loaden; they are a burden to the weary beast. 
They stoop, they bow down together; they could not deliver the burden, but themselves are gone into captivity. 
Hearken unto me, O house of Jacob, and all the remnant of the house of Israel, which are borne by me from the belly, which are carried from the womb: 
And even to your old age I am he; and even to hoar hairs will I carry you: I have made, and I will bear; even I will carry, and will deliver you. 
To whom will ye liken me, and make me equal, and compare me, that we may be like? 
They lavish gold out of the bag, and weigh silver in the balance, and hire a goldsmith; and he maketh it a god: they fall down, yea, they worship. 
They bear him upon the shoulder, they carry him, and set him in his place, and he standeth; from his place shall he not remove: yea, one shall cry unto him, yet can he not answer, nor save him out of his trouble. 
Remember this, and shew yourselves men: bring it again to mind, O ye transgressors. 
Remember the former things of old: for I am God, and there is none el
987, through faith unto salvation ready to be revealed in the last time. 
Wherein ye greatly rejoice, though now for a season, if need be, ye are in heaviness through manifold temptations: 
That the trial of your faith, being much more precious than of gold that perisheth, though it be tried with fire, might be found unto praise and honour and glory at the appearing of Jesus Christ: 
Whom having not seen, ye love; in whom, though now ye see him not, yet believing, ye rejoice with joy unspeakable and full of glory: 
Receiving the end of your faith, even the salvation of your souls. 
Of which salvation the prophets have enquired and searched diligently, who prophesied of the grace that should come unto you: 
Searching what, or what manner of time the Spirit of Christ which was in them did signify, when it testified beforehand the sufferings of Christ, and the glory that should follow. 
Unto whom it was revealed, that not unto themselves, but unto us they did minister the things,
846,e above that which he seeth me to be, or that he heareth of me. 
And lest I should be exalted above measure through the abundance of the revelations, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, the messenger of Satan to buffet me, lest I should be exalted above measure. 
For this thing I besought the Lord thrice, that it might depart from me. 
And he said unto me, My grace is sufficient for thee: for my strength is made perfect in weakness. Most gladly therefore will I rather glory in my infirmities, that the power of Christ may rest upon me. 
Therefore I take pleasure in infirmities, in reproaches, in necessities, in persecutions, in distresses for Christ's sake: for when I am weak, then am I strong. 
I am become a fool in glorying; ye have compelled me: for I ought to have been commended of you: for in nothing am I behind the very c
824,ire of the righteous is only good: but the expectation of the wicked is wrath. 
There is that scattereth, and yet increaseth; and there is that withholdeth more than is meet, but it tendeth to poverty. 
The liberal soul shall be made fat: and he that watereth shall be watered also himself. 
He that withholdeth corn, the people shall curse him: but blessing shall be upon the head of him that selleth it. 
He that diligently seeketh good procureth favour: but he that seeketh mischief, it shall come unto him. 
He that trusteth in his riches shall fall; but the righteous shall flourish as a branch. 
He that troubleth his own house shall inherit the wind: and the fool shall be servant to the wise of heart. 
The fruit of the righteous is a tree of life; and he that winneth souls is wise. 
Behold, the righteous shall be 
753,ood in the entering in of the cave. And, behold, there came a voice unto him, and said, What doest thou here, Elijah? 
And he said, I have been very jealous for the LORD God of hosts: because the children of Israel have forsaken thy covenant, thrown down thine altars, and slain thy prophets with the sword; and I, even I only, am left; and they seek my life, to take it away. 
And the LORD said unto him, Go, return on thy way to the wilderness of Damascus: and when thou comest, anoint Hazael to be king over Syria: 
And Jehu the son of Nimshi shalt thou anoint to be king over Israel: and Elisha the son of Shaphat of Abelmeholah shalt thou anoint to be prophet in thy room. 
And it shall come to pass, that him that escapeth the sword of Hazael shal
730,rter, and shall plaister the house. 
And if the plague come again, and break out in the house, after that he hath taken away the stones, and after he hath scraped the house, and after it is plaistered; 
Then the priest shall come and look, and, behold, if the plague be spread in the house, it is a fretting leprosy in the house; it is unclean. 
And he shall break down the house, the stones of it, and the timber thereof, and all the morter of the house; and he shall carry them forth out of the city into an unclean place. 
Moreover he that goeth into the house all the while that it is shut up shall be unclean until the even. 
And he that lieth in the house shall wash his clothes; and he that eateth in the house shall wash h
1033,he young man the Levite, even unto the house of Micah, and saluted him. 
And the six hundred men appointed with their weapons of war, which were of the children of Dan, stood by the entering of the gate. 
And the five men that went to spy out the land went up, and came in thither, and took the graven image, and the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image: and the priest stood in the entering of the gate with the six hundred men that were appointed with weapons of war. 
And these went into Micah's house, and fetched the carved image, the ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image. Then said the priest unto them, What do ye? 
And they said unto him, Hold thy peace, lay thine hand upon thy mouth, and go with us, and be to us a father and a priest: is it better for thee to be a priest unto the house of one man, or that thou be a priest unto a tribe and a family in Israel? 
And the priest's heart was glad, and he took the ephod, and the teraphim, and the graven image, and went in the midst of the people. 
So they 
720,at we shall judge angels? how much more things that pertain to this life? 
If then ye have judgments of things pertaining to this life, set them to judge who are least esteemed in the church. 
I speak to your shame. Is it so, that there is not a wise man among you? no, not one that shall be able to judge between his brethren? 
But brother goeth to law with brother, and that before the unbelievers. 
Now therefore there is utterly a fault among you, because ye go to law one with another. Why do ye not rather take wrong? why do ye not rather suffer yourselves to be defrauded? 
Nay, ye do wrong, and defraud, and that your brethren. 
Know ye not that the unrighteous shall not inherit the kingdom of God? Be not decei
1059, Zalmunna: 
Who said, Let us take to ourselves the houses of God in possession. 
O my God, make them like a wheel; as the stubble before the wind. 
As the fire burneth a wood, and as the flame setteth the mountains on fire; 
So persecute them with thy tempest, and make them afraid with thy storm. 
Fill their faces with shame; that they may seek thy name, O LORD. 
Let them be confounded and troubled for ever; yea, let them be put to shame, and perish: 
That men may know that thou, whose name alone is JEHOVAH, art the most high over all the earth. 
How amiable are thy tabernacles, O LORD of hosts! 
My soul longeth, yea, even fainteth for the courts of the LORD: my heart and my flesh crieth out for the living God. 
Yea, the sparrow hath found an house, and the swallow a nest for herself, where she may lay her young, even thine altars, O LORD of hosts, my King, and my God. 
Blessed are they that dwell in thy house: they will be still praising thee. Selah. 
Blessed is the man whose strength is in thee; in whose heart are the ways of them. 
Who pass
982, maketh it dry, and drieth up all the rivers: Bashan languisheth, and Carmel, and the flower of Lebanon languisheth. 
The mountains quake at him, and the hills melt, and the earth is burned at his presence, yea, the world, and all that dwell therein. 
Who can stand before his indignation? and who can abide in the fierceness of his anger? his fury is poured out like fire, and the rocks are thrown down by him. 
The LORD is good, a strong hold in the day of trouble; and he knoweth them that trust in him. 
But with an overrunning flood he will make an utter end of the place thereof, and darkness shall pursue his enemies. 
What do ye imagine against the LORD? he will make an utter end: affliction shall not rise up the second time. 
For while they be folden together as thorns, and while they are drunken as drunkards, they shall be devoured as stubble fully dry. 
There is one come out of thee, that imagineth evil against the LORD, a wicked counsellor. 
Thus saith the LORD; T
1040,and melteth them: he causeth his wind to blow, and the waters flow. 
He sheweth his word unto Jacob, his statutes and his judgments unto Israel. 
He hath not dealt so with any nation: and as for his judgments, they have not known them. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise ye the LORD from the heavens: praise him in the heights. 
Praise ye him, all his angels: praise ye him, all his hosts. 
Praise ye him, sun and moon: praise him, all ye stars of light. 
Praise him, ye heavens of heavens, and ye waters that be above the heavens. 
Let them praise the name of the LORD: for he commanded, and they were created. 
He hath also stablished them for ever and ever: he hath made a decree which shall not pass. 
Praise the LORD from the earth, ye dragons, and all deeps: 
Fire, and hail; snow, and vapours; stormy wind fulfilling his word: 
Mountains, and all hills; fruitful trees, and all cedars: 
Beasts, and all cattle; creeping things, and flying fowl: 
Kings of the earth, and all people; princes, and all judges of the earth: 
904,heathen also before them, and divided them an inheritance by line, and made the tribes of Israel to dwell in their tents. 
Yet they tempted and provoked the most high God, and kept not his testimonies: 
But turned back, and dealt unfaithfully like their fathers: they were turned aside like a deceitful bow. 
For they provoked him to anger with their high places, and moved him to jealousy with their graven images. 
When God heard this, he was wroth, and greatly abhorred Israel: 
So that he forsook the tabernacle of Shiloh, the tent which he placed among men; 
And delivered his strength into captivity, and his glory into the enemy's hand. 
He gave his people over also unto the sword; and was wroth with his inheritance. 
The fire consumed their young men; and their maidens were not given to marriage. 
Their priests fell by the sword; and their widows made no lamentation. 
Then the LORD awaked as
929, also went abroad. 
The voice of thy thunder was in the heaven: the lightnings lightened the world: the earth trembled and shook. 
Thy way is in the sea, and thy path in the great waters, and thy footsteps are not known. 
Thou leddest thy people like a flock by the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
Give ear, O my people, to my law: incline your ears to the words of my mouth. 
I will open my mouth in a parable: I will utter dark sayings of old: 
Which we have heard and known, and our fathers have told us. 
We will not hide them from their children, shewing to the generation to come the praises of the LORD, and his strength, and his wonderful works that he hath done. 
For he established a testimony in Jacob, and appointed a law in Israel, which he commanded our fathers, that they should make them known to their children: 
That the generation to come might know them, even the children which should be born; who should arise and
1042,of Judah. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were threescore and fourteen thousand and six hundred. 
And those that do pitch next unto him shall be the tribe of Issachar: and Nethaneel the son of Zuar shall be captain of the children of Issachar. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and four thousand and four hundred. 
Then the tribe of Zebulun: and Eliab the son of Helon shall be captain of the children of Zebulun. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and seven thousand and four hundred. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Judah were an hundred thousand and fourscore thousand and six thousand and four hundred, throughout their armies. These shall first set forth. 
On the south side shall be the standard of the camp of Reuben according to their armies: and the captain of the children of Reuben shall be Elizur the son of Shedeur. 
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were forty and six thousand and five hundred. 
And those which pitch by h
919,inst him that shaketh it? as if the rod should shake itself against them that lift it up, or as if the staff should lift up itself, as if it were no wood. 
Therefore shall the Lord, the Lord of hosts, send among his fat ones leanness; and under his glory he shall kindle a burning like the burning of a fire. 
And the light of Israel shall be for a fire, and his Holy One for a flame: and it shall burn and devour his thorns and his briers in one day; 
And shall consume the glory of his forest, and of his fruitful field, both soul and body: and they shall be as when a standard-bearer fainteth. 
And the rest of the trees of his forest shall be few, that a child may write them. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the remnant of Israel, and such as are escaped of the house of Jacob, shall no more again stay upon him that smote them; but shall stay upon the LORD, the Holy One of Israel, in truth. 
The rem
755,e men of Judah and inhabitants of Jerusalem: lest my fury come forth like fire, and burn that none can quench it, because of the evil of your doings. 
Declare ye in Judah, and publish in Jerusalem; and say, Blow ye the trumpet in the land: cry, gather together, and say, Assemble yourselves, and let us go into the defenced cities. 
Set up the standard toward Zion: retire, stay not: for I will bring evil from the north, and a great destruction. 
The lion is come up from his thicket, and the destroyer of the Gentiles is on his way; he is gone forth from his place to make thy land desolate; and thy cities shall be laid waste, without an inhabitant. 
For this gird you with sackcloth, lament and howl: for the fierce anger of the LORD is not turned bac
940, the glory of his inheritance in the saints, 
And what is the exceeding greatness of his power to us-ward who believe, according to the working of his mighty power, 
Which he wrought in Christ, when he raised him from the dead, and set him at his own right hand in the heavenly places, 
Far above all principality, and power, and might, and dominion, and every name that is named, not only in this world, but also in that which is to come: 
And hath put all things under his feet, and gave him to be the head over all things to the church, 
Which is his body, the fulness of him that filleth all in all. 
And you hath he quickened, who were dead in trespasses and sins; 
Wherein in time past ye walked according to the course of this world, according to the prince of the power of the air, the spirit that now worketh in the children of disobedience: 
Among whom also we all had our conversation in times past in the lusts of our flesh, ful
845,equal unto the angels; and are the children of God, being the children of the resurrection. 
Now that the dead are raised, even Moses shewed at the bush, when he calleth the Lord the God of Abraham, and the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob. 
For he is not a God of the dead, but of the living: for all live unto him. 
Then certain of the scribes answering said, Master, thou hast well said. 
And after that they durst not ask him any question at all. 
And he said unto them, How say they that Christ is David's son? 
And David himself saith in the book of Psalms, The LORD said unto my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand, 
Till I make thine enemies thy footstool. 
David therefore calleth him Lord, how is he then his son? 
Then in the audience of all the people he said unto his disciples, 
Beware of the scribes, which desire to walk in long ro
1002,t burn with fire a third part in the midst of the city, when the days of the siege are fulfilled: and thou shalt take a third part, and smite about it with a knife: and a third part thou shalt scatter in the wind; and I will draw out a sword after them. 
Thou shalt also take thereof a few in number, and bind them in thy skirts. 
Then take of them again, and cast them into the midst of the fire, and burn them in the fire; for thereof shall a fire come forth into all the house of Israel. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; This is Jerusalem: I have set it in the midst of the nations and countries that are round about her. 
And she hath changed my judgments into wickedness more than the nations, and my statutes more than the countries that are round about her: for they have refused my judgments and my statutes, they have not walked in them. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye multiplied more than the nations that are round about you, and have not walked in my statutes, neither have kept my
770, in Tyre and Sidon, which have been done in you, they had a great while ago repented, sitting in sackcloth and ashes. 
But it shall be more tolerable for Tyre and Sidon at the judgment, than for you. 
And thou, Capernaum, which art exalted to heaven, shalt be thrust down to hell. 
He that heareth you heareth me; and he that despiseth you despiseth me; and he that despiseth me despiseth him that sent me. 
And the seventy returned again with joy, saying, Lord, even the devils are subject unto us through thy name. 
And he said unto them, I beheld Satan as lightning fall from heaven. 
Behold, I give unto you power to tread on serpents and scorpions, and over all the power of the enemy: and nothing shall by any means hurt you. 
Notwithstanding in this rejoice not, 
971,rst day at even, remain all night until the morning. 
Thou mayest not sacrifice the passover within any of thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee: 
But at the place which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name in, there thou shalt sacrifice the passover at even, at the going down of the sun, at the season that thou camest forth out of Egypt. 
And thou shalt roast and eat it in the place which the LORD thy God shall choose: and thou shalt turn in the morning, and go unto thy tents. 
Six days thou shalt eat unleavened bread: and on the seventh day shall be a solemn assembly to the LORD thy God: thou shalt do no work therein. 
Seven weeks shalt thou number unto thee: begin to number the seven weeks from such time as thou beginnest to put the sickle to the corn. 
And thou shalt keep the feast of weeks unto the LORD thy God with a tribute of a freewill offering of thine hand, which thou shalt give unto the LORD thy God, according as the LORD thy 
1050, even they also turned to be with the Israelites that were with Saul and Jonathan. 
Likewise all the men of Israel which had hid themselves in mount Ephraim, when they heard that the Philistines fled, even they also followed hard after them in the battle. 
So the LORD saved Israel that day: and the battle passed over unto Bethaven. 
And the men of Israel were distressed that day: for Saul had adjured the people, saying, Cursed be the man that eateth any food until evening, that I may be avenged on mine enemies. So none of the people tasted any food. 
And all they of the land came to a wood; and there was honey upon the ground. 
And when the people were come into the wood, behold, the honey dropped; but no man put his hand to his mouth: for the people feared the oath. 
But Jonathan heard not when his father charged the people with the oath: wherefore he put forth the end of the rod that was in his hand, and dipped it in an honeycomb, and put his hand to his mouth; and his eyes were enlightened. 
Then answered one of the people, and sai
899, thee, How art thou destroyed, that wast inhabited of seafaring men, the renowned city, which wast strong in the sea, she and her inhabitants, which cause their terror to be on all that haunt it! 
Now shall the isles tremble in the day of thy fall; yea, the isles that are in the sea shall be troubled at thy departure. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; When I shall make thee a desolate city, like the cities that are not inhabited; when I shall bring up the deep upon thee, and great waters shall cover thee; 
When I shall bring thee down with them that descend into the pit, with the people of old time, and shall set thee in the low parts of the earth, in places desolate of old, with them that go down to the pit, that thou be not inhabited; and I shall set glory in the land of the living; 
I will make thee a terror, and thou shalt be no more: though thou be sought for, yet shalt thou never be f
1064,e Girgashites, and the Amorites, and the Canaanites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, seven nations greater and mightier than thou; 
And when the LORD thy God shall deliver them before thee; thou shalt smite them, and utterly destroy them; thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor shew mercy unto them: 
Neither shalt thou make marriages with them; thy daughter thou shalt not give unto his son, nor his daughter shalt thou take unto thy son. 
For they will turn away thy son from following me, that they may serve other gods: so will the anger of the LORD be kindled against you, and destroy thee suddenly. 
But thus shall ye deal with them; ye shall destroy their altars, and break down their images, and cut down their groves, and burn their graven images with fire. 
For thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God: the LORD thy God hath chosen thee to be a special people unto himself, above all people that are upon the face of the earth. 
The LORD did not set his love upon you, nor choose you, because ye were more in number than
785,ou hast enlarged my steps under me, that my feet did not slip. 
I have pursued mine enemies, and overtaken them: neither did I turn again till they were consumed. 
I have wounded them that they were not able to rise: they are fallen under my feet. 
For thou hast girded me with strength unto the battle: thou hast subdued under me those that rose up against me. 
Thou hast also given me the necks of mine enemies; that I might destroy them that hate me. 
They cried, but there was none to save them: even unto the LORD, but he answered them not. 
Then did I beat them small as the dust before the wind: I did cast them out as the dirt in the streets. 
Thou hast delivered me from the strivings of the people; and thou hast made me the head of the heathen: a people whom I have not know
955,s stead. 
And when Husham was dead, Hadad the son of Bedad, which smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith. 
And when Hadad was dead, Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And when Samlah was dead, Shaul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And when Shaul was dead, Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead. 
And when Baalhanan was dead, Hadad reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Pai; and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab. 
Hadad died also. And the dukes of Edom were; duke Timnah, duke Aliah, duke Jetheth, 
Duke Aholibamah, duke Elah, duke Pinon, 
Duke Kenaz, duke Teman, duke Mibzar, 
Duke Magdiel, duke Iram. These are the dukes of Edom. 
These are the sons of Israel; Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah, Issachar, and Zebulun, 
Dan, Joseph, and Benjamin, Naphtali, Gad, and Asher. 
The sons of Judah; Er, and Onan, and
832,d thy father walked, and do according to all that I have commanded thee, and shalt observe my statutes and my judgments; 
Then will I stablish the throne of thy kingdom, according as I have covenanted with David thy father, saying, There shall not fail thee a man to be ruler in Israel. 
But if ye turn away, and forsake my statutes and my commandments, which I have set before you, and shall go and serve other gods, and worship them; 
Then will I pluck them up by the roots out of my land which I have given them; and this house, which I have sanctified for my name, will I cast out of my sight, and will make it to be a proverb and a byword among all nations. 
And this house, which is high, shall be an astonishment to every one that passeth by it; so that he shall say, Why hath the LORD done thus unto this land, and unto this
810,ey cause some to fall. 
For they eat the bread of wickedness, and drink the wine of violence. 
But the path of the just is as the shining light, that shineth more and more unto the perfect day. 
The way of the wicked is as darkness: they know not at what they stumble. 
My son, attend to my words; incline thine ear unto my sayings. 
Let them not depart from thine eyes; keep them in the midst of thine heart. 
For they are life unto those that find them, and health to all their flesh. 
Keep thy heart with all diligence; for out of it are the issues of life. 
Put away from thee a froward mouth, and perverse lips put far from thee. 
Let thine eyes look right on, and let thine eyelids look straight before thee. 
Ponder the path of thy feet, and let all thy ways be established. 
Turn not to the right hand 
808,thou art cursed above all cattle, and above every beast of the field; upon thy belly shalt thou go, and dust shalt thou eat all the days of thy life: 
And I will put enmity between thee and the woman, and between thy seed and her seed; it shall bruise thy head, and thou shalt bruise his heel. 
Unto the woman he said, I will greatly multiply thy sorrow and thy conception; in sorrow thou shalt bring forth children; and thy desire shall be to thy husband, and he shall rule over thee. 
And unto Adam he said, Because thou hast hearkened unto the voice of thy wife, and hast eaten of the tree, of which I commanded thee, saying, Thou shalt not eat of it: cursed is the ground for thy sake; in sorrow shalt thou eat of it all the days of thy life; 
Thorns also and thistles shall it bring forth to thee; and t
837,ong the prophets, then the people said one to another, What is this that is come unto the son of Kish? Is Saul also among the prophets? 
And one of the same place answered and said, But who is their father? Therefore it became a proverb, Is Saul also among the prophets? 
And when he had made an end of prophesying, he came to the high place. 
And Saul's uncle said unto him and to his servant, Whither went ye? And he said, To seek the asses: and when we saw that they were no where, we came to Samuel. 
And Saul's uncle said, Tell me, I pray thee, what Samuel said unto you. 
And Saul said unto his uncle, He told us plainly that the asses were found. But of the matter of the kingdom, whereof Samuel spake, he told him not. 
And Samuel called the people together unto the LORD to Mizpeh; 
And said unto the children of Israel, Thus sa
920,eir waves, and the tumult of the people. 
They also that dwell in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy tokens: thou makest the outgoings of the morning and evening to rejoice. 
Thou visitest the earth, and waterest it: thou greatly enrichest it with the river of God, which is full of water: thou preparest them corn, when thou hast so provided for it. 
Thou waterest the ridges thereof abundantly: thou settlest the furrows thereof: thou makest it soft with showers: thou blessest the springing thereof. 
Thou crownest the year with thy goodness; and thy paths drop fatness. 
They drop upon the pastures of the wilderness: and the little hills rejoice on every side. 
The pastures are clothed with flocks; the valleys also are covered over with corn; they shout for joy, they also sing. 
Make a joyful noise unto God, all ye lands: 
Sing forth the honour of his name: make his praise glorious. 
Say unto God, How terri
1005,ft he be, shall be found any more in thee; and the sound of a millstone shall be heard no more at all in thee; 
And the light of a candle shall shine no more at all in thee; and the voice of the bridegroom and of the bride shall be heard no more at all in thee: for thy merchants were the great men of the earth; for by thy sorceries were all nations deceived. 
And in her was found the blood of prophets, and of saints, and of all that were slain upon the earth. 
And after these things I heard a great voice of much people in heaven, saying, Alleluia; Salvation, and glory, and honour, and power, unto the Lord our God: 
For true and righteous are his judgments: for he hath judged the great whore, which did corrupt the earth with her fornication, and hath avenged the blood of his servants at her hand. 
And again they said, Alleluia And her smoke rose up for ever and ever. 
And the four and twenty elders and the four beasts fell down and worshipped God that sat on the throne, saying, Amen; Allelui
1056,said unto them, He that soweth the good seed is the Son of man; 
The field is the world; the good seed are the children of the kingdom; but the tares are the children of the wicked one; 
The enemy that sowed them is the devil; the harvest is the end of the world; and the reapers are the angels. 
As therefore the tares are gathered and burned in the fire; so shall it be in the end of this world. 
The Son of man shall send forth his angels, and they shall gather out of his kingdom all things that offend, and them which do iniquity; 
And shall cast them into a furnace of fire: there shall be wailing and gnashing of teeth. 
Then shall the righteous shine forth as the sun in the kingdom of their Father. Who hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto treasure hid in a field; the which when a man hath found, he hideth, and for joy thereof goeth and selleth all that he hath, and buyeth that field. 
Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a merchant man, seeking goodly pearls: 
Who, when he had found one pearl of g
1005,ard the remnant of his children which he shall leave: 
So that he will not give to any of them of the flesh of his children whom he shall eat: because he hath nothing left him in the siege, and in the straitness, wherewith thine enemies shall distress thee in all thy gates. 
The tender and delicate woman among you, which would not adventure to set the sole of her foot upon the ground for delicateness and tenderness, her eye shall be evil toward the husband of her bosom, and toward her son, and toward her daughter, 
And toward her young one that cometh out from between her feet, and toward her children which she shall bear: for she shall eat them for want of all things secretly in the siege and straitness, wherewith thine enemy shall distress thee in thy gates. 
If thou wilt not observe to do all the words of this law that are written in this book, that thou mayest fear this glorious and fearful name, THE LORD THY GOD; 
Then the LORD will make thy plagues wonderful, and the plagues of thy se
939,the ruler of the people, and let him go free. 
He made him lord of his house, and ruler of all his substance: 
To bind his princes at his pleasure; and teach his senators wisdom. 
Israel also came into Egypt; and Jacob sojourned in the land of Ham. 
And he increased his people greatly; and made them stronger than their enemies. 
He turned their heart to hate his people, to deal subtilly with his servants. 
He sent Moses his servant; and Aaron whom he had chosen. 
They shewed his signs among them, and wonders in the land of Ham. 
He sent darkness, and made it dark; and they rebelled not against his word. 
He turned their waters into blood, and slew their fish. 
Their land brought forth frogs in abundance, in the chambers of their kings. 
He spake, and there came divers sorts of flies, and lice in all their coasts. 
He gave them hail for rain, and flaming fire in their land. 
He smote their vines also and their fig trees; and b
812,d, I stand at the door, and knock: if any man hear my voice, and open the door, I will come in to him, and will sup with him, and he with me. 
To him that overcometh will I grant to sit with me in my throne, even as I also overcame, and am set down with my Father in his throne. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches. 
After this I looked, and, behold, a door was opened in heaven: and the first voice which I heard was as it were of a trumpet talking with me; which said, Come up hither, and I will shew thee things which must be hereafter. 
And immediately I was in the spirit: and, behold, a throne was set in heaven, and one sat on the throne. 
And he that sat was to look upon like a jasper and a sardine stone: and there was a rainbow round about the throne, in sight l
997,mmunicate forget not: for with such sacrifices God is well pleased. 
Obey them that have the rule over you, and submit yourselves: for they watch for your souls, as they that must give account, that they may do it with joy, and not with grief: for that is unprofitable for you. 
Pray for us: for we trust we have a good conscience, in all things willing to live honestly. 
But I beseech you the rather to do this, that I may be restored to you the sooner. 
Now the God of peace, that brought again from the dead our Lord Jesus, that great shepherd of the sheep, through the blood of the everlasting covenant, 
Make you perfect in every good work to do his will, working in you that which is wellpleasing in his sight, through Jesus Christ; to whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
And I beseech you, brethren, suffer the word of exhortation: for I have written a letter unto you in few words. 
Know ye that our brother Timothy is set at liberty; with whom, if he come shortly, I will see you. 
S
972,of years shall be unto thee forty and nine years. 
Then shalt thou cause the trumpet of the jubile to sound on the tenth day of the seventh month, in the day of atonement shall ye make the trumpet sound throughout all your land. 
And ye shall hallow the fiftieth year, and proclaim liberty throughout all the land unto all the inhabitants thereof: it shall be a jubile unto you; and ye shall return every man unto his possession, and ye shall return every man unto his family. 
A jubile shall that fiftieth year be unto you: ye shall not sow, neither reap that which groweth of itself in it, nor gather the grapes in it of thy vine undressed. 
For it is the jubile; it shall be holy unto you: ye shall eat the increase thereof out of the field. 
In the year of this jubile ye shall return every man unto his possession. 
And if thou sell ought unto thy neighbour, or buyest ought of thy neighbour's hand, ye shall not oppress one another: 
According to the number of years
1052, evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of his father, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
And Baasha the son of Ahijah, of the house of Issachar, conspired against him; and Baasha smote him at Gibbethon, which belonged to the Philistines; for Nadab and all Israel laid siege to Gibbethon. 
Even in the third year of Asa king of Judah did Baasha slay him, and reigned in his stead. 
And it came to pass, when he reigned, that he smote all the house of Jeroboam; he left not to Jeroboam any that breathed, until he had destroyed him, according unto the saying of the LORD, which he spake by his servant Ahijah the Shilonite: 
Because of the sins of Jeroboam which he sinned, and which he made Israel sin, by his provocation wherewith he provoked the LORD God of Israel to anger. 
Now the rest of the acts of Nadab, and all that he did, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel? 
And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days. 
In the third year of Asa king of Judah be
913,and shall be clean. 
And on the eighth day he shall take to him two turtledoves, or two young pigeons, and come before the LORD unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and give them unto the priest: 
And the priest shall offer them, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD for his issue. 
And if any man's seed of copulation go out from him, then he shall wash all his flesh in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And every garment, and every skin, whereon is the seed of copulation, shall be washed with water, and be unclean until the even. 
The woman also with whom man shall lie with seed of copulation, they shall both bathe themselves in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And if a woman have an issue, and her issue in her flesh be blood, she shall be put apart seven days: and whosoever toucheth he
720,gal; that ye may know the righteousness of the LORD. 
Wherewith shall I come before the LORD, and bow myself before the high God? shall I come before him with burnt offerings, with calves of a year old? 
Will the LORD be pleased with thousands of rams, or with ten thousands of rivers of oil? shall I give my firstborn for my transgression, the fruit of my body for the sin of my soul? 
He hath shewed thee, O man, what is good; and what doth the LORD require of thee, but to do justly, and to love mercy, and to walk humbly with thy God? 
The LORD's voice crieth unto the city, and the man of wisdom shall see thy name: hear ye the rod, and who hath appointed it. 
Are there yet the treasures of wickedness in the house
721,onths: it shall be the first month of the year to you. 
Speak ye unto all the congregation of Israel, saying, In the tenth day of this month they shall take to them every man a lamb, according to the house of their fathers, a lamb for an house: 
And if the household be too little for the lamb, let him and his neighbour next unto his house take it according to the number of the souls; every man according to his eating shall make your count for the lamb. 
Your lamb shall be without blemish, a male of the first year: ye shall take it out from the sheep, or from the goats: 
And ye shall keep it up until the fourteenth day of the same month: and the whole assembly of the congregation of Israel shall kill it in the ev
786,ot to heart. 
But now thus saith the LORD that created thee, O Jacob, and he that formed thee, O Israel, Fear not: for I have redeemed thee, I have called thee by thy name; thou art mine. 
When thou passest through the waters, I will be with thee; and through the rivers, they shall not overflow thee: when thou walkest through the fire, thou shalt not be burned; neither shall the flame kindle upon thee. 
For I am the LORD thy God, the Holy One of Israel, thy Saviour: I gave Egypt for thy ransom, Ethiopia and Seba for thee. 
Since thou wast precious in my sight, thou hast been honourable, and I have loved thee: therefore will I give men for thee, and people for thy life. 
Fear not: for I am with thee: I will bring thy seed from the east, and gather thee from the west; 
I will s
1034,r Lord? are not ye my work in the Lord? 
If I be not an apostle unto others, yet doubtless I am to you: for the seal of mine apostleship are ye in the Lord. 
Mine answer to them that do examine me is this, 
Have we not power to eat and to drink? 
Have we not power to lead about a sister, a wife, as well as other apostles, and as the brethren of the Lord, and Cephas? 
Or I only and Barnabas, have not we power to forbear working? 
Who goeth a warfare any time at his own charges? who planteth a vineyard, and eateth not of the fruit thereof? or who feedeth a flock, and eateth not of the milk of the flock? 
Say I these things as a man? or saith not the law the same also? 
For it is written in the law of Moses, thou shalt not muzzle the mouth of the ox that treadeth out the corn. Doth God take care for oxen? 
Or saith he it altogether for our sakes? For our sakes, no doubt, this is written: that he that ploweth should plow in hope; and that he that thresheth in hope should be partaker of his hope. 
If we have sown unto you s
743,ng in at the doors. 
Unto you, O men, I call; and my voice is to the sons of man. 
O ye simple, understand wisdom: and, ye fools, be ye of an understanding heart. 
Hear; for I will speak of excellent things; and the opening of my lips shall be right things. 
For my mouth shall speak truth; and wickedness is an abomination to my lips. 
All the words of my mouth are in righteousness; there is nothing froward or perverse in them. 
They are all plain to him that understandeth, and right to them that find knowledge. 
Receive my instruction, and not silver; and knowledge rather than choice gold. 
For wisdom is better than rubies; and all the things that may be desired are not to be compared to it. 
I wisdom dwell with prudence, and find ou
1041, from helping me, and from the words of my roaring? 
O my God, I cry in the day time, but thou hearest not; and in the night season, and am not silent. 
But thou art holy, O thou that inhabitest the praises of Israel. 
Our fathers trusted in thee: they trusted, and thou didst deliver them. 
They cried unto thee, and were delivered: they trusted in thee, and were not confounded. 
But I am a worm, and no man; a reproach of men, and despised of the people. 
All they that see me laugh me to scorn: they shoot out the lip, they shake the head, saying, 
He trusted on the LORD that he would deliver him: let him deliver him, seeing he delighted in him. 
But thou art he that took me out of the womb: thou didst make me hope when I was upon my mother's breasts. 
I was cast upon thee from the womb: thou art my God from my mother's belly. 
Be not far from me; for trouble is near; for there is none to help. 
Many bulls have compassed me: strong bulls of Bashan have beset me round. 
They gaped upon me with their mouths, as a ravening and a r
764,d his brother Asaph, who stood on his right hand, even Asaph the son of Berachiah, the son of Shimea, 
The son of Michael, the son of Baaseiah, the son of Malchiah, 
The son of Ethni, the son of Zerah, the son of Adaiah, 
The son of Ethan, the son of Zimmah, the son of Shimei, 
The son of Jahath, the son of Gershom, the son of Levi. 
And their brethren the sons of Merari stood on the left hand: Ethan the son of Kishi, the son of Abdi, the son of Malluch, 
The son of Hashabiah, the son of Amaziah, the son of Hilkiah, 
The son of Amzi, the son of Bani, the son of Shamer, 
The son of Mahli, the son of Mushi, the son of Merari, the son of Levi. 
Their brethren also the Levites were appointed unto all manner of service of the tabernacle of the house of God. 

822,ttle that goeth before me and the children be able to endure, until I come unto my lord unto Seir. 
And Esau said, Let me now leave with thee some of the folk that are with me. And he said, What needeth it? let me find grace in the sight of my lord. 
So Esau returned that day on his way unto Seir. 
And Jacob journeyed to Succoth, and built him an house, and made booths for his cattle: therefore the name of the place is called Succoth. 
And Jacob came to Shalem, a city of Shechem, which is in the land of Canaan, when he came from Padanaram; and pitched his tent before the city. 
And he bought a parcel of a field, where he had spread his tent, at the hand of the children of Hamor, Shechem's father, for an hundred pieces of money. 
And he erected there an altar, and called it EleloheIsrael. 
And Dinah the daughter
956,ome. 
But Mary stood without at the sepulchre weeping: and as she wept, she stooped down, and looked into the sepulchre, 
And seeth two angels in white sitting, the one at the head, and the other at the feet, where the body of Jesus had lain. 
And they say unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? She saith unto them, Because they have taken away my LORD, and I know not where they have laid him. 
And when she had thus said, she turned herself back, and saw Jesus standing, and knew not that it was Jesus. 
Jesus saith unto her, Woman, why weepest thou? whom seekest thou? She, supposing him to be the gardener, saith unto him, Sir, if thou have borne him hence, tell me where thou hast laid him, and I will take him away. 
Jesus saith unto her, Mary. She turned herself, and saith unto him, Rabboni; which is to say, Master. 
Jesus saith unto her, Touch me not; for I am not yet ascended to my Father: but go to my brethren, and say unto them, I ascend unto m
936,and which thou gavest before them, neither turned they from their wicked works. 
Behold, we are servants this day, and for the land that thou gavest unto our fathers to eat the fruit thereof and the good thereof, behold, we are servants in it: 
And it yieldeth much increase unto the kings whom thou hast set over us because of our sins: also they have dominion over our bodies, and over our cattle, at their pleasure, and we are in great distress. 
And because of all this we make a sure covenant, and write it; and our princes, Levites, and priests, seal unto it. 
Now those that sealed were, Nehemiah, the Tirshatha, the son of Hachaliah, and Zidkijah, 
Seraiah, Azariah, Jeremiah, 
Pashur, Amariah, Malchijah, 
Hattush, Shebaniah, Malluch, 
Harim, Meremoth, Obadiah, 
Daniel, Ginnethon, Baruch, 
Meshullam, Abijah, Mijamin, 
Maaziah, Bilgai, Shemaiah: these were the priests. 
And the Levites: both Jeshua the son of Azaniah, Binnui
963, a Benjamite, of the smallest of the tribes of Israel? and my family the least of all the families of the tribe of Benjamin? wherefore then speakest thou so to me? 
And Samuel took Saul and his servant, and brought them into the parlour, and made them sit in the chiefest place among them that were bidden, which were about thirty persons. 
And Samuel said unto the cook, Bring the portion which I gave thee, of which I said unto thee, Set it by thee. 
And the cook took up the shoulder, and that which was upon it, and set it before Saul. And Samuel said, Behold that which is left! set it before thee, and eat: for unto this time hath it been kept for thee since I said, I have invited the people. So Saul did eat with Samuel that day. 
And when they were come down from the high place into the city, Samuel communed with Saul upon the top of the house. 
And they arose early: and it came to pass about the spring of the day, that Samuel called Saul to the top 
804, Ziph, and Ziphah, Tiria, and Asareel. 
And the sons of Ezra were, Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and Jalon: and she bare Miriam, and Shammai, and Ishbah the father of Eshtemoa. 
And his wife Jehudijah bare Jered the father of Gedor, and Heber the father of Socho, and Jekuthiel the father of Zanoah. And these are the sons of Bithiah the daughter of Pharaoh, which Mered took. 
And the sons of his wife Hodiah the sister of Naham, the father of Keilah the Garmite, and Eshtemoa the Maachathite. 
And the sons of Shimon were, Amnon, and Rinnah, Benhanan, and Tilon. And the sons of Ishi were, Zoheth, and Benzoheth. 
The sons of Shelah the son of Judah were, Er the father of Lecah, and Laadah the father of Mareshah, and the families of the house of them that wrought fine linen, of the house of Ashbea, 
1030, David went on his way, and Saul returned to his place. 
And David said in his heart, I shall now perish one day by the hand of Saul: there is nothing better for me than that I should speedily escape into the land of the Philistines; and Saul shall despair of me, to seek me any more in any coast of Israel: so shall I escape out of his hand. 
And David arose, and he passed over with the six hundred men that were with him unto Achish, the son of Maoch, king of Gath. 
And David dwelt with Achish at Gath, he and his men, every man with his household, even David with his two wives, Ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail the Carmelitess, Nabal's wife. 
And it was told Saul that David was fled to Gath: and he sought no more again for him. 
And David said unto Achish, If I have now found grace in thine eyes, let them give me a place in some town in the country, that I may dwell there: for why should thy servant dwell in the royal city with thee? 
Then Achish gave him Ziklag that day: wherefore Ziklag pertaineth unto the kin
914,thjair, unto this day. 
And I gave Gilead unto Machir. 
And unto the Reubenites and unto the Gadites I gave from Gilead even unto the river Arnon half the valley, and the border even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all that are meet for the war. 
But your wives, and your little ones, and your cattle, (for I know that ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I have given you; 
Until the LORD have given rest unto your brethren, as well as unto you, and until they also possess the land which the LORD your God hath given them beyond Jordan: 
811,honour: so that there shall not be any among the kings like unto thee all thy days. 
And if thou wilt walk in my ways, to keep my statutes and my commandments, as thy father David did walk, then I will lengthen thy days. 
And Solomon awoke; and, behold, it was a dream. And he came to Jerusalem, and stood before the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and offered up burnt offerings, and offered peace offerings, and made a feast to all his servants. 
Then came there two women, that were harlots, unto the king, and stood before him. 
And the one woman said, O my lord, I and this woman dwell in one house; and I was delivered of a child with her in the house. 
And it came to pass the third day after that I was delivered, that this woman was delivered also: and we were together; there was no stranger with us 
978,you, that ye also may have fellowship with us: and truly our fellowship is with the Father, and with his Son Jesus Christ. 
And these things write we unto you, that your joy may be full. 
This then is the message which we have heard of him, and declare unto you, that God is light, and in him is no darkness at all. 
If we say that we have fellowship with him, and walk in darkness, we lie, and do not the truth: 
But if we walk in the light, as he is in the light, we have fellowship one with another, and the blood of Jesus Christ his Son cleanseth us from all sin. 
If we say that we have no sin, we deceive ourselves, and the truth is not in us. 
If we confess our sins, he is faithful and just to forgive us our sins, and to cleanse us from all unrighteousness. 
If we say that we have not sinned, we make him a liar, and his word is not in us. 
My little children, these things write I unto you, that ye sin not. And if any man sin, we have an advocate with the Father, Je
1055, in the land which thou gavest unto our fathers. 
Moreover concerning a stranger, that is not of thy people Israel, but cometh out of a far country for thy name's sake; 
(For they shall hear of thy great name, and of thy strong hand, and of thy stretched out arm;) when he shall come and pray toward this house; 
Hear thou in heaven thy dwelling place, and do according to all that the stranger calleth to thee for: that all people of the earth may know thy name, to fear thee, as do thy people Israel; and that they may know that this house, which I have builded, is called by thy name. 
If thy people go out to battle against their enemy, whithersoever thou shalt send them, and shall pray unto the LORD toward the city which thou hast chosen, and toward the house that I have built for thy name: 
Then hear thou in heaven their prayer and their supplication, and maintain their cause. 
If they sin against thee, (for there is no man that sinneth not,) and thou be angry with them, and deliver them to the enemy, so that they carry them away captives un
803,, the child Jesus tarried behind in Jerusalem; and Joseph and his mother knew not of it. 
But they, supposing him to have been in the company, went a day's journey; and they sought him among their kinsfolk and acquaintance. 
And when they found him not, they turned back again to Jerusalem, seeking him. 
And it came to pass, that after three days they found him in the temple, sitting in the midst of the doctors, both hearing them, and asking them questions. 
And all that heard him were astonished at his understanding and answers. 
And when they saw him, they were amazed: and his mother said unto him, Son, why hast thou thus dealt with us? behold, thy father and I have sought thee sorrowing. 
And he said unto them, How is it that ye sought me? wist ye not that I must be about my Father's busine
950,r works. 
I say again, let no man think me a fool; if otherwise, yet as a fool receive me, that I may boast myself a little. 
That which I speak, I speak it not after the Lord, but as it were foolishly, in this confidence of boasting. 
Seeing that many glory after the flesh, I will glory also. 
For ye suffer fools gladly, seeing ye yourselves are wise. 
For ye suffer, if a man bring you into bondage, if a man devour you, if a man take of you, if a man exalt himself, if a man smite you on the face. 
I speak as concerning reproach, as though we had been weak. Howbeit whereinsoever any is bold, (I speak foolishly,) I am bold also. 
Are they Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am I. Are they the seed of Abraham? so am I. 
Are they ministers of Christ? (I speak as a fool) I am more; in labours more abundant, in stripes above measure, in prisons more frequent, in deaths oft. 
Of the Jews five times received I forty stripes save one. 
Th
855,And she went forth, and said unto her mother, What shall I ask? And she said, The head of John the Baptist. 
And she came in straightway with haste unto the king, and asked, saying, I will that thou give me by and by in a charger the head of John the Baptist. 
And the king was exceeding sorry; yet for his oath's sake, and for their sakes which sat with him, he would not reject her. 
And immediately the king sent an executioner, and commanded his head to be brought: and he went and beheaded him in the prison, 
And brought his head in a charger, and gave it to the damsel: and the damsel gave it to her mother. 
And when his disciples heard of it, they came and took up his corpse, and laid it in a tomb. 
And the apostles gathered themselves together unto Jesus, and told him all things, both what they had done, and what they had taught. 
And he sai
1069,ty companions to be with him. 
And Samson said unto them, I will now put forth a riddle unto you: if ye can certainly declare it me within the seven days of the feast, and find it out, then I will give you thirty sheets and thirty change of garments: 
But if ye cannot declare it me, then shall ye give me thirty sheets and thirty change of garments. And they said unto him, Put forth thy riddle, that we may hear it. 
And he said unto them, Out of the eater came forth meat, and out of the strong came forth sweetness. And they could not in three days expound the riddle. 
And it came to pass on the seventh day, that they said unto Samson's wife, Entice thy husband, that he may declare unto us the riddle, lest we burn thee and thy father's house with fire: have ye called us to take that we have? is it not so? 
And Samson's wife wept before him, and said, Thou dost but hate me, and lovest me not: thou hast put forth a riddle unto the children of my people, and hast not told it me. And he said unto her, Behold, I have not told it my father nor my mother, and sh
1017,And the fourth row, a beryl, an onyx, and a jasper: they were inclosed in ouches of gold in their inclosings. 
And the stones were according to the names of the children of Israel, twelve, according to their names, like the engravings of a signet, every one with his name, according to the twelve tribes. 
And they made upon the breastplate chains at the ends, of wreathen work of pure gold. 
And they made two ouches of gold, and two gold rings; and put the two rings in the two ends of the breastplate. 
And they put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings on the ends of the breastplate. 
And the two ends of the two wreathen chains they fastened in the two ouches, and put them on the shoulderpieces of the ephod, before it. 
And they made two rings of gold, and put them on the two ends of the breastplate, upon the border of it, which was on the side of the ephod inward. 
And they made two other golden rings, and put them on the two sides of the ephod underneath, toward the forepart of it, over agai
941,one small stone found there. 
And Absalom and all the men of Israel said, The counsel of Hushai the Archite is better than the counsel of Ahithophel. For the LORD had appointed to defeat the good counsel of Ahithophel, to the intent that the LORD might bring evil upon Absalom. 
Then said Hushai unto Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, Thus and thus did Ahithophel counsel Absalom and the elders of Israel; and thus and thus have I counselled. 
Now therefore send quickly, and tell David, saying, Lodge not this night in the plains of the wilderness, but speedily pass over; lest the king be swallowed up, and all the people that are with him. 
Now Jonathan and Ahimaaz stayed by Enrogel; for they might not be seen to come into the city: and a wench went and told them; and they went and told king David. 
Nevertheless a lad saw them, and told Absalom: but they went both of them away quickly, and came to a man's house in Bahurim, which ha
1072,but go and serve other gods, and worship them: 
Then will I cut off Israel out of the land which I have given them; and this house, which I have hallowed for my name, will I cast out of my sight; and Israel shall be a proverb and a byword among all people: 
And at this house, which is high, every one that passeth by it shall be astonished, and shall hiss; and they shall say, Why hath the LORD done thus unto this land, and to this house? 
And they shall answer, Because they forsook the LORD their God, who brought forth their fathers out of the land of Egypt, and have taken hold upon other gods, and have worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath the LORD brought upon them all this evil. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, when Solomon had built the two houses, the house of the LORD, and the king's house, 
(Now Hiram the king of Tyre had furnished Solomon with cedar trees and fir trees, and with gold, according to all his desire,) that then king Solomon gave Hiram twenty cities in the land of Galilee. 
And Hiram came out from Tyre to see t
1027,ther fill their bowels: because it is the stumblingblock of their iniquity. 
As for the beauty of his ornament, he set it in majesty: but they made the images of their abominations and of their detestable things therein: therefore have I set it far from them. 
And I will give it into the hands of the strangers for a prey, and to the wicked of the earth for a spoil; and they shall pollute it. 
My face will I turn also from them, and they shall pollute my secret place: for the robbers shall enter into it, and defile it. 
Make a chain: for the land is full of bloody crimes, and the city is full of violence. 
Wherefore I will bring the worst of the heathen, and they shall possess their houses: I will also make the pomp of the strong to cease; and their holy places shall be defiled. 
Destruction cometh; and they shall seek peace, and there shall be none. 
Mischief shall come upon mischief, and rumour shall be upon rumour; then shall they seek a vision of the prophet; but the law shall perish from the priest, and coun
851, for they repented at the preaching of Jonas; and, behold, a greater than Jonas is here. 
No man, when he hath lighted a candle, putteth it in a secret place, neither under a bushel, but on a candlestick, that they which come in may see the light. 
The light of the body is the eye: therefore when thine eye is single, thy whole body also is full of light; but when thine eye is evil, thy body also is full of darkness. 
Take heed therefore that the light which is in thee be not darkness. 
If thy whole body therefore be full of light, having no part dark, the whole shall be full of light, as when the bright shining of a candle doth give thee light. 
And as he spake, a certain Pharisee besought him to dine with him: and he went in, and sat down to meat. 
And when the Pharisee saw it, he marvelled that he had not first washed before dinner. 
And
755,ered Eliphaz the Temanite, and said, 
Should a wise man utter vain knowledge, and fill his belly with the east wind? 
Should he reason with unprofitable talk? or with speeches wherewith he can do no good? 
Yea, thou castest off fear, and restrainest prayer before God. 
For thy mouth uttereth thine iniquity, and thou choosest the tongue of the crafty. 
Thine own mouth condemneth thee, and not I: yea, thine own lips testify against thee. 
Art thou the first man that was born? or wast thou made before the hills? 
Hast thou heard the secret of God? and dost thou restrain wisdom to thyself? 
What knowest thou, that we know not? what understandest thou, which is not in us? 
With us are both the grayheaded and very aged men, much elder than thy father.
1008,h sworn by himself, saith the LORD the God of hosts, I abhor the excellency of Jacob, and hate his palaces: therefore will I deliver up the city with all that is therein. 
And it shall come to pass, if there remain ten men in one house, that they shall die. 
And a man's uncle shall take him up, and he that burneth him, to bring out the bones out of the house, and shall say unto him that is by the sides of the house, Is there yet any with thee? and he shall say, No. Then shall he say, Hold thy tongue: for we may not make mention of the name of the LORD. 
For, behold, the LORD commandeth, and he will smite the great house with breaches, and the little house with clefts. 
Shall horses run upon the rock? will one plow there with oxen? for ye have turned judgment into gall, and the fruit of righteousness into hemlock: 
Ye which rejoice in a thing of nought, which say, Have we not taken to us horns by our own strength? 
But, behold, I will raise up against you a nation, O house of Israel, saith the 
850,gether in one all things in Christ, both which are in heaven, and which are on earth; even in him: 
In whom also we have obtained an inheritance, being predestinated according to the purpose of him who worketh all things after the counsel of his own will: 
That we should be to the praise of his glory, who first trusted in Christ. 
In whom ye also trusted, after that ye heard the word of truth, the gospel of your salvation: in whom also after that ye believed, ye were sealed with that holy Spirit of promise, 
Which is the earnest of our inheritance until the redemption of the purchased possession, unto the praise of his glory. 
Wherefore I also, after I heard of your faith in the Lord Jesus, and love unto all the saints, 
Cease not to give thanks for you, making mention of you in my prayers; 
That the God of our Lord Jesus Christ, the Fath
926,ish; and Joshua smote him and his people, until he had left him none remaining. 
And from Lachish Joshua passed unto Eglon, and all Israel with him; and they encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And they took it on that day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein he utterly destroyed that day, according to all that he had done to Lachish. 
And Joshua went up from Eglon, and all Israel with him, unto Hebron; and they fought against it: 
And they took it, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof, and all the souls that were therein; he left none remaining, according to all that he had done to Eglon; but destroyed it utterly, and all the souls that were therein. 
And Joshua returned, and all Israel with him, to Debir; and fought against it: 
And he took it, and the king thereof, and all the cities thereof; and they smote t
1049,the rock in Horeb; and thou shalt smite the rock, and there shall come water out of it, that the people may drink. And Moses did so in the sight of the elders of Israel. 
And he called the name of the place Massah, and Meribah, because of the chiding of the children of Israel, and because they tempted the LORD, saying, Is the LORD among us, or not? 
Then came Amalek, and fought with Israel in Rephidim. 
And Moses said unto Joshua, Choose us out men, and go out, fight with Amalek: to morrow I will stand on the top of the hill with the rod of God in mine hand. 
So Joshua did as Moses had said to him, and fought with Amalek: and Moses, Aaron, and Hur went up to the top of the hill. 
And it came to pass, when Moses held up his hand, that Israel prevailed: and when he let down his hand, Amalek prevailed. 
But Moses hands were heavy; and they took a stone, and put it under him, and he sat thereon; and Aaron and Hur stayed up his hands, the one on the one side, and the other on the other side; and his hands were steady until the going down 
912,as the elect of God, holy and beloved, bowels of mercies, kindness, humbleness of mind, meekness, longsuffering; 
Forbearing one another, and forgiving one another, if any man have a quarrel against any: even as Christ forgave you, so also do ye. 
And above all these things put on charity, which is the bond of perfectness. 
And let the peace of God rule in your hearts, to the which also ye are called in one body; and be ye thankful. 
Let the word of Christ dwell in you richly in all wisdom; teaching and admonishing one another in psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing with grace in your hearts to the Lord. 
And whatsoever ye do in word or deed, do all in the name of the Lord Jesus, giving thanks to God and the Father by him. 
Wives, submit yourselves unto your own husbands, as it is fit in the Lord. 
Husbands, love your wives, and be not bitter against them. 
Children, obey your parents in al
962,th her according to his vow which he had vowed: and she knew no man. And it was a custom in Israel, 
That the daughters of Israel went yearly to lament the daughter of Jephthah the Gileadite four days in a year. 
And the men of Ephraim gathered themselves together, and went northward, and said unto Jephthah, Wherefore passedst thou over to fight against the children of Ammon, and didst not call us to go with thee? we will burn thine house upon thee with fire. 
And Jephthah said unto them, I and my people were at great strife with the children of Ammon; and when I called you, ye delivered me not out of their hands. 
And when I saw that ye delivered me not, I put my life in my hands, and passed over against the children of Ammon, and the LORD delivered them into my hand: wherefore then are ye come up unto me this day, to fight against me? 
Then Jephthah gathered together all the men of Gilead, and fought with Ephraim: and the men of Gilead smote Ephr
1003, I will make an everlasting covenant with them. 
And their seed shall be known among the Gentiles, and their offspring among the people: all that see them shall acknowledge them, that they are the seed which the LORD hath blessed. 
I will greatly rejoice in the LORD, my soul shall be joyful in my God; for he hath clothed me with the garments of salvation, he hath covered me with the robe of righteousness, as a bridegroom decketh himself with ornaments, and as a bride adorneth herself with her jewels. 
For as the earth bringeth forth her bud, and as the garden causeth the things that are sown in it to spring forth; so the Lord GOD will cause righteousness and praise to spring forth before all the nations. 
For Zion's sake will I not hold my peace, and for Jerusalem's sake I will not rest, until the righteousness thereof go forth as brightness, and the salvation thereof as a lamp that burneth. 
And the Gentiles shall see thy righteousness, and all kings thy glory: and thou shalt be called b
913,nd thou shalt take fine flour, and bake twelve cakes thereof: two tenth deals shall be in one cake. 
And thou shalt set them in two rows, six on a row, upon the pure table before the LORD. 
And thou shalt put pure frankincense upon each row, that it may be on the bread for a memorial, even an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
Every sabbath he shall set it in order before the LORD continually, being taken from the children of Israel by an everlasting covenant. 
And it shall be Aaron's and his sons'; and they shall eat it in the holy place: for it is most holy unto him of the offerings of the LORD made by fire by a perpetual statute. 
And the son of an Israelitish woman, whose father was an Egyptian, went out among the children of Israel: and this son of the Israelitish woman and a man of Israel strove together in the camp; 
And the Israelitish woman's son blasphemed the name of the Lord, and curse
966, valley of Jezreel. 
But the Spirit of the LORD came upon Gideon, and he blew a trumpet; and Abiezer was gathered after him. 
And he sent messengers throughout all Manasseh; who also was gathered after him: and he sent messengers unto Asher, and unto Zebulun, and unto Naphtali; and they came up to meet them. 
And Gideon said unto God, If thou wilt save Israel by mine hand, as thou hast said, 
Behold, I will put a fleece of wool in the floor; and if the dew be on the fleece only, and it be dry upon all the earth beside, then shall I know that thou wilt save Israel by mine hand, as thou hast said. 
And it was so: for he rose up early on the morrow, and thrust the fleece together, and wringed the dew out of the fleece, a bowl full of water. 
And Gideon said unto God, Let not thine anger be hot against me, and I will speak but this once: let me prove, I pray thee, but this once with the fleece; let it now be dry only upon the fleece, and upon all the groun
753,d out of Eshtaol, six hundred men appointed with weapons of war. 
And they went up, and pitched in Kirjathjearim, in Judah: wherefore they called that place Mahanehdan unto this day: behold, it is behind Kirjathjearim. 
And they passed thence unto mount Ephraim, and came unto the house of Micah. 
Then answered the five men that went to spy out the country of Laish, and said unto their brethren, Do ye know that there is in these houses an ephod, and teraphim, and a graven image, and a molten image? now therefore consider what ye have to do. 
And they turned thitherward, and came to the house of the young man the Levite, even unto the house of Micah, and saluted him. 
And the six hundred men appointed with their weapons of war, which were of the
813,om strife: but every fool will be meddling. 
The sluggard will not plow by reason of the cold; therefore shall he beg in harvest, and have nothing. 
Counsel in the heart of man is like deep water; but a man of understanding will draw it out. 
Most men will proclaim every one his own goodness: but a faithful man who can find? 
The just man walketh in his integrity: his children are blessed after him. 
A king that sitteth in the throne of judgment scattereth away all evil with his eyes. 
Who can say, I have made my heart clean, I am pure from my sin? 
Divers weights, and divers measures, both of them are alike abomination to the LORD. 
Even a child is known by his doings, whether his work be pure, and whether it be right. 
The hearing ear, and the seeing eye, the LORD hath made even both of them. 
Love n
821, unto death. 
Then said the LORD, Thou hast had pity on the gourd, for the which thou hast not laboured, neither madest it grow; which came up in a night, and perished in a night: 
And should not I spare Nineveh, that great city, wherein are more then sixscore thousand persons that cannot discern between their right hand and their left hand; and also much cattle? 
The word of the LORD that came to Micah the Morasthite in the days of Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, which he saw concerning Samaria and Jerusalem. 
Hear, all ye people; hearken, O earth, and all that therein is: and let the Lord GOD be witness against you, the LORD from his holy temple. 
For, behold, the LORD cometh forth out of his place, and will come down, and tread upon the high places of the earth. 
And the mountains shall be molte
1011,th by courses: a month they were in Lebanon, and two months at home: and Adoniram was over the levy. 
And Solomon had threescore and ten thousand that bare burdens, and fourscore thousand hewers in the mountains; 
Beside the chief of Solomon's officers which were over the work, three thousand and three hundred, which ruled over the people that wrought in the work. 
And the king commanded, and they brought great stones, costly stones, and hewed stones, to lay the foundation of the house. 
And Solomon's builders and Hiram's builders did hew them, and the stonesquarers: so they prepared timber and stones to build the house. 
And it came to pass in the four hundred and eightieth year after the children of Israel were come out of the land of Egypt, in the fourth year of Solomon's reign over Israel, in the month Zif, which is the second month, that he began to build the house of the LORD. 
And the house which king Solomon built for the LORD, the length thereof was threescore cubits, and the breadth the
891, earth is my footstool: what house will ye build me? saith the Lord: or what is the place of my rest? 
Hath not my hand made all these things? 
Ye stiffnecked and uncircumcised in heart and ears, ye do always resist the Holy Ghost: as your fathers did, so do ye. 
Which of the prophets have not your fathers persecuted? and they have slain them which shewed before of the coming of the Just One; of whom ye have been now the betrayers and murderers: 
Who have received the law by the disposition of angels, and have not kept it. 
When they heard these things, they were cut to the heart, and they gnashed on him with their teeth. 
But he, being full of the Holy Ghost, looked up stedfastly into heaven, and saw the glory of God, and Jesus standing on the right hand of God, 
And said, Behold, I see the heavens opened, and the Son of man standing on the right hand of God. 
Then they cried o
896,he chief captain Lysias came upon us, and with great violence took him away out of our hands, 
Commanding his accusers to come unto thee: by examining of whom thyself mayest take knowledge of all these things, whereof we accuse him. 
And the Jews also assented, saying that these things were so. 
Then Paul, after that the governor had beckoned unto him to speak, answered, Forasmuch as I know that thou hast been of many years a judge unto this nation, I do the more cheerfully answer for myself: 
Because that thou mayest understand, that there are yet but twelve days since I went up to Jerusalem for to worship. 
And they neither found me in the temple disputing with any man, neither raising up the people, neither in the synagogues, nor in the city: 
Neither can they prove the things whereof they now accuse me. 
But this I confess unto thee, that after the way which they call heresy, so 
876,ew ye to them, and before the churches, the proof of your love, and of our boasting on your behalf. 
For as touching the ministering to the saints, it is superfluous for me to write to you: 
For I know the forwardness of your mind, for which I boast of you to them of Macedonia, that Achaia was ready a year ago; and your zeal hath provoked very many. 
Yet have I sent the brethren, lest our boasting of you should be in vain in this behalf; that, as I said, ye may be ready: 
Lest haply if they of Macedonia come with me, and find you unprepared, we (that we say not, ye) should be ashamed in this same confident boasting. 
Therefore I thought it necessary to exhort the brethren, that they would go before unto you, and make up beforehand your bounty, whereof ye had notice before, that the same might be ready, as a matter of bounty, and not as of covetousness. 
But this I
852, in my wrath, They shall not enter into my rest.) 
Take heed, brethren, lest there be in any of you an evil heart of unbelief, in departing from the living God. 
But exhort one another daily, while it is called To day; lest any of you be hardened through the deceitfulness of sin. 
For we are made partakers of Christ, if we hold the beginning of our confidence stedfast unto the end; 
While it is said, To day if ye will hear his voice, harden not your hearts, as in the provocation. 
For some, when they had heard, did provoke: howbeit not all that came out of Egypt by Moses. 
But with whom was he grieved forty years? was it not with them that had sinned, whose carcases fell in the wilderness? 
And to whom sware he that they should not enter into his rest, but to them that believed not? 
So we see that they could not enter in because of unbelie
825,ue hath not spread in the house, after the house was plaistered: then the priest shall pronounce the house clean, because the plague is healed. 
And he shall take to cleanse the house two birds, and cedar wood, and scarlet, and hyssop: 
And he shall kill the one of the birds in an earthen vessel over running water: 
And he shall take the cedar wood, and the hyssop, and the scarlet, and the living bird, and dip them in the blood of the slain bird, and in the running water, and sprinkle the house seven times: 
And he shall cleanse the house with the blood of the bird, and with the running water, and with the living bird, and with the cedar wood, and with the hyssop, and with the scarlet: 
But he shall let go the living bird out of the city into the open fields, and make an atonement for the house: and it shall be cl
747, judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek. 
But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, though thou be little among the thousands of Judah, yet out of thee shall he come forth unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting. 
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought forth: then the remnant of his brethren shall return unto the children of Israel. 
And he shall stand and feed in the strength of the LORD, in the majesty of the name of the LORD his God; and they shall abide: for now shall he be great unto the ends of the earth. 
And this man shall be the peace, when the Assyrian shall come into our land: and when he shall tread in our palaces, then shall we ra
1042,atsoever she asked, beside that which she had brought unto the king. So she turned, and went away to her own land, she and her servants. 
Now the weight of gold that came to Solomon in one year was six hundred and threescore and six talents of gold; 
Beside that which chapmen and merchants brought. And all the kings of Arabia and governors of the country brought gold and silver to Solomon. 
And king Solomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six hundred shekels of beaten gold went to one target. 
And three hundred shields made he of beaten gold: three hundred shekels of gold went to one shield. And the king put them in the house of the forest of Lebanon. 
Moreover the king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it with pure gold. 
And there were six steps to the throne, with a footstool of gold, which were fastened to the throne, and stays on each side of the sitting place, and two lions standing by the stays: 
And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other upon the six steps. There was not the like ma
1036,at even now, whatsoever thou wilt ask of God, God will give it thee. 
Jesus saith unto her, Thy brother shall rise again. 
Martha saith unto him, I know that he shall rise again in the resurrection at the last day. 
Jesus said unto her, I am the resurrection, and the life: he that believeth in me, though he were dead, yet shall he live: 
And whosoever liveth and believeth in me shall never die. Believest thou this? 
She saith unto him, Yea, Lord: I believe that thou art the Christ, the Son of God, which should come into the world. 
And when she had so said, she went her way, and called Mary her sister secretly, saying, The Master is come, and calleth for thee. 
As soon as she heard that, she arose quickly, and came unto him. 
Now Jesus was not yet come into the town, but was in that place where Martha met him. 
The Jews then which were with her in the house, and comforted her, when they saw Mary, that she rose up hastily and went out, followed her, saying, She goeth unto the grave to weep there. 
Then when Mary was come 
794,ment of Egypt, and the punishment of all nations that come not up to keep the feast of tabernacles. 
In that day shall there be upon the bells of the horses, HOLINESS UNTO THE LORD; and the pots in the LORD's house shall be like the bowls before the altar. 
Yea, every pot in Jerusalem and in Judah shall be holiness unto the LORD of hosts: and all they that sacrifice shall come and take of them, and seethe therein: and in that day there shall be no more the Canaanite in the house of the LORD of hosts. 
The burden of the word of the LORD to Israel by Malachi. 
I have loved you, saith the LORD. Yet ye say, Wherein hast thou loved us? Was not Esau Jacob's brother? saith the LORD: yet I loved Jacob, 
And I hated Esau, and laid his mountains and his heritage waste for the dragons of the wi
915, David built there an altar unto the LORD, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings, and called upon the LORD; and he answered him from heaven by fire upon the altar of burnt offering. 
And the LORD commanded the angel; and he put up his sword again into the sheath thereof. 
At that time when David saw that the LORD had answered him in the threshingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite, then he sacrificed there. 
For the tabernacle of the LORD, which Moses made in the wilderness, and the altar of the burnt offering, were at that season in the high place at Gibeon. 
But David could not go before it to enquire of God: for he was afraid because of the sword of the angel of the LORD. 
Then David said, This is the house of the LORD God, and this is the altar of the burnt offering for Israel. 
And David commanded to gather together the strangers that were in the land of Israel; and he set masons to hew wrought 
956,gation, saying, Get you up from about the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram. 
And Moses rose up and went unto Dathan and Abiram; and the elders of Israel followed him. 
And he spake unto the congregation, saying, Depart, I pray you, from the tents of these wicked men, and touch nothing of their's, lest ye be consumed in all their sins. 
So they gat up from the tabernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram, on every side: and Dathan and Abiram came out, and stood in the door of their tents, and their wives, and their sons, and their little children. 
And Moses said, Hereby ye shall know that the LORD hath sent me to do all these works; for I have not done them of mine own mind. 
If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be visited after the visitation of all men; then the LORD hath not sent me. 
But if the LORD make a new thing, and the earth open her mouth, and swallow them up, with all that appertain unto them, and they go dow
747,anksgiving; sing praise upon the harp unto our God: 
Who covereth the heaven with clouds, who prepareth rain for the earth, who maketh grass to grow upon the mountains. 
He giveth to the beast his food, and to the young ravens which cry. 
He delighteth not in the strength of the horse: he taketh not pleasure in the legs of a man. 
The LORD taketh pleasure in them that fear him, in those that hope in his mercy. 
Praise the LORD, O Jerusalem; praise thy God, O Zion. 
For he hath strengthened the bars of thy gates; he hath blessed thy children within thee. 
He maketh peace in thy borders, and filleth thee with the finest of the wheat. 
He sendeth forth his commandment upon earth: his word runneth very swiftly. 
He giveth snow like wool: he 
863, possessed. 
This is the land that yet remaineth: all the borders of the Philistines, and all Geshuri, 
From Sihor, which is before Egypt, even unto the borders of Ekron northward, which is counted to the Canaanite: five lords of the Philistines; the Gazathites, and the Ashdothites, the Eshkalonites, the Gittites, and the Ekronites; also the Avites: 
From the south, all the land of the Canaanites, and Mearah that is beside the Sidonians unto Aphek, to the borders of the Amorites: 
And the land of the Giblites, and all Lebanon, toward the sunrising, from Baalgad under mount Hermon unto the entering into Hamath. 
All the inhabitants of the hill country from Lebanon unto Misrephothmaim, and all the Sidonians, them will I drive out from before the children of Israel: only divide thou it by lot unto the Israelites for an inheritance, as I have commanded th
762,them, and became tributaries. 
Neither did Asher drive out the inhabitants of Accho, nor the inhabitants of Zidon, nor of Ahlab, nor of Achzib, nor of Helbah, nor of Aphik, nor of Rehob: 
But the Asherites dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land: for they did not drive them out. 
Neither did Naphtali drive out the inhabitants of Bethshemesh, nor the inhabitants of Bethanath; but he dwelt among the Canaanites, the inhabitants of the land: nevertheless the inhabitants of Bethshemesh and of Bethanath became tributaries unto them. 
And the Amorites forced the children of Dan into the mountain: for they would not suffer them to come down to the valley: 
But the Amorites would dwell in mount Heres in Aijalon, and in Shaalbim: yet the hand of 
804,y hear it, and do it? 
But the word is very nigh unto thee, in thy mouth, and in thy heart, that thou mayest do it. 
See, I have set before thee this day life and good, and death and evil; 
In that I command thee this day to love the LORD thy God, to walk in his ways, and to keep his commandments and his statutes and his judgments, that thou mayest live and multiply: and the LORD thy God shall bless thee in the land whither thou goest to possess it. 
But if thine heart turn away, so that thou wilt not hear, but shalt be drawn away, and worship other gods, and serve them; 
I denounce unto you this day, that ye shall surely perish, and that ye shall not prolong your days upon the land, whither thou passest over Jordan to go to possess it. 
I call heaven and earth to record this day against you, 
952, thence the ark of God the LORD, that dwelleth between the cherubims, whose name is called on it. 
And they carried the ark of God in a new cart out of the house of Abinadab: and Uzza and Ahio drave the cart. 
And David and all Israel played before God with all their might, and with singing, and with harps, and with psalteries, and with timbrels, and with cymbals, and with trumpets. 
And when they came unto the threshingfloor of Chidon, Uzza put forth his hand to hold the ark; for the oxen stumbled. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzza, and he smote him, because he put his hand to the ark: and there he died before God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon Uzza: wherefore that place is called Perezuzza to this day. 
And David was afraid of God that day, saying, How shall I bring the ark of God home to me? 
So David brought not the ark home to himself to the city of David, but carried it aside in
934,Sheba the son of Bichri by name, hath lifted up his hand against the king, even against David: deliver him only, and I will depart from the city. And the woman said unto Joab, Behold, his head shall be thrown to thee over the wall. 
Then the woman went unto all the people in her wisdom. And they cut off the head of Sheba the son of Bichri, and cast it out to Joab. And he blew a trumpet, and they retired from the city, every man to his tent. And Joab returned to Jerusalem unto the king. 
Now Joab was over all the host of Israel: and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the Cherethites and over the Pelethites: 
And Adoram was over the tribute: and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was recorder: 
And Sheva was scribe: and Zadok and Abiathar were the priests: 
And Ira also the Jairite was a chief ruler about David. 
Then there was a famine in the days of David three years, year after year; and David enquired of the LORD. And the
762,ot dwelt. 
And Lot went up out of Zoar, and dwelt in the mountain, and his two daughters with him; for he feared to dwell in Zoar: and he dwelt in a cave, he and his two daughters. 
And the firstborn said unto the younger, Our father is old, and there is not a man in the earth to come in unto us after the manner of all the earth: 
Come, let us make our father drink wine, and we will lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father. 
And they made their father drink wine that night: and the firstborn went in, and lay with her father; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the firstborn said unto the younger, Behold, I lay yesternight with my father: let us make him drink wine this night 
811,he chief fathers of the children of Israel: 
And they said, The LORD commanded my lord to give the land for an inheritance by lot to the children of Israel: and my lord was commanded by the LORD to give the inheritance of Zelophehad our brother unto his daughters. 
And if they be married to any of the sons of the other tribes of the children of Israel, then shall their inheritance be taken from the inheritance of our fathers, and shall be put to the inheritance of the tribe whereunto they are received: so shall it be taken from the lot of our inheritance. 
And when the jubile of the children of Israel shall be, then shall their inheritance be put unto the inheritance of the tribe whereunto they are received: so shall their inheritance be taken away from the inheritance of the tribe of our fathers. 
A
956,eople. 
Now it came to pass when Sanballat, and Tobiah, and Geshem the Arabian, and the rest of our enemies, heard that I had builded the wall, and that there was no breach left therein; (though at that time I had not set up the doors upon the gates;) 
That Sanballat and Geshem sent unto me, saying, Come, let us meet together in some one of the villages in the plain of Ono. But they thought to do me mischief. 
And I sent messengers unto them, saying, I am doing a great work, so that I cannot come down: why should the work cease, whilst I leave it, and come down to you? 
Yet they sent unto me four times after this sort; and I answered them after the same manner. 
Then sent Sanballat his servant unto me in like manner the fifth time with an open letter in his hand; 
Wherein was written, It is reported among the heathen, and Gashmu saith it, that thou and the Jews think to rebel: for which cause thou buildest the wall, that thou mayest be their 
1052,s, and to cleave unto him; 
Then will the LORD drive out all these nations from before you, and ye shall possess greater nations and mightier than yourselves. 
Every place whereon the soles of your feet shall tread shall be yours: from the wilderness and Lebanon, from the river, the river Euphrates, even unto the uttermost sea shall your coast be. 
There shall no man be able to stand before you: for the LORD your God shall lay the fear of you and the dread of you upon all the land that ye shall tread upon, as he hath said unto you. 
Behold, I set before you this day a blessing and a curse; 
A blessing, if ye obey the commandments of the LORD your God, which I command you this day: 
And a curse, if ye will not obey the commandments of the LORD your God, but turn aside out of the way which I command you this day, to go after other gods, which ye have not known. 
And it shall come to pass, when the LORD thy God hath brought thee in unto the land whither thou goest to possess it, that thou shalt put the blessing upon mount Gerizim, and the 
869,Pharaoh, from his servants, and from his people, to morrow: but let not Pharaoh deal deceitfully any more in not letting the people go to sacrifice to the LORD. 
And Moses went out from Pharaoh, and intreated the LORD. 
And the LORD did according to the word of Moses; and he removed the swarms of flies from Pharaoh, from his servants, and from his people; there remained not one. 
And Pharaoh hardened his heart at this time also, neither would he let the people go. 
Then the LORD said unto Moses, Go in unto Pharaoh, and tell him, Thus saith the LORD God of the Hebrews, Let my people go, that they may serve me. 
For if thou refuse to let them go, and wilt hold them still, 
Behold, the hand of the LORD is upon thy cattle which is in the field, upon the horses, upon the asses, upon the camels, upon the oxen, and upon the sheep: there shall be a very grievous mu
781,o you, The Son can do nothing of himself, but what he seeth the Father do: for what things soever he doeth, these also doeth the Son likewise. 
For the Father loveth the Son, and sheweth him all things that himself doeth: and he will shew him greater works than these, that ye may marvel. 
For as the Father raiseth up the dead, and quickeneth them; even so the Son quickeneth whom he will. 
For the Father judgeth no man, but hath committed all judgment unto the Son: 
That all men should honour the Son, even as they honour the Father. He that honoureth not the Son honoureth not the Father which hath sent him. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that heareth my word, and believeth on him that sent me, hath everlasting life, and shall not come into condemnation; but is passed
736,t out this bondwoman and her son: for the son of this bondwoman shall not be heir with my son, even with Isaac. 
And the thing was very grievous in Abraham's sight because of his son. 
And God said unto Abraham, Let it not be grievous in thy sight because of the lad, and because of thy bondwoman; in all that Sarah hath said unto thee, hearken unto her voice; for in Isaac shall thy seed be called. 
And also of the son of the bondwoman will I make a nation, because he is thy seed. 
And Abraham rose up early in the morning, and took bread, and a bottle of water, and gave it unto Hagar, putting it on her shoulder, and the child, and sent her away: and she departed, and wandered in the wilderness of Beersheba. 
And the water was sp
1002,dst of the city, when the days of the siege are fulfilled: and thou shalt take a third part, and smite about it with a knife: and a third part thou shalt scatter in the wind; and I will draw out a sword after them. 
Thou shalt also take thereof a few in number, and bind them in thy skirts. 
Then take of them again, and cast them into the midst of the fire, and burn them in the fire; for thereof shall a fire come forth into all the house of Israel. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; This is Jerusalem: I have set it in the midst of the nations and countries that are round about her. 
And she hath changed my judgments into wickedness more than the nations, and my statutes more than the countries that are round about her: for they have refused my judgments and my statutes, they have not walked in them. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye multiplied more than the nations that are round about you, and have not walked in my statutes, neither have kept my judgments, neither have done according
1003,eto the fifth part thereof. 
And concerning the tithe of the herd, or of the flock, even of whatsoever passeth under the rod, the tenth shall be holy unto the LORD. 
He shall not search whether it be good or bad, neither shall he change it: and if he change it at all, then both it and the change thereof shall be holy; it shall not be redeemed. 
These are the commandments, which the LORD commanded Moses for the children of Israel in mount Sinai. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the tabernacle of the congregation, on the first day of the second month, in the second year after they were come out of the land of Egypt, saying, 
Take ye the sum of all the congregation of the children of Israel, after their families, by the house of their fathers, with the number of their names, every male by their polls; 
From twenty years old and upward, all that are able to go forth to war in Israel: thou and Aaron shall number them by their armies. 
And with you there shall be a 
892,ard, that the everlasting God, the LORD, the Creator of the ends of the earth, fainteth not, neither is weary? there is no searching of his understanding. 
He giveth power to the faint; and to them that have no might he increaseth strength. 
Even the youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men shall utterly fall: 
But they that wait upon the LORD shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run, and not be weary; and they shall walk, and not faint. 
Keep silence before me, O islands; and let the people renew their strength: let them come near; then let them speak: let us come near together to judgment. 
Who raised up the righteous man from the east, called him to his foot, gave the nations before him, and made him rule over kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed safely
1026,laid me in the lowest pit, in darkness, in the deeps. 
Thy wrath lieth hard upon me, and thou hast afflicted me with all thy waves. Selah. 
Thou hast put away mine acquaintance far from me; thou hast made me an abomination unto them: I am shut up, and I cannot come forth. 
Mine eye mourneth by reason of affliction: LORD, I have called daily upon thee, I have stretched out my hands unto thee. 
Wilt thou shew wonders to the dead? shall the dead arise and praise thee? Selah. 
Shall thy lovingkindness be declared in the grave? or thy faithfulness in destruction? 
Shall thy wonders be known in the dark? and thy righteousness in the land of forgetfulness? 
But unto thee have I cried, O LORD; and in the morning shall my prayer prevent thee. 
LORD, why castest thou off my soul? why hidest thou thy face from me? 
I am afflicted and ready to die from my youth up: while I suffer thy terrors I am distracted. 
Thy fierce wrath goeth over me; thy terrors have cut me off. 
They came round about me daily like water; they compa
1031,and he drank. 
And his father Isaac said unto him, Come near now, and kiss me, my son. 
And he came near, and kissed him: and he smelled the smell of his raiment, and blessed him, and said, See, the smell of my son is as the smell of a field which the LORD hath blessed: 
Therefore God give thee of the dew of heaven, and the fatness of the earth, and plenty of corn and wine: 
Let people serve thee, and nations bow down to thee: be lord over thy brethren, and let thy mother's sons bow down to thee: cursed be every one that curseth thee, and blessed be he that blesseth thee. 
And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of blessing Jacob, and Jacob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of Isaac his father, that Esau his brother came in from his hunting. 
And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his father, and said unto his father, Let my father arise, and eat of his son's venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac his father said unto him, Who art thou? And he said, I am thy son, thy fi
798,rath remember mercy. 
God came from Teman, and the Holy One from mount Paran. Selah. His glory covered the heavens, and the earth was full of his praise. 
And his brightness was as the light; he had horns coming out of his hand: and there was the hiding of his power. 
Before him went the pestilence, and burning coals went forth at his feet. 
He stood, and measured the earth: he beheld, and drove asunder the nations; and the everlasting mountains were scattered, the perpetual hills did bow: his ways are everlasting. 
I saw the tents of Cushan in affliction: and the curtains of the land of Midian did tremble. 
Was the LORD displeased against the rivers? was thine anger against the rivers? was thy wrath against the sea, that thou didst ride upon thine horses and thy chariots of salvation? 

861,'s seed hath God according to his promise raised unto Israel a Saviour, Jesus: 
When John had first preached before his coming the baptism of repentance to all the people of Israel. 
And as John fulfilled his course, he said, Whom think ye that I am? I am not he. But, behold, there cometh one after me, whose shoes of his feet I am not worthy to loose. 
Men and brethren, children of the stock of Abraham, and whosoever among you feareth God, to you is the word of this salvation sent. 
For they that dwell at Jerusalem, and their rulers, because they knew him not, nor yet the voices of the prophets which are read every sabbath day, they have fulfilled them in condemning him. 
And though they found no cause of death in him, yet desired they Pilate that he should be slain. 
And when they had fulfilled all that was written of him, they took him down from t
951,re than ten days, he went down unto Caesarea; and the next day sitting on the judgment seat commanded Paul to be brought. 
And when he was come, the Jews which came down from Jerusalem stood round about, and laid many and grievous complaints against Paul, which they could not prove. 
While he answered for himself, Neither against the law of the Jews, neither against the temple, nor yet against Caesar, have I offended any thing at all. 
But Festus, willing to do the Jews a pleasure, answered Paul, and said, Wilt thou go up to Jerusalem, and there be judged of these things before me? 
Then said Paul, I stand at Caesar's judgment seat, where I ought to be judged: to the Jews have I done no wrong, as thou very well knowest. 
For if I be an offender, or have committed any thing worthy of death, I refuse not to die: but if there be none of these things whereof these accuse me, no man may deliver me unto them. I appeal unto Caesar. 
Then Festus
1078, hands shall be feeble, and every spirit shall faint, and all knees shall be weak as water: behold, it cometh, and shall be brought to pass, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy, and say, Thus saith the LORD; Say, A sword, a sword is sharpened, and also furbished: 
It is sharpened to make a sore slaughter; it is furbished that it may glitter: should we then make mirth? it contemneth the rod of my son, as every tree. 
And he hath given it to be furbished, that it may be handled: this sword is sharpened, and it is furbished, to give it into the hand of the slayer. 
Cry and howl, son of man: for it shall be upon my people, it shall be upon all the princes of Israel: terrors by reason of the sword shall be upon my people: smite therefore upon thy thigh. 
Because it is a trial, and what if the sword contemn even the rod? it shall be no more, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thou therefore, son of man, prophesy, and smite thine hands together. and let the sword be doubled the third time, the sword of the slain: it is the swor
724,ah by his house. 
After him repaired Binnui the son of Henadad another piece, from the house of Azariah unto the turning of the wall, even unto the corner. 
Palal the son of Uzai, over against the turning of the wall, and the tower which lieth out from the king's high house, that was by the court of the prison. After him Pedaiah the son of Parosh. 
Moreover the Nethinims dwelt in Ophel, unto the place over against the water gate toward the east, and the tower that lieth out. 
After them the Tekoites repaired another piece, over against the great tower that lieth out, even unto the wall of Ophel. 
From above the horse gate repaired the priests, every one over against his house. 
After them repaired Zadok the son of 
1047, to all your enemies against whom ye fight. 
And afterward Joshua smote them, and slew them, and hanged them on five trees: and they were hanging upon the trees until the evening. 
And it came to pass at the time of the going down of the sun, that Joshua commanded, and they took them down off the trees, and cast them into the cave wherein they had been hid, and laid great stones in the cave's mouth, which remain until this very day. 
And that day Joshua took Makkedah, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof he utterly destroyed, them, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain: and he did to the king of Makkedah as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
Then Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, unto Libnah, and fought against Libnah: 
And the LORD delivered it also, and the king thereof, into the hand of Israel; and he smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain in it; but did unto the king thereof as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
An
944, Gomorrah brimstone and fire from the LORD out of heaven; 
And he overthrew those cities, and all the plain, and all the inhabitants of the cities, and that which grew upon the ground. 
But his wife looked back from behind him, and she became a pillar of salt. 
And Abraham gat up early in the morning to the place where he stood before the LORD: 
And he looked toward Sodom and Gomorrah, and toward all the land of the plain, and beheld, and, lo, the smoke of the country went up as the smoke of a furnace. 
And it came to pass, when God destroyed the cities of the plain, that God remembered Abraham, and sent Lot out of the midst of the overthrow, when he overthrew the cities in the which Lot dwelt. 
And Lot went up out of Zoar, and dwelt in the mountain, and his two daughters with him; for he feared to dwell in Zoar: and he dwelt in a cave, he and his two daughters. 
And the firstborn said unto the younger, Our father is old, and ther
742,ubits the breadth thereof, and three cubits the height of it. 
And the work of the bases was on this manner: they had borders, and the borders were between the ledges: 
And on the borders that were between the ledges were lions, oxen, and cherubims: and upon the ledges there was a base above: and beneath the lions and oxen were certain additions made of thin work. 
And every base had four brasen wheels, and plates of brass: and the four corners thereof had undersetters: under the laver were undersetters molten, at the side of every addition. 
And the mouth of it within the chapiter and above was a cubit: but the mouth thereof was round after the work of the base, a cubit and an half: and also upon the mouth of it were gravings with 
831,d prepare themselves without my fault: awake to help me, and behold. 
Thou therefore, O LORD God of hosts, the God of Israel, awake to visit all the heathen: be not merciful to any wicked transgressors. Selah. 
They return at evening: they make a noise like a dog, and go round about the city. 
Behold, they belch out with their mouth: swords are in their lips: for who, say they, doth hear? 
But thou, O LORD, shalt laugh at them; thou shalt have all the heathen in derision. 
Because of his strength will I wait upon thee: for God is my defence. 
The God of my mercy shall prevent me: God shall let me see my desire upon mine enemies. 
Slay them not, lest my people forget: scatter them by thy power; and bring them down, O Lord our shield. 
For the sin of their mouth and the words of their lips let them even be taken in their 
1077, even like Israel, whom God went to redeem for a people to himself, and to make him a name, and to do for you great things and terrible, for thy land, before thy people, which thou redeemedst to thee from Egypt, from the nations and their gods? 
For thou hast confirmed to thyself thy people Israel to be a people unto thee for ever: and thou, LORD, art become their God. 
And now, O LORD God, the word that thou hast spoken concerning thy servant, and concerning his house, establish it for ever, and do as thou hast said. 
And let thy name be magnified for ever, saying, The LORD of hosts is the God over Israel: and let the house of thy servant David be established before thee. 
For thou, O LORD of hosts, God of Israel, hast revealed to thy servant, saying, I will build thee an house: therefore hath thy servant found in his heart to pray this prayer unto thee. 
And now, O Lord GOD, thou art that God, and thy words be true, and thou hast promised this goodness unto thy servant: 
Therefore now let it please thee to bless the house of thy servant, that it may continue 
820,cast out unto the uttermost part of the heaven, yet will I gather them from thence, and will bring them unto the place that I have chosen to set my name there. 
Now these are thy servants and thy people, whom thou hast redeemed by thy great power, and by thy strong hand. 
O LORD, I beseech thee, let now thine ear be attentive to the prayer of thy servant, and to the prayer of thy servants, who desire to fear thy name: and prosper, I pray thee, thy servant this day, and grant him mercy in the sight of this man. For I was the king's cupbearer. 
And it came to pass in the month Nisan, in the twentieth year of Artaxerxes the king, that wine was before him: and I took up the wine, and gave it unto the king. Now I had not been beforetime sad in his presence. 
Wherefore the king said unto me, Why is thy countenance 
938, nigh them that fear him; that glory may dwell in our land. 
Mercy and truth are met together; righteousness and peace have kissed each other. 
Truth shall spring out of the earth; and righteousness shall look down from heaven. 
Yea, the LORD shall give that which is good; and our land shall yield her increase. 
Righteousness shall go before him; and shall set us in the way of his steps. 
Bow down thine ear, O LORD, hear me: for I am poor and needy. 
Preserve my soul; for I am holy: O thou my God, save thy servant that trusteth in thee. 
Be merciful unto me, O Lord: for I cry unto thee daily. 
Rejoice the soul of thy servant: for unto thee, O Lord, do I lift up my soul. 
For thou, Lord, art good, and ready to forgive; and plenteous in mercy unto all them that call upon thee. 
Give ear, O LORD, unto my prayer; and attend to the voice of my supplications. 
In the day of my trouble I will call upon thee: for thou wilt answer me
735, took ten camels of the camels of his master, and departed; for all the goods of his master were in his hand: and he arose, and went to Mesopotamia, unto the city of Nahor. 
And he made his camels to kneel down without the city by a well of water at the time of the evening, even the time that women go out to draw water. 
And he said O LORD God of my master Abraham, I pray thee, send me good speed this day, and shew kindness unto my master Abraham. 
Behold, I stand here by the well of water; and the daughters of the men of the city come out to draw water: 
And let it come to pass, that the damsel to whom I shall say, Let down thy pitcher, I pray thee, that I may drink; and she shall say, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink
993,hall be anointed with fresh oil. 
Mine eye also shall see my desire on mine enemies, and mine ears shall hear my desire of the wicked that rise up against me. 
The righteous shall flourish like the palm tree: he shall grow like a cedar in Lebanon. 
Those that be planted in the house of the LORD shall flourish in the courts of our God. 
They shall still bring forth fruit in old age; they shall be fat and flourishing; 
To shew that the LORD is upright: he is my rock, and there is no unrighteousness in him. 
The LORD reigneth, he is clothed with majesty; the LORD is clothed with strength, wherewith he hath girded himself: the world also is stablished, that it cannot be moved. 
Thy throne is established of old: thou art from everlasting. 
The floods have lifted up, O LORD, the floods have lifted up their voice; the floods lift up their waves. 
The LORD on high is mightier than the noise of many waters, yea, than the mighty waves of the sea. 
Thy testimonies are very sure: holiness b
884, because I was with you. 
But now I go my way to him that sent me; and none of you asketh me, Whither goest thou? 
But because I have said these things unto you, sorrow hath filled your heart. 
Nevertheless I tell you the truth; It is expedient for you that I go away: for if I go not away, the Comforter will not come unto you; but if I depart, I will send him unto you. 
And when he is come, he will reprove the world of sin, and of righteousness, and of judgment: 
Of sin, because they believe not on me; 
Of righteousness, because I go to my Father, and ye see me no more; 
Of judgment, because the prince of this world is judged. 
I have yet many things to say unto you, but ye cannot bear them now. 
Howbeit when he, the Spirit of truth, is come, he will guide you into all truth: for he shall not speak of himself; but whatsoever he shall hear, that shall he speak: and he will
849,m. 
And they found the stone rolled away from the sepulchre. 
And they entered in, and found not the body of the Lord Jesus. 
And it came to pass, as they were much perplexed thereabout, behold, two men stood by them in shining garments: 
And as they were afraid, and bowed down their faces to the earth, they said unto them, Why seek ye the living among the dead? 
He is not here, but is risen: remember how he spake unto you when he was yet in Galilee, 
Saying, The Son of man must be delivered into the hands of sinful men, and be crucified, and the third day rise again. 
And they remembered his words, 
And returned from the sepulchre, and told all these things unto the eleven, and to all the rest. 
It was Mary Magdalene and Joanna, and Mary the mother of James, and other women that were with them, which told these things unto the apostles.
979,the border of Egypt: they brought presents, and served Solomon all the days of his life. 
And Solomon's provision for one day was thirty measures of fine flour, and threescore measures of meal, 
Ten fat oxen, and twenty oxen out of the pastures, and an hundred sheep, beside harts, and roebucks, and fallowdeer, and fatted fowl. 
For he had dominion over all the region on this side the river, from Tiphsah even to Azzah, over all the kings on this side the river: and he had peace on all sides round about him. 
And Judah and Israel dwelt safely, every man under his vine and under his fig tree, from Dan even to Beersheba, all the days of Solomon. 
And Solomon had forty thousand stalls of horses for his chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen. 
And those officers provided victual for king Solomon, and for all that came unto king Solomon's table, every man in his month: they lacked nothing. 
Barley also and straw for the horses and dromedaries brought they unto the place w
912, as a deceiver; and I shall bring a curse upon me, and not a blessing. 
And his mother said unto him, Upon me be thy curse, my son: only obey my voice, and go fetch me them. 
And he went, and fetched, and brought them to his mother: and his mother made savoury meat, such as his father loved. 
And Rebekah took goodly raiment of her eldest son Esau, which were with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son: 
And she put the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands, and upon the smooth of his neck: 
And she gave the savoury meat and the bread, which she had prepared, into the hand of her son Jacob. 
And he came unto his father, and said, My father: and he said, Here am I; who art thou, my son? 
And Jacob said unto his father, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou badest me: arise, I pray thee, sit and eat of my venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac said 
926,to their mouth, were three hundred men: but all the rest of the people bowed down upon their knees to drink water. 
And the LORD said unto Gideon, By the three hundred men that lapped will I save you, and deliver the Midianites into thine hand: and let all the other people go every man unto his place. 
So the people took victuals in their hand, and their trumpets: and he sent all the rest of Israel every man unto his tent, and retained those three hundred men: and the host of Midian was beneath him in the valley. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him, Arise, get thee down unto the host; for I have delivered it into thine hand. 
But if thou fear to go down, go thou with Phurah thy servant down to the host: 
And thou shalt hear what they say; and afterward shall thine hands be strengthened to go down unto the host. Then went he down with Phurah his servant unto the outside of the armed me
1062,he watchman of Ephraim was with my God: but the prophet is a snare of a fowler in all his ways, and hatred in the house of his God. 
They have deeply corrupted themselves, as in the days of Gibeah: therefore he will remember their iniquity, he will visit their sins. 
I found Israel like grapes in the wilderness; I saw your fathers as the firstripe in the fig tree at her first time: but they went to Baalpeor, and separated themselves unto that shame; and their abominations were according as they loved. 
As for Ephraim, their glory shall fly away like a bird, from the birth, and from the womb, and from the conception. 
Though they bring up their children, yet will I bereave them, that there shall not be a man left: yea, woe also to them when I depart from them! 
Ephraim, as I saw Tyrus, is planted in a pleasant place: but Ephraim shall bring forth his children to the murderer. 
Give them, O LORD: what wilt thou give? give them a miscarrying womb and dry breasts. 
All their wickedness is in Gilgal: for there I hated them: for the wickedness of their
877,les among the priests, and to all that were reckoned by genealogies among the Levites. 
And thus did Hezekiah throughout all Judah, and wrought that which was good and right and truth before the LORD his God. 
And in every work that he began in the service of the house of God, and in the law, and in the commandments, to seek his God, he did it with all his heart, and prospered. 
After these things, and the establishment thereof, Sennacherib king of Assyria came, and entered into Judah, and encamped against the fenced cities, and thought to win them for himself. 
And when Hezekiah saw that Sennacherib was come, and that he was purposed to fight against Jerusalem, 
He took counsel with his princes and his mighty men to stop the waters of the fountains which were without the city: and they did help him. 
So there was gathered much people together, who stopped all the 
1051,And I will come down and talk with thee there: and I will take of the spirit which is upon thee, and will put it upon them; and they shall bear the burden of the people with thee, that thou bear it not thyself alone. 
And say thou unto the people, Sanctify yourselves against to morrow, and ye shall eat flesh: for ye have wept in the ears of the LORD, saying, Who shall give us flesh to eat? for it was well with us in Egypt: therefore the LORD will give you flesh, and ye shall eat. 
Ye shall not eat one day, nor two days, nor five days, neither ten days, nor twenty days; 
But even a whole month, until it come out at your nostrils, and it be loathsome unto you: because that ye have despised the LORD which is among you, and have wept before him, saying, Why came we forth out of Egypt? 
And Moses said, The people, among whom I am, are six hundred thousand footmen; and thou hast said, I will give them flesh, that they may eat a whole month. 
Shall the flocks and the herds be slain for them, to suffice them? or shall all the fish of the sea b
845,m: for he that hath mercy on them shall lead them, even by the springs of water shall he guide them. 
And I will make all my mountains a way, and my highways shall be exalted. 
Behold, these shall come from far: and, lo, these from the north and from the west; and these from the land of Sinim. 
Sing, O heavens; and be joyful, O earth; and break forth into singing, O mountains: for the LORD hath comforted his people, and will have mercy upon his afflicted. 
But Zion said, The LORD hath forsaken me, and my Lord hath forgotten me. 
Can a woman forget her sucking child, that she should not have compassion on the son of her womb? yea, they may forget, yet will I not forget thee. 
Behold, I have graven thee upon the palms of my hands; thy walls are continually before me. 
Thy children shall make haste; thy destroyers and they that made the
993,, sweareth by the throne of God, and by him that sitteth thereon. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye pay tithe of mint and anise and cummin, and have omitted the weightier matters of the law, judgment, mercy, and faith: these ought ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone. 
Ye blind guides, which strain at a gnat, and swallow a camel. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye make clean the outside of the cup and of the platter, but within they are full of extortion and excess. 
Thou blind Pharisee, cleanse first that which is within the cup and platter, that the outside of them may be clean also. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye are like unto whited sepulchres, which indeed appear beautiful outward, but are within full of dead men's bones, and of all uncleanness. 
Even so ye also outwardly appear righteous unto men, but within ye are full of hypocrisy and iniquity. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypoc
736, bold, (I speak foolishly,) I am bold also. 
Are they Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am I. Are they the seed of Abraham? so am I. 
Are they ministers of Christ? (I speak as a fool) I am more; in labours more abundant, in stripes above measure, in prisons more frequent, in deaths oft. 
Of the Jews five times received I forty stripes save one. 
Thrice was I beaten with rods, once was I stoned, thrice I suffered shipwreck, a night and a day I have been in the deep; 
In journeyings often, in perils of waters, in perils of robbers, in perils by mine own countrymen, in perils by the heathen, in perils in the city, in perils in the wilderness, in perils in the sea, in perils among false brethren; 
In weariness and painfuln
963,s spake in the ears of all the congregation of Israel the words of this song, until they were ended. 
Give ear, O ye heavens, and I will speak; and hear, O earth, the words of my mouth. 
My doctrine shall drop as the rain, my speech shall distil as the dew, as the small rain upon the tender herb, and as the showers upon the grass: 
Because I will publish the name of the LORD: ascribe ye greatness unto our God. 
He is the Rock, his work is perfect: for all his ways are judgment: a God of truth and without iniquity, just and right is he. 
They have corrupted themselves, their spot is not the spot of his children: they are a perverse and crooked generation. 
Do ye thus requite the LORD, O foolish people and unwise? is not he thy father that hath bought thee? hath he not made thee, and established thee? 
Remember the days of old, consider the years of many generations: ask thy father, and he will shew thee; thy elders, and they will tell thee. 
When the
847,, then I will come and help thee. 
Be of good courage, and let us play the men for our people, and for the cities of our God: and the LORD do that which seemeth him good. 
And Joab drew nigh, and the people that were with him, unto the battle against the Syrians: and they fled before him. 
And when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled, then fled they also before Abishai, and entered into the city. So Joab returned from the children of Ammon, and came to Jerusalem. 
And when the Syrians saw that they were smitten before Israel, they gathered themselves together. 
And Hadarezer sent, and brought out the Syrians that were beyond the river: and they came to Helam; and Shobach the captain of the host of Hadarezer went before them. 
And when it was told David, he gathered all Israel together, and passed over Jordan, and came 
799,nd I will speak; and hear, O earth, the words of my mouth. 
My doctrine shall drop as the rain, my speech shall distil as the dew, as the small rain upon the tender herb, and as the showers upon the grass: 
Because I will publish the name of the LORD: ascribe ye greatness unto our God. 
He is the Rock, his work is perfect: for all his ways are judgment: a God of truth and without iniquity, just and right is he. 
They have corrupted themselves, their spot is not the spot of his children: they are a perverse and crooked generation. 
Do ye thus requite the LORD, O foolish people and unwise? is not he thy father that hath bought thee? hath he not made thee, and established thee? 
Remember the days of old, consider the years of many generations: ask thy father, and he will shew thee; thy elder
1031,rod, and stretch out thine hand over the sea, and divide it: and the children of Israel shall go on dry ground through the midst of the sea. 
And I, behold, I will harden the hearts of the Egyptians, and they shall follow them: and I will get me honour upon Pharaoh, and upon all his host, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I have gotten me honour upon Pharaoh, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the angel of God, which went before the camp of Israel, removed and went behind them; and the pillar of the cloud went from before their face, and stood behind them: 
And it came between the camp of the Egyptians and the camp of Israel; and it was a cloud and darkness to them, but it gave light by night to these: so that the one came not near the other all the night. 
And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and the LORD caused the sea to go back by a strong east wind all that night, and made the sea dry land, and the waters were divided. 
And the
1063,our down rain according to the vapour thereof: 
Which the clouds do drop and distil upon man abundantly. 
Also can any understand the spreadings of the clouds, or the noise of his tabernacle? 
Behold, he spreadeth his light upon it, and covereth the bottom of the sea. 
For by them judgeth he the people; he giveth meat in abundance. 
With clouds he covereth the light; and commandeth it not to shine by the cloud that cometh betwixt. 
The noise thereof sheweth concerning it, the cattle also concerning the vapour. 
At this also my heart trembleth, and is moved out of his place. 
Hear attentively the noise of his voice, and the sound that goeth out of his mouth. 
He directeth it under the whole heaven, and his lightning unto the ends of the earth. 
After it a voice roareth: he thundereth with the voice of his excellency; and he will not stay them when his voice is heard. 
God thundereth marvellously with his voice; great things doeth he, which we cannot comprehend. 
For he saith to the snow, Be thou on the earth; likewise to the small rain, and to the 
935,e fat thereof, as the fat is taken away from off the sacrifice of peace offerings; and the priest shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savour unto the LORD; and the priest shall make an atonement for him, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if he bring a lamb for a sin offering, he shall bring it a female without blemish. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of the sin offering, and slay it for a sin offering in the place where they kill the burnt offering. 
And the priest shall take of the blood of the sin offering with his finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering, and shall pour out all the blood thereof at the bottom of the altar: 
And he shall take away all the fat thereof, as the fat of the lamb is taken away from the sacrifice of the peace offerings; and the priest shall burn them upon the altar, according to the offerings made by fire unto the LORD: and the priest shall make an atonem
1078,him that for sedition and murder was cast into prison, whom they had desired; but he delivered Jesus to their will. 
And as they led him away, they laid hold upon one Simon, a Cyrenian, coming out of the country, and on him they laid the cross, that he might bear it after Jesus. 
And there followed him a great company of people, and of women, which also bewailed and lamented him. 
But Jesus turning unto them said, Daughters of Jerusalem, weep not for me, but weep for yourselves, and for your children. 
For, behold, the days are coming, in the which they shall say, Blessed are the barren, and the wombs that never bare, and the paps which never gave suck. 
Then shall they begin to say to the mountains, Fall on us; and to the hills, Cover us. 
For if they do these things in a green tree, what shall be done in the dry? 
And there were also two other, malefactors, led with him to be put to death. 
And when they were come to the place, which is called Calvary, there they crucified him, and the malefactors, one on the right hand, and the other on the left. 
Then said J
983, had said, I will not give thee the inheritance of my fathers. And he laid him down upon his bed, and turned away his face, and would eat no bread. 
But Jezebel his wife came to him, and said unto him, Why is thy spirit so sad, that thou eatest no bread? 
And he said unto her, Because I spake unto Naboth the Jezreelite, and said unto him, Give me thy vineyard for money; or else, if it please thee, I will give thee another vineyard for it: and he answered, I will not give thee my vineyard. 
And Jezebel his wife said unto him, Dost thou now govern the kingdom of Israel? arise, and eat bread, and let thine heart be merry: I will give thee the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite. 
So she wrote letters in Ahab's name, and sealed them with his seal, and sent the letters unto the elders and to the nobles that were in his city, dwelling with Naboth. 
And she wrote in the letters, saying, Proclaim a fast, and set Naboth on high among the people: 
And set two men, sons of Belial, 
902,Canaan that year. 
And it came to pass, when Joshua was by Jericho, that he lifted up his eyes and looked, and, behold, there stood a man over against him with his sword drawn in his hand: and Joshua went unto him, and said unto him, Art thou for us, or for our adversaries? 
And he said, Nay; but as captain of the host of the LORD am I now come. And Joshua fell on his face to the earth, and did worship, and said unto him, What saith my Lord unto his servant? 
And the captain of the LORD's host said unto Joshua, Loose thy shoe from off thy foot; for the place whereon thou standest is holy. And Joshua did so. 
Now Jericho was straitly shut up because of the children of Israel: none went out, and none came in. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, See, I have given into thine hand Jericho, and the king thereof, and the mighty men of valour. 
And ye shall compass the city, all ye men of war, and go 
919,th, or a year, that the cloud tarried upon the tabernacle, remaining thereon, the children of Israel abode in their tents, and journeyed not: but when it was taken up, they journeyed. 
At the commandment of the LORD they rested in the tents, and at the commandment of the LORD they journeyed: they kept the charge of the LORD, at the commandment of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Make thee two trumpets of silver; of a whole piece shalt thou make them: that thou mayest use them for the calling of the assembly, and for the journeying of the camps. 
And when they shall blow with them, all the assembly shall assemble themselves to thee at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And if they blow but with one trumpet, then the princes, which are heads of the thousands of Israel, shall gather themselves unto thee. 
When ye blow an alarm, then the camps that lie on th
978,in the sun, and in the moon, and in the stars; and upon the earth distress of nations, with perplexity; the sea and the waves roaring; 
Men's hearts failing them for fear, and for looking after those things which are coming on the earth: for the powers of heaven shall be shaken. 
And then shall they see the Son of man coming in a cloud with power and great glory. 
And when these things begin to come to pass, then look up, and lift up your heads; for your redemption draweth nigh. 
And he spake to them a parable; Behold the fig tree, and all the trees; 
When they now shoot forth, ye see and know of your own selves that summer is now nigh at hand. 
So likewise ye, when ye see these things come to pass, know ye that the kingdom of God is nigh at hand. 
Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass away, till all be fulfilled. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
And take heed to yourselves, lest at any time your hearts be overc
1071,d pitched in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho. 
And they pitched by Jordan, from Bethjesimoth even unto Abelshittim in the plains of Moab. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, When ye are passed over Jordan into the land of Canaan; 
Then ye shall drive out all the inhabitants of the land from before you, and destroy all their pictures, and destroy all their molten images, and quite pluck down all their high places: 
And ye shall dispossess the inhabitants of the land, and dwell therein: for I have given you the land to possess it. 
And ye shall divide the land by lot for an inheritance among your families: and to the more ye shall give the more inheritance, and to the fewer ye shall give the less inheritance: every man's inheritance shall be in the place where his lot falleth; according to the tribes of your fathers ye shall inherit. 
But if ye will not drive out the inhabitants of the land from before you; then it shall come to pass, that those
1037,city ascended up to heaven. 
And when the men of Israel turned again, the men of Benjamin were amazed: for they saw that evil was come upon them. 
Therefore they turned their backs before the men of Israel unto the way of the wilderness; but the battle overtook them; and them which came out of the cities they destroyed in the midst of them. 
Thus they inclosed the Benjamites round about, and chased them, and trode them down with ease over against Gibeah toward the sunrising. 
And there fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these were men of valour. 
And they turned and fled toward the wilderness unto the rock of Rimmon: and they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men; and pursued hard after them unto Gidom, and slew two thousand men of them. 
So that all which fell that day of Benjamin were twenty and five thousand men that drew the sword; all these were men of valour. 
But six hundred men turned and fled to the wilderness unto the rock Rimmon, and abode in the rock Rimmon four months. 
And the men of Isr
821, was grieved in my spirit in the midst of my body, and the visions of my head troubled me. 
I came near unto one of them that stood by, and asked him the truth of all this. So he told me, and made me know the interpretation of the things. 
These great beasts, which are four, are four kings, which shall arise out of the earth. 
But the saints of the most High shall take the kingdom, and possess the kingdom for ever, even for ever and ever. 
Then I would know the truth of the fourth beast, which was diverse from all the others, exceeding dreadful, whose teeth were of iron, and his nails of brass; which devoured, brake in pieces, and stamped the residue with his feet; 
And of the ten horns that were in his head, and of the other which came up, and before whom three fell; even of that horn that had eyes, and a mou
952,, even to the time of the end: many shall run to and fro, and knowledge shall be increased. 
Then I Daniel looked, and, behold, there stood other two, the one on this side of the bank of the river, and the other on that side of the bank of the river. 
And one said to the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, How long shall it be to the end of these wonders? 
And I heard the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, when he held up his right hand and his left hand unto heaven, and sware by him that liveth for ever that it shall be for a time, times, and an half; and when he shall have accomplished to scatter the power of the holy people, all these things shall be finished. 
And I heard, but I understood not: then said I, O my Lord, what shall be the end of these things? 
And he said, Go thy way, Daniel: for the words are closed up and sealed till the time of the end. 
Many shall be purified, and 
738,the wall of Ophel he built much. 
Moreover he built cities in the mountains of Judah, and in the forests he built castles and towers. 
He fought also with the king of the Ammonites, and prevailed against them. And the children of Ammon gave him the same year an hundred talents of silver, and ten thousand measures of wheat, and ten thousand of barley. So much did the children of Ammon pay unto him, both the second year, and the third. 
So Jotham became mighty, because he prepared his ways before the LORD his God. 
Now the rest of the acts of Jotham, and all his wars, and his ways, lo, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah. 
He was five and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned sixteen years 
894, will still abide in this land, then will I build you, and not pull you down, and I will plant you, and not pluck you up: for I repent me of the evil that I have done unto you. 
Be not afraid of the king of Babylon, of whom ye are afraid; be not afraid of him, saith the LORD: for I am with you to save you, and to deliver you from his hand. 
And I will shew mercies unto you, that he may have mercy upon you, and cause you to return to your own land. 
But if ye say, We will not dwell in this land, neither obey the voice of the LORD your God, 
Saying, No; but we will go into the land of Egypt, where we shall see no war, nor hear the sound of the trumpet, nor have hunger of bread; and there will we dwell: 
And now therefore hear the word of the LORD, ye remnant of Judah; Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; If ye wholly set your faces to enter into Egypt, and go to sojourn t
816, there thou shalt serve other gods, which neither thou nor thy fathers have known, even wood and stone. 
And among these nations shalt thou find no ease, neither shall the sole of thy foot have rest: but the LORD shall give thee there a trembling heart, and failing of eyes, and sorrow of mind: 
And thy life shall hang in doubt before thee; and thou shalt fear day and night, and shalt have none assurance of thy life: 
In the morning thou shalt say, Would God it were even! and at even thou shalt say, Would God it were morning! for the fear of thine heart wherewith thou shalt fear, and for the sight of thine eyes which thou shalt see. 
And the LORD shall bring thee into Egypt again with ships, by the way whereof I spake unto thee, Thou shalt see it no more again: and there ye shall be sold unto your enemies 
947,chmen upon the mount Ephraim shall cry, Arise ye, and let us go up to Zion unto the LORD our God. 
For thus saith the LORD; Sing with gladness for Jacob, and shout among the chief of the nations: publish ye, praise ye, and say, O LORD, save thy people, the remnant of Israel. 
Behold, I will bring them from the north country, and gather them from the coasts of the earth, and with them the blind and the lame, the woman with child and her that travaileth with child together: a great company shall return thither. 
They shall come with weeping, and with supplications will I lead them: I will cause them to walk by the rivers of waters in a straight way, wherein they shall not stumble: for I am a father to Israel, and Ephraim is my firstborn. 
Hear the word of the LORD, O ye nations, and declare it in the isles afar off, and say, He that scattered Israel will gather him, and keep him, as a shepherd doth his flock. 
For the LORD hath redeeme
904, had fought against the former king of Moab, and taken all his land out of his hand, even unto Arnon. 
Wherefore they that speak in proverbs say, Come into Heshbon, let the city of Sihon be built and prepared: 
For there is a fire gone out of Heshbon, a flame from the city of Sihon: it hath consumed ar of Moab, and the lords of the high places of Arnon. 
Woe to thee, Moab! thou art undone, O people of Chemosh: he hath given his sons that escaped, and his daughters, into captivity unto Sihon king of the Amorites. 
We have shot at them; Heshbon is perished even unto Dibon, and we have laid them waste even unto Nophah, which reacheth unto Medeba. 
Thus Israel dwelt in the land of the Amorites. 
And Moses sent to spy out Jaazer, and they took the villages thereof, and drove out the Amorites that were there. 
And they turned and went up by the way of Bashan: and og the king of bashan went out aga
821, understanding: whose mouth must be held in with bit and bridle, lest they come near unto thee. 
Many sorrows shall be to the wicked: but he that trusteth in the LORD, mercy shall compass him about. 
Be glad in the LORD, and rejoice, ye righteous: and shout for joy, all ye that are upright in heart. 
Rejoice in the LORD, O ye righteous: for praise is comely for the upright. 
Praise the LORD with harp: sing unto him with the psaltery and an instrument of ten strings. 
Sing unto him a new song; play skilfully with a loud noise. 
For the word of the LORD is right; and all his works are done in truth. 
He loveth righteousness and judgment: the earth is full of the goodness of the LORD. 
By the word of the LORD were the heavens made; and all the host of them by the breath of his mouth. 
He gathereth the waters of t
921,es, and he laid waste their cities; and the land was desolate, and the fulness thereof, by the noise of his roaring. 
Then the nations set against him on every side from the provinces, and spread their net over him: he was taken in their pit. 
And they put him in ward in chains, and brought him to the king of Babylon: they brought him into holds, that his voice should no more be heard upon the mountains of Israel. 
Thy mother is like a vine in thy blood, planted by the waters: she was fruitful and full of branches by reason of many waters. 
And she had strong rods for the sceptres of them that bare rule, and her stature was exalted among the thick branches, and she appeared in her height with the multitude of her branches. 
But she was plucked up in fury, she was cast down to the ground, and the east wind dried up her fruit: her strong rods were broken and withered; the fire consumed them. 
And now she is pl
752, grove which thou shalt cut down. 
Then Gideon took ten men of his servants, and did as the LORD had said unto him: and so it was, because he feared his father's household, and the men of the city, that he could not do it by day, that he did it by night. 
And when the men of the city arose early in the morning, behold, the altar of Baal was cast down, and the grove was cut down that was by it, and the second bullock was offered upon the altar that was built. 
And they said one to another, Who hath done this thing? And when they enquired and asked, they said, Gideon the son of Joash hath done this thing. 
Then the men of the city said unto Joash, Bring out thy son, that he may die: because he hath cast down the altar of Baal, and because he ha
828,RD divideth the flames of fire. 
The voice of the LORD shaketh the wilderness; the LORD shaketh the wilderness of Kadesh. 
The voice of the LORD maketh the hinds to calve, and discovereth the forests: and in his temple doth every one speak of his glory. 
The LORD sitteth upon the flood; yea, the LORD sitteth King for ever. 
The LORD will give strength unto his people; the LORD will bless his people with peace. 
I will extol thee, O LORD; for thou hast lifted me up, and hast not made my foes to rejoice over me. 
O LORD my God, I cried unto thee, and thou hast healed me. 
O LORD, thou hast brought up my soul from the grave: thou hast kept me alive, that I should not go down to the pit. 
Sing unto the LORD, O ye saints of his, and give thanks at the remembrance of his holiness. 
For his anger endureth but a moment; in h
931,x, or his ass, or any thing that is thy neighbour's. 
These words the LORD spake unto all your assembly in the mount out of the midst of the fire, of the cloud, and of the thick darkness, with a great voice: and he added no more. And he wrote them in two tables of stone, and delivered them unto me. 
And it came to pass, when ye heard the voice out of the midst of the darkness, (for the mountain did burn with fire,) that ye came near unto me, even all the heads of your tribes, and your elders; 
And ye said, Behold, the LORD our God hath shewed us his glory and his greatness, and we have heard his voice out of the midst of the fire: we have seen this day that God doth talk with man, and he liveth. 
Now therefore why should we die? for this great fire will consume us: if we hear the voice of the LORD our God any more, then we shall die. 
For who is there of all flesh, that hath heard the voice of the living God speaking 
978,baths, and I am profaned among them. 
Her princes in the midst thereof are like wolves ravening the prey, to shed blood, and to destroy souls, to get dishonest gain. 
And her prophets have daubed them with untempered morter, seeing vanity, and divining lies unto them, saying, Thus saith the Lord GOD, when the LORD hath not spoken. 
The people of the land have used oppression, and exercised robbery, and have vexed the poor and needy: yea, they have oppressed the stranger wrongfully. 
And I sought for a man among them, that should make up the hedge, and stand in the gap before me for the land, that I should not destroy it: but I found none. 
Therefore have I poured out mine indignation upon them; I have consumed them with the fire of my wrath: their own way have I recompensed upon their heads, saith the Lord GOD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Son of man, there were two women, the daughters of one mother: 
And they committed whoredoms in Egypt; t
1022,d, and he had answered me; yet would I not believe that he had hearkened unto my voice. 
For he breaketh me with a tempest, and multiplieth my wounds without cause. 
He will not suffer me to take my breath, but filleth me with bitterness. 
If I speak of strength, lo, he is strong: and if of judgment, who shall set me a time to plead? 
If I justify myself, mine own mouth shall condemn me: if I say, I am perfect, it shall also prove me perverse. 
Though I were perfect, yet would I not know my soul: I would despise my life. 
This is one thing, therefore I said it, He destroyeth the perfect and the wicked. 
If the scourge slay suddenly, he will laugh at the trial of the innocent. 
The earth is given into the hand of the wicked: he covereth the faces of the judges thereof; if not, where, and who is he? 
Now my days are swifter than a post: they flee away, they see no good. 
They are passed away as the swift ships: as the eagle that hasteth to the prey. 
If I say, I will forget my complaint, I will leave off my h
937,David answered the priest, and said unto him, Of a truth women have been kept from us about these three days, since I came out, and the vessels of the young men are holy, and the bread is in a manner common, yea, though it were sanctified this day in the vessel. 
So the priest gave him hallowed bread: for there was no bread there but the shewbread, that was taken from before the LORD, to put hot bread in the day when it was taken away. 
Now a certain man of the servants of Saul was there that day, detained before the LORD; and his name was Doeg, an Edomite, the chiefest of the herdmen that belonged to Saul. 
And David said unto Ahimelech, And is there not here under thine hand spear or sword? for I have neither brought my sword nor my weapons with me, because the king's business required haste. 
And the priest said, The sword of Goliath the Philistine, whom thou slewest in the valley of Elah, behold, it is here wrapped in a
965,servant in the land of Egypt, and that the LORD thy God brought thee out thence through a mighty hand and by a stretched out arm: therefore the LORD thy God commanded thee to keep the sabbath day. 
Honour thy father and thy mother, as the LORD thy God hath commanded thee; that thy days may be prolonged, and that it may go well with thee, in the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
Thou shalt not kill. 
Neither shalt thou commit adultery. 
Neither shalt thou steal. 
Neither shalt thou bear false witness against thy neighbour. 
Neither shalt thou desire thy neighbour's wife, neither shalt thou covet thy neighbour's house, his field, or his manservant, or his maidservant, his ox, or his ass, or any thing that is thy neighbour's. 
These words the LORD spake unto all your assembly in the mount out of the midst of the fire, of the cloud, and of the thick darkness, with a great voice: and he added no more. And he wrote them in two tables of stone, and d
1028,e midst thereof, and will slay all the princes thereof with him, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Judah, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have despised the law of the LORD, and have not kept his commandments, and their lies caused them to err, after the which their fathers have walked: 
But I will send a fire upon Judah, and it shall devour the palaces of Jerusalem. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Israel, and for four, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they sold the righteous for silver, and the poor for a pair of shoes; 
That pant after the dust of the earth on the head of the poor, and turn aside the way of the meek: and a man and his father will go in unto the same maid, to profane my holy name: 
And they lay themselves down upon clothes laid to pledge by every altar, and they drink the wine of the condemned in the house of their god. 
Yet destroyed I the Amorite before them, whose height was like the h
1036,han stripped himself of the robe that was upon him, and gave it to David, and his garments, even to his sword, and to his bow, and to his girdle. 
And David went out whithersoever Saul sent him, and behaved himself wisely: and Saul set him over the men of war, and he was accepted in the sight of all the people, and also in the sight of Saul's servants. 
And it came to pass as they came, when David was returned from the slaughter of the Philistine, that the women came out of all cities of Israel, singing and dancing, to meet king Saul, with tabrets, with joy, and with instruments of musick. 
And the women answered one another as they played, and said, Saul hath slain his thousands, and David his ten thousands. 
And Saul was very wroth, and the saying displeased him; and he said, They have ascribed unto David ten thousands, and to me they have ascribed but thousands: and what can he have more but the kingdom? 
And Saul eyed David from that day and forward. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the evil spirit from God c
891,n water, and be unclean until the even. 
And whosoever toucheth any thing that she sat upon shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And if it be on her bed, or on any thing whereon she sitteth, when he toucheth it, he shall be unclean until the even. 
And if any man lie with her at all, and her flowers be upon him, he shall be unclean seven days; and all the bed whereon he lieth shall be unclean. 
And if a woman have an issue of her blood many days out of the time of her separation, or if it run beyond the time of her separation; all the days of the issue of her uncleanness shall be as the days of her separation: she shall be unclean. 
Every bed whereon she lieth all the days of her issue shall be unto her as the bed of her separation: and whatsoever she sitteth upon shall be unclean, as the uncleanness of her separation. 
And whosoeve
830, when ye dwelt upon it. 
And upon them that are left alive of you I will send a faintness into their hearts in the lands of their enemies; and the sound of a shaken leaf shall chase them; and they shall flee, as fleeing from a sword; and they shall fall when none pursueth. 
And they shall fall one upon another, as it were before a sword, when none pursueth: and ye shall have no power to stand before your enemies. 
And ye shall perish among the heathen, and the land of your enemies shall eat you up. 
And they that are left of you shall pine away in their iniquity in your enemies' lands; and also in the iniquities of their fathers shall they pine away with them. 
If they shall confess their iniquity, and the iniquity of their fathers, with their trespass which they trespassed against me, and that also they have walked co
982,ather of Birzavith. 
And Heber begat Japhlet, and Shomer, and Hotham, and Shua their sister. 
And the sons of Japhlet; Pasach, and Bimhal, and Ashvath. These are the children of Japhlet. 
And the sons of Shamer; Ahi, and Rohgah, Jehubbah, and Aram. 
And the sons of his brother Helem; Zophah, and Imna, and Shelesh, and Amal. 
The sons of Zophah; Suah, and Harnepher, and Shual, and Beri, and Imrah, 
Bezer, and Hod, and Shamma, and Shilshah, and Ithran, and Beera. 
And the sons of Jether; Jephunneh, and Pispah, and Ara. 
And the sons of Ulla; Arah, and Haniel, and Rezia. 
All these were the children of Asher, heads of their father's house, choice and mighty men of valour, chief of the princes. And the number throughout the genealogy of them that were apt to the war and to battle was twenty and six thousand men. 
Now Benjamin begat Bela his firstborn, Ashbel the second, and Aharah the third, 
Nohah the fourth, and Rapha the fifth. 
And the sons of Bela were, Addar, and Ge
914,n thing. 
Therefore the abundance they have gotten, and that which they have laid up, shall they carry away to the brook of the willows. 
For the cry is gone round about the borders of Moab; the howling thereof unto Eglaim, and the howling thereof unto Beerelim. 
For the waters of Dimon shall be full of blood: for I will bring more upon Dimon, lions upon him that escapeth of Moab, and upon the remnant of the land. 
Send ye the lamb to the ruler of the land from Sela to the wilderness, unto the mount of the daughter of Zion. 
For it shall be, that, as a wandering bird cast out of the nest, so the daughters of Moab shall be at the fords of Arnon. 
Take counsel, execute judgment; make thy shadow as the night in the midst of the noonday; hide the outcasts; bewray not him that wandereth. 
Let mine outcasts dwell with thee, Moab; be thou a covert to them from the face of the spoiler: for the extortioner is 
785,r old age: and this is the sixth month with her, who was called barren. 
For with God nothing shall be impossible. 
And Mary said, Behold the handmaid of the Lord; be it unto me according to thy word. And the angel departed from her. 
And Mary arose in those days, and went into the hill country with haste, into a city of Juda; 
And entered into the house of Zacharias, and saluted Elisabeth. 
And it came to pass, that, when Elisabeth heard the salutation of Mary, the babe leaped in her womb; and Elisabeth was filled with the Holy Ghost: 
And she spake out with a loud voice, and said, Blessed art thou among women, and blessed is the fruit of thy womb. 
And whence is this to me, that the mother of my Lord should come to me? 
For, lo, as soon as the voice of thy salutation sound
784,n of Nebat reigned Abijam over Judah. 
Three years reigned he in Jerusalem. and his mother's name was Maachah, the daughter of Abishalom. 
And he walked in all the sins of his father, which he had done before him: and his heart was not perfect with the LORD his God, as the heart of David his father. 
Nevertheless for David's sake did the LORD his God give him a lamp in Jerusalem, to set up his son after him, and to establish Jerusalem: 
Because David did that which was right in the eyes of the LORD, and turned not aside from any thing that he commanded him all the days of his life, save only in the matter of Uriah the Hittite. 
And there was war between Rehoboam and Jeroboam all the days of his life. 
Now the rest of the acts of Abijam, and all that he did, are they not wri
994,ound them have devoured them: and their adversaries said, We offend not, because they have sinned against the LORD, the habitation of justice, even the LORD, the hope of their fathers. 
Remove out of the midst of Babylon, and go forth out of the land of the Chaldeans, and be as the he goats before the flocks. 
For, lo, I will raise and cause to come up against Babylon an assembly of great nations from the north country: and they shall set themselves in array against her; from thence she shall be taken: their arrows shall be as of a mighty expert man; none shall return in vain. 
And Chaldea shall be a spoil: all that spoil her shall be satisfied, saith the LORD. 
Because ye were glad, because ye rejoiced, O ye destroyers of mine heritage, because ye are grown fat as the heifer at grass, and bellow as bulls; 
Your mother shall be sore confounded; she that bare you shall be ashamed: behold, the hindermost of the nations shall be a wilderness, a dry land, and a desert. 
Because of th
729,door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and there eat it with the bread that is in the basket of consecrations, as I commanded, saying, Aaron and his sons shall eat it. 
And that which remaineth of the flesh and of the bread shall ye burn with fire. 
And ye shall not go out of the door of the tabernacle of the congregation in seven days, until the days of your consecration be at an end: for seven days shall he consecrate you. 
As he hath done this day, so the LORD hath commanded to do, to make an atonement for you. 
Therefore shall ye abide at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation day and night seven days, and keep the charge of the LORD, that ye die not: for so I am commanded. 
So Aaron and his sons did al
912,ilt thee an house to dwell in, a settled place for thee to abide in for ever. 
And the king turned his face about, and blessed all the congregation of Israel: (and all the congregation of Israel stood;) 
And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which spake with his mouth unto David my father, and hath with his hand fulfilled it, saying, 
Since the day that I brought forth my people Israel out of Egypt, I chose no city out of all the tribes of Israel to build an house, that my name might be therein; but I chose David to be over my people Israel. 
And it was in the heart of David my father to build an house for the name of the LORD God of Israel. 
And the LORD said unto David my father, Whereas it was in thine heart to build an house unto my name, thou didst well that it was in thine heart. 
Nevertheless thou shalt not build the house; but thy son that shall come forth out of thy loins, he shal
1048,I will look unto the LORD; I will wait for the God of my salvation: my God will hear me. 
Rejoice not against me, O mine enemy: when I fall, I shall arise; when I sit in darkness, the LORD shall be a light unto me. 
I will bear the indignation of the LORD, because I have sinned against him, until he plead my cause, and execute judgment for me: he will bring me forth to the light, and I shall behold his righteousness. 
Then she that is mine enemy shall see it, and shame shall cover her which said unto me, Where is the LORD thy God? mine eyes shall behold her: now shall she be trodden down as the mire of the streets. 
In the day that thy walls are to be built, in that day shall the decree be far removed. 
In that day also he shall come even to thee from Assyria, and from the fortified cities, and from the fortress even to the river, and from sea to sea, and from mountain to mountain. 
Notwithstanding the land shall be desolate because of them that dwell therein, for the fruit of their doings. 
Feed thy people with thy rod, the flock o
930,, and let them bring forth salvation, and let righteousness spring up together; I the LORD have created it. 
Woe unto him that striveth with his Maker! Let the potsherd strive with the potsherds of the earth. Shall the clay say to him that fashioneth it, What makest thou? or thy work, He hath no hands? 
Woe unto him that saith unto his father, What begettest thou? or to the woman, What hast thou brought forth? 
Thus saith the LORD, the Holy One of Israel, and his Maker, Ask me of things to come concerning my sons, and concerning the work of my hands command ye me. 
I have made the earth, and created man upon it: I, even my hands, have stretched out the heavens, and all their host have I commanded. 
I have raised him up in righteousness, and I will direct all his ways: he shall build my city, and he shall let go my captives, not for price nor reward, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Thus saith the LORD, The labour of Egypt, 
998,ed: 
His offering was one silver charger, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Ahira the son of Enan. 
This was the dedication of the altar, in the day when it was anointed, by the princes of Israel: twelve chargers of silver, twelve silver bowls, twelve spoons of gold: 
Each charger of silver weighing an hundred and thirty shekels, each bowl seventy: all the silver vessels weighed two thousand and four hundred shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary: 
The golden spoons were twelve, full of incense, weighing ten shekels apiece,
1068, dead. 
Howbeit, as the disciples stood round about him, he rose up, and came into the city: and the next day he departed with Barnabas to Derbe. 
And when they had preached the gospel to that city, and had taught many, they returned again to Lystra, and to Iconium, and Antioch, 
Confirming the souls of the disciples, and exhorting them to continue in the faith, and that we must through much tribulation enter into the kingdom of God. 
And when they had ordained them elders in every church, and had prayed with fasting, they commended them to the Lord, on whom they believed. 
And after they had passed throughout Pisidia, they came to Pamphylia. 
And when they had preached the word in Perga, they went down into Attalia: 
And thence sailed to Antioch, from whence they had been recommended to the grace of God for the work which they fulfilled. 
And when they were come, and had gathered the church together, they rehearsed all that God had done with them, and how he had opened the door of faith unto the Gentiles. 
And there they abode long time with the disci
985,dow. 
He draweth also the mighty with his power: he riseth up, and no man is sure of life. 
Though it be given him to be in safety, whereon he resteth; yet his eyes are upon their ways. 
They are exalted for a little while, but are gone and brought low; they are taken out of the way as all other, and cut off as the tops of the ears of corn. 
And if it be not so now, who will make me a liar, and make my speech nothing worth? 
Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 
Dominion and fear are with him, he maketh peace in his high places. 
Is there any number of his armies? and upon whom doth not his light arise? 
How then can man be justified with God? or how can he be clean that is born of a woman? 
Behold even to the moon, and it shineth not; yea, the stars are not pure in his sight. 
How much less man, that is a worm? and the son of man, which is a worm? 
But Job answered and said, 
How hast thou helped him that is without power? how savest thou the arm that hath no str
939,offer gifts. 
Yea, all kings shall fall down before him: all nations shall serve him. 
For he shall deliver the needy when he crieth; the poor also, and him that hath no helper. 
He shall spare the poor and needy, and shall save the souls of the needy. 
He shall redeem their soul from deceit and violence: and precious shall their blood be in his sight. 
And he shall live, and to him shall be given of the gold of Sheba: prayer also shall be made for him continually; and daily shall he be praised. 
There shall be an handful of corn in the earth upon the top of the mountains; the fruit thereof shall shake like Lebanon: and they of the city shall flourish like grass of the earth. 
His name shall endure for ever: his name shall be continued as long as the sun: and men shall be blessed in him: all nations shall call him blessed. 
Blessed be the LORD God, the God of Israel, who only doeth wondrous things. 
And blessed be his gloriou
920,aid, Swear to me this day; and he sware unto him: and he sold his birthright unto Jacob. 
Then Jacob gave Esau bread and pottage of lentiles; and he did eat and drink, and rose up, and went his way: thus Esau despised his birthright. 
And there was a famine in the land, beside the first famine that was in the days of Abraham. And Isaac went unto Abimelech king of the Philistines unto Gerar. 
And the LORD appeared unto him, and said, Go not down into Egypt; dwell in the land which I shall tell thee of: 
Sojourn in this land, and I will be with thee, and will bless thee; for unto thee, and unto thy seed, I will give all these countries, and I will perform the oath which I sware unto Abraham thy father; 
And I will make thy seed to multiply as the stars of heaven, and will give unto thy seed all these countries; and in thy seed shall all the nations of the earth be blessed; 
Because that Abraham obeyed my voic
949,be taken away from among you. 
For I verily, as absent in body, but present in spirit, have judged already, as though I were present, concerning him that hath so done this deed, 
In the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, when ye are gathered together, and my spirit, with the power of our Lord Jesus Christ, 
To deliver such an one unto Satan for the destruction of the flesh, that the spirit may be saved in the day of the Lord Jesus. 
Your glorying is not good. Know ye not that a little leaven leaveneth the whole lump? 
Purge out therefore the old leaven, that ye may be a new lump, as ye are unleavened. For even Christ our passover is sacrificed for us: 
Therefore let us keep the feast, not with old leaven, neither with the leaven of malice and wickedness; but with the unleavened bread of sincerity and truth. 
I wrote unto you in an epistle not to company with fornicators: 
Yet not altogether with the fornicators of this world, or with the c
957,hed blood: 
Destruction and misery are in their ways: 
And the way of peace have they not known: 
There is no fear of God before their eyes. 
Now we know that what things soever the law saith, it saith to them who are under the law: that every mouth may be stopped, and all the world may become guilty before God. 
Therefore by the deeds of the law there shall no flesh be justified in his sight: for by the law is the knowledge of sin. 
But now the righteousness of God without the law is manifested, being witnessed by the law and the prophets; 
Even the righteousness of God which is by faith of Jesus Christ unto all and upon all them that believe: for there is no difference: 
For all have sinned, and come short of the glory of God; 
Being justified freely by his grace through the redemption that is in Christ Jesus: 
Whom God hath set forth to be a propitiation through faith in his blood, to declare his righteousness for the remission of sins that
946,t blood upon thine house, if any man fall from thence. 
Thou shalt not sow thy vineyard with divers seeds: lest the fruit of thy seed which thou hast sown, and the fruit of thy vineyard, be defiled. 
Thou shalt not plow with an ox and an ass together. 
Thou shalt not wear a garment of divers sorts, as of woollen and linen together. 
Thou shalt make thee fringes upon the four quarters of thy vesture, wherewith thou coverest thyself. 
If any man take a wife, and go in unto her, and hate her, 
And give occasions of speech against her, and bring up an evil name upon her, and say, I took this woman, and when I came to her, I found her not a maid: 
Then shall the father of the damsel, and her mother, take and bring forth the tokens of the damsel's virginity unto the elders of the city in the gate: 
And the damsel's father shall say unto the elders, I gave my daughter unto this man to wife, and he hateth her; 
And, lo, he hath given occasi
875,be satisfied upon them; I will draw my sword, my hand shall destroy them. 
Thou didst blow with thy wind, the sea covered them: they sank as lead in the mighty waters. 
Who is like unto thee, O LORD, among the gods? who is like thee, glorious in holiness, fearful in praises, doing wonders? 
Thou stretchedst out thy right hand, the earth swallowed them. 
Thou in thy mercy hast led forth the people which thou hast redeemed: thou hast guided them in thy strength unto thy holy habitation. 
The people shall hear, and be afraid: sorrow shall take hold on the inhabitants of Palestina. 
Then the dukes of Edom shall be amazed; the mighty men of Moab, trembling shall take hold upon them; all the inhabitants of Canaan shall melt away. 
Fear and dread shall fall upon them; by the greatness of thine arm they shall be as still as a stone; till thy people pass over, O LORD, til
1025,nwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is on them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And Aaron's sons shall burn it on the altar upon the burnt sacrifice, which is upon the wood that is on the fire: it is an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if his offering for a sacrifice of peace offering unto the LORD be of the flock; male or female, he shall offer it without blemish. 
If he offer a lamb for his offering, then shall he offer it before the LORD. 
And he shall lay his hand upon the head of his offering, and kill it before the tabernacle of the congregation: and Aaron's sons shall sprinkle the blood thereof round about upon the altar. 
And he shall offer of the sacrifice of the peace offering an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat thereof, and the whole rump, it shall he take off hard by the backbone; and the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is u
857,ibes and chief priests heard it, and sought how they might destroy him: for they feared him, because all the people was astonished at his doctrine. 
And when even was come, he went out of the city. 
And in the morning, as they passed by, they saw the fig tree dried up from the roots. 
And Peter calling to remembrance saith unto him, Master, behold, the fig tree which thou cursedst is withered away. 
And Jesus answering saith unto them, Have faith in God. 
For verily I say unto you, That whosoever shall say unto this mountain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea; and shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things which he saith shall come to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith. 
Therefore I say unto you, What things soever ye desire, when ye pray, believe that ye receive them, and ye shall have them. 
And when ye
917,with the spear even to the earth at once, and I will not smite him the second time. 
And David said to Abishai, Destroy him not: for who can stretch forth his hand against the LORD's anointed, and be guiltless? 
David said furthermore, As the LORD liveth, the LORD shall smite him; or his day shall come to die; or he shall descend into battle, and perish. 
The LORD forbid that I should stretch forth mine hand against the LORD's anointed: but, I pray thee, take thou now the spear that is at his bolster, and the cruse of water, and let us go. 
So David took the spear and the cruse of water from Saul's bolster; and they gat them away, and no man saw it, nor knew it, neither awaked: for they were all asleep; because a deep sleep from the LORD was fallen upon them. 
Then David went over to the other side, and stood on the top of an hill afar off; a great space being between them: 
And David cried to the people
899, own glory: but he that seeketh his glory that sent him, the same is true, and no unrighteousness is in him. 
Did not Moses give you the law, and yet none of you keepeth the law? Why go ye about to kill me? 
The people answered and said, Thou hast a devil: who goeth about to kill thee? 
Jesus answered and said unto them, I have done one work, and ye all marvel. 
Moses therefore gave unto you circumcision; (not because it is of Moses, but of the fathers;) and ye on the sabbath day circumcise a man. 
If a man on the sabbath day receive circumcision, that the law of Moses should not be broken; are ye angry at me, because I have made a man every whit whole on the sabbath day? 
Judge not according to the appearance, but judge righteous judgment. 
Then said some of them of Jerusalem, Is not this he, whom they seek to kill? 
But, lo, he speaketh boldly, and they say nothing unto him. Do the ru
968,perish at the rebuke of thy countenance. 
Let thy hand be upon the man of thy right hand, upon the son of man whom thou madest strong for thyself. 
So will not we go back from thee: quicken us, and we will call upon thy name. 
Turn us again, O LORD God of hosts, cause thy face to shine; and we shall be saved. 
Sing aloud unto God our strength: make a joyful noise unto the God of Jacob. 
Take a psalm, and bring hither the timbrel, the pleasant harp with the psaltery. 
Blow up the trumpet in the new moon, in the time appointed, on our solemn feast day. 
For this was a statute for Israel, and a law of the God of Jacob. 
This he ordained in Joseph for a testimony, when he went out through the land of Egypt: where I heard a language that I understood not. 
I removed his shoulder from the burden: his hands were delivered from the pots. 
Thou calledst in trouble, and I delivered thee; I answered thee in the secret place of thunder: I proved thee at the waters o
777,s, they came to Perga in Pamphylia: and John departing from them returned to Jerusalem. 
But when they departed from Perga, they came to Antioch in Pisidia, and went into the synagogue on the sabbath day, and sat down. 
And after the reading of the law and the prophets the rulers of the synagogue sent unto them, saying, Ye men and brethren, if ye have any word of exhortation for the people, say on. 
Then Paul stood up, and beckoning with his hand said, Men of Israel, and ye that fear God, give audience. 
The God of this people of Israel chose our fathers, and exalted the people when they dwelt as strangers in the land of Egypt, and with an high arm brought he them out of it. 
And about the time of forty years suffered he their manners in the wilderness. 
And when he 
1076,e porters. 
And all the people departed every man to his house: and David returned to bless his house. 
Now it came to pass, as David sat in his house, that David said to Nathan the prophet, Lo, I dwell in an house of cedars, but the ark of the covenant of the LORD remaineth under curtains. 
Then Nathan said unto David, Do all that is in thine heart; for God is with thee. 
And it came to pass the same night, that the word of God came to Nathan, saying, 
Go and tell David my servant, Thus saith the LORD, Thou shalt not build me an house to dwell in: 
For I have not dwelt in an house since the day that I brought up Israel unto this day; but have gone from tent to tent, and from one tabernacle to another. 
Wheresoever I have walked with all Israel, spake I a word to any of the judges of Israel, whom I commanded to feed my people, saying, Why have ye not built me an house of cedars? 
Now therefore thus shalt thou say unto my servant David, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I took thee from the sheepcote, even from following the sheep, that thou shouldest be ruler over
763,in the morning; for in thee do I trust: cause me to know the way wherein I should walk; for I lift up my soul unto thee. 
Deliver me, O LORD, from mine enemies: I flee unto thee to hide me. 
Teach me to do thy will; for thou art my God: thy spirit is good; lead me into the land of uprightness. 
Quicken me, O LORD, for thy name's sake: for thy righteousness' sake bring my soul out of trouble. 
And of thy mercy cut off mine enemies, and destroy all them that afflict my soul: for I am thy servant. 
Blessed be the LORD my strength which teacheth my hands to war, and my fingers to fight: 
My goodness, and my fortress; my high tower, and my deliverer; my shield, and he in whom I trust; who subdueth my people under me. 
LORD, what is man, that thou takest know
737,are to whom ye obey; whether of sin unto death, or of obedience unto righteousness? 
But God be thanked, that ye were the servants of sin, but ye have obeyed from the heart that form of doctrine which was delivered you. 
Being then made free from sin, ye became the servants of righteousness. 
I speak after the manner of men because of the infirmity of your flesh: for as ye have yielded your members servants to uncleanness and to iniquity unto iniquity; even so now yield your members servants to righteousness unto holiness. 
For when ye were the servants of sin, ye were free from righteousness. 
What fruit had ye then in those things whereof ye are now ashamed? for the end of those things is death. 
But now being made free from 
937,he law of the God of heaven, perfect peace, and at such a time. 
I make a decree, that all they of the people of Israel, and of his priests and Levites, in my realm, which are minded of their own freewill to go up to Jerusalem, go with thee. 
Forasmuch as thou art sent of the king, and of his seven counsellors, to enquire concerning Judah and Jerusalem, according to the law of thy God which is in thine hand; 
And to carry the silver and gold, which the king and his counsellors have freely offered unto the God of Israel, whose habitation is in Jerusalem, 
And all the silver and gold that thou canst find in all the province of Babylon, with the freewill offering of the people, and of the priests, offering willingly for the house of their God which is in Jerusalem: 
That thou mayest buy speedily with this money bullocks, rams, lambs, with their meat offerings and their drink offerings, and offer them upon the altar of the hous
767, have heard, lest at any time we should let them slip. 
For if the word spoken by angels was stedfast, and every transgression and disobedience received a just recompence of reward; 
How shall we escape, if we neglect so great salvation; which at the first began to be spoken by the Lord, and was confirmed unto us by them that heard him; 
God also bearing them witness, both with signs and wonders, and with divers miracles, and gifts of the Holy Ghost, according to his own will? 
For unto the angels hath he not put in subjection the world to come, whereof we speak. 
But one in a certain place testified, saying, What is man, that thou art mindful of him? or the son of man that thou visitest him? 
Thou madest him a little lower than the angels; thou crownedst h
926,ok of every clean beast, and of every clean fowl, and offered burnt offerings on the altar. 
And the LORD smelled a sweet savour; and the LORD said in his heart, I will not again curse the ground any more for man's sake; for the imagination of man's heart is evil from his youth; neither will I again smite any more every thing living, as I have done. 
While the earth remaineth, seedtime and harvest, and cold and heat, and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease. 
And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said unto them, Be fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth. 
And the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every beast of the earth, and upon every fowl of the air, upon all that moveth upon the earth, and upon all the fishes of the sea; into your hand are they delivered. 
Every moving thing that liveth shall be meat for you; even as the green herb have I given you all things. 
But flesh
1026,m Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all that are meet for the war. 
But your wives, and your little ones, and your cattle, (for I know that ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I have given you; 
Until the LORD have given rest unto your brethren, as well as unto you, and until they also possess the land which the LORD your God hath given them beyond Jordan: and then shall ye return every man unto his possession, which I have given you. 
And I commanded Joshua at that time, saying, Thine eyes have seen all that the LORD your God hath done unto these two kings: so shall the LORD do unto all the kingdoms whither thou passest. 
Ye shall not fear them: for the LORD your God he shall fight for you. 
And I besought the LORD at that time, saying, 
O Lord GOD, thou hast begun t
1066,covering the altar of the LORD with tears, with weeping, and with crying out, insomuch that he regardeth not the offering any more, or receiveth it with good will at your hand. 
Yet ye say, Wherefore? Because the LORD hath been witness between thee and the wife of thy youth, against whom thou hast dealt treacherously: yet is she thy companion, and the wife of thy covenant. 
And did not he make one? Yet had he the residue of the spirit. And wherefore one? That he might seek a godly seed. Therefore take heed to your spirit, and let none deal treacherously against the wife of his youth. 
For the LORD, the God of Israel, saith that he hateth putting away: for one covereth violence with his garment, saith the LORD of hosts: therefore take heed to your spirit, that ye deal not treacherously. 
Ye have wearied the LORD with your words. Yet ye say, Wherein have we wearied him? When ye say, Every one that doeth evil is good in the sight of the LORD, and he delighteth in them; or, Where is the God of judgment? 
Behold, I will send my messenger, and he shall pre
752,st us, which was contrary to us, and took it out of the way, nailing it to his cross; 
And having spoiled principalities and powers, he made a shew of them openly, triumphing over them in it. 
Let no man therefore judge you in meat, or in drink, or in respect of an holyday, or of the new moon, or of the sabbath days: 
Which are a shadow of things to come; but the body is of Christ. 
Let no man beguile you of your reward in a voluntary humility and worshipping of angels, intruding into those things which he hath not seen, vainly puffed up by his fleshly mind, 
And not holding the Head, from which all the body by joints and bands having nourishment ministered, and knit together, increaseth with the increase of God. 
Wherefore if ye be dead with
1062, that I am the Lord GOD. 
Because, even because they have seduced my people, saying, Peace; and there was no peace; and one built up a wall, and, lo, others daubed it with untempered morter: 
Say unto them which daub it with untempered morter, that it shall fall: there shall be an overflowing shower; and ye, O great hailstones, shall fall; and a stormy wind shall rend it. 
Lo, when the wall is fallen, shall it not be said unto you, Where is the daubing wherewith ye have daubed it? 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even rend it with a stormy wind in my fury; and there shall be an overflowing shower in mine anger, and great hailstones in my fury to consume it. 
So will I break down the wall that ye have daubed with untempered morter, and bring it down to the ground, so that the foundation thereof shall be discovered, and it shall fall, and ye shall be consumed in the midst thereof: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Thus will I accomplish my wrath upon the wall, and upon them that have daubed it with untempered morter, and will say unt
1021,t the people thronged him. 
And a woman having an issue of blood twelve years, which had spent all her living upon physicians, neither could be healed of any, 
Came behind him, and touched the border of his garment: and immediately her issue of blood stanched. 
And Jesus said, Who touched me? When all denied, Peter and they that were with him said, Master, the multitude throng thee and press thee, and sayest thou, Who touched me? 
And Jesus said, Somebody hath touched me: for I perceive that virtue is gone out of me. 
And when the woman saw that she was not hid, she came trembling, and falling down before him, she declared unto him before all the people for what cause she had touched him, and how she was healed immediately. 
And he said unto her, Daughter, be of good comfort: thy faith hath made thee whole; go in peace. 
While he yet spake, there cometh one from the ruler of the synagogue's house, saying to him, Thy daughter is dead; trouble not the Master. 
But when Jesus heard it, he answered him, saying
855,iderer, in blue, and in purple, in scarlet, and in fine linen, and of the weaver, even of them that do any work, and of those that devise cunning work. 
Then wrought Bezaleel and Aholiab, and every wise hearted man, in whom the LORD put wisdom and understanding to know how to work all manner of work for the service of the sanctuary, according to all that the LORD had commanded. 
And Moses called Bezaleel and Aholiab, and every wise hearted man, in whose heart the LORD had put wisdom, even every one whose heart stirred him up to come unto the work to do it: 
And they received of Moses all the offering, which the children of Israel had brought for the work of the service of the sanctuary, to make it withal. And they brought yet unto him free offerings every morning. 
And all the wise men, that wrought all the work of the sanctuary, came every ma
926,and it shall stop the noses of the passengers: and there shall they bury Gog and all his multitude: and they shall call it The valley of Hamongog. 
And seven months shall the house of Israel be burying of them, that they may cleanse the land. 
Yea, all the people of the land shall bury them; and it shall be to them a renown the day that I shall be glorified, saith the Lord GOD. 
And they shall sever out men of continual employment, passing through the land to bury with the passengers those that remain upon the face of the earth, to cleanse it: after the end of seven months shall they search. 
And the passengers that pass through the land, when any seeth a man's bone, then shall he set up a sign by it, till the buriers have buried it in the valley of Hamongog. 
And also the name of the city shall be Hamonah. Thus shall they cleanse the land. 
And, thou son of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; Speak unto every feathere
825,. 
Then said David, I will shew kindness unto Hanun the son of Nahash, as his father shewed kindness unto me. And David sent to comfort him by the hand of his servants for his father. And David's servants came into the land of the children of Ammon. 
And the princes of the children of Ammon said unto Hanun their lord, Thinkest thou that David doth honour thy father, that he hath sent comforters unto thee? hath not David rather sent his servants unto thee, to search the city, and to spy it out, and to overthrow it? 
Wherefore Hanun took David's servants, and shaved off the one half of their beards, and cut off their garments in the middle, even to their buttocks, and sent them away. 
When they told it unto David, he sent to meet them, because the men were greatly ashamed: and the king said, Tarry at Jericho until y
760,r dwellings throughout your generations. 
And when ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not make clean riddance of the corners of thy field when thou reapest, neither shalt thou gather any gleaning of thy harvest: thou shalt leave them unto the poor, and to the stranger: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, In the seventh month, in the first day of the month, shall ye have a sabbath, a memorial of blowing of trumpets, an holy convocation. 
Ye shall do no servile work therein: but ye shall offer an offering made by fire unto the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Also on the tenth day of this seventh month there shall be a day of atonement: it shall be an holy c
850,any thing? And they said, Nothing. 
Then said he unto them, But now, he that hath a purse, let him take it, and likewise his scrip: and he that hath no sword, let him sell his garment, and buy one. 
For I say unto you, that this that is written must yet be accomplished in me, And he was reckoned among the transgressors: for the things concerning me have an end. 
And they said, Lord, behold, here are two swords. And he said unto them, It is enough. 
And he came out, and went, as he was wont, to the mount of Olives; and his disciples also followed him. 
And when he was at the place, he said unto them, Pray that ye enter not into temptation. 
And he was withdrawn from them about a stone's cast, and kneeled down, and prayed, 
Saying, Father, if thou be willing, remove this cup from me: nevertheless not my will, but thine, be done. 
And there 
737,ing eyes, see ye not? and having ears, hear ye not? and do ye not remember? 
When I brake the five loaves among five thousand, how many baskets full of fragments took ye up? They say unto him, Twelve. 
And when the seven among four thousand, how many baskets full of fragments took ye up? And they said, Seven. 
And he said unto them, How is it that ye do not understand? 
And he cometh to Bethsaida; and they bring a blind man unto him, and besought him to touch him. 
And he took the blind man by the hand, and led him out of the town; and when he had spit on his eyes, and put his hands upon him, he asked him if he saw ought. 
And he looked up, and said, I see men as trees, walking. 
After that he put his hands again upon his eyes,
978,ther after Abner, and became one troop, and stood on the top of an hill. 
Then Abner called to Joab, and said, Shall the sword devour for ever? knowest thou not that it will be bitterness in the latter end? how long shall it be then, ere thou bid the people return from following their brethren? 
And Joab said, As God liveth, unless thou hadst spoken, surely then in the morning the people had gone up every one from following his brother. 
So Joab blew a trumpet, and all the people stood still, and pursued after Israel no more, neither fought they any more. 
And Abner and his men walked all that night through the plain, and passed over Jordan, and went through all Bithron, and they came to Mahanaim. 
And Joab returned from following Abner: and when he had gathered all the people together, there lacked of David's servants nineteen men and Asahel. 
But the servants of David had smitten of Benjamin, and of Abner's men, so that three hundred and threescore men died. 
An
721,ending them, but ye have not hearkened; 
Then will I make this house like Shiloh, and will make this city a curse to all the nations of the earth. 
So the priests and the prophets and all the people heard Jeremiah speaking these words in the house of the LORD. 
Now it came to pass, when Jeremiah had made an end of speaking all that the LORD had commanded him to speak unto all the people, that the priests and the prophets and all the people took him, saying, Thou shalt surely die. 
Why hast thou prophesied in the name of the LORD, saying, This house shall be like Shiloh, and this city shall be desolate without an inhabitant? And all the people were gathered against Jeremiah in the house of the LORD. 
When the pri
931,e LORD hath wrought this? 
In whose hand is the soul of every living thing, and the breath of all mankind. 
Doth not the ear try words? and the mouth taste his meat? 
With the ancient is wisdom; and in length of days understanding. 
With him is wisdom and strength, he hath counsel and understanding. 
Behold, he breaketh down, and it cannot be built again: he shutteth up a man, and there can be no opening. 
Behold, he withholdeth the waters, and they dry up: also he sendeth them out, and they overturn the earth. 
With him is strength and wisdom: the deceived and the deceiver are his. 
He leadeth counsellors away spoiled, and maketh the judges fools. 
He looseth the bond of kings, and girdeth their loins with a girdle. 
He leadeth princes away spoiled, and overthroweth the mighty. 
He removeth away the speech of the trusty, and taketh away the understanding of the aged. 
He poureth contempt upon princes, and weakeneth t
770,house of Judah, and will save them by the LORD their God, and will not save them by bow, nor by sword, nor by battle, by horses, nor by horsemen. 
Now when she had weaned Loruhamah, she conceived, and bare a son. 
Then said God, Call his name Loammi: for ye are not my people, and I will not be your God. 
Yet the number of the children of Israel shall be as the sand of the sea, which cannot be measured nor numbered; and it shall come to pass, that in the place where it was said unto them, Ye are not my people, there it shall be said unto them, Ye are the sons of the living God. 
Then shall the children of Judah and the children of Israel be gathered together, and appoint themselves one head, and they shall come up out of the land: for great shall be the day of 
985,e of the LORD, that ye die not: for so I am commanded. 
So Aaron and his sons did all things which the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses. 
And it came to pass on the eighth day, that Moses called Aaron and his sons, and the elders of Israel; 
And he said unto Aaron, Take thee a young calf for a sin offering, and a ram for a burnt offering, without blemish, and offer them before the LORD. 
And unto the children of Israel thou shalt speak, saying, Take ye a kid of the goats for a sin offering; and a calf and a lamb, both of the first year, without blemish, for a burnt offering; 
Also a bullock and a ram for peace offerings, to sacrifice before the LORD; and a meat offering mingled with oil: for to day the LORD will appear unto you. 
And they brought that which Moses commanded before the tabernacle of the congregation: and all the congregation drew near and stood before the LORD. 
And Moses said, This is the thing which the LORD commanded that ye should do: and the glory 
738, your consolation and salvation. 
And our hope of you is stedfast, knowing, that as ye are partakers of the sufferings, so shall ye be also of the consolation. 
For we would not, brethren, have you ignorant of our trouble which came to us in Asia, that we were pressed out of measure, above strength, insomuch that we despaired even of life: 
But we had the sentence of death in ourselves, that we should not trust in ourselves, but in God which raiseth the dead: 
Who delivered us from so great a death, and doth deliver: in whom we trust that he will yet deliver us; 
Ye also helping together by prayer for us, that for the gift bestowed upon us by the means of many persons thanks may be given by many on our behalf. 
For our rejoicing
766,mmon made war against Israel, the elders of Gilead went to fetch Jephthah out of the land of Tob: 
And they said unto Jephthah, Come, and be our captain, that we may fight with the children of Ammon. 
And Jephthah said unto the elders of Gilead, Did not ye hate me, and expel me out of my father's house? and why are ye come unto me now when ye are in distress? 
And the elders of Gilead said unto Jephthah, Therefore we turn again to thee now, that thou mayest go with us, and fight against the children of Ammon, and be our head over all the inhabitants of Gilead. 
And Jephthah said unto the elders of Gilead, If ye bring me home again to fight against the children of Ammon, and the LORD deliver them before me, shall I be your head? 
And the elders of Gilead sa
1051,in thine heart: turn thee; behold, I am with thee according to thy heart. 
Then said Jonathan, Behold, we will pass over unto these men, and we will discover ourselves unto them. 
If they say thus unto us, Tarry until we come to you; then we will stand still in our place, and will not go up unto them. 
But if they say thus, Come up unto us; then we will go up: for the LORD hath delivered them into our hand: and this shall be a sign unto us. 
And both of them discovered themselves unto the garrison of the Philistines: and the Philistines said, Behold, the Hebrews come forth out of the holes where they had hid themselves. 
And the men of the garrison answered Jonathan and his armourbearer, and said, Come up to us, and we will shew you a thing. And Jonathan said unto his armourbearer, Come up after me: for the LORD hath delivered them into the hand of Israel. 
And Jonathan climbed up upon his hands and upon his feet, and his armourbearer after him: and they fell before Jonathan; and his armourbearer slew after him. 
And that first slaught
1048,gs of a woman that travaileth: I was bowed down at the hearing of it; I was dismayed at the seeing of it. 
My heart panted, fearfulness affrighted me: the night of my pleasure hath he turned into fear unto me. 
Prepare the table, watch in the watchtower, eat, drink: arise, ye princes, and anoint the shield. 
For thus hath the LORD said unto me, Go, set a watchman, let him declare what he seeth. 
And he saw a chariot with a couple of horsemen, a chariot of asses, and a chariot of camels; and he hearkened diligently with much heed: 
And he cried, A lion: My lord, I stand continually upon the watchtower in the daytime, and I am set in my ward whole nights: 
And, behold, here cometh a chariot of men, with a couple of horsemen. And he answered and said, Babylon is fallen, is fallen; and all the graven images of her gods he hath broken unto the ground. 
O my threshing, and the corn of my floor: that which I have heard of the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, have I declared unto you. 
The burden of Dumah. He calleth to me out of Seir, Wat
806,hem slain, fallen by the sword, which caused terror in the land of the living. 
There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised into the nether parts of the earth, which caused their terror in the land of the living; yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
They have set her a bed in the midst of the slain with all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword: though their terror was caused in the land of the living, yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit: he is put in the midst of them that be slain. 
There is Meshech, Tubal, and all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slai
1008,d. 
For John came neither eating nor drinking, and they say, He hath a devil. 
The Son of man came eating and drinking, and they say, Behold a man gluttonous, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners. But wisdom is justified of her children. 
Then began he to upbraid the cities wherein most of his mighty works were done, because they repented not: 
Woe unto thee, Chorazin! woe unto thee, Bethsaida! for if the mighty works, which were done in you, had been done in Tyre and Sidon, they would have repented long ago in sackcloth and ashes. 
But I say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for Tyre and Sidon at the day of judgment, than for you. 
And thou, Capernaum, which art exalted unto heaven, shalt be brought down to hell: for if the mighty works, which have been done in thee, had been done in Sodom, it would have remained until this day. 
But I say unto you, That it shall be more tolerable for the land of Sodom in the day of judgment, than for thee. 
At that time Jesus answered and s
1016,hem, seeking to turn away the deputy from the faith. 
Then Saul, (who also is called Paul,) filled with the Holy Ghost, set his eyes on him. 
And said, O full of all subtilty and all mischief, thou child of the devil, thou enemy of all righteousness, wilt thou not cease to pervert the right ways of the Lord? 
And now, behold, the hand of the Lord is upon thee, and thou shalt be blind, not seeing the sun for a season. And immediately there fell on him a mist and a darkness; and he went about seeking some to lead him by the hand. 
Then the deputy, when he saw what was done, believed, being astonished at the doctrine of the Lord. 
Now when Paul and his company loosed from Paphos, they came to Perga in Pamphylia: and John departing from them returned to Jerusalem. 
But when they departed from Perga, they came to Antioch in Pisidia, and went into the synagogue on the sabbath day, and sat down. 
And after the reading of the law and the prophets the rulers of the synagogue sent unto them, saying, Ye men and 
744,rinkleth the water of separation shall wash his clothes; and he that toucheth the water of separation shall be unclean until even. 
And whatsoever the unclean person toucheth shall be unclean; and the soul that toucheth it shall be unclean until even. 
Then came the children of Israel, even the whole congregation, into the desert of Zin in the first month: and the people abode in Kadesh; and Miriam died there, and was buried there. 
And there was no water for the congregation: and they gathered themselves together against Moses and against Aaron. 
And the people chode with Moses, and spake, saying, Would God that we had died when our brethren died before the LORD! 
And why have ye brought up the congregation of the LORD into this wild
795,y, verily, I say unto you, Except a corn of wheat fall into the ground and die, it abideth alone: but if it die, it bringeth forth much fruit. 
He that loveth his life shall lose it; and he that hateth his life in this world shall keep it unto life eternal. 
If any man serve me, let him follow me; and where I am, there shall also my servant be: if any man serve me, him will my Father honour. 
Now is my soul troubled; and what shall I say? Father, save me from this hour: but for this cause came I unto this hour. 
Father, glorify thy name. Then came there a voice from heaven, saying, I have both glorified it, and will glorify it again. 
The people therefore, that stood by, and heard it, said that it thundered: others said, An angel spake to him. 
Jesus answered and said, This voice came
971, said, I am not sent but unto the lost sheep of the house of Israel. 
Then came she and worshipped him, saying, Lord, help me. 
But he answered and said, It is not meet to take the children's bread, and to cast it to dogs. 
And she said, Truth, Lord: yet the dogs eat of the crumbs which fall from their masters' table. 
Then Jesus answered and said unto her, O woman, great is thy faith: be it unto thee even as thou wilt. And her daughter was made whole from that very hour. 
And Jesus departed from thence, and came nigh unto the sea of Galilee; and went up into a mountain, and sat down there. 
And great multitudes came unto him, having with them those that were lame, blind, dumb, maimed, and many others, and cast them down at Jesus' feet; and he healed them: 
Insomuch that the multitude wondered, when they saw the dumb to speak, the maimed to be whole, the lame to walk, and the blind to see: and they glorified the God of Israel. 
Then Jesus called his discipl
988,verteth the sinner from the error of his way shall save a soul from death, and shall hide a multitude of sins. 
Peter, an apostle of Jesus Christ, to the strangers scattered throughout Pontus, Galatia, Cappadocia, Asia, and Bithynia, 
Elect according to the foreknowledge of God the Father, through sanctification of the Spirit, unto obedience and sprinkling of the blood of Jesus Christ: Grace unto you, and peace, be multiplied. 
Blessed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, which according to his abundant mercy hath begotten us again unto a lively hope by the resurrection of Jesus Christ from the dead, 
To an inheritance incorruptible, and undefiled, and that fadeth not away, reserved in heaven for you, 
Who are kept by the power of God through faith unto salvation ready to be revealed in the last time. 
Wherein ye greatly rejoice, though now for a season, if need be, ye are in heaviness through manifold temptations: 
That the trial of your faith, being much more p
727,ocency of my hands have I done this. 
And God said unto him in a dream, Yea, I know that thou didst this in the integrity of thy heart; for I also withheld thee from sinning against me: therefore suffered I thee not to touch her. 
Now therefore restore the man his wife; for he is a prophet, and he shall pray for thee, and thou shalt live: and if thou restore her not, know thou that thou shalt surely die, thou, and all that are thine. 
Therefore Abimelech rose early in the morning, and called all his servants, and told all these things in their ears: and the men were sore afraid. 
Then Abimelech called Abraham, and said unto him, What hast thou done unto us? and what have I offended thee, that thou hast brought on me a
862,ather, where is mine honour? and if I be a master, where is my fear? saith the LORD of hosts unto you, O priests, that despise my name. And ye say, Wherein have we despised thy name? 
Ye offer polluted bread upon mine altar; and ye say, Wherein have we polluted thee? In that ye say, The table of the LORD is contemptible. 
And if ye offer the blind for sacrifice, is it not evil? and if ye offer the lame and sick, is it not evil? offer it now unto thy governor; will he be pleased with thee, or accept thy person? saith the LORD of hosts. 
And now, I pray you, beseech God that he will be gracious unto us: this hath been by your means: will he regard your persons? saith the LORD of hosts. 
Who is there even among you that would shut the doors for nought? neither do ye kindle fire on mine altar for nought. I have no pleasure in you, saith the LORD of hosts
977, our Lord is above all gods. 
Whatsoever the LORD pleased, that did he in heaven, and in earth, in the seas, and all deep places. 
He causeth the vapours to ascend from the ends of the earth; he maketh lightnings for the rain; he bringeth the wind out of his treasuries. 
Who smote the firstborn of Egypt, both of man and beast. 
Who sent tokens and wonders into the midst of thee, O Egypt, upon Pharaoh, and upon all his servants. 
Who smote great nations, and slew mighty kings; 
Sihon king of the Amorites, and Og king of Bashan, and all the kingdoms of Canaan: 
And gave their land for an heritage, an heritage unto Israel his people. 
Thy name, O LORD, endureth for ever; and thy memorial, O LORD, throughout all generations. 
For the LORD will judge his people, and he will repent himself concerning his servants. 
The idols of the heathen are silver and gold, the work of men's hands. 
They have mouths, but they speak not; eyes have they, but they see not; 
They have e
935,RD kindled against his people, insomuch that he abhorred his own inheritance. 
And he gave them into the hand of the heathen; and they that hated them ruled over them. 
Their enemies also oppressed them, and they were brought into subjection under their hand. 
Many times did he deliver them; but they provoked him with their counsel, and were brought low for their iniquity. 
Nevertheless he regarded their affliction, when he heard their cry: 
And he remembered for them his covenant, and repented according to the multitude of his mercies. 
He made them also to be pitied of all those that carried them captives. 
Save us, O LORD our God, and gather us from among the heathen, to give thanks unto thy holy name, and to triumph in thy praise. 
Blessed be the LORD God of Israel from everlasting to everlasting: and let all the people say, Amen. Praise ye the LORD. 
O give thanks unto the LORD, for he is good: for his mercy endureth
847,their names; Samaria is Aholah, and Jerusalem Aholibah. 
And Aholah played the harlot when she was mine; and she doted on her lovers, on the Assyrians her neighbours, 
Which were clothed with blue, captains and rulers, all of them desirable young men, horsemen riding upon horses. 
Thus she committed her whoredoms with them, with all them that were the chosen men of Assyria, and with all on whom she doted: with all their idols she defiled herself. 
Neither left she her whoredoms brought from Egypt: for in her youth they lay with her, and they bruised the breasts of her virginity, and poured their whoredom upon her. 
Wherefore I have delivered her into the hand of her lovers, into the hand of the Assyrians, upon whom she doted. 
These discovered her nakedness: they took her sons and her daughters, and slew her with the sword: and she bec
1012,i. 
And the sons of Asher; Jimnah, and Ishuah, and Isui, and Beriah, and Serah their sister: and the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel. 
These are the sons of Zilpah, whom Laban gave to Leah his daughter, and these she bare unto Jacob, even sixteen souls. 
The sons of Rachel Jacob's wife; Joseph, and Benjamin. 
And unto Joseph in the land of Egypt were born Manasseh and Ephraim, which Asenath the daughter of Potipherah priest of On bare unto him. 
And the sons of Benjamin were Belah, and Becher, and Ashbel, Gera, and Naaman, Ehi, and Rosh, Muppim, and Huppim, and Ard. 
These are the sons of Rachel, which were born to Jacob: all the souls were fourteen. 
And the sons of Dan; Hushim. 
And the sons of Naphtali; Jahzeel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Shillem. 
These are the sons of Bilhah, which Laban gave unto Rachel his daughter, and she bare these unto Jacob: all the souls were seven. 
All the souls that came with Jacob into Egypt, which came out of his loins, besides Jacob's sons' wives, all the soul
944,crease unto more ungodliness. 
And their word will eat as doth a canker: of whom is Hymenaeus and Philetus; 
Who concerning the truth have erred, saying that the resurrection is past already; and overthrow the faith of some. 
Nevertheless the foundation of God standeth sure, having this seal, The Lord knoweth them that are his. And, let every one that nameth the name of Christ depart from iniquity. 
But in a great house there are not only vessels of gold and of silver, but also of wood and of earth; and some to honour, and some to dishonour. 
If a man therefore purge himself from these, he shall be a vessel unto honour, sanctified, and meet for the master's use, and prepared unto every good work. 
Flee also youthful lusts: but follow righteousness, faith, charity, peace, with them that call on the Lord out of a pure heart. 
But foolish and unlearned questions avoid, knowing that they do gender strifes. 
And the servant of the Lord
921,at followed him from Galilee, stood afar off, beholding these things. 
And, behold, there was a man named Joseph, a counsellor; and he was a good man, and a just: 
(The same had not consented to the counsel and deed of them;) he was of Arimathaea, a city of the Jews: who also himself waited for the kingdom of God. 
This man went unto Pilate, and begged the body of Jesus. 
And he took it down, and wrapped it in linen, and laid it in a sepulchre that was hewn in stone, wherein never man before was laid. 
And that day was the preparation, and the sabbath drew on. 
And the women also, which came with him from Galilee, followed after, and beheld the sepulchre, and how his body was laid. 
And they returned, and prepared spices and ointments; and rested the sabbath day according to the commandment. 
Now upon the first day of the week, very early in the morning, they came unto the sepulchre, bringing the spices whic
773,y his Son, whom he hath appointed heir of all things, by whom also he made the worlds; 
Who being the brightness of his glory, and the express image of his person, and upholding all things by the word of his power, when he had by himself purged our sins, sat down on the right hand of the Majesty on high: 
Being made so much better than the angels, as he hath by inheritance obtained a more excellent name than they. 
For unto which of the angels said he at any time, Thou art my Son, this day have I begotten thee? And again, I will be to him a Father, and he shall be to me a Son? 
And again, when he bringeth in the firstbegotten into the world, he saith, And let all the angels of God worship him. 
And of the angels he saith, Who maketh his angels spirits, and his mi
893,or want of a shelter. 
They pluck the fatherless from the breast, and take a pledge of the poor. 
They cause him to go naked without clothing, and they take away the sheaf from the hungry; 
Which make oil within their walls, and tread their winepresses, and suffer thirst. 
Men groan from out of the city, and the soul of the wounded crieth out: yet God layeth not folly to them. 
They are of those that rebel against the light; they know not the ways thereof, nor abide in the paths thereof. 
The murderer rising with the light killeth the poor and needy, and in the night is as a thief. 
The eye also of the adulterer waiteth for the twilight, saying, No eye shall see me: and disguiseth his face. 
In the dark they dig through houses, which they had marked for themselves in the daytime: they know not the light. 
For the morning is to them even as the shadow of death: if one know them, th
879,ey shall abundantly utter the memory of thy great goodness, and shall sing of thy righteousness. 
The LORD is gracious, and full of compassion; slow to anger, and of great mercy. 
The LORD is good to all: and his tender mercies are over all his works. 
All thy works shall praise thee, O LORD; and thy saints shall bless thee. 
They shall speak of the glory of thy kingdom, and talk of thy power; 
To make known to the sons of men his mighty acts, and the glorious majesty of his kingdom. 
Thy kingdom is an everlasting kingdom, and thy dominion endureth throughout all generations. 
The LORD upholdeth all that fall, and raiseth up all those that be bowed down. 
The eyes of all wait upon thee; and thou givest them their meat in due season. 
Thou openest thine hand, and satisfiest the desire of every living thing. 
The LORD is righteous in all his ways, and holy in all his w
1034, head: and he burnt them upon the altar. 
And he did wash the inwards and the legs, and burnt them upon the burnt offering on the altar. 
And he brought the people's offering, and took the goat, which was the sin offering for the people, and slew it, and offered it for sin, as the first. 
And he brought the burnt offering, and offered it according to the manner. 
And he brought the meat offering, and took an handful thereof, and burnt it upon the altar, beside the burnt sacrifice of the morning. 
He slew also the bullock and the ram for a sacrifice of peace offerings, which was for the people: and Aaron's sons presented unto him the blood, which he sprinkled upon the altar round about, 
And the fat of the bullock and of the ram, the rump, and that which covereth the inwards, and the kidneys, and the caul above the liver: 
And they put the fat upon the breasts, and he burnt the fat upon the altar: 
And the breasts and the right shoulder Aaron waved for a wave offering before the LORD; as Moses commanded. 
And Aaron lift
744,e cities of Judah unto Jerusalem. 
Then read Baruch in the book the words of Jeremiah in the house of the LORD, in the chamber of Gemariah the son of Shaphan the scribe, in the higher court, at the entry of the new gate of the LORD's house, in the ears of all the people. 
When Michaiah the son of Gemariah, the son of Shaphan, had heard out of the book all the words of the LORD, 
Then he went down into the king's house, into the scribe's chamber: and, lo, all the princes sat there, even Elishama the scribe, and Delaiah the son of Shemaiah, and Elnathan the son of Achbor, and Gemariah the son of Shaphan, and Zedekiah the son of Hananiah, and all the princes. 
Then Michaiah declared unto them all the words that he had heard, when Baruch 
938,xceeding much brass. 
When Toi king of Hamath heard that David had smitten all the host of Hadadezer, 
Then Toi sent Joram his son unto king David, to salute him, and to bless him, because he had fought against Hadadezer, and smitten him: for Hadadezer had wars with Toi. And Joram brought with him vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and vessels of brass: 
Which also king David did dedicate unto the LORD, with the silver and gold that he had dedicated of all nations which he subdued; 
Of Syria, and of Moab, and of the children of Ammon, and of the Philistines, and of Amalek, and of the spoil of Hadadezer, son of Rehob, king of Zobah. 
And David gat him a name when he returned from smiting of the Syrians in the valley of salt, being eighteen thousand men. 
And he put garrisons in Edom; throughout all Edom put he garrisons, and all they of Edom became David's servants. And the LORD preserved David whithersoever he went. 
An
720,er tutors and governors until the time appointed of the father. 
Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world: 
But when the fulness of the time was come, God sent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, 
To redeem them that were under the law, that we might receive the adoption of sons. 
And because ye are sons, God hath sent forth the Spirit of his Son into your hearts, crying, Abba, Father. 
Wherefore thou art no more a servant, but a son; and if a son, then an heir of God through Christ. 
Howbeit then, when ye knew not God, ye did service unto them which by nature are no gods. 
But now, after that ye have known God, or rather are known of God, how turn ye ag
723,e abominable works, there is none that doeth good. 
The LORD looked down from heaven upon the children of men, to see if there were any that did understand, and seek God. 
They are all gone aside, they are all together become filthy: there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Have all the workers of iniquity no knowledge? who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon the LORD. 
There were they in great fear: for God is in the generation of the righteous. 
Ye have shamed the counsel of the poor, because the LORD is his refuge. 
Oh that the salvation of Israel were come out of Zion! when the LORD bringeth back the captivity of his people, Jacob shall rejoice, and Israel shall be glad. 
Lord, who shall 
994,ss, and thy mighty hand: for what God is there in heaven or in earth, that can do according to thy works, and according to thy might? 
I pray thee, let me go over, and see the good land that is beyond Jordan, that goodly mountain, and Lebanon. 
But the LORD was wroth with me for your sakes, and would not hear me: and the LORD said unto me, Let it suffice thee; speak no more unto me of this matter. 
Get thee up into the top of Pisgah, and lift up thine eyes westward, and northward, and southward, and eastward, and behold it with thine eyes: for thou shalt not go over this Jordan. 
But charge Joshua, and encourage him, and strengthen him: for he shall go over before this people, and he shall cause them to inherit the land which thou shalt see. 
So we abode in the valley over against Bethpeor. 
Now therefore hearken, O Israel, unto the statutes and unto the judgments, which I teach you, for to do them, that ye may live, and go in and possess the land which the LORD God of your fathe
887,he eyes of man, and a mouth speaking great things. 
I beheld till the thrones were cast down, and the Ancient of days did sit, whose garment was white as snow, and the hair of his head like the pure wool: his throne was like the fiery flame, and his wheels as burning fire. 
A fiery stream issued and came forth from before him: thousand thousands ministered unto him, and ten thousand times ten thousand stood before him: the judgment was set, and the books were opened. 
I beheld then because of the voice of the great words which the horn spake: I beheld even till the beast was slain, and his body destroyed, and given to the burning flame. 
As concerning the rest of the beasts, they had their dominion taken away: yet their lives were prolonged for a season and time. 
I saw in the night visions, and, behold, one like the Son of man came with the clouds of heaven, and came to the
998,n hundred prophets, and hid them by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water.) 
And Ahab said unto Obadiah, Go into the land, unto all fountains of water, and unto all brooks: peradventure we may find grass to save the horses and mules alive, that we lose not all the beasts. 
So they divided the land between them to pass throughout it: Ahab went one way by himself, and Obadiah went another way by himself. 
And as Obadiah was in the way, behold, Elijah met him: and he knew him, and fell on his face, and said, Art thou that my lord Elijah? 
And he answered him, I am: go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here. 
And he said, What have I sinned, that thou wouldest deliver thy servant into the hand of Ahab, to slay me? 
As the LORD thy God liveth, there is no nation or kingdom, whither my lord hath not sent to seek thee: and when they said, He is not there; he took an oath of the kingdom and nation, that they found thee not. 
And now thou sayest, Go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah
932,o might he increaseth strength. 
Even the youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men shall utterly fall: 
But they that wait upon the LORD shall renew their strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall run, and not be weary; and they shall walk, and not faint. 
Keep silence before me, O islands; and let the people renew their strength: let them come near; then let them speak: let us come near together to judgment. 
Who raised up the righteous man from the east, called him to his foot, gave the nations before him, and made him rule over kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed safely; even by the way that he had not gone with his feet. 
Who hath wrought and done it, calling the generations from the beginning? I the LORD, the first, and with the last; I am he. 
The isles saw it, and feared; the ends of the earth were afraid, dre
855,nto repentance; seeing they crucify to themselves the Son of God afresh, and put him to an open shame. 
For the earth which drinketh in the rain that cometh oft upon it, and bringeth forth herbs meet for them by whom it is dressed, receiveth blessing from God: 
But that which beareth thorns and briers is rejected, and is nigh unto cursing; whose end is to be burned. 
But, beloved, we are persuaded better things of you, and things that accompany salvation, though we thus speak. 
For God is not unrighteous to forget your work and labour of love, which ye have shewed toward his name, in that ye have ministered to the saints, and do minister. 
And we desire that every one of you do shew the same diligence to the full assurance of hope unto the end: 
That ye be not slothful, but followers of them who through faith and patience inherit the promises.
878,melech, and let him also rejoice in you: 
But if not, let fire come out from Abimelech, and devour the men of Shechem, and the house of Millo; and let fire come out from the men of Shechem, and from the house of Millo, and devour Abimelech. 
And Jotham ran away, and fled, and went to Beer, and dwelt there, for fear of Abimelech his brother. 
When Abimelech had reigned three years over Israel, 
Then God sent an evil spirit between Abimelech and the men of Shechem; and the men of Shechem dealt treacherously with Abimelech: 
That the cruelty done to the threescore and ten sons of Jerubbaal might come, and their blood be laid upon Abimelech their brother, which slew them; and upon the men of Shechem, which aided him in the killing of his brethren. 
And the men of Shechem set liers in wait for him in the top of the mountains, and they robbed all that came along that way 
1065, law continually for ever and ever. 
And I will walk at liberty: for I seek thy precepts. 
I will speak of thy testimonies also before kings, and will not be ashamed. 
And I will delight myself in thy commandments, which I have loved. 
My hands also will I lift up unto thy commandments, which I have loved; and I will meditate in thy statutes. 
Remember the word unto thy servant, upon which thou hast caused me to hope. 
This is my comfort in my affliction: for thy word hath quickened me. 
The proud have had me greatly in derision: yet have I not declined from thy law. 
I remembered thy judgments of old, O LORD; and have comforted myself. 
Horror hath taken hold upon me because of the wicked that forsake thy law. 
Thy statutes have been my songs in the house of my pilgrimage. 
I have remembered thy name, O LORD, in the night, and have kept thy law. 
This I had, because I kept thy precepts. 
Thou art my portion, O LORD: I have said that I would keep thy words. 
I intreated thy favour with my whole heart: be merciful unto me according to thy word. 
I th
790, said, Lo, it is yet high day, neither is it time that the cattle should be gathered together: water ye the sheep, and go and feed them. 
And they said, We cannot, until all the flocks be gathered together, and till they roll the stone from the well's mouth; then we water the sheep. 
And while he yet spake with them, Rachel came with her father's sheep; for she kept them. 
And it came to pass, when Jacob saw Rachel the daughter of Laban his mother's brother, and the sheep of Laban his mother's brother, that Jacob went near, and rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and watered the flock of Laban his mother's brother. 
And Jacob kissed Rachel, and lifted up his voice, and wept. 
And Jacob told Rachel that he was her father's brother, and that he was Rebekah's son: and she ran an
886,t day Joshua took Makkedah, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof he utterly destroyed, them, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain: and he did to the king of Makkedah as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
Then Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, unto Libnah, and fought against Libnah: 
And the LORD delivered it also, and the king thereof, into the hand of Israel; and he smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain in it; but did unto the king thereof as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
And Joshua passed from Libnah, and all Israel with him, unto Lachish, and encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And the LORD delivered Lachish into the hand of Israel, which took it on the second day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein, 
738,s from before you, and ye shall possess greater nations and mightier than yourselves. 
Every place whereon the soles of your feet shall tread shall be yours: from the wilderness and Lebanon, from the river, the river Euphrates, even unto the uttermost sea shall your coast be. 
There shall no man be able to stand before you: for the LORD your God shall lay the fear of you and the dread of you upon all the land that ye shall tread upon, as he hath said unto you. 
Behold, I set before you this day a blessing and a curse; 
A blessing, if ye obey the commandments of the LORD your God, which I command you this day: 
And a curse, if ye will not obey the commandments of the LORD your God, but turn aside out of the way which I command yo
1073,s, and the family of the Izeharites, and the family of the Hebronites, and the family of the Uzzielites: these are the families of the Kohathites. 
In the number of all the males, from a month old and upward, were eight thousand and six hundred, keeping the charge of the sanctuary. 
The families of the sons of Kohath shall pitch on the side of the tabernacle southward. 
And the chief of the house of the father of the families of the Kohathites shall be Elizaphan the son of Uzziel. 
And their charge shall be the ark, and the table, and the candlestick, and the altars, and the vessels of the sanctuary wherewith they minister, and the hanging, and all the service thereof. 
And Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest shall be chief over the chief of the Levites, and have the oversight of them that keep the charge of the sanctuary. 
Of Merari was the family of the Mahlites, and the family of the Mushites: these are the families of Merari. 
And those that were numbered of them, according to the number of all the males, from a month old and upward, were six thousand a
747, of Lamech were seven hundred seventy and seven years: and he died. 
And Noah was five hundred years old: and Noah begat Shem, Ham, and Japheth. 
And it came to pass, when men began to multiply on the face of the earth, and daughters were born unto them, 
That the sons of God saw the daughters of men that they were fair; and they took them wives of all which they chose. 
And the LORD said, My spirit shall not always strive with man, for that he also is flesh: yet his days shall be an hundred and twenty years. 
There were giants in the earth in those days; and also after that, when the sons of God came in unto the daughters of men, and they bare children to them, the same became mighty men which were of old, men of renown. 
And God saw th
960, for judgment, but behold oppression; for righteousness, but behold a cry. 
Woe unto them that join house to house, that lay field to field, till there be no place, that they may be placed alone in the midst of the earth! 
In mine ears said the LORD of hosts, Of a truth many houses shall be desolate, even great and fair, without inhabitant. 
Yea, ten acres of vineyard shall yield one bath, and the seed of an homer shall yield an ephah. 
Woe unto them that rise up early in the morning, that they may follow strong drink; that continue until night, till wine inflame them! 
And the harp, and the viol, the tabret, and pipe, and wine, are in their feasts: but they regard not the work of the LORD, neither consider the operation of his hands. 
Therefore my people are gone into captivity, because they have no knowledge: and their honourable men are famished, and their multitude dried up with thirst. 
Therefore hell hath enlarged herself, and opened her mo
892, have done abominable works, there is none that doeth good. 
The LORD looked down from heaven upon the children of men, to see if there were any that did understand, and seek God. 
They are all gone aside, they are all together become filthy: there is none that doeth good, no, not one. 
Have all the workers of iniquity no knowledge? who eat up my people as they eat bread, and call not upon the LORD. 
There were they in great fear: for God is in the generation of the righteous. 
Ye have shamed the counsel of the poor, because the LORD is his refuge. 
Oh that the salvation of Israel were come out of Zion! when the LORD bringeth back the captivity of his people, Jacob shall rejoice, and Israel shall be glad. 
Lord, who shall abide in thy tabernacle? who shall dwell in thy holy hill? 
He that walketh uprightly, and worketh righteousness, and speaketh the truth in his heart. 
He that 
1030,her names unto the cities which they builded. 
And the children of Machir the son of Manasseh went to Gilead, and took it, and dispossessed the Amorite which was in it. 
And Moses gave Gilead unto Machir the son of Manasseh; and he dwelt therein. 
And Jair the son of Manasseh went and took the small towns thereof, and called them Havothjair. 
And Nobah went and took Kenath, and the villages thereof, and called it Nobah, after his own name. 
These are the journeys of the children of Israel, which went forth out of the land of Egypt with their armies under the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
And Moses wrote their goings out according to their journeys by the commandment of the LORD: and these are their journeys according to their goings out. 
And they departed from Rameses in the first month, on the fifteenth day of the first month; on the morrow after the passover the children of Israel went out with an high hand in the sight of all the Egyptians. 
For the Egyptians buried all their firstborn, which the LORD had smitten a
908,lmighty, that thou art righteous? or is it gain to him, that thou makest thy ways perfect? 
Will he reprove thee for fear of thee? will he enter with thee into judgment? 
Is not thy wickedness great? and thine iniquities infinite? 
For thou hast taken a pledge from thy brother for nought, and stripped the naked of their clothing. 
Thou hast not given water to the weary to drink, and thou hast withholden bread from the hungry. 
But as for the mighty man, he had the earth; and the honourable man dwelt in it. 
Thou hast sent widows away empty, and the arms of the fatherless have been broken. 
Therefore snares are round about thee, and sudden fear troubleth thee; 
Or darkness, that thou canst not see; and abundance of waters cover thee. 
Is not God in the height of heaven? and behold the height of the stars, how high they are! 
And thou sayest, How doth God know? can he judge through the dark cloud?
922,ry: 
And before him shall be gathered all nations: and he shall separate them one from another, as a shepherd divideth his sheep from the goats: 
And he shall set the sheep on his right hand, but the goats on the left. 
Then shall the King say unto them on his right hand, Come, ye blessed of my Father, inherit the kingdom prepared for you from the foundation of the world: 
For I was an hungred, and ye gave me meat: I was thirsty, and ye gave me drink: I was a stranger, and ye took me in: 
Naked, and ye clothed me: I was sick, and ye visited me: I was in prison, and ye came unto me. 
Then shall the righteous answer him, saying, Lord, when saw we thee an hungred, and fed thee? or thirsty, and gave thee drink? 
When saw we thee a stranger, and took thee in? or naked, and clothed thee? 
Or when saw we thee sick, or in prison, and came unto thee? 
And the King shall answer and say unto them, Verily I say unto you,
1054,her to another man: abide with me. 
And Jacob served seven years for Rachel; and they seemed unto him but a few days, for the love he had to her. 
And Jacob said unto Laban, Give me my wife, for my days are fulfilled, that I may go in unto her. 
And Laban gathered together all the men of the place, and made a feast. 
And it came to pass in the evening, that he took Leah his daughter, and brought her to him; and he went in unto her. 
And Laban gave unto his daughter Leah Zilpah his maid for an handmaid. 
And it came to pass, that in the morning, behold, it was Leah: and he said to Laban, What is this thou hast done unto me? did not I serve with thee for Rachel? wherefore then hast thou beguiled me? 
And Laban said, It must not be so done in our country, to give the younger before the firstborn. 
Fulfil her week, and we will give thee this also for the service which thou shalt serve with me yet seven other years. 
And Jacob did so, and fulfilled her week: and he gave him Rachel his daughter to wife also. 
And Laban gave to Rachel his daught
977,Asaph the seer. And they sang praises with gladness, and they bowed their heads and worshipped. 
Then Hezekiah answered and said, Now ye have consecrated yourselves unto the LORD, come near and bring sacrifices and thank offerings into the house of the LORD. And the congregation brought in sacrifices and thank offerings; and as many as were of a free heart burnt offerings. 
And the number of the burnt offerings, which the congregation brought, was threescore and ten bullocks, an hundred rams, and two hundred lambs: all these were for a burnt offering to the LORD. 
And the consecrated things were six hundred oxen and three thousand sheep. 
But the priests were too few, so that they could not flay all the burnt offerings: wherefore their brethren the Levites did help them, till the work was ended, and until the other priests had sanctified themselves: for the Levites were more upright in heart to sanctify themselves than the priests. 
And also the burnt offerings w
824,e singers and the porters kept the ward of their God, and the ward of the purification, according to the commandment of David, and of Solomon his son. 
For in the days of David and Asaph of old there were chief of the singers, and songs of praise and thanksgiving unto God. 
And all Israel in the days of Zerubbabel, and in the days of Nehemiah, gave the portions of the singers and the porters, every day his portion: and they sanctified holy things unto the Levites; and the Levites sanctified them unto the children of Aaron. 
On that day they read in the book of Moses in the audience of the people; and therein was found written, that the Ammonite and the Moabite should not come into the congregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against the
988,ephod of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
And they did beat the gold into thin plates, and cut it into wires, to work it in the blue, and in the purple, and in the scarlet, and in the fine linen, with cunning work. 
They made shoulderpieces for it, to couple it together: by the two edges was it coupled together. 
And the curious girdle of his ephod, that was upon it, was of the same, according to the work thereof; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they wrought onyx stones inclosed in ouches of gold, graven, as signets are graven, with the names of the children of Israel. 
And he put them on the shoulders of the ephod, that they should be stones for a memorial to the children of Israel; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the breastplate of cunning work, like the work of the ephod; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
It was foursquare; they made the br
991, become of Peter. 
And when Herod had sought for him, and found him not, he examined the keepers, and commanded that they should be put to death. And he went down from Judaea to Caesarea, and there abode. 
And Herod was highly displeased with them of Tyre and Sidon: but they came with one accord to him, and, having made Blastus the king's chamberlain their friend, desired peace; because their country was nourished by the king's country. 
And upon a set day Herod, arrayed in royal apparel, sat upon his throne, and made an oration unto them. 
And the people gave a shout, saying, It is the voice of a god, and not of a man. 
And immediately the angel of the Lord smote him, because he gave not God the glory: and he was eaten of worms, and gave up the ghost. 
But the word of God grew and multiplied. 
And Barnabas and Saul returned from Jerusalem, when they had fulfilled their ministry, and took with them John, whose surname was Mark. 
Now there were in the church that was at Antioch
861,s face, and wept upon him, and kissed him. 
And Joseph commanded his servants the physicians to embalm his father: and the physicians embalmed Israel. 
And forty days were fulfilled for him; for so are fulfilled the days of those which are embalmed: and the Egyptians mourned for him threescore and ten days. 
And when the days of his mourning were past, Joseph spake unto the house of Pharaoh, saying, If now I have found grace in your eyes, speak, I pray you, in the ears of Pharaoh, saying, 
My father made me swear, saying, Lo, I die: in my grave which I have digged for me in the land of Canaan, there shalt thou bury me. Now therefore let me go up, I pray thee, and bury my father, and I will come again. 
And Pharaoh said, Go up, and bury thy father, according as he made thee swear. 
And Joseph went up to bury his father: and with him went up all the s
950,erved unto the LORD for bringing them out from the land of Egypt: this is that night of the LORD to be observed of all the children of Israel in their generations. 
And the LORD said unto Moses and Aaron, This is the ordinance of the passover: There shall no stranger eat thereof: 
But every man's servant that is bought for money, when thou hast circumcised him, then shall he eat thereof. 
A foreigner and an hired servant shall not eat thereof. 
In one house shall it be eaten; thou shalt not carry forth ought of the flesh abroad out of the house; neither shall ye break a bone thereof. 
All the congregation of Israel shall keep it. 
And when a stranger shall sojourn with thee, and will keep the passover to the LORD, let all his males be circumcised, and then let him come near and keep it; and he shall be as one that is born in the land: for no uncircumcised person shall eat thereof. 
One law shall be to him that is homeborn, and unto the 
945,: but ye feed not the flock. 
The diseased have ye not strengthened, neither have ye healed that which was sick, neither have ye bound up that which was broken, neither have ye brought again that which was driven away, neither have ye sought that which was lost; but with force and with cruelty have ye ruled them. 
And they were scattered, because there is no shepherd: and they became meat to all the beasts of the field, when they were scattered. 
My sheep wandered through all the mountains, and upon every high hill: yea, my flock was scattered upon all the face of the earth, and none did search or seek after them. 
Therefore, ye shepherds, hear the word of the LORD; 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely because my flock became a prey, and my flock became meat to every beast of the field, because there was no shepherd, neither did my shepherds search for my flock, but the shepherds fed themselves, and fed not my flock; 
Therefore, 
931,f the gate: and the Syrians of Zoba, and of Rehob, and Ishtob, and Maacah, were by themselves in the field. 
When Joab saw that the front of the battle was against him before and behind, he chose of all the choice men of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians: 
And the rest of the people he delivered into the hand of Abishai his brother, that he might put them in array against the children of Ammon. 
And he said, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then thou shalt help me: but if the children of Ammon be too strong for thee, then I will come and help thee. 
Be of good courage, and let us play the men for our people, and for the cities of our God: and the LORD do that which seemeth him good. 
And Joab drew nigh, and the people that were with him, unto the battle against the Syrians: and they fled before him. 
And when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled, then fled they also before Abishai, 
819,ean for his father, or for his mother, for his brother, or for his sister, when they die: because the consecration of his God is upon his head. 
All the days of his separation he is holy unto the LORD. 
And if any man die very suddenly by him, and he hath defiled the head of his consecration; then he shall shave his head in the day of his cleansing, on the seventh day shall he shave it. 
And on the eighth day he shall bring two turtles, or two young pigeons, to the priest, to the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: 
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, and make an atonement for him, for that he sinned by the dead, and shall hallow his head that same day. 
And he shall consecrate unto the LORD the days of his separation, and shall bring a lamb of t
833,at I shall speak unto thee, that thou shalt speak. So Balaam went with the princes of Balak. 
And when Balak heard that Balaam was come, he went out to meet him unto a city of Moab, which is in the border of Arnon, which is in the utmost coast. 
And Balak said unto Balaam, Did I not earnestly send unto thee to call thee? wherefore camest thou not unto me? am I not able indeed to promote thee to honour? 
And Balaam said unto Balak, Lo, I am come unto thee: have I now any power at all to say any thing? the word that God putteth in my mouth, that shall I speak. 
And Balaam went with Balak, and they came unto Kirjathhuzoth. 
And Balak offered oxen and sheep, and sent to Balaam, and to the princes that were with him. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Balak took Balaam, and brought him up into the high places of Baal, th
783, alone did lead him, and there was no strange god with him. 
He made him ride on the high places of the earth, that he might eat the increase of the fields; and he made him to suck honey out of the rock, and oil out of the flinty rock; 
Butter of kine, and milk of sheep, with fat of lambs, and rams of the breed of Bashan, and goats, with the fat of kidneys of wheat; and thou didst drink the pure blood of the grape. 
But Jeshurun waxed fat, and kicked: thou art waxen fat, thou art grown thick, thou art covered with fatness; then he forsook God which made him, and lightly esteemed the Rock of his salvation. 
They provoked him to jealousy with strange gods, with abominations provoked they him to anger. 
They sacrificed unto devils, not to God; to gods whom they knew not, to n
818,at are mine enemies wrongfully rejoice over me: neither let them wink with the eye that hate me without a cause. 
For they speak not peace: but they devise deceitful matters against them that are quiet in the land. 
Yea, they opened their mouth wide against me, and said, Aha, aha, our eye hath seen it. 
This thou hast seen, O LORD: keep not silence: O Lord, be not far from me. 
Stir up thyself, and awake to my judgment, even unto my cause, my God and my Lord. 
Judge me, O LORD my God, according to thy righteousness; and let them not rejoice over me. 
Let them not say in their hearts, Ah, so would we have it: let them not say, We have swallowed him up. 
Let them be ashamed and brought to confusion together that rejoice at mine hurt: let them be clothed with shame and dishonour that magnify themselves against
1062,ORD; and beside me there is no saviour. 
I have declared, and have saved, and I have shewed, when there was no strange god among you: therefore ye are my witnesses, saith the LORD, that I am God. 
Yea, before the day was I am he; and there is none that can deliver out of my hand: I will work, and who shall let it? 
Thus saith the LORD, your redeemer, the Holy One of Israel; For your sake I have sent to Babylon, and have brought down all their nobles, and the Chaldeans, whose cry is in the ships. 
I am the LORD, your Holy One, the creator of Israel, your King. 
Thus saith the LORD, which maketh a way in the sea, and a path in the mighty waters; 
Which bringeth forth the chariot and horse, the army and the power; they shall lie down together, they shall not rise: they are extinct, they are quenched as tow. 
Remember ye not the former things, neither consider the things of old. 
Behold, I will do a new thing; now it shall spring forth; shall ye not know it? I will even make a way in the wilderness, and rivers in the desert. 
The beast of the field s
956,eak unto every feathered fowl, and to every beast of the field, Assemble yourselves, and come; gather yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do sacrifice for you, even a great sacrifice upon the mountains of Israel, that ye may eat flesh, and drink blood. 
Ye shall eat the flesh of the mighty, and drink the blood of the princes of the earth, of rams, of lambs, and of goats, of bullocks, all of them fatlings of Bashan. 
And ye shall eat fat till ye be full, and drink blood till ye be drunken, of my sacrifice which I have sacrificed for you. 
Thus ye shall be filled at my table with horses and chariots, with mighty men, and with all men of war, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will set my glory among the heathen, and all the heathen shall see my judgment that I have executed, and my hand that I have laid upon them. 
So the house of Israel shall know that I am the LORD their God from that day and forward. 
And the heathen shall know that the 
941,s, and making confession to the LORD God of their fathers. 
And the whole assembly took counsel to keep other seven days: and they kept other seven days with gladness. 
For Hezekiah king of Judah did give to the congregation a thousand bullocks and seven thousand sheep; and the princes gave to the congregation a thousand bullocks and ten thousand sheep: and a great number of priests sanctified themselves. 
And all the congregation of Judah, with the priests and the Levites, and all the congregation that came out of Israel, and the strangers that came out of the land of Israel, and that dwelt in Judah, rejoiced. 
So there was great joy in Jerusalem: for since the time of Solomon the son of David king of Israel there was not the like in Jerusalem. 
Then the priests the Levites arose and blessed the people: and their voice was heard, and their prayer came up to his holy dwelling place, even unto heaven. 
Now when all this was fini
962,salem, saying, 
Why do thy disciples transgress the tradition of the elders? for they wash not their hands when they eat bread. 
But he answered and said unto them, Why do ye also transgress the commandment of God by your tradition? 
For God commanded, saying, Honour thy father and mother: and, He that curseth father or mother, let him die the death. 
But ye say, Whosoever shall say to his father or his mother, It is a gift, by whatsoever thou mightest be profited by me; 
And honour not his father or his mother, he shall be free. Thus have ye made the commandment of God of none effect by your tradition. 
Ye hypocrites, well did Esaias prophesy of you, saying, 
This people draweth nigh unto me with their mouth, and honoureth me with their lips; but their heart is far from me. 
But in vain they do worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men. 
And he called the multitude, and said unto them, Hear, and understand: 
Not that which goeth i
994,he LORD had commanded you. 
And I took the two tables, and cast them out of my two hands, and brake them before your eyes. 
And I fell down before the LORD, as at the first, forty days and forty nights: I did neither eat bread, nor drink water, because of all your sins which ye sinned, in doing wickedly in the sight of the LORD, to provoke him to anger. 
For I was afraid of the anger and hot displeasure, wherewith the LORD was wroth against you to destroy you. But the LORD hearkened unto me at that time also. 
And the LORD was very angry with Aaron to have destroyed him: and I prayed for Aaron also the same time. 
And I took your sin, the calf which ye had made, and burnt it with fire, and stamped it, and ground it very small, even until it was as small as dust: and I cast the dust thereof into the brook that descended out of the mount. 
And at Taberah, and at Massah, and at Kibrothhattaavah, ye provoked the LORD to wrath. 
Likewise when the LORD sent you from Kadeshbarnea, sayin
749, and over all that he had, that the LORD blessed the Egyptian's house for Joseph's sake; and the blessing of the LORD was upon all that he had in the house, and in the field. 
And he left all that he had in Joseph's hand; and he knew not ought he had, save the bread which he did eat. And Joseph was a goodly person, and well favoured. 
And it came to pass after these things, that his master's wife cast her eyes upon Joseph; and she said, Lie with me. 
But he refused, and said unto his master's wife, Behold, my master wotteth not what is with me in the house, and he hath committed all that he hath to my hand; 
There is none greater in this house than I; neither hath he kept back any thing from me but thee, because thou art his wife: how then
849,t unto him, (for he was naked,) and did cast himself into the sea. 
And the other disciples came in a little ship; (for they were not far from land, but as it were two hundred cubits,) dragging the net with fishes. 
As soon then as they were come to land, they saw a fire of coals there, and fish laid thereon, and bread. 
Jesus saith unto them, Bring of the fish which ye have now caught. 
Simon Peter went up, and drew the net to land full of great fishes, an hundred and fifty and three: and for all there were so many, yet was not the net broken. 
Jesus saith unto them, Come and dine. And none of the disciples durst ask him, Who art thou? knowing that it was the Lord. 
Jesus then cometh, and taketh bread, and giveth them, and fish likewise. 
This is now the third time that Jesus shewed himself to his disciples, after that he was risen from
733,And Moses said unto Aaron, Take a censer, and put fire therein from off the altar, and put on incense, and go quickly unto the congregation, and make an atonement for them: for there is wrath gone out from the LORD; the plague is begun. 
And Aaron took as Moses commanded, and ran into the midst of the congregation; and, behold, the plague was begun among the people: and he put on incense, and made an atonement for the people. 
And he stood between the dead and the living; and the plague was stayed. 
Now they that died in the plague were fourteen thousand and seven hundred, beside them that died about the matter of Korah. 
And Aaron returned unto Moses unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and the plague was s
941, and the Levites, and the rest of the children of the captivity, kept the dedication of this house of God with joy. 
And offered at the dedication of this house of God an hundred bullocks, two hundred rams, four hundred lambs; and for a sin offering for all Israel, twelve he goats, according to the number of the tribes of Israel. 
And they set the priests in their divisions, and the Levites in their courses, for the service of God, which is at Jerusalem; as it is written in the book of Moses. 
And the children of the captivity kept the passover upon the fourteenth day of the first month. 
For the priests and the Levites were purified together, all of them were pure, and killed the passover for all the children of the captivity, and for their brethren the priests, and for themselves. 
And the children of Israel, which were come again out of captivity, and all such as had separated themselves unto them from the filthiness of the 
817,to turn back from the enemy: and they which hate us spoil for themselves. 
Thou hast given us like sheep appointed for meat; and hast scattered us among the heathen. 
Thou sellest thy people for nought, and dost not increase thy wealth by their price. 
Thou makest us a reproach to our neighbours, a scorn and a derision to them that are round about us. 
Thou makest us a byword among the heathen, a shaking of the head among the people. 
My confusion is continually before me, and the shame of my face hath covered me, 
For the voice of him that reproacheth and blasphemeth; by reason of the enemy and avenger. 
All this is come upon us; yet have we not forgotten thee, neither have we dealt falsely in thy covenant. 
Our heart is not turned back, neither have our steps declined from thy way; 
Though thou hast sore
730,e for Rachel? wherefore then hast thou beguiled me? 
And Laban said, It must not be so done in our country, to give the younger before the firstborn. 
Fulfil her week, and we will give thee this also for the service which thou shalt serve with me yet seven other years. 
And Jacob did so, and fulfilled her week: and he gave him Rachel his daughter to wife also. 
And Laban gave to Rachel his daughter Bilhah his handmaid to be her maid. 
And he went in also unto Rachel, and he loved also Rachel more than Leah, and served with him yet seven other years. 
And when the LORD saw that Leah was hated, he opened her womb: but Rachel was barren. 
And Leah conceived, and bare a son, and she called his name Reuben: for she said, Sure
902,inst me, and the assemblies of violent men have sought after my soul; and have not set thee before them. 
But thou, O Lord, art a God full of compassion, and gracious, long suffering, and plenteous in mercy and truth. 
O turn unto me, and have mercy upon me; give thy strength unto thy servant, and save the son of thine handmaid. 
Shew me a token for good; that they which hate me may see it, and be ashamed: because thou, LORD, hast holpen me, and comforted me. 
His foundation is in the holy mountains. 
The LORD loveth the gates of Zion more than all the dwellings of Jacob. 
Glorious things are spoken of thee, O city of God. Selah. 
I will make mention of Rahab and Babylon to them that know me: behold Philistia, and Tyre, with Ethiopia; this man was born there. 
And of Zion it shall be said, This and that man was born in her: and the highest himself shall establish her. 
The LORD shall count
846,self to defile herself. 
Thou art become guilty in thy blood that thou hast shed; and hast defiled thyself in thine idols which thou hast made; and thou hast caused thy days to draw near, and art come even unto thy years: therefore have I made thee a reproach unto the heathen, and a mocking to all countries. 
Those that be near, and those that be far from thee, shall mock thee, which art infamous and much vexed. 
Behold, the princes of Israel, every one were in thee to their power to shed blood. 
In thee have they set light by father and mother: in the midst of thee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have they vexed the fatherless and the widow. 
Thou hast despised mine holy things, and hast profaned my sabbaths. 
In thee are men that carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they eat upon the mountains: in the mids
747, unto them. 
And when Jesus was entered into Capernaum, there came unto him a centurion, beseeching him, 
And saying, Lord, my servant lieth at home sick of the palsy, grievously tormented. 
And Jesus saith unto him, I will come and heal him. 
The centurion answered and said, Lord, I am not worthy that thou shouldest come under my roof: but speak the word only, and my servant shall be healed. 
For I am a man under authority, having soldiers under me: and I say to this man, Go, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he cometh; and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it. 
When Jesus heard it, he marvelled, and said to them that followed, Verily I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no, not in Israel. 
And I say unto you, That 
821,f Dagon, and set it by Dagon. 
And when they of Ashdod arose early on the morrow, behold, Dagon was fallen upon his face to the earth before the ark of the LORD. And they took Dagon, and set him in his place again. 
And when they arose early on the morrow morning, behold, Dagon was fallen upon his face to the ground before the ark of the LORD; and the head of Dagon and both the palms of his hands were cut off upon the threshold; only the stump of Dagon was left to him. 
Therefore neither the priests of Dagon, nor any that come into Dagon's house, tread on the threshold of Dagon in Ashdod unto this day. 
But the hand of the LORD was heavy upon them of Ashdod, and he destroyed them, and smote them with emerods, even Ashdod and the coasts thereof. 
And when the men of Ashdod saw that it was so, they said, The ark
863,mson, Tell me, I pray thee, wherein thy great strength lieth, and wherewith thou mightest be bound to afflict thee. 
And Samson said unto her, If they bind me with seven green withs that were never dried, then shall I be weak, and be as another man. 
Then the lords of the Philistines brought up to her seven green withs which had not been dried, and she bound him with them. 
Now there were men lying in wait, abiding with her in the chamber. And she said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he brake the withs, as a thread of tow is broken when it toucheth the fire. So his strength was not known. 
And Delilah said unto Samson, Behold, thou hast mocked me, and told me lies: now tell me, I pray thee, wherewith thou mightest be bound. 
And he said unto her, If they bind me fast with new ropes that never were occupied, then shall I be weak, an
1072,ght to be feared. 
He shall cut off the spirit of princes: he is terrible to the kings of the earth. 
I cried unto God with my voice, even unto God with my voice; and he gave ear unto me. 
In the day of my trouble I sought the Lord: my sore ran in the night, and ceased not: my soul refused to be comforted. 
I remembered God, and was troubled: I complained, and my spirit was overwhelmed. Selah. 
Thou holdest mine eyes waking: I am so troubled that I cannot speak. 
I have considered the days of old, the years of ancient times. 
I call to remembrance my song in the night: I commune with mine own heart: and my spirit made diligent search. 
Will the Lord cast off for ever? and will he be favourable no more? 
Is his mercy clean gone for ever? doth his promise fail for evermore? 
Hath God forgotten to be gracious? hath he in anger shut up his tender mercies? Selah. 
And I said, This is my infirmity: but I will remember the years of the right hand of the most High. 
I will remember the works of the LORD: surely I will remember thy wonders of old. 
I will meditate 
925, he neglect to hear the church, let him be unto thee as an heathen man and a publican. 
Verily I say unto you, Whatsoever ye shall bind on earth shall be bound in heaven: and whatsoever ye shall loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven. 
Again I say unto you, That if two of you shall agree on earth as touching any thing that they shall ask, it shall be done for them of my Father which is in heaven. 
For where two or three are gathered together in my name, there am I in the midst of them. 
Then came Peter to him, and said, Lord, how oft shall my brother sin against me, and I forgive him? till seven times? 
Jesus saith unto him, I say not unto thee, Until seven times: but, Until seventy times seven. 
Therefore is the kingdom of heaven likened unto a certain king, which would take account of his servants. 
And when he had begun to reckon, one was brought unto him, which owed him ten thousand talents. 
But forasmuch
768, will surely go with thee: notwithstanding the journey that thou takest shall not be for thine honour; for the LORD shall sell Sisera into the hand of a woman. And Deborah arose, and went with Barak to Kedesh. 
And Barak called Zebulun and Naphtali to Kedesh; and he went up with ten thousand men at his feet: and Deborah went up with him. 
Now Heber the Kenite, which was of the children of Hobab the father in law of Moses, had severed himself from the Kenites, and pitched his tent unto the plain of Zaanaim, which is by Kedesh. 
And they shewed Sisera that Barak the son of Abinoam was gone up to mount Tabor. 
And Sisera gathered together all his chariots, even nine hundred chariots of iron, and all the people that were with him, from Harosheth of the Gentiles 
930,e great stone of Abel, whereon they set down the ark of the LORD: which stone remaineth unto this day in the field of Joshua, the Bethshemite. 
And he smote the men of Bethshemesh, because they had looked into the ark of the LORD, even he smote of the people fifty thousand and threescore and ten men: and the people lamented, because the LORD had smitten many of the people with a great slaughter. 
And the men of Bethshemesh said, Who is able to stand before this holy LORD God? and to whom shall he go up from us? 
And they sent messengers to the inhabitants of Kirjathjearim, saying, The Philistines have brought again the ark of the LORD; come ye down, and fetch it up to you. 
And the men of Kirjathjearim came, and fetched up the ark of the LORD, and brought it into the house of Abinadab in the hill, and sanctified Eleazar his son to keep the ark of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, while the ark abode in Kirjathjearim, t
732,For I will at this time send all my plagues upon thine heart, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people; that thou mayest know that there is none like me in all the earth. 
For now I will stretch out my hand, that I may smite thee and thy people with pestilence; and thou shalt be cut off from the earth. 
And in very deed for this cause have I raised thee up, for to shew in thee my power; and that my name may be declared throughout all the earth. 
As yet exaltest thou thyself against my people, that thou wilt not let them go? 
Behold, to morrow about this time I will cause it to rain a very grievous hail, such as hath not been in Egypt since the foundation thereof even until now. 
Send therefore now, and gather thy cattle,
803, please him: for he that cometh to God must believe that he is, and that he is a rewarder of them that diligently seek him. 
By faith Noah, being warned of God of things not seen as yet, moved with fear, prepared an ark to the saving of his house; by the which he condemned the world, and became heir of the righteousness which is by faith. 
By faith Abraham, when he was called to go out into a place which he should after receive for an inheritance, obeyed; and he went out, not knowing whither he went. 
By faith he sojourned in the land of promise, as in a strange country, dwelling in tabernacles with Isaac and Jacob, the heirs with him of the same promise: 
For he looked for a city which hath foundations, whose builder and maker is God. 
Through faith also Sara herself received strength to con
839, the voice of thy thunder they hasted away. 
They go up by the mountains; they go down by the valleys unto the place which thou hast founded for them. 
Thou hast set a bound that they may not pass over; that they turn not again to cover the earth. 
He sendeth the springs into the valleys, which run among the hills. 
They give drink to every beast of the field: the wild asses quench their thirst. 
By them shall the fowls of the heaven have their habitation, which sing among the branches. 
He watereth the hills from his chambers: the earth is satisfied with the fruit of thy works. 
He causeth the grass to grow for the cattle, and herb for the service of man: that he may bring forth food out of the earth; 
And wine that maketh glad the heart of man, and oil to make his face to shine, and bread which strengtheneth man's heart. 
The
1012,giveth songs in the night; 
Who teacheth us more than the beasts of the earth, and maketh us wiser than the fowls of heaven? 
There they cry, but none giveth answer, because of the pride of evil men. 
Surely God will not hear vanity, neither will the Almighty regard it. 
Although thou sayest thou shalt not see him, yet judgment is before him; therefore trust thou in him. 
But now, because it is not so, he hath visited in his anger; yet he knoweth it not in great extremity: 
Therefore doth Job open his mouth in vain; he multiplieth words without knowledge. 
Elihu also proceeded, and said, 
Suffer me a little, and I will shew thee that I have yet to speak on God's behalf. 
I will fetch my knowledge from afar, and will ascribe righteousness to my Maker. 
For truly my words shall not be false: he that is perfect in knowledge is with thee. 
Behold, God is mighty, and despiseth not any: he is mighty in strength and wisdom. 
He preserveth not the life of the wicked: but giveth right to the poor. 
He with
939,, and sacrifices, and meat offerings, and incense, and bringing sacrifices of praise, unto the house of the LORD. 
But if ye will not hearken unto me to hallow the sabbath day, and not to bear a burden, even entering in at the gates of Jerusalem on the sabbath day; then will I kindle a fire in the gates thereof, and it shall devour the palaces of Jerusalem, and it shall not be quenched. 
The word which came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Arise, and go down to the potter's house, and there I will cause thee to hear my words. 
Then I went down to the potter's house, and, behold, he wrought a work on the wheels. 
And the vessel that he made of clay was marred in the hand of the potter: so he made it again another vessel, as seemed good to the potter to make it. 
Then the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
O house of Israel, cannot I do with you as this potter? saith the LORD. Behold, as the clay is in the potter's hand, 
725, the king said unto him, Go in peace. So he arose, and went to Hebron. 
But Absalom sent spies throughout all the tribes of Israel, saying, As soon as ye hear the sound of the trumpet, then ye shall say, Absalom reigneth in Hebron. 
And with Absalom went two hundred men out of Jerusalem, that were called; and they went in their simplicity, and they knew not any thing. 
And Absalom sent for Ahithophel the Gilonite, David's counsellor, from his city, even from Giloh, while he offered sacrifices. And the conspiracy was strong; for the people increased continually with Absalom. 
And there came a messenger to David, saying, The hearts of the men of Israel are after Absalom. 
And David said unto all his servants that were
996,s spread forth their two wings over the place of the ark, and the cherubims covered the ark and the staves thereof above. 
And they drew out the staves, that the ends of the staves were seen out in the holy place before the oracle, and they were not seen without: and there they are unto this day. 
There was nothing in the ark save the two tables of stone, which Moses put there at Horeb, when the LORD made a covenant with the children of Israel, when they came out of the land of Egypt. 
And it came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy place, that the cloud filled the house of the LORD, 
So that the priests could not stand to minister because of the cloud: for the glory of the LORD had filled the house of the LORD. 
Then spake Solomon, The LORD said that he would dwell in the thick darkness. 
I have surely built thee an house to dwell in, a settled place for thee to abide in for ever. 
And the king turned his face about, and blessed all the congregation of Israel: (and
1058,hall be dismayed, to the end that every one of the mount of Esau may be cut off by slaughter. 
For thy violence against thy brother Jacob shame shall cover thee, and thou shalt be cut off for ever. 
In the day that thou stoodest on the other side, in the day that the strangers carried away captive his forces, and foreigners entered into his gates, and cast lots upon Jerusalem, even thou wast as one of them. 
But thou shouldest not have looked on the day of thy brother in the day that he became a stranger; neither shouldest thou have rejoiced over the children of Judah in the day of their destruction; neither shouldest thou have spoken proudly in the day of distress. 
Thou shouldest not have entered into the gate of my people in the day of their calamity; yea, thou shouldest not have looked on their affliction in the day of their calamity, nor have laid hands on their substance in the day of their calamity; 
Neither shouldest thou have stood in the crossway, to cut off those of his that did escape; neither shouldest thou have delivered up thos
722,ole earth. 
Now gather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid siege against us: they shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon the cheek. 
But thou, Bethlehem Ephratah, though thou be little among the thousands of Judah, yet out of thee shall he come forth unto me that is to be ruler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old, from everlasting. 
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which travaileth hath brought forth: then the remnant of his brethren shall return unto the children of Israel. 
And he shall stand and feed in the strength of the LORD, in the majesty of the name of the LORD his God; and they shall abide: for now shall he be great unto the ends of the e
832,l that have fins and scales shall ye eat: 
And whatsoever hath not fins and scales ye may not eat; it is unclean unto you. 
Of all clean birds ye shall eat. 
But these are they of which ye shall not eat: the eagle, and the ossifrage, and the ospray, 
And the glede, and the kite, and the vulture after his kind, 
And every raven after his kind, 
And the owl, and the night hawk, and the cuckow, and the hawk after his kind, 
The little owl, and the great owl, and the swan, 
And the pelican, and the gier eagle, and the cormorant, 
And the stork, and the heron after her kind, and the lapwing, and the bat. 
And every creeping thing that flieth is unclean unto you: they shall not be eaten. 
But of all clean fowls ye may eat. 
Ye shall not eat of anything that dieth of itself: thou shalt give it unto the stranger that is in thy g
789,h: for they shall feed and lie down, and none shall make them afraid. 
Sing, O daughter of Zion; shout, O Israel; be glad and rejoice with all the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath taken away thy judgments, he hath cast out thine enemy: the king of Israel, even the LORD, is in the midst of thee: thou shalt not see evil any more. 
In that day it shall be said to Jerusalem, Fear thou not: and to Zion, Let not thine hands be slack. 
The LORD thy God in the midst of thee is mighty; he will save, he will rejoice over thee with joy; he will rest in his love, he will joy over thee with singing. 
I will gather them that are sorrowful for the solemn assembly, who are of thee, to whom the reproach of it was a burden. 
Behold, at that time I will undo all that afflict thee: an
845, be. 
Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 
How long wilt thou speak these things? and how long shall the words of thy mouth be like a strong wind? 
Doth God pervert judgment? or doth the Almighty pervert justice? 
If thy children have sinned against him, and he have cast them away for their transgression; 
If thou wouldest seek unto God betimes, and make thy supplication to the Almighty; 
If thou wert pure and upright; surely now he would awake for thee, and make the habitation of thy righteousness prosperous. 
Though thy beginning was small, yet thy latter end should greatly increase. 
For enquire, I pray thee, of the former age, and prepare thyself to the search of their fathers: 
(For we are but of yesterday, and know nothing, because our days upon earth are a shadow:) 
Shall not they teach thee, and tell thee, and utter w
873,ORD. 
And if the prophet be deceived when he hath spoken a thing, I the LORD have deceived that prophet, and I will stretch out my hand upon him, and will destroy him from the midst of my people Israel. 
And they shall bear the punishment of their iniquity: the punishment of the prophet shall be even as the punishment of him that seeketh unto him; 
That the house of Israel may go no more astray from me, neither be polluted any more with all their transgressions; but that they may be my people, and I may be their God, saith the Lord GOD. 
The word of the LORD came again to me, saying, 
Son of man, when the land sinneth against me by trespassing grievously, then will I stretch out mine hand upon it, and will break the staff of the bread thereof, and will send famine upon it, and will cut off man and beast from it: 
Though these three men, Noah, Daniel, and Job, w
874, Babylon. 
Then was the secret revealed unto Daniel in a night vision. Then Daniel blessed the God of heaven. 
Daniel answered and said, Blessed be the name of God for ever and ever: for wisdom and might are his: 
And he changeth the times and the seasons: he removeth kings, and setteth up kings: he giveth wisdom unto the wise, and knowledge to them that know understanding: 
He revealeth the deep and secret things: he knoweth what is in the darkness, and the light dwelleth with him. 
I thank thee, and praise thee, O thou God of my fathers, who hast given me wisdom and might, and hast made known unto me now what we desired of thee: for thou hast now made known unto us the king's matter. 
Therefore Daniel went in unto Arioch, whom the king had ordained to destroy the wise men of Babylon: he went and said thus unto him; Destroy not the wise men of Babylon: bring me
1077, him, and came and fell at his feet: 
The woman was a Greek, a Syrophenician by nation; and she besought him that he would cast forth the devil out of her daughter. 
But Jesus said unto her, Let the children first be filled: for it is not meet to take the children's bread, and to cast it unto the dogs. 
And she answered and said unto him, Yes, Lord: yet the dogs under the table eat of the children's crumbs. 
And he said unto her, For this saying go thy way; the devil is gone out of thy daughter. 
And when she was come to her house, she found the devil gone out, and her daughter laid upon the bed. 
And again, departing from the coasts of Tyre and Sidon, he came unto the sea of Galilee, through the midst of the coasts of Decapolis. 
And they bring unto him one that was deaf, and had an impediment in his speech; and they beseech him to put his hand upon him. 
And he took him aside from the multitude, and put his fingers into his ears, and he spit, and touched his tongue; 
And looking up to heaven, he sighed, and saith unto him, Ephphatha, that is, Be opened. 
And 
883,let no man glory in men. For all things are your's; 
Whether Paul, or Apollos, or Cephas, or the world, or life, or death, or things present, or things to come; all are your's; 
And ye are Christ's; and Christ is God's. 
Let a man so account of us, as of the ministers of Christ, and stewards of the mysteries of God. 
Moreover it is required in stewards, that a man be found faithful. 
But with me it is a very small thing that I should be judged of you, or of man's judgment: yea, I judge not mine own self. 
For I know nothing by myself; yet am I not hereby justified: but he that judgeth me is the Lord. 
Therefore judge nothing before the time, until the Lord come, who both will bring to light the hidden things of darkness, and will make manifest the counsels of the hearts: and then shall every man have praise of God. 
And these things, brethren, I have in a figure transfer
843,ne of Sibmah: the lords of the heathen have broken down the principal plants thereof, they are come even unto Jazer, they wandered through the wilderness: her branches are stretched out, they are gone over the sea. 
Therefore I will bewail with the weeping of Jazer the vine of Sibmah: I will water thee with my tears, O Heshbon, and Elealeh: for the shouting for thy summer fruits and for thy harvest is fallen. 
And gladness is taken away, and joy out of the plentiful field; and in the vineyards there shall be no singing, neither shall there be shouting: the treaders shall tread out no wine in their presses; I have made their vintage shouting to cease. 
Wherefore my bowels shall sound like an harp for Moab, and mine inward parts for Kirharesh. 
And it shall come to pass, when it is seen that Moab is weary on the high place, that he s
750,d thee up, for to shew in thee my power; and that my name may be declared throughout all the earth. 
As yet exaltest thou thyself against my people, that thou wilt not let them go? 
Behold, to morrow about this time I will cause it to rain a very grievous hail, such as hath not been in Egypt since the foundation thereof even until now. 
Send therefore now, and gather thy cattle, and all that thou hast in the field; for upon every man and beast which shall be found in the field, and shall not be brought home, the hail shall come down upon them, and they shall die. 
He that feared the word of the LORD among the servants of Pharaoh made his servants and his cattle flee into the houses: 
And he that regarded not the word of the LORD left his se
942, Terah an hundred and nineteen years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Terah lived seventy years, and begat Abram, Nahor, and Haran. 
Now these are the generations of Terah: Terah begat Abram, Nahor, and Haran; and Haran begat Lot. 
And Haran died before his father Terah in the land of his nativity, in Ur of the Chaldees. 
And Abram and Nahor took them wives: the name of Abram's wife was Sarai; and the name of Nahor's wife, Milcah, the daughter of Haran, the father of Milcah, and the father of Iscah. 
But Sarai was barren; she had no child. 
And Terah took Abram his son, and Lot the son of Haran his son's son, and Sarai his daughter in law, his son Abram's wife; and they went forth with them from Ur of the Chaldees, to go into the land of Canaan; and they came unto Haran, and dwelt there. 
And the days of Terah were two hundred and five years: and Terah died in Haran. 
Now the LORD had said unto Abram, Get thee out of thy coun
881,id went on his way, and Saul returned to his place. 
And David said in his heart, I shall now perish one day by the hand of Saul: there is nothing better for me than that I should speedily escape into the land of the Philistines; and Saul shall despair of me, to seek me any more in any coast of Israel: so shall I escape out of his hand. 
And David arose, and he passed over with the six hundred men that were with him unto Achish, the son of Maoch, king of Gath. 
And David dwelt with Achish at Gath, he and his men, every man with his household, even David with his two wives, Ahinoam the Jezreelitess, and Abigail the Carmelitess, Nabal's wife. 
And it was told Saul that David was fled to Gath: and he sought no more again for him. 
And David said unto Achish, If I have now found grace in thine eyes, let them give me a place in some town in the country, that I may dwell the
1070,nd secure you. 
So they took the money, and did as they were taught: and this saying is commonly reported among the Jews until this day. 
Then the eleven disciples went away into Galilee, into a mountain where Jesus had appointed them. 
And when they saw him, they worshipped him: but some doubted. 
And Jesus came and spake unto them, saying, All power is given unto me in heaven and in earth. 
Go ye therefore, and teach all nations, baptizing them in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost: 
Teaching them to observe all things whatsoever I have commanded you: and, lo, I am with you alway, even unto the end of the world. Amen. 
The beginning of the gospel of Jesus Christ, the Son of God; 
As it is written in the prophets, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
The voice of one crying in the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of the Lord, make his paths straight. 
John did baptize in the wilderness, and preach the baptism of repentance for the remission of sins. 
And there went out unto him a
969,r they call themselves of the holy city, and stay themselves upon the God of Israel; The LORD of hosts is his name. 
I have declared the former things from the beginning; and they went forth out of my mouth, and I shewed them; I did them suddenly, and they came to pass. 
Because I knew that thou art obstinate, and thy neck is an iron sinew, and thy brow brass; 
I have even from the beginning declared it to thee; before it came to pass I shewed it thee: lest thou shouldest say, Mine idol hath done them, and my graven image, and my molten image, hath commanded them. 
Thou hast heard, see all this; and will not ye declare it? I have shewed thee new things from this time, even hidden things, and thou didst not know them. 
They are created now, and not from the beginning; even before the day when thou heardest them not; lest thou shouldest say, Behold, I knew them. 
Yea, thou heardest not; yea, thou knewest not; yea, from that time that thine ear was not opene
894,the way of the south gate shall go forth by the way of the north gate: he shall not return by the way of the gate whereby he came in, but shall go forth over against it. 
And the prince in the midst of them, when they go in, shall go in; and when they go forth, shall go forth. 
And in the feasts and in the solemnities the meat offering shall be an ephah to a bullock, and an ephah to a ram, and to the lambs as he is able to give, and an hin of oil to an ephah. 
Now when the prince shall prepare a voluntary burnt offering or peace offerings voluntarily unto the LORD, one shall then open him the gate that looketh toward the east, and he shall prepare his burnt offering and his peace offerings, as he did on the sabbath day: then he shall go forth; and after his going forth one shall shut the gate. 
Thou shalt daily prepare a burnt offering unto the LORD of a lamb of the first year with
967, Baalim, and made groves, and worshipped all the host of heaven, and served them. 
Also he built altars in the house of the LORD, whereof the LORD had said, In Jerusalem shall my name be for ever. 
And he built altars for all the host of heaven in the two courts of the house of the LORD. 
And he caused his children to pass through the fire in the valley of the son of Hinnom: also he observed times, and used enchantments, and used witchcraft, and dealt with a familiar spirit, and with wizards: he wrought much evil in the sight of the LORD, to provoke him to anger. 
And he set a carved image, the idol which he had made, in the house of God, of which God had said to David and to Solomon his son, In this house, and in Jerusalem, which I have chosen before all the tribes of Israel, will I put my name for ever: 
Neither will I any more remove the foot of Israel from out of the land which I have appointed for your fathers; so that they will take heed to do all
770,And they took him, and killed him, and cast him out of the vineyard. 
What shall therefore the lord of the vineyard do? he will come and destroy the husbandmen, and will give the vineyard unto others. 
And have ye not read this scripture; The stone which the builders rejected is become the head of the corner: 
This was the Lord's doing, and it is marvellous in our eyes? 
And they sought to lay hold on him, but feared the people: for they knew that he had spoken the parable against them: and they left him, and went their way. 
And they send unto him certain of the Pharisees and of the Herodians, to catch him in his words. 
And when they were come, they say unto him, Master, we know that thou art true, and carest for no man: for thou regardest not the person of 
940,e the LORD: and Aaron shall bear the judgment of the children of Israel upon his heart before the LORD continually. 
And thou shalt make the robe of the ephod all of blue. 
And there shall be an hole in the top of it, in the midst thereof: it shall have a binding of woven work round about the hole of it, as it were the hole of an habergeon, that it be not rent. 
And beneath upon the hem of it thou shalt make pomegranates of blue, and of purple, and of scarlet, round about the hem thereof; and bells of gold between them round about: 
A golden bell and a pomegranate, a golden bell and a pomegranate, upon the hem of the robe round about. 
And it shall be upon Aaron to minister: and his sound shall be heard when he goeth in unto the holy place before the LORD, and when he cometh out, that he die not. 
And thou shalt make a plate of pure gold, and grave upon it, like the engravings of a signet, HOLINESS TO THE LORD. 
And thou shalt
913,ickedly departed from my God. 
For all his judgments were before me: and as for his statutes, I did not depart from them. 
I was also upright before him, and have kept myself from mine iniquity. 
Therefore the LORD hath recompensed me according to my righteousness; according to my cleanness in his eye sight. 
With the merciful thou wilt shew thyself merciful, and with the upright man thou wilt shew thyself upright. 
With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and with the froward thou wilt shew thyself unsavoury. 
And the afflicted people thou wilt save: but thine eyes are upon the haughty, that thou mayest bring them down. 
For thou art my lamp, O LORD: and the LORD will lighten my darkness. 
For by thee I have run through a troop: by my God have I leaped over a wall. 
As for God, his way is perfect; the word of the LORD is tried: he is a buckler to all them that trust in him. 
For who is God, save t
780,offered. 
Also Cyrus the king brought forth the vessels of the house of the LORD, which Nebuchadnezzar had brought forth out of Jerusalem, and had put them in the house of his gods; 
Even those did Cyrus king of Persia bring forth by the hand of Mithredath the treasurer, and numbered them unto Sheshbazzar, the prince of Judah. 
And this is the number of them: thirty chargers of gold, a thousand chargers of silver, nine and twenty knives, 
Thirty basons of gold, silver basons of a second sort four hundred and ten, and other vessels a thousand. 
All the vessels of gold and of silver were five thousand and four hundred. All these did Sheshbazzar bring up with them of the captivity that were brought up from Babylon unto Jerusalem. 
Now these are the children of the province
915,e sea, that thou didst ride upon thine horses and thy chariots of salvation? 
Thy bow was made quite naked, according to the oaths of the tribes, even thy word. Selah. Thou didst cleave the earth with rivers. 
The mountains saw thee, and they trembled: the overflowing of the water passed by: the deep uttered his voice, and lifted up his hands on high. 
The sun and moon stood still in their habitation: at the light of thine arrows they went, and at the shining of thy glittering spear. 
Thou didst march through the land in indignation, thou didst thresh the heathen in anger. 
Thou wentest forth for the salvation of thy people, even for salvation with thine anointed; thou woundedst the head out of the house of the wicked, by discovering the foundation unto the neck. Selah. 
Thou didst strike through with his staves the head of his villages: they came out as a whirlwind to scatter me: their rejoicing was a
907,od of Jacob? God is not the God of the dead, but of the living. 
And when the multitude heard this, they were astonished at his doctrine. 
But when the Pharisees had heard that he had put the Sadducees to silence, they were gathered together. 
Then one of them, which was a lawyer, asked him a question, tempting him, and saying, 
Master, which is the great commandment in the law? 
Jesus said unto him, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart, and with all thy soul, and with all thy mind. 
This is the first and great commandment. 
And the second is like unto it, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. 
On these two commandments hang all the law and the prophets. 
While the Pharisees were gathered together, Jesus asked them, 
Saying, What think ye of Christ? whose son is he? They say unto him, The son of David. 
He saith unto them, How then doth David in spirit call him Lord, saying, 
878,with mighty power, to help the king against the enemy. 
And Uzziah prepared for them throughout all the host shields, and spears, and helmets, and habergeons, and bows, and slings to cast stones. 
And he made in Jerusalem engines, invented by cunning men, to be on the towers and upon the bulwarks, to shoot arrows and great stones withal. And his name spread far abroad; for he was marvellously helped, till he was strong. 
But when he was strong, his heart was lifted up to his destruction: for he transgressed against the LORD his God, and went into the temple of the LORD to burn incense upon the altar of incense. 
And Azariah the priest went in after him, and with him fourscore priests of the LORD, that were valiant men: 
And they withstood Uzziah the king, and said unto him, It appertaineth not unto thee, Uzziah, to burn incense unto the LORD, but to the priests the 
799,thou hast attained. 
But refuse profane and old wives' fables, and exercise thyself rather unto godliness. 
For bodily exercise profiteth little: but godliness is profitable unto all things, having promise of the life that now is, and of that which is to come. 
This is a faithful saying and worthy of all acceptation. 
For therefore we both labour and suffer reproach, because we trust in the living God, who is the Saviour of all men, specially of those that believe. 
These things command and teach. 
Let no man despise thy youth; but be thou an example of the believers, in word, in conversation, in charity, in spirit, in faith, in purity. 
Till I come, give attendance to reading, to exhortation, to doctrine. 
Neglect not the gift that is in thee, which was given thee by prophecy, with the l
835, them will I bring to my holy mountain, and make them joyful in my house of prayer: their burnt offerings and their sacrifices shall be accepted upon mine altar; for mine house shall be called an house of prayer for all people. 
The Lord GOD, which gathereth the outcasts of Israel saith, Yet will I gather others to him, beside those that are gathered unto him. 
All ye beasts of the field, come to devour, yea, all ye beasts in the forest. 
His watchmen are blind: they are all ignorant, they are all dumb dogs, they cannot bark; sleeping, lying down, loving to slumber. 
Yea, they are greedy dogs which can never have enough, and they are shepherds that cannot understand: they all look to their own way, every one for his gain, from his quarter. 
Come ye, say they, I will fetch wine, and we will fill ourselves with strong drink; 
822,n wisdom, as he promised him: and there was peace between Hiram and Solomon; and they two made a league together. 
And king Solomon raised a levy out of all Israel; and the levy was thirty thousand men. 
And he sent them to Lebanon, ten thousand a month by courses: a month they were in Lebanon, and two months at home: and Adoniram was over the levy. 
And Solomon had threescore and ten thousand that bare burdens, and fourscore thousand hewers in the mountains; 
Beside the chief of Solomon's officers which were over the work, three thousand and three hundred, which ruled over the people that wrought in the work. 
And the king commanded, and they brought great stones, costly stones, and hewed stones, to lay the foundation of the house. 
And Solomon's builders and Hiram's builders did hew them, and the stonesquarer
790,ng the congregation of the LORD. 
Now therefore kill every male among the little ones, and kill every woman that hath known man by lying with him. 
But all the women children, that have not known a man by lying with him, keep alive for yourselves. 
And do ye abide without the camp seven days: whosoever hath killed any person, and whosoever hath touched any slain, purify both yourselves and your captives on the third day, and on the seventh day. 
And purify all your raiment, and all that is made of skins, and all work of goats' hair, and all things made of wood. 
And Eleazar the priest said unto the men of war which went to the battle, This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD commanded Moses; 
Only the gold, and the silver, the brass, the iron, the tin, and the lead, 
Every
1017,
The heart of the righteous studieth to answer: but the mouth of the wicked poureth out evil things. 
The LORD is far from the wicked: but he heareth the prayer of the righteous. 
The light of the eyes rejoiceth the heart: and a good report maketh the bones fat. 
The ear that heareth the reproof of life abideth among the wise. 
He that refuseth instruction despiseth his own soul: but he that heareth reproof getteth understanding. 
The fear of the LORD is the instruction of wisdom; and before honour is humility. 
The preparations of the heart in man, and the answer of the tongue, is from the LORD. 
All the ways of a man are clean in his own eyes; but the LORD weigheth the spirits. 
Commit thy works unto the LORD, and thy thoughts shall be established. 
The LORD hath made all things for himself: yea, even the wicked for the day of evil. 
Every one that is proud in heart is an abomination to the LORD: though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished. 
By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the 
970,e, to eat the bread of sorrows: for so he giveth his beloved sleep. 
Lo, children are an heritage of the LORD: and the fruit of the womb is his reward. 
As arrows are in the hand of a mighty man; so are children of the youth. 
Happy is the man that hath his quiver full of them: they shall not be ashamed, but they shall speak with the enemies in the gate. 
Blessed is every one that feareth the LORD; that walketh in his ways. 
For thou shalt eat the labour of thine hands: happy shalt thou be, and it shall be well with thee. 
Thy wife shall be as a fruitful vine by the sides of thine house: thy children like olive plants round about thy table. 
Behold, that thus shall the man be blessed that feareth the LORD. 
The LORD shall bless thee out of Zion: and thou shalt see the good of Jerusalem all the days of thy life. 
Yea, thou shalt see thy children's children, and peace upon Israel. 
Many a time have they afflicted me from my youth, may Israel now say: 
Many a
925,of Tanhumeth, and the sons of Ephai the Netophathite, and Jezaniah the son of a Maachathite, they and their men. 
And Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan sware unto them and to their men, saying, Fear not to serve the Chaldeans: dwell in the land, and serve the king of Babylon, and it shall be well with you. 
As for me, behold, I will dwell at Mizpah, to serve the Chaldeans, which will come unto us: but ye, gather ye wine, and summer fruits, and oil, and put them in your vessels, and dwell in your cities that ye have taken. 
Likewise when all the Jews that were in Moab, and among the Ammonites, and in Edom, and that were in all the countries, heard that the king of Babylon had left a remnant of Judah, and that he had set over them Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan; 
Even all the Jews returned out of all places whither they were driven, and came to the land of Judah, to Gedaliah, unto Mizpah
951,n, and there confound their language, that they may not understand one another's speech. 
So the LORD scattered them abroad from thence upon the face of all the earth: and they left off to build the city. 
Therefore is the name of it called Babel; because the LORD did there confound the language of all the earth: and from thence did the LORD scatter them abroad upon the face of all the earth. 
These are the generations of Shem: Shem was an hundred years old, and begat Arphaxad two years after the flood: 
And Shem lived after he begat Arphaxad five hundred years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Arphaxad lived five and thirty years, and begat Salah: 
And Arphaxad lived after he begat Salah four hundred and three years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Salah lived thirty years, and begat Eber: 
And Salah lived after he begat Eber four hundred and three years, and begat sons and daughters. 
And Eber lived four and thirty years, and bega
899,d ass. 
And Saul gathered the people together, and numbered them in Telaim, two hundred thousand footmen, and ten thousand men of Judah. 
And Saul came to a city of Amalek, and laid wait in the valley. 
And Saul said unto the Kenites, Go, depart, get you down from among the Amalekites, lest I destroy you with them: for ye shewed kindness to all the children of Israel, when they came up out of Egypt. So the Kenites departed from among the Amalekites. 
And Saul smote the Amalekites from Havilah until thou comest to Shur, that is over against Egypt. 
And he took Agag the king of the Amalekites alive, and utterly destroyed all the people with the edge of the sword. 
But Saul and the people spared Agag, and the best of the sheep, and of the oxen, and of the fatlings, and the lambs, and all that was good, and would not utterly destroy them: but every thing that was vile and refuse, that they 
1051, which bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, as well the stranger, as he that was born among them; half of them over against mount Gerizim, and half of them over against mount Ebal; as Moses the servant of the LORD had commanded before, that they should bless the people of Israel. 
And afterward he read all the words of the law, the blessings and cursings, according to all that is written in the book of the law. 
There was not a word of all that Moses commanded, which Joshua read not before all the congregation of Israel, with the women, and the little ones, and the strangers that were conversant among them. 
And it came to pass, when all the kings which were on this side Jordan, in the hills, and in the valleys, and in all the coasts of the great sea over against Lebanon, the Hittite, and the Amorite, the Canaanite, the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite, heard thereof; 
That they gathered themselves together, to fight with Joshua and with Israel, with one accord. 
And when the inhabitants of Gibeon heard what Joshua had done
1061, of God: do therefore what is good in thine eyes. 
For all of my father's house were but dead men before my lord the king: yet didst thou set thy servant among them that did eat at thine own table. What right therefore have I yet to cry any more unto the king? 
And the king said unto him, Why speakest thou any more of thy matters? I have said, Thou and Ziba divide the land. 
And Mephibosheth said unto the king, Yea, let him take all, forasmuch as my lord the king is come again in peace unto his own house. 
And Barzillai the Gileadite came down from Rogelim, and went over Jordan with the king, to conduct him over Jordan. 
Now Barzillai was a very aged man, even fourscore years old: and he had provided the king of sustenance while he lay at Mahanaim; for he was a very great man. 
And the king said unto Barzillai, Come thou over with me, and I will feed thee with me in Jerusalem. 
And Barzillai said unto the king, How long have I to live, that I should go up with the king unto Jerusalem? 
I am this day fourscore years old: and can I discern between
984,ds over you, captains over thousands, and captains over hundreds, and captains over fifties, and captains over tens, and officers among your tribes. 
And I charged your judges at that time, saying, Hear the causes between your brethren, and judge righteously between every man and his brother, and the stranger that is with him. 
Ye shall not respect persons in judgment; but ye shall hear the small as well as the great; ye shall not be afraid of the face of man; for the judgment is God's: and the cause that is too hard for you, bring it unto me, and I will hear it. 
And I commanded you at that time all the things which ye should do. 
And when we departed from Horeb, we went through all that great and terrible wilderness, which ye saw by the way of the mountain of the Amorites, as the LORD our God commanded us; and we came to Kadeshbarnea. 
And I said unto you, Ye are come unto the mountain of the Amorites, which the LORD our God doth give unto us. 
Behold, the LORD thy Go
809,the forepart of it, over against the other coupling thereof, above the curious girdle of the ephod. 
And they did bind the breastplate by his rings unto the rings of the ephod with a lace of blue, that it might be above the curious girdle of the ephod, and that the breastplate might not be loosed from the ephod; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the robe of the ephod of woven work, all of blue. 
And there was an hole in the midst of the robe, as the hole of an habergeon, with a band round about the hole, that it should not rend. 
And they made upon the hems of the robe pomegranates of blue, and purple, and scarlet, and twined linen. 
And they made bells of pure gold, and put the bells between the pomegranates upon the hem of the robe, round about between the pomegranates; 
A bell and a pome
855,odge here this night, and I will bring you word again, as the LORD shall speak unto me: and the princes of Moab abode with Balaam. 
And God came unto Balaam, and said, What men are these with thee? 
And Balaam said unto God, Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab, hath sent unto me, saying, 
Behold, there is a people come out of Egypt, which covereth the face of the earth: come now, curse me them; peradventure I shall be able to overcome them, and drive them out. 
And God said unto Balaam, Thou shalt not go with them; thou shalt not curse the people: for they are blessed. 
And Balaam rose up in the morning, and said unto the princes of Balak, Get you into your land: for the LORD refuseth to give me leave to go with you. 
And the princes of Moab rose up, and they went unto Balak, and said, Balaam refuseth to come with us. 
And Balak sent yet aga
889,Now Israel loved Joseph more than all his children, because he was the son of his old age: and he made him a coat of many colours. 
And when his brethren saw that their father loved him more than all his brethren, they hated him, and could not speak peaceably unto him. 
And Joseph dreamed a dream, and he told it his brethren: and they hated him yet the more. 
And he said unto them, Hear, I pray you, this dream which I have dreamed: 
For, behold, we were binding sheaves in the field, and, lo, my sheaf arose, and also stood upright; and, behold, your sheaves stood round about, and made obeisance to my sheaf. 
And his brethren said to him, Shalt thou indeed reign over us? or shalt thou indeed have dominion over us? And they hated him yet the more for his dreams, and for his words. 
And he dreamed yet another dream, and told it his brethren, and said, Behold, I have dreamed a drea
806,witnesses of all things which he did both in the land of the Jews, and in Jerusalem; whom they slew and hanged on a tree: 
Him God raised up the third day, and shewed him openly; 
Not to all the people, but unto witnesses chosen before God, even to us, who did eat and drink with him after he rose from the dead. 
And he commanded us to preach unto the people, and to testify that it is he which was ordained of God to be the Judge of quick and dead. 
To him give all the prophets witness, that through his name whosoever believeth in him shall receive remission of sins. 
While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all them which heard the word. 
And they of the circumcision which believed were astonished, as many as came with Peter, because that on the Gentiles also was poured out the g
873, the priest's hand he shall put upon the head of him that is to be cleansed, to make an atonement for him before the LORD. 
And he shall offer the one of the turtledoves, or of the young pigeons, such as he can get; 
Even such as he is able to get, the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, with the meat offering: and the priest shall make an atonement for him that is to be cleansed before the LORD. 
This is the law of him in whom is the plague of leprosy, whose hand is not able to get that which pertaineth to his cleansing. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
When ye be come into the land of Canaan, which I give to you for a possession, and I put the plague of leprosy in a house of the land of your possession; 
And he that owneth the house shall come and tell the priest, saying, It seemeth to me there is as it were a pl
1018,in perils in the wilderness, in perils in the sea, in perils among false brethren; 
In weariness and painfulness, in watchings often, in hunger and thirst, in fastings often, in cold and nakedness. 
Beside those things that are without, that which cometh upon me daily, the care of all the churches. 
Who is weak, and I am not weak? who is offended, and I burn not? 
If I must needs glory, I will glory of the things which concern mine infirmities. 
The God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, which is blessed for evermore, knoweth that I lie not. 
In Damascus the governor under Aretas the king kept the city of the damascenes with a garrison, desirous to apprehend me: 
And through a window in a basket was I let down by the wall, and escaped his hands. 
It is not expedient for me doubtless to glory. I will come to visions and revelations of the Lord. 
I knew a man in Christ above fourteen years ago, (whether in the body, I cannot tell; or whether out of the body, I cannot tell: God knoweth;) such an one caug
778, sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The twelfth to Hashabiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The thirteenth to Shubael, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The fourteenth to Mattithiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The fifteenth to Jeremoth, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The sixteenth to Hananiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The seventeenth to Joshbekashah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The eighteenth to Hanani, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The nineteenth to Mallothi, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The twentieth to Eliathah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 
The one and twentieth to Hothir, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twel
757,aid unto him, I am a prophet also as thou art; and an angel spake unto me by the word of the LORD, saying, Bring him back with thee into thine house, that he may eat bread and drink water. But he lied unto him. 
So he went back with him, and did eat bread in his house, and drank water. 
And it came to pass, as they sat at the table, that the word of the LORD came unto the prophet that brought him back: 
And he cried unto the man of God that came from Judah, saying, Thus saith the LORD, Forasmuch as thou hast disobeyed the mouth of the LORD, and hast not kept the commandment which the LORD thy God commanded thee, 
But camest back, and hast eaten bread and drunk water in the place, of the which the Lord did say to thee, Eat no bread, and drink no wa
968,the time of their visitation. 
The voice thereof shall go like a serpent; for they shall march with an army, and come against her with axes, as hewers of wood. 
They shall cut down her forest, saith the LORD, though it cannot be searched; because they are more than the grasshoppers, and are innumerable. 
The daughter of Egypt shall be confounded; she shall be delivered into the hand of the people of the north. 
The LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saith; Behold, I will punish the multitude of No, and Pharaoh, and Egypt, with their gods, and their kings; even Pharaoh, and all them that trust in him: 
And I will deliver them into the hand of those that seek their lives, and into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of his servants: and afterward it shall be inhabited, as in the days of old, saith the LORD. 
But fear not thou, O my servant Jacob, and be not dismayed, O Israel: for, behold, I will save thee from afar off, and thy se
720,ts of Zidon, that pass over the sea, have replenished. 
And by great waters the seed of Sihor, the harvest of the river, is her revenue; and she is a mart of nations. 
Be thou ashamed, O Zidon: for the sea hath spoken, even the strength of the sea, saying, I travail not, nor bring forth children, neither do I nourish up young men, nor bring up virgins. 
As at the report concerning Egypt, so shall they be sorely pained at the report of Tyre. 
Pass ye over to Tarshish; howl, ye inhabitants of the isle. 
Is this your joyous city, whose antiquity is of ancient days? her own feet shall carry her afar off to sojourn. 
Who hath taken this counsel against Tyre, the crowning city, whose merchants are princes, whose traf
1010, the house of Israel committeth here, that I should go far off from my sanctuary? but turn thee yet again, and thou shalt see greater abominations. 
And he brought me to the door of the court; and when I looked, behold a hole in the wall. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, dig now in the wall: and when I had digged in the wall, behold a door. 
And he said unto me, Go in, and behold the wicked abominations that they do here. 
So I went in and saw; and behold every form of creeping things, and abominable beasts, and all the idols of the house of Israel, pourtrayed upon the wall round about. 
And there stood before them seventy men of the ancients of the house of Israel, and in the midst of them stood Jaazaniah the son of Shaphan, with every man his censer in his hand; and a thick cloud of incense went up. 
Then said he unto me, Son of man, hast thou seen what the ancients of the house of Israel do in the dark, every man in the chambers of his imagery? for they say, the LORD seeth us not; the LORD 
783,cing, and her people a joy. 
And I will rejoice in Jerusalem, and joy in my people: and the voice of weeping shall be no more heard in her, nor the voice of crying. 
There shall be no more thence an infant of days, nor an old man that hath not filled his days: for the child shall die an hundred years old; but the sinner being an hundred years old shall be accursed. 
And they shall build houses, and inhabit them; and they shall plant vineyards, and eat the fruit of them. 
They shall not build, and another inhabit; they shall not plant, and another eat: for as the days of a tree are the days of my people, and mine elect shall long enjoy the work of their hands. 
They shall not labour in vain, nor bring forth for trouble; for they are the seed of the blessed of the LORD, and 
812,male: and of beasts that are not clean by two, the male and his female. 
Of fowls also of the air by sevens, the male and the female; to keep seed alive upon the face of all the earth. 
For yet seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth forty days and forty nights; and every living substance that I have made will I destroy from off the face of the earth. 
And Noah did according unto all that the LORD commanded him. 
And Noah was six hundred years old when the flood of waters was upon the earth. 
And Noah went in, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him, into the ark, because of the waters of the flood. 
Of clean beasts, and of beasts that are not clean, and of fowls, and of every thing that creepeth upon the earth, 
There went in two and two unto Noah into the ark, the mal
807, poor, and reprove with equity for the meek of the earth: and he shall smite the earth: with the rod of his mouth, and with the breath of his lips shall he slay the wicked. 
And righteousness shall be the girdle of his loins, and faithfulness the girdle of his reins. 
The wolf also shall dwell with the lamb, and the leopard shall lie down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling together; and a little child shall lead them. 
And the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie down together: and the lion shall eat straw like the ox. 
And the sucking child shall play on the hole of the asp, and the weaned child shall put his hand on the cockatrice' den. 
They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain: for the earth shall be full of the knowledge of the LORD
857,ces of heaven and earth; 
Then will I cast away the seed of Jacob and David my servant, so that I will not take any of his seed to be rulers over the seed of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob: for I will cause their captivity to return, and have mercy on them. 
The word which came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, when Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, and all his army, and all the kingdoms of the earth of his dominion, and all the people, fought against Jerusalem, and against all the cities thereof, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; Go and speak to Zedekiah king of Judah, and tell him, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will give this city into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall burn it with fire: 
And thou shalt not escape out of his hand, but shalt surely be taken, and delivered into his hand; and thine eyes shall behold the eyes of th
1074,ps, and with psalteries, and with timbrels, and with cymbals, and with trumpets. 
And when they came unto the threshingfloor of Chidon, Uzza put forth his hand to hold the ark; for the oxen stumbled. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzza, and he smote him, because he put his hand to the ark: and there he died before God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon Uzza: wherefore that place is called Perezuzza to this day. 
And David was afraid of God that day, saying, How shall I bring the ark of God home to me? 
So David brought not the ark home to himself to the city of David, but carried it aside into the house of Obededom the Gittite. 
And the ark of God remained with the family of Obededom in his house three months. And the LORD blessed the house of Obededom, and all that he had. 
Now Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and timber of cedars, with masons and carpenters, to build him an house. 
And David perceived that the LORD had confirmed him king over Israel, for his kingdom was lifted up on high, because
989,RD, I pray thee, let us detain thee, until we shall have made ready a kid for thee. 
And the angel of the LORD said unto Manoah, Though thou detain me, I will not eat of thy bread: and if thou wilt offer a burnt offering, thou must offer it unto the LORD. For Manoah knew not that he was an angel of the LORD. 
And Manoah said unto the angel of the LORD, What is thy name, that when thy sayings come to pass we may do thee honour? 
And the angel of the LORD said unto him, Why askest thou thus after my name, seeing it is secret? 
So Manoah took a kid with a meat offering, and offered it upon a rock unto the LORD: and the angel did wonderously; and Manoah and his wife looked on. 
For it came to pass, when the flame went up toward heaven from off the altar, that the angel of the LORD ascended in the flame of the altar. And Manoah and his wife looked on it, and fell on their faces to the ground. 
But the angel of the LORD did no more appear to Manoah and to his wife. Then Manoah kne
1043,een hid, and laid great stones in the cave's mouth, which remain until this very day. 
And that day Joshua took Makkedah, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and the king thereof he utterly destroyed, them, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain: and he did to the king of Makkedah as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
Then Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, unto Libnah, and fought against Libnah: 
And the LORD delivered it also, and the king thereof, into the hand of Israel; and he smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein; he let none remain in it; but did unto the king thereof as he did unto the king of Jericho. 
And Joshua passed from Libnah, and all Israel with him, unto Lachish, and encamped against it, and fought against it: 
And the LORD delivered Lachish into the hand of Israel, which took it on the second day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein, according to all that he had done to Libnah. 
Then Horam king o
720, from the days of Josiah, even unto this day. 
It may be that the house of Judah will hear all the evil which I purpose to do unto them; that they may return every man from his evil way; that I may forgive their iniquity and their sin. 
Then Jeremiah called Baruch the son of Neriah: and Baruch wrote from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the LORD, which he had spoken unto him, upon a roll of a book. 
And Jeremiah commanded Baruch, saying, I am shut up; I cannot go into the house of the LORD: 
Therefore go thou, and read in the roll, which thou hast written from my mouth, the words of the LORD in the ears of the people in the LORD's house upon the fasting day: and also thou shalt read them in the ears of al
926,s. 
Then Jesus saith unto them, Children, have ye any meat? They answered him, No. 
And he said unto them, Cast the net on the right side of the ship, and ye shall find. They cast therefore, and now they were not able to draw it for the multitude of fishes. 
Therefore that disciple whom Jesus loved saith unto Peter, It is the Lord. Now when Simon Peter heard that it was the Lord, he girt his fisher's coat unto him, (for he was naked,) and did cast himself into the sea. 
And the other disciples came in a little ship; (for they were not far from land, but as it were two hundred cubits,) dragging the net with fishes. 
As soon then as they were come to land, they saw a fire of coals there, and fish laid thereon, and bread. 
Jesus saith unto them, Bring of the fish which ye have now caught. 
Simon Peter went up, and drew the net to land full of great fishes, an hundred and fifty and three: and for all there were so ma
911,hath despised thee, and laughed thee to scorn; the daughter of Jerusalem hath shaken her head at thee. 
Whom hast thou reproached and blasphemed? and against whom hast thou exalted thy voice, and lifted up thine eyes on high? even against the Holy One of Israel. 
By thy servants hast thou reproached the Lord, and hast said, By the multitude of my chariots am I come up to the height of the mountains, to the sides of Lebanon; and I will cut down the tall cedars thereof, and the choice fir trees thereof: and I will enter into the height of his border, and the forest of his Carmel. 
I have digged, and drunk water; and with the sole of my feet have I dried up all the rivers of the besieged places. 
Hast thou not heard long ago, how I have done it; and of ancient times, that I have formed it? now have I brought it to pass, that thou shouldest be to lay waste defenced cities into ruinous heaps. 
Therefore
1068,afflict them, even he that abideth of old. Selah. Because they have no changes, therefore they fear not God. 
He hath put forth his hands against such as be at peace with him: he hath broken his covenant. 
The words of his mouth were smoother than butter, but war was in his heart: his words were softer than oil, yet were they drawn swords. 
Cast thy burden upon the LORD, and he shall sustain thee: he shall never suffer the righteous to be moved. 
But thou, O God, shalt bring them down into the pit of destruction: bloody and deceitful men shall not live out half their days; but I will trust in thee. 
Be merciful unto me, O God: for man would swallow me up; he fighting daily oppresseth me. 
Mine enemies would daily swallow me up: for they be many that fight against me, O thou most High. 
What time I am afraid, I will trust in thee. 
In God I will praise his word, in God I have put my trust; I will not fear what flesh can do unto me. 
Every day they wrest my words: all their thoughts are against me for evil. 
They gather themselves together, they hide the
750,ess thee in all that thou settest thine hand to in the land whither thou goest to possess it. 
When thou shalt vow a vow unto the LORD thy God, thou shalt not slack to pay it: for the LORD thy God will surely require it of thee; and it would be sin in thee. 
But if thou shalt forbear to vow, it shall be no sin in thee. 
That which is gone out of thy lips thou shalt keep and perform; even a freewill offering, according as thou hast vowed unto the LORD thy God, which thou hast promised with thy mouth. 
When thou comest into thy neighbour's vineyard, then thou mayest eat grapes thy fill at thine own pleasure; but thou shalt not put any in thy vessel. 
When thou comest into the standing corn of thy neighbour, then thou mayest pluck the ears wit
844,he king Ahasuerus' name, and sealed it with the king's ring, and sent letters by posts on horseback, and riders on mules, camels, and young dromedaries: 
Wherein the king granted the Jews which were in every city to gather themselves together, and to stand for their life, to destroy, to slay and to cause to perish, all the power of the people and province that would assault them, both little ones and women, and to take the spoil of them for a prey, 
Upon one day in all the provinces of king Ahasuerus, namely, upon the thirteenth day of the twelfth month, which is the month Adar. 
The copy of the writing for a commandment to be given in every province was published unto all people, and that the Jews should be ready against that day to avenge themselves on their enemies. 
So the posts that rode upon mules and camels went out, being ha
912,d which is by the sea shore innumerable. 
These all died in faith, not having received the promises, but having seen them afar off, and were persuaded of them, and embraced them, and confessed that they were strangers and pilgrims on the earth. 
For they that say such things declare plainly that they seek a country. 
And truly, if they had been mindful of that country from whence they came out, they might have had opportunity to have returned. 
But now they desire a better country, that is, an heavenly: wherefore God is not ashamed to be called their God: for he hath prepared for them a city. 
By faith Abraham, when he was tried, offered up Isaac: and he that had received the promises offered up his only begotten son, 
Of whom it was said, That in Isaac shall thy seed be called: 
Accounting that God was able to raise him up, even from the dead; from whence also he received him in a figure. 
By faith
1030,for Judah rejoiced for the priests and for the Levites that waited. 
And both the singers and the porters kept the ward of their God, and the ward of the purification, according to the commandment of David, and of Solomon his son. 
For in the days of David and Asaph of old there were chief of the singers, and songs of praise and thanksgiving unto God. 
And all Israel in the days of Zerubbabel, and in the days of Nehemiah, gave the portions of the singers and the porters, every day his portion: and they sanctified holy things unto the Levites; and the Levites sanctified them unto the children of Aaron. 
On that day they read in the book of Moses in the audience of the people; and therein was found written, that the Ammonite and the Moabite should not come into the congregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, that he should curse them: howbeit our God turned the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard the 
1017, ask of her father a field: and she lighted from off her ass; and Caleb said unto her, What wilt thou? 
And she said unto him, Give me a blessing: for thou hast given me a south land; give me also springs of water. And Caleb gave her the upper springs and the nether springs. 
And the children of the Kenite, Moses' father in law, went up out of the city of palm trees with the children of Judah into the wilderness of Judah, which lieth in the south of Arad; and they went and dwelt among the people. 
And Judah went with Simeon his brother, and they slew the Canaanites that inhabited Zephath, and utterly destroyed it. And the name of the city was called Hormah. 
Also Judah took Gaza with the coast thereof, and Askelon with the coast thereof, and Ekron with the coast thereof. 
And the LORD was with Judah; and he drave out the inhabitants of the mountain; but could not drive out the inhabitants of the valley, because they had chariots of iron. 
And they gave Hebron unto Caleb, as Moses said: and he expelled 
830, and he put on incense, and made an atonement for the people. 
And he stood between the dead and the living; and the plague was stayed. 
Now they that died in the plague were fourteen thousand and seven hundred, beside them that died about the matter of Korah. 
And Aaron returned unto Moses unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation: and the plague was stayed. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and take of every one of them a rod according to the house of their fathers, of all their princes according to the house of their fathers twelve rods: write thou every man's name upon his rod. 
And thou shalt write Aaron's name upon the rod of Levi: for one rod shall be for the head of the house of their fathers. 
And thou shalt lay them up in the tabernacle of the congregation b
1067,ernacle said not, Oh that we had of his flesh! we cannot be satisfied. 
The stranger did not lodge in the street: but I opened my doors to the traveller. 
If I covered my transgressions as Adam, by hiding mine iniquity in my bosom: 
Did I fear a great multitude, or did the contempt of families terrify me, that I kept silence, and went not out of the door? 
Oh that one would hear me! behold, my desire is, that the Almighty would answer me, and that mine adversary had written a book. 
Surely I would take it upon my shoulder, and bind it as a crown to me. 
I would declare unto him the number of my steps; as a prince would I go near unto him. 
If my land cry against me, or that the furrows likewise thereof complain; 
If I have eaten the fruits thereof without money, or have caused the owners thereof to lose their life: 
Let thistles grow instead of wheat, and cockle instead of barley. The words of Job are ended. 
So these three men ceased to answer Job, because he was righteous in his own eyes. 
Then was kindled the wrath of Elihu the son of Barachel the 
761,e fire which is under the sacrifice of the peace offerings. 
And the priest shall take the sodden shoulder of the ram, and one unleavened cake out of the basket, and one unleavened wafer, and shall put them upon the hands of the Nazarite, after the hair of his separation is shaven: 
And the priest shall wave them for a wave offering before the LORD: this is holy for the priest, with the wave breast and heave shoulder: and after that the Nazarite may drink wine. 
This is the law of the Nazarite who hath vowed, and of his offering unto the LORD for his separation, beside that that his hand shall get: according to the vow which he vowed, so he must do after the law of his separation. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron and unto his 
728,that their father loved him more than all his brethren, they hated him, and could not speak peaceably unto him. 
And Joseph dreamed a dream, and he told it his brethren: and they hated him yet the more. 
And he said unto them, Hear, I pray you, this dream which I have dreamed: 
For, behold, we were binding sheaves in the field, and, lo, my sheaf arose, and also stood upright; and, behold, your sheaves stood round about, and made obeisance to my sheaf. 
And his brethren said to him, Shalt thou indeed reign over us? or shalt thou indeed have dominion over us? And they hated him yet the more for his dreams, and for his words. 
And he dreamed yet another dream, and told it his brethren, and said, Behold, I have dreamed a d
890,ed by genealogy, but they were not found: therefore were they, as polluted, put from the priesthood. 
And the Tirshatha said unto them, that they should not eat of the most holy things, till there stood up a priest with Urim and with Thummim. 
The whole congregation together was forty and two thousand three hundred and threescore, 
Beside their servants and their maids, of whom there were seven thousand three hundred thirty and seven: and there were among them two hundred singing men and singing women. 
Their horses were seven hundred thirty and six; their mules, two hundred forty and five; 
Their camels, four hundred thirty and five; their asses, six thousand seven hundred and twenty. 
And some of the chief of the fathers, when they came to the house of the LORD which is at Jerusalem, offered freely for the house of God to set it up in his place: 
They gave after their ability
882,em. 
Sing unto the LORD a new song, and his praise from the end of the earth, ye that go down to the sea, and all that is therein; the isles, and the inhabitants thereof. 
Let the wilderness and the cities thereof lift up their voice, the villages that Kedar doth inhabit: let the inhabitants of the rock sing, let them shout from the top of the mountains. 
Let them give glory unto the LORD, and declare his praise in the islands. 
The LORD shall go forth as a mighty man, he shall stir up jealousy like a man of war: he shall cry, yea, roar; he shall prevail against his enemies. 
I have long time holden my peace; I have been still, and refrained myself: now will I cry like a travailing woman; I will destroy and devour at once. 
I will make waste mountains and hills, and dry up all their herbs; and I will make the rivers islands, and I will dry up the pools. 
And I will brin
1015,ave sorrow: but I will see you again, and your heart shall rejoice, and your joy no man taketh from you. 
And in that day ye shall ask me nothing. Verily, verily, I say unto you, Whatsoever ye shall ask the Father in my name, he will give it you. 
Hitherto have ye asked nothing in my name: ask, and ye shall receive, that your joy may be full. 
These things have I spoken unto you in proverbs: but the time cometh, when I shall no more speak unto you in proverbs, but I shall shew you plainly of the Father. 
At that day ye shall ask in my name: and I say not unto you, that I will pray the Father for you: 
For the Father himself loveth you, because ye have loved me, and have believed that I came out from God. 
I came forth from the Father, and am come into the world: again, I leave the world, and go to the Father. 
His disciples said unto him, Lo, now speakest thou plainly, and speakest no proverb. 
Now are we sure that thou knowest all things, and needest not that any man should ask thee: by this we beli
901,e flesh of your foreskin; and it shall be a token of the covenant betwixt me and you. 
And he that is eight days old shall be circumcised among you, every man child in your generations, he that is born in the house, or bought with money of any stranger, which is not of thy seed. 
He that is born in thy house, and he that is bought with thy money, must needs be circumcised: and my covenant shall be in your flesh for an everlasting covenant. 
And the uncircumcised man child whose flesh of his foreskin is not circumcised, that soul shall be cut off from his people; he hath broken my covenant. 
And God said unto Abraham, As for Sarai thy wife, thou shalt not call her name Sarai, but Sarah shall her name be. 
And I will bless her, and give thee a son also of her: yea, I will bless her, and she shall be a mother of nations; kings of people shall be of her. 
Then Abraham fell upon his face, and 
975,was taken away. 
Now a certain man of the servants of Saul was there that day, detained before the LORD; and his name was Doeg, an Edomite, the chiefest of the herdmen that belonged to Saul. 
And David said unto Ahimelech, And is there not here under thine hand spear or sword? for I have neither brought my sword nor my weapons with me, because the king's business required haste. 
And the priest said, The sword of Goliath the Philistine, whom thou slewest in the valley of Elah, behold, it is here wrapped in a cloth behind the ephod: if thou wilt take that, take it: for there is no other save that here. And David said, There is none like that; give it me. 
And David arose and fled that day for fear of Saul, and went to Achish the king of Gath. 
And the servants of Achish said unto him, Is not this David the king of the land? did they not sing one to another of him in dances, saying, Saul hath slain his thousands, and David his ten thousands? 
And David laid up th
943,be good or bad: as the priest shall estimate it, so shall it stand. 
And if he that sanctified it will redeem his house, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and it shall be his. 
And if a man shall sanctify unto the LORD some part of a field of his possession, then thy estimation shall be according to the seed thereof: an homer of barley seed shall be valued at fifty shekels of silver. 
If he sanctify his field from the year of jubile, according to thy estimation it shall stand. 
But if he sanctify his field after the jubile, then the priest shall reckon unto him the money according to the years that remain, even unto the year of the jubile, and it shall be abated from thy estimation. 
And if he that sanctified the field will in any wise redeem it, then he shall add the fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and it shall be assured to him. 
And if he will not redeem the field, or i
861,or his offering one silver charger, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One spoon of gold of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Nethaneel the son of Zuar. 
On the third day Eliab the son of Helon, prince of the children of Zebulun, did offer: 
His offering was one silver charger, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oi
806, even the world itself could not contain the books that should be written. Amen. 
The former treatise have I made, O Theophilus, of all that Jesus began both to do and teach, 
Until the day in which he was taken up, after that he through the Holy Ghost had given commandments unto the apostles whom he had chosen: 
To whom also he shewed himself alive after his passion by many infallible proofs, being seen of them forty days, and speaking of the things pertaining to the kingdom of God: 
And, being assembled together with them, commanded them that they should not depart from Jerusalem, but wait for the promise of the Father, which, saith he, ye have heard of me. 
For John truly baptized with water; but ye shall be baptized with the Holy Ghost not many days hence. 
When they therefore were come toge
771,f hosts, and to keep the feast of tabernacles. 
And it shall be, that whoso will not come up of all the families of the earth unto Jerusalem to worship the King, the LORD of hosts, even upon them shall be no rain. 
And if the family of Egypt go not up, and come not, that have no rain; there shall be the plague, wherewith the LORD will smite the heathen that come not up to keep the feast of tabernacles. 
This shall be the punishment of Egypt, and the punishment of all nations that come not up to keep the feast of tabernacles. 
In that day shall there be upon the bells of the horses, HOLINESS UNTO THE LORD; and the pots in the LORD's house shall be like the bowls before the altar. 
Yea, every pot in Jerusalem and in Judah shall be holiness unto the LORD of hosts:
1050,dst of the river, and all the plain of Medeba unto Dibon; 
And all the cities of Sihon king of the Amorites, which reigned in Heshbon, unto the border of the children of Ammon; 
And Gilead, and the border of the Geshurites and Maachathites, and all mount Hermon, and all Bashan unto Salcah; 
All the kingdom of Og in Bashan, which reigned in Ashtaroth and in Edrei, who remained of the remnant of the giants: for these did Moses smite, and cast them out. 
Nevertheless the children of Israel expelled not the Geshurites, nor the Maachathites: but the Geshurites and the Maachathites dwell among the Israelites until this day. 
Only unto the tribes of Levi he gave none inheritance; the sacrifices of the LORD God of Israel made by fire are their inheritance, as he said unto them. 
And Moses gave unto the tribe of the children of Reuben inheritance according to their families. 
And their coast was from Aroer, that is on the bank of the river Arnon, and the city that is in the midst of the river, and all the plain by Medeba; 
Heshbon, and all her
1000,by the Spirit of God, then the kingdom of God is come unto you. 
Or else how can one enter into a strong man's house, and spoil his goods, except he first bind the strong man? and then he will spoil his house. 
He that is not with me is against me; and he that gathereth not with me scattereth abroad. 
Wherefore I say unto you, All manner of sin and blasphemy shall be forgiven unto men: but the blasphemy against the Holy Ghost shall not be forgiven unto men. 
And whosoever speaketh a word against the Son of man, it shall be forgiven him: but whosoever speaketh against the Holy Ghost, it shall not be forgiven him, neither in this world, neither in the world to come. 
Either make the tree good, and his fruit good; or else make the tree corrupt, and his fruit corrupt: for the tree is known by his fruit. 
O generation of vipers, how can ye, being evil, speak good things? for out of the abundance of the heart the mouth speaketh. 
A good man out of the good treasure of the heart bringeth fort
1035,g all nations. 
But when they shall lead you, and deliver you up, take no thought beforehand what ye shall speak, neither do ye premeditate: but whatsoever shall be given you in that hour, that speak ye: for it is not ye that speak, but the Holy Ghost. 
Now the brother shall betray the brother to death, and the father the son; and children shall rise up against their parents, and shall cause them to be put to death. 
And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake: but he that shall endure unto the end, the same shall be saved. 
But when ye shall see the abomination of desolation, spoken of by Daniel the prophet, standing where it ought not, (let him that readeth understand,) then let them that be in Judaea flee to the mountains: 
And let him that is on the housetop not go down into the house, neither enter therein, to take any thing out of his house: 
And let him that is in the field not turn back again for to take up his garment. 
But woe to them that are with child, and to them that give suck in those days! 
And 
955,from a child shall have him become his son at the length. 
An angry man stirreth up strife, and a furious man aboundeth in transgression. 
A man's pride shall bring him low: but honour shall uphold the humble in spirit. 
Whoso is partner with a thief hateth his own soul: he heareth cursing, and bewrayeth it not. 
The fear of man bringeth a snare: but whoso putteth his trust in the LORD shall be safe. 
Many seek the ruler's favour; but every man's judgment cometh from the LORD. 
An unjust man is an abomination to the just: and he that is upright in the way is abomination to the wicked. 
The words of Agur the son of Jakeh, even the prophecy: the man spake unto Ithiel, even unto Ithiel and Ucal, 
Surely I am more brutish than any man, and have not the understanding of a man. 
I neither learned wisdom, nor have the knowledge of the holy. 
Who hath ascended up into heaven, or descended? who hath gathered the wind in his fists? who hath bound the 
827,d Gilead and Bashan. 
There was also a lot for the rest of the children of Manasseh by their families; for the children of Abiezer, and for the children of Helek, and for the children of Asriel, and for the children of Shechem, and for the children of Hepher, and for the children of Shemida: these were the male children of Manasseh the son of Joseph by their families. 
But Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of Machir, the son of Manasseh, had no sons, but daughters: and these are the names of his daughters, Mahlah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and Tirzah. 
And they came near before Eleazar the priest, and before Joshua the son of Nun, and before the princes, saying, The LORD commanded Moses to give us an inheritance among our brethren. Therefore according to the commandment of the LORD he gave th
965,ense unto the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto her, as we have done, we, and our fathers, our kings, and our princes, in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem: for then had we plenty of victuals, and were well, and saw no evil. 
But since we left off to burn incense to the queen of heaven, and to pour out drink offerings unto her, we have wanted all things, and have been consumed by the sword and by the famine. 
And when we burned incense to the queen of heaven, and poured out drink offerings unto her, did we make her cakes to worship her, and pour out drink offerings unto her, without our men? 
Then Jeremiah said unto all the people, to the men, and to the women, and to all the people which had given him that answer, saying, 
The incense that ye burned in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of Jerusalem, ye, and your fathers, your kings, and your princes, and the people of the land, did not the LORD remember th
1030, gate: for wide is the gate, and broad is the way, that leadeth to destruction, and many there be which go in thereat: 
Because strait is the gate, and narrow is the way, which leadeth unto life, and few there be that find it. 
Beware of false prophets, which come to you in sheep's clothing, but inwardly they are ravening wolves. 
Ye shall know them by their fruits. Do men gather grapes of thorns, or figs of thistles? 
Even so every good tree bringeth forth good fruit; but a corrupt tree bringeth forth evil fruit. 
A good tree cannot bring forth evil fruit, neither can a corrupt tree bring forth good fruit. 
Every tree that bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire. 
Wherefore by their fruits ye shall know them. 
Not every one that saith unto me, Lord, Lord, shall enter into the kingdom of heaven; but he that doeth the will of my Father which is in heaven. 
Many will say to me in that day, Lord, Lord, have we not prophesied in thy name? and in thy name have cast out devils? and in thy name 
1054,hem that believe on his name: 
Which were born, not of blood, nor of the will of the flesh, nor of the will of man, but of God. 
And the Word was made flesh, and dwelt among us, (and we beheld his glory, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of grace and truth. 
John bare witness of him, and cried, saying, This was he of whom I spake, He that cometh after me is preferred before me: for he was before me. 
And of his fulness have all we received, and grace for grace. 
For the law was given by Moses, but grace and truth came by Jesus Christ. 
No man hath seen God at any time, the only begotten Son, which is in the bosom of the Father, he hath declared him. 
And this is the record of John, when the Jews sent priests and Levites from Jerusalem to ask him, Who art thou? 
And he confessed, and denied not; but confessed, I am not the Christ. 
And they asked him, What then? Art thou Elias? And he saith, I am not. Art thou that prophet? And he answered, No. 
Then said they unto him, Who art thou? that we may give an answer to them 
846,allen upon his face to the ground before the ark of the LORD; and the head of Dagon and both the palms of his hands were cut off upon the threshold; only the stump of Dagon was left to him. 
Therefore neither the priests of Dagon, nor any that come into Dagon's house, tread on the threshold of Dagon in Ashdod unto this day. 
But the hand of the LORD was heavy upon them of Ashdod, and he destroyed them, and smote them with emerods, even Ashdod and the coasts thereof. 
And when the men of Ashdod saw that it was so, they said, The ark of the God of Israel shall not abide with us: for his hand is sore upon us, and upon Dagon our god. 
They sent therefore and gathered all the lords of the Philistines unto them, and said, What shall we do with the ark of the God of Israel? And they answered, Let the ark of the God of Israel be carried about
873,eart of the children of Israel from going over into the land which the LORD hath given them? 
Thus did your fathers, when I sent them from Kadeshbarnea to see the land. 
For when they went up unto the valley of Eshcol, and saw the land, they discouraged the heart of the children of Israel, that they should not go into the land which the LORD had given them. 
And the LORD'S anger was kindled the same time, and he sware, saying, 
Surely none of the men that came up out of Egypt, from twenty years old and upward, shall see the land which I sware unto Abraham, unto Isaac, and unto Jacob; because they have not wholly followed me: 
Save Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite, and Joshua the son of Nun: for they have wholly followed the LORD. 
And the LORD'S anger was kindled against Israel, and he made them wander in the wilderness forty years, until all the generat
1009,ac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who? where is he that hath taken venison, and brought it me, and I have eaten of all before thou camest, and have blessed him? yea, and he shall be blessed. 
And when Esau heard the words of his father, he cried with a great and exceeding bitter cry, and said unto his father, Bless me, even me also, O my father. 
And he said, Thy brother came with subtilty, and hath taken away thy blessing. 
And he said, Is not he rightly named Jacob? for he hath supplanted me these two times: he took away my birthright; and, behold, now he hath taken away my blessing. And he said, Hast thou not reserved a blessing for me? 
And Isaac answered and said unto Esau, Behold, I have made him thy lord, and all his brethren have I given to him for servants; and with corn and wine have I sustained him: and what shall I do now unto thee, my son? 
And Esau said unto his father, Hast thou but one blessing, my father? bless me, even me also, O my father. And Esau lifted up his voice, 
919,And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and the meat offering thereof, and their drink offerings. 
And on the third day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish; 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fourth day ten bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish: 
Their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fifth day nine 
889,e nations: let not the rebellious exalt themselves. Selah. 
O bless our God, ye people, and make the voice of his praise to be heard: 
Which holdeth our soul in life, and suffereth not our feet to be moved. 
For thou, O God, hast proved us: thou hast tried us, as silver is tried. 
Thou broughtest us into the net; thou laidst affliction upon our loins. 
Thou hast caused men to ride over our heads; we went through fire and through water: but thou broughtest us out into a wealthy place. 
I will go into thy house with burnt offerings: I will pay thee my vows, 
Which my lips have uttered, and my mouth hath spoken, when I was in trouble. 
I will offer unto thee burnt sacrifices of fatlings, with the incense of rams; I will offer bullocks with goats. Selah. 
Come and hear, all ye that fear God, and I will declare what he hath done for my soul. 
I cried unto him with my mouth, and he 
1005,saying, Shew a miracle for you: then thou shalt say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and cast it before Pharaoh, and it shall become a serpent. 
And Moses and Aaron went in unto Pharaoh, and they did so as the LORD had commanded: and Aaron cast down his rod before Pharaoh, and before his servants, and it became a serpent. 
Then Pharaoh also called the wise men and the sorcerers: now the magicians of Egypt, they also did in like manner with their enchantments. 
For they cast down every man his rod, and they became serpents: but Aaron's rod swallowed up their rods. 
And he hardened Pharaoh's heart, that he hearkened not unto them; as the LORD had said. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh's heart is hardened, he refuseth to let the people go. 
Get thee unto Pharaoh in the morning; lo, he goeth out unto the water; and thou shalt stand by the river's brink against he come; and the rod which was turned to a serpent shalt thou take in thine hand. 
And thou shalt say unto him, The LORD God of the Hebre
845,reds, came near unto Moses: 
And they said unto Moses, Thy servants have taken the sum of the men of war which are under our charge, and there lacketh not one man of us. 
We have therefore brought an oblation for the LORD, what every man hath gotten, of jewels of gold, chains, and bracelets, rings, earrings, and tablets, to make an atonement for our souls before the LORD. 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest took the gold of them, even all wrought jewels. 
And all the gold of the offering that they offered up to the LORD, of the captains of thousands, and of the captains of hundreds, was sixteen thousand seven hundred and fifty shekels. 
(For the men of war had taken spoil, every man for himself.) 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest took the gold of the captains of thousands and of hundreds, and brought it into the tabernacle of the congr
833,hat setteth light by his father or his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that removeth his neighbour's landmark. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that maketh the blind to wander out of the way. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that perverteth the judgment of the stranger, fatherless, and widow. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his father's wife; because he uncovereth his father's skirt. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with any manner of beast. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his sister, the daughter of his father, or the daughter of his mother. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed be he that lieth with his mother in law. And all the people shall say, Amen. 
Cursed
998,ey any more. 
And Abner and his men walked all that night through the plain, and passed over Jordan, and went through all Bithron, and they came to Mahanaim. 
And Joab returned from following Abner: and when he had gathered all the people together, there lacked of David's servants nineteen men and Asahel. 
But the servants of David had smitten of Benjamin, and of Abner's men, so that three hundred and threescore men died. 
And they took up Asahel, and buried him in the sepulchre of his father, which was in Bethlehem. And Joab and his men went all night, and they came to Hebron at break of day. 
Now there was long war between the house of Saul and the house of David: but David waxed stronger and stronger, and the house of Saul waxed weaker and weaker. 
And unto David were sons born in Hebron: and his firstborn was Amnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; 
And his second, Chileab, of Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite; and the third, Absalom the son of Maacah the daughter of Talmai kin
1021,indled it: it shall not be quenched. 
Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! they say of me, Doth he not speak parables? 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face toward Jerusalem, and drop thy word toward the holy places, and prophesy against the land of Israel, 
And say to the land of Israel, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I am against thee, and will draw forth my sword out of his sheath, and will cut off from thee the righteous and the wicked. 
Seeing then that I will cut off from thee the righteous and the wicked, therefore shall my sword go forth out of his sheath against all flesh from the south to the north: 
That all flesh may know that I the LORD have drawn forth my sword out of his sheath: it shall not return any more. 
Sigh therefore, thou son of man, with the breaking of thy loins; and with bitterness sigh before their eyes. 
And it shall be, when they say unto thee, Wherefore sighest thou? that thou shalt answer, For the tidings; because it cometh: and every heart shall melt, 
1022,r soul is precious, and it ceaseth for ever:) 
That he should still live for ever, and not see corruption. 
For he seeth that wise men die, likewise the fool and the brutish person perish, and leave their wealth to others. 
Their inward thought is, that their houses shall continue for ever, and their dwelling places to all generations; they call their lands after their own names. 
Nevertheless man being in honour abideth not: he is like the beasts that perish. 
This their way is their folly: yet their posterity approve their sayings. Selah. 
Like sheep they are laid in the grave; death shall feed on them; and the upright shall have dominion over them in the morning; and their beauty shall consume in the grave from their dwelling. 
But God will redeem my soul from the power of the grave: for he shall receive me. Selah. 
Be not thou afraid when one is made rich, when the glory of his house is increased; 
For when he dieth he shall carry nothing away: his glory shall not descend after him. 
Though while he liv
772, on the name of Baal from morning even until noon, saying, O Baal, hear us. But there was no voice, nor any that answered. And they leaped upon the altar which was made. 
And it came to pass at noon, that Elijah mocked them, and said, Cry aloud: for he is a god; either he is talking, or he is pursuing, or he is in a journey, or peradventure he sleepeth, and must be awaked. 
And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their manner with knives and lancets, till the blood gushed out upon them. 
And it came to pass, when midday was past, and they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice, that there was neither voice, nor any to answer, nor any that regarded. 
And Elijah said unto all the people, Come near unto me. And all the people came
810,b, with all Bashan, which was called the land of giants. 
Jair the son of Manasseh took all the country of Argob unto the coasts of Geshuri and Maachathi; and called them after his own name, Bashanhavothjair, unto this day. 
And I gave Gilead unto Machir. 
And unto the Reubenites and unto the Gadites I gave from Gilead even unto the river Arnon half the valley, and the border even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unto the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah eastward. 
And I commanded you at that time, saying, The LORD your God hath given you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before your brethren the children of Israel, all that are meet for the war. 
But y
825,from their coasts, men of valour, from Zorah, and from Eshtaol, to spy out the land, and to search it; and they said unto them, Go, search the land: who when they came to mount Ephraim, to the house of Micah, they lodged there. 
When they were by the house of Micah, they knew the voice of the young man the Levite: and they turned in thither, and said unto him, Who brought thee hither? and what makest thou in this place? and what hast thou here? 
And he said unto them, Thus and thus dealeth Micah with me, and hath hired me, and I am his priest. 
And they said unto him, Ask counsel, we pray thee, of God, that we may know whether our way which we go shall be prosperous. 
And the priest said unto them, Go in peace: before the LORD is your way wherein ye go. 
Then the five men departed, and came to Laish, and saw the p
1011,nd at Noph, and in the country of Pathros, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Ye have seen all the evil that I have brought upon Jerusalem, and upon all the cities of Judah; and, behold, this day they are a desolation, and no man dwelleth therein, 
Because of their wickedness which they have committed to provoke me to anger, in that they went to burn incense, and to serve other gods, whom they knew not, neither they, ye, nor your fathers. 
Howbeit I sent unto you all my servants the prophets, rising early and sending them, saying, Oh, do not this abominable thing that I hate. 
But they hearkened not, nor inclined their ear to turn from their wickedness, to burn no incense unto other gods. 
Wherefore my fury and mine anger was poured forth, and was kindled in the cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem; and they are wasted and desolate, as at this day. 
Therefore now thus saith the LORD, the God of hosts, the God of Israel; Wherefore commit ye this great evil against
750,shall see me: and, Because I go to the Father? 
They said therefore, What is this that he saith, A little while? we cannot tell what he saith. 
Now Jesus knew that they were desirous to ask him, and said unto them, Do ye enquire among yourselves of that I said, A little while, and ye shall not see me: and again, a little while, and ye shall see me? 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, That ye shall weep and lament, but the world shall rejoice: and ye shall be sorrowful, but your sorrow shall be turned into joy. 
A woman when she is in travail hath sorrow, because her hour is come: but as soon as she is delivered of the child, she remembereth no more the anguish, for joy that a man is born into the world. 
And ye now therefore have sorrow: but I
946,lestick, with the lamps thereof, even with the lamps to be set in order, and all the vessels thereof, and the oil for light, 
And the golden altar, and the anointing oil, and the sweet incense, and the hanging for the tabernacle door, 
The brasen altar, and his grate of brass, his staves, and all his vessels, the laver and his foot, 
The hangings of the court, his pillars, and his sockets, and the hanging for the court gate, his cords, and his pins, and all the vessels of the service of the tabernacle, for the tent of the congregation, 
The cloths of service to do service in the holy place, and the holy garments for Aaron the priest, and his sons' garments, to minister in the priest's office. 
According to all that the LORD commanded Moses, so the children of Israel made all the work. 
And Moses did look upon all the work, and, behold, they had done it as the LORD had commanded, even so had they done it: and Moses blessed them. 
And
1025,ed: so shall I be saved from mine enemies. 
The sorrows of death compassed me, and the floods of ungodly men made me afraid. 
The sorrows of hell compassed me about: the snares of death prevented me. 
In my distress I called upon the LORD, and cried unto my God: he heard my voice out of his temple, and my cry came before him, even into his ears. 
Then the earth shook and trembled; the foundations also of the hills moved and were shaken, because he was wroth. 
There went up a smoke out of his nostrils, and fire out of his mouth devoured: coals were kindled by it. 
He bowed the heavens also, and came down: and darkness was under his feet. 
And he rode upon a cherub, and did fly: yea, he did fly upon the wings of the wind. 
He made darkness his secret place; his pavilion round about him were dark waters and thick clouds of the skies. 
At the brightness that was before him his thick clouds passed, hail stones and coals of fire. 
The LORD also thundered in the heavens, and the Highest gave his voice; hail stones an
890, sleepeth. And they laughed him to scorn. 
But when the people were put forth, he went in, and took her by the hand, and the maid arose. 
And the fame hereof went abroad into all that land. 
And when Jesus departed thence, two blind men followed him, crying, and saying, Thou son of David, have mercy on us. 
And when he was come into the house, the blind men came to him: and Jesus saith unto them, Believe ye that I am able to do this? They said unto him, Yea, Lord. 
Then touched he their eyes, saying, According to your faith be it unto you. 
And their eyes were opened; and Jesus straitly charged them, saying, See that no man know it. 
But they, when they were departed, spread abroad his fame in all that country. 
As they went out, behold, they brought to him a dumb man possessed with a devil. 
And when the devil was cast out, the dumb spake: and the multitudes marvelled, saying,
966,eem that which his brother sold. 
And if the man have none to redeem it, and himself be able to redeem it; 
Then let him count the years of the sale thereof, and restore the overplus unto the man to whom he sold it; that he may return unto his possession. 
But if he be not able to restore it to him, then that which is sold shall remain in the hand of him that hath bought it until the year of jubile: and in the jubile it shall go out, and he shall return unto his possession. 
And if a man sell a dwelling house in a walled city, then he may redeem it within a whole year after it is sold; within a full year may he redeem it. 
And if it be not redeemed within the space of a full year, then the house that is in the walled city shall be established for ever to him that bought it throughout his generations: it shall not go out in the jubile. 
But the houses of the villages which have no wall round about them shall be counted as the fields of the country: they
723,im, he kept him as the apple of his eye. 
As an eagle stirreth up her nest, fluttereth over her young, spreadeth abroad her wings, taketh them, beareth them on her wings: 
So the LORD alone did lead him, and there was no strange god with him. 
He made him ride on the high places of the earth, that he might eat the increase of the fields; and he made him to suck honey out of the rock, and oil out of the flinty rock; 
Butter of kine, and milk of sheep, with fat of lambs, and rams of the breed of Bashan, and goats, with the fat of kidneys of wheat; and thou didst drink the pure blood of the grape. 
But Jeshurun waxed fat, and kicked: thou art waxen fat, thou art grown thick, thou art covered with fatness; then he for
833, not hear, nor receive instruction. 
And it shall come to pass, if ye diligently hearken unto me, saith the LORD, to bring in no burden through the gates of this city on the sabbath day, but hallow the sabbath day, to do no work therein; 
Then shall there enter into the gates of this city kings and princes sitting upon the throne of David, riding in chariots and on horses, they, and their princes, the men of Judah, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem: and this city shall remain for ever. 
And they shall come from the cities of Judah, and from the places about Jerusalem, and from the land of Benjamin, and from the plain, and from the mountains, and from the south, bringing burnt offerings, and sacrifices, and meat offerings, and incense, and bringing sacrifices of praise, unto the house of the LORD. 
But if ye will not hearke
746,he children of Israel said, Let us flee, and draw them from the city unto the highways. 
And all the men of Israel rose up out of their place, and put themselves in array at Baaltamar: and the liers in wait of Israel came forth out of their places, even out of the meadows of Gibeah. 
And there came against Gibeah ten thousand chosen men out of all Israel, and the battle was sore: but they knew not that evil was near them. 
And the LORD smote Benjamin before Israel: and the children of Israel destroyed of the Benjamites that day twenty and five thousand and an hundred men: all these drew the sword. 
So the children of Benjamin saw that they were smitten: for the men of Israel gave place to the Benjamites, because they trusted unto the li
882,David, who kept my commandments, and who followed me with all his heart, to do that only which was right in mine eyes; 
But hast done evil above all that were before thee: for thou hast gone and made thee other gods, and molten images, to provoke me to anger, and hast cast me behind thy back: 
Therefore, behold, I will bring evil upon the house of Jeroboam, and will cut off from Jeroboam him that pisseth against the wall, and him that is shut up and left in Israel, and will take away the remnant of the house of Jeroboam, as a man taketh away dung, till it be all gone. 
Him that dieth of Jeroboam in the city shall the dogs eat; and him that dieth in the field shall the fowls of the air eat: for the LORD hath spoken it. 
Arise thou therefore, get thee to thine own house: and when thy feet enter into the city, the child shall die. 
And all Israel shall mourn for him, and b
918,ll I pluck them up by the roots out of my land which I have given them; and this house, which I have sanctified for my name, will I cast out of my sight, and will make it to be a proverb and a byword among all nations. 
And this house, which is high, shall be an astonishment to every one that passeth by it; so that he shall say, Why hath the LORD done thus unto this land, and unto this house? 
And it shall be answered, Because they forsook the LORD God of their fathers, which brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, and laid hold on other gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath he brought all this evil upon them. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, wherein Solomon had built the house of the LORD, and his own house, 
That the cities which Huram had restored to Solomon, Solomon built them, and caused the children of Israel to dwell there. 
And Solomon went to Hamathzobah,
835, which passeth knowledge, that ye might be filled with all the fulness of God. 
Now unto him that is able to do exceeding abundantly above all that we ask or think, according to the power that worketh in us, 
Unto him be glory in the church by Christ Jesus throughout all ages, world without end. Amen. 
I therefore, the prisoner of the Lord, beseech you that ye walk worthy of the vocation wherewith ye are called, 
With all lowliness and meekness, with longsuffering, forbearing one another in love; 
Endeavouring to keep the unity of the Spirit in the bond of peace. 
There is one body, and one Spirit, even as ye are called in one hope of your calling; 
One Lord, one faith, one baptism, 
One God and Father of all, who is above all, and through all, and in you all. 
But unto every one of us is given grace according to the measur
937,tretch forth thine hand against the wrath of mine enemies, and thy right hand shall save me. 
The LORD will perfect that which concerneth me: thy mercy, O LORD, endureth for ever: forsake not the works of thine own hands. 
O lord, thou hast searched me, and known me. 
Thou knowest my downsitting and mine uprising, thou understandest my thought afar off. 
Thou compassest my path and my lying down, and art acquainted with all my ways. 
For there is not a word in my tongue, but, lo, O LORD, thou knowest it altogether. 
Thou hast beset me behind and before, and laid thine hand upon me. 
Such knowledge is too wonderful for me; it is high, I cannot attain unto it. 
Whither shall I go from thy spirit? or whither shall I flee from thy presence? 
If I ascend up into heaven, thou art there: if I make my bed in hell, behold, thou art there. 
If I take the wings of the morning, and dwell in the uttermost parts of the sea; 
Even there s
849,unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, When a man or woman shall commit any sin that men commit, to do a trespass against the LORD, and that person be guilty; 
Then they shall confess their sin which they have done: and he shall recompense his trespass with the principal thereof, and add unto it the fifth part thereof, and give it unto him against whom he hath trespassed. 
But if the man have no kinsman to recompense the trespass unto, let the trespass be recompensed unto the LORD, even to the priest; beside the ram of the atonement, whereby an atonement shall be made for him. 
And every offering of all the holy things of the children of Israel, which they bring unto the priest, shall be his. 
And every man's hallowed things shall be his: whatsoever any man giveth the priest, it shall be his. 
And the LORD spake unto Mos
1065,, The gods are come down to us in the likeness of men. 
And they called Barnabas, Jupiter; and Paul, Mercurius, because he was the chief speaker. 
Then the priest of Jupiter, which was before their city, brought oxen and garlands unto the gates, and would have done sacrifice with the people. 
Which when the apostles, Barnabas and Paul, heard of, they rent their clothes, and ran in among the people, crying out, 
And saying, Sirs, why do ye these things? We also are men of like passions with you, and preach unto you that ye should turn from these vanities unto the living God, which made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and all things that are therein: 
Who in times past suffered all nations to walk in their own ways. 
Nevertheless he left not himself without witness, in that he did good, and gave us rain from heaven, and fruitful seasons, filling our hearts with food and gladness. 
And with these sayings scarce restrained they the people, that they had not done sacrifice unto them. 
And there came thither certain Jews from Antioch and Iconium, who pers
946,ed. 
The LORD hath made all things for himself: yea, even the wicked for the day of evil. 
Every one that is proud in heart is an abomination to the LORD: though hand join in hand, he shall not be unpunished. 
By mercy and truth iniquity is purged: and by the fear of the LORD men depart from evil. 
When a man's ways please the LORD, he maketh even his enemies to be at peace with him. 
Better is a little with righteousness than great revenues without right. 
A man's heart deviseth his way: but the LORD directeth his steps. 
A divine sentence is in the lips of the king: his mouth transgresseth not in judgment. 
A just weight and balance are the LORD's: all the weights of the bag are his work. 
It is an abomination to kings to commit wickedness: for the throne is established by righteousness. 
Righteous lips are the delight of kings; and they love him that speaketh right. 
The wrath of a king is as messengers of death: but a wise man w
912,ar soft clothing are in kings' houses. 
But what went ye out for to see? A prophet? yea, I say unto you, and more than a prophet. 
For this is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
Verily I say unto you, Among them that are born of women there hath not risen a greater than John the Baptist: notwithstanding he that is least in the kingdom of heaven is greater than he. 
And from the days of John the Baptist until now the kingdom of heaven suffereth violence, and the violent take it by force. 
For all the prophets and the law prophesied until John. 
And if ye will receive it, this is Elias, which was for to come. 
He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
But whereunto shall I liken this generation? It is like unto children sitting in the markets, and calling unto their fellows, 
And saying, We have piped unto you, and ye have 
993,n upon the earth. 
And after these things I heard a great voice of much people in heaven, saying, Alleluia; Salvation, and glory, and honour, and power, unto the Lord our God: 
For true and righteous are his judgments: for he hath judged the great whore, which did corrupt the earth with her fornication, and hath avenged the blood of his servants at her hand. 
And again they said, Alleluia And her smoke rose up for ever and ever. 
And the four and twenty elders and the four beasts fell down and worshipped God that sat on the throne, saying, Amen; Alleluia. 
And a voice came out of the throne, saying, Praise our God, all ye his servants, and ye that fear him, both small and great. 
And I heard as it were the voice of a great multitude, and as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of mighty thunderings, saying, Alleluia: for the Lord God omnipotent reigneth. 
Let us be glad and rejoice, and give honour to him: for the marriage of the Lamb is come, and his wife hath made hersel
1039,ighbour drink, that puttest thy bottle to him, and makest him drunken also, that thou mayest look on their nakedness! 
Thou art filled with shame for glory: drink thou also, and let thy foreskin be uncovered: the cup of the LORD's right hand shall be turned unto thee, and shameful spewing shall be on thy glory. 
For the violence of Lebanon shall cover thee, and the spoil of beasts, which made them afraid, because of men's blood, and for the violence of the land, of the city, and of all that dwell therein. 
What profiteth the graven image that the maker thereof hath graven it; the molten image, and a teacher of lies, that the maker of his work trusteth therein, to make dumb idols? 
Woe unto him that saith to the wood, Awake; to the dumb stone, Arise, it shall teach! Behold, it is laid over with gold and silver, and there is no breath at all in the midst of it. 
But the LORD is in his holy temple: let all the earth keep silence before him. 
A prayer of Habakkuk the prophet upon Shigionoth. 
O LORD, I have heard thy speech, an
932,as wheat: 
But I have prayed for thee, that thy faith fail not: and when thou art converted, strengthen thy brethren. 
And he said unto him, Lord, I am ready to go with thee, both into prison, and to death. 
And he said, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this day, before that thou shalt thrice deny that thou knowest me. 
And he said unto them, When I sent you without purse, and scrip, and shoes, lacked ye any thing? And they said, Nothing. 
Then said he unto them, But now, he that hath a purse, let him take it, and likewise his scrip: and he that hath no sword, let him sell his garment, and buy one. 
For I say unto you, that this that is written must yet be accomplished in me, And he was reckoned among the transgressors: for the things concerning me have an end. 
And they said, Lord, behold, here are two swords. And he said unto them, It is enough. 
And he came out, and went, as he was wont, to the mount of O
960,great: for the palace is not for man, but for the LORD God. 
Now I have prepared with all my might for the house of my God the gold for things to be made of gold, and the silver for things of silver, and the brass for things of brass, the iron for things of iron, and wood for things of wood; onyx stones, and stones to be set, glistering stones, and of divers colours, and all manner of precious stones, and marble stones in abundance. 
Moreover, because I have set my affection to the house of my God, I have of mine own proper good, of gold and silver, which I have given to the house of my God, over and above all that I have prepared for the holy house. 
Even three thousand talents of gold, of the gold of Ophir, and seven thousand talents of refined silver, to overlay the walls of the houses withal: 
The gold for things of gold, and the silver for things of silver, and for all manner of work to be made by the hands of artificers. And who then is wil
1067, all things are ready: come unto the marriage. 
But they made light of it, and went their ways, one to his farm, another to his merchandise: 
And the remnant took his servants, and entreated them spitefully, and slew them. 
But when the king heard thereof, he was wroth: and he sent forth his armies, and destroyed those murderers, and burned up their city. 
Then saith he to his servants, The wedding is ready, but they which were bidden were not worthy. 
Go ye therefore into the highways, and as many as ye shall find, bid to the marriage. 
So those servants went out into the highways, and gathered together all as many as they found, both bad and good: and the wedding was furnished with guests. 
And when the king came in to see the guests, he saw there a man which had not on a wedding garment: 
And he saith unto him, Friend, how camest thou in hither not having a wedding garment? And he was speechless. 
Then said the king to the servants, Bind him hand and foot, and take him away, and cast him into outer darkness, there shall be weeping and gnashing of t
867,alter and to destroy this house of God which is at Jerusalem. I Darius have made a decree; let it be done with speed. 
Then Tatnai, governor on this side the river, Shetharboznai, and their companions, according to that which Darius the king had sent, so they did speedily. 
And the elders of the Jews builded, and they prospered through the prophesying of Haggai the prophet and Zechariah the son of Iddo. And they builded, and finished it, according to the commandment of the God of Israel, and according to the commandment of Cyrus, and Darius, and Artaxerxes king of Persia. 
And this house was finished on the third day of the month Adar, which was in the sixth year of the reign of Darius the king. 
And the children of Israel, the priests, and the Levites, and the rest of the children of the captivity, kept the dedication of this house of God with joy. 
And 
730,hereof they were possessed, according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And when they came unto the borders of Jordan, that are in the land of Canaan, the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh built there an altar by Jordan, a great altar to see to. 
And the children of Israel heard say, Behold, the children of Reuben and the children of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh have built an altar over against the land of Canaan, in the borders of Jordan, at the passage of the children of Israel. 
And when the children of Israel heard of it, the whole congregation of the children of Israel gathered themselves together at Shiloh, to go up to war against them. 
And the children of
986,great deal they published it; 
And were beyond measure astonished, saying, He hath done all things well: he maketh both the deaf to hear, and the dumb to speak. 
In those days the multitude being very great, and having nothing to eat, Jesus called his disciples unto him, and saith unto them, 
I have compassion on the multitude, because they have now been with me three days, and have nothing to eat: 
And if I send them away fasting to their own houses, they will faint by the way: for divers of them came from far. 
And his disciples answered him, From whence can a man satisfy these men with bread here in the wilderness? 
And he asked them, How many loaves have ye? And they said, Seven. 
And he commanded the people to sit down on the ground: and he took the seven loaves, and gave thanks, and brake, and gave to his disciples to set before them; and they did set them before the people. 
And they had a few small fishes: and he blessed, and commanded to set them also before them
777,, behold, men brought in a bed a man which was taken with a palsy: and they sought means to bring him in, and to lay him before him. 
And when they could not find by what way they might bring him in because of the multitude, they went upon the housetop, and let him down through the tiling with his couch into the midst before Jesus. 
And when he saw their faith, he said unto him, Man, thy sins are forgiven thee. 
And the scribes and the Pharisees began to reason, saying, Who is this which speaketh blasphemies? Who can forgive sins, but God alone? 
But when Jesus perceived their thoughts, he answering said unto them, What reason ye in your hearts? 
Whether is easier, to say, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or to say, Rise up and walk? 
But that ye may know that the Son of m
935,lver and gold. 
And it shall be, when he sitteth upon the throne of his kingdom, that he shall write him a copy of this law in a book out of that which is before the priests the Levites: 
And it shall be with him, and he shall read therein all the days of his life: that he may learn to fear the LORD his God, to keep all the words of this law and these statutes, to do them: 
That his heart be not lifted up above his brethren, and that he turn not aside from the commandment, to the right hand, or to the left: to the end that he may prolong his days in his kingdom, he, and his children, in the midst of Israel. 
The priests the Levites, and all the tribe of Levi, shall have no part nor inheritance with Israel: they shall eat the offerings of the LORD made by fire, and his inheritance. 
Therefore shall they have no inheritance among their brethren: the LORD is their inheritance, as he hath said unto them. 
And this shall be th
844,ut he shall die in the place whither they have led him captive, and shall see this land no more. 
Woe unto him that buildeth his house by unrighteousness, and his chambers by wrong; that useth his neighbour's service without wages, and giveth him not for his work; 
That saith, I will build me a wide house and large chambers, and cutteth him out windows; and it is cieled with cedar, and painted with vermilion. 
Shalt thou reign, because thou closest thyself in cedar? did not thy father eat and drink, and do judgment and justice, and then it was well with him? 
He judged the cause of the poor and needy; then it was well with him: was not this to know me? saith the LORD. 
But thine eyes and thine heart are not but for thy covetousness, and for to shed innocent blood, and for oppression, and for violence, to do it. 
Therefore thus saith
941,of the house of God, and over the treasures of the dedicated things. 
As concerning the sons of Laadan; the sons of the Gershonite Laadan, chief fathers, even of Laadan the Gershonite, were Jehieli. 
The sons of Jehieli; Zetham, and Joel his brother, which were over the treasures of the house of the LORD. 
Of the Amramites, and the Izharites, the Hebronites, and the Uzzielites: 
And Shebuel the son of Gershom, the son of Moses, was ruler of the treasures. 
And his brethren by Eliezer; Rehabiah his son, and Jeshaiah his son, and Joram his son, and Zichri his son, and Shelomith his son. 
Which Shelomith and his brethren were over all the treasures of the dedicated things, which David the king, and the chief fathers, the captains over thousands and hundreds, and the captains of the host, had dedicated. 
Out of the spoils won in battles did they dedicate to maintain the house of the LORD. 
And all that Samuel the seer, and Saul the
979,ore hereafter. 
And the sixth angel sounded, and I heard a voice from the four horns of the golden altar which is before God, 
Saying to the sixth angel which had the trumpet, Loose the four angels which are bound in the great river Euphrates. 
And the four angels were loosed, which were prepared for an hour, and a day, and a month, and a year, for to slay the third part of men. 
And the number of the army of the horsemen were two hundred thousand thousand: and I heard the number of them. 
And thus I saw the horses in the vision, and them that sat on them, having breastplates of fire, and of jacinth, and brimstone: and the heads of the horses were as the heads of lions; and out of their mouths issued fire and smoke and brimstone. 
By these three was the third part of men killed, by the fire, and by the smoke, and by the brimstone, which issued out of their mouths. 
For their power is in their mouth, and in their tails: for their tails were like unto serpents, and h
1027,his fodder? 
Can that which is unsavoury be eaten without salt? or is there any taste in the white of an egg? 
The things that my soul refused to touch are as my sorrowful meat. 
Oh that I might have my request; and that God would grant me the thing that I long for! 
Even that it would please God to destroy me; that he would let loose his hand, and cut me off! 
Then should I yet have comfort; yea, I would harden myself in sorrow: let him not spare; for I have not concealed the words of the Holy One. 
What is my strength, that I should hope? and what is mine end, that I should prolong my life? 
Is my strength the strength of stones? or is my flesh of brass? 
Is not my help in me? and is wisdom driven quite from me? 
To him that is afflicted pity should be shewed from his friend; but he forsaketh the fear of the Almighty. 
My brethren have dealt deceitfully as a brook, and as the stream of brooks they pass away; 
Which are blackish by reason of the ice, and wherein the snow is hid: 
What time they wax warm, they v
720, and Obadiah went another way by himself. 
And as Obadiah was in the way, behold, Elijah met him: and he knew him, and fell on his face, and said, Art thou that my lord Elijah? 
And he answered him, I am: go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here. 
And he said, What have I sinned, that thou wouldest deliver thy servant into the hand of Ahab, to slay me? 
As the LORD thy God liveth, there is no nation or kingdom, whither my lord hath not sent to seek thee: and when they said, He is not there; he took an oath of the kingdom and nation, that they found thee not. 
And now thou sayest, Go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here. 
And it shall come to pass, as soon as I am gone from thee, that the Spirit of the LORD s
921,in mine heart. 
Nevertheless my brethren that went up with me made the heart of the people melt: but I wholly followed the LORD my God. 
And Moses sware on that day, saying, Surely the land whereon thy feet have trodden shall be thine inheritance, and thy children's for ever, because thou hast wholly followed the LORD my God. 
And now, behold, the LORD hath kept me alive, as he said, these forty and five years, even since the LORD spake this word unto Moses, while the children of Israel wandered in the wilderness: and now, lo, I am this day fourscore and five years old. 
As yet I am as strong this day as I was in the day that Moses sent me: as my strength was then, even so is my strength now, for war, both to go out, and to come in. 
Now therefore give me this mountain, whereof the LORD spake in that day; for thou heardest in that day how the Anakims were there, and that the cities were great and fenced: if 
915,it thine iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will discover thy sins. 
Remember, O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold our reproach. 
Our inheritance is turned to strangers, our houses to aliens. 
We are orphans and fatherless, our mothers are as widows. 
We have drunken our water for money; our wood is sold unto us. 
Our necks are under persecution: we labour, and have no rest. 
We have given the hand to the Egyptians, and to the Assyrians, to be satisfied with bread. 
Our fathers have sinned, and are not; and we have borne their iniquities. 
Servants have ruled over us: there is none that doth deliver us out of their hand. 
We gat our bread with the peril of our lives because of the sword of the wilderness. 
Our skin was black like an oven because of the terrible famine. 
They ravished the women in Zion, and the maids in the cities of Judah. 
Princes are hanged up by their hand: the faces of
729,il. 
I will send my fear before thee, and will destroy all the people to whom thou shalt come, and I will make all thine enemies turn their backs unto thee. 
And I will send hornets before thee, which shall drive out the Hivite, the Canaanite, and the Hittite, from before thee. 
I will not drive them out from before thee in one year; lest the land become desolate, and the beast of the field multiply against thee. 
By little and little I will drive them out from before thee, until thou be increased, and inherit the land. 
And I will set thy bounds from the Red sea even unto the sea of the Philistines, and from the desert unto the river: for I will deliver the inhabitants of the land into your hand; and thou shalt drive t
948,and learn what that meaneth, I will have mercy, and not sacrifice: for I am not come to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance. 
Then came to him the disciples of John, saying, Why do we and the Pharisees fast oft, but thy disciples fast not? 
And Jesus said unto them, Can the children of the bridechamber mourn, as long as the bridegroom is with them? but the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken from them, and then shall they fast. 
No man putteth a piece of new cloth unto an old garment, for that which is put in to fill it up taketh from the garment, and the rent is made worse. 
Neither do men put new wine into old bottles: else the bottles break, and the wine runneth out, and the bottles perish: but they put new wine into new bottles, and both are preserved. 
While he spake these things unto them, behold, there came a certain ruler, and worshipped him, saying, My daughter is even now dead: but come and lay thy h
1044,begat Esrom; and Esrom begat Aram; 
And Aram begat Aminadab; and Aminadab begat Naasson; and Naasson begat Salmon; 
And Salmon begat Booz of Rachab; and Booz begat Obed of Ruth; and Obed begat Jesse; 
And Jesse begat David the king; and David the king begat Solomon of her that had been the wife of Urias; 
And Solomon begat Roboam; and Roboam begat Abia; and Abia begat Asa; 
And Asa begat Josaphat; and Josaphat begat Joram; and Joram begat Ozias; 
And Ozias begat Joatham; and Joatham begat Achaz; and Achaz begat Ezekias; 
And Ezekias begat Manasses; and Manasses begat Amon; and Amon begat Josias; 
And Josias begat Jechonias and his brethren, about the time they were carried away to Babylon: 
And after they were brought to Babylon, Jechonias begat Salathiel; and Salathiel begat Zorobabel; 
And Zorobabel begat Abiud; and Abiud begat Eliakim; and Eliakim begat Azor; 
And Azor begat Sadoc; and Sadoc begat Achim; and Achim begat Eliud; 
And Eliud begat Eleazar; and Eleazar begat Matthan; and Matthan begat Jacob; 
And Jacob begat Josep
792, sword, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, evil shall go forth from nation to nation, and a great whirlwind shall be raised up from the coasts of the earth. 
And the slain of the LORD shall be at that day from one end of the earth even unto the other end of the earth: they shall not be lamented, neither gathered, nor buried; they shall be dung upon the ground. 
Howl, ye shepherds, and cry; and wallow yourselves in the ashes, ye principal of the flock: for the days of your slaughter and of your dispersions are accomplished; and ye shall fall like a pleasant vessel. 
And the shepherds shall have no way to flee, nor the principal of the flock to escape. 
A voice of the cry of the shepherds, and an howling of the principal of the flock, shall be heard: for the LORD 
915, come down to the valley: 
But the Amorites would dwell in mount Heres in Aijalon, and in Shaalbim: yet the hand of the house of Joseph prevailed, so that they became tributaries. 
And the coast of the Amorites was from the going up to Akrabbim, from the rock, and upward. 
And an angel of the LORD came up from Gilgal to Bochim, and said, I made you to go up out of Egypt, and have brought you unto the land which I sware unto your fathers; and I said, I will never break my covenant with you. 
And ye shall make no league with the inhabitants of this land; ye shall throw down their altars: but ye have not obeyed my voice: why have ye done this? 
Wherefore I also said, I will not drive them out from before you; but they shall be as thorns in your sides, and their gods shall be a snare unto you. 
And it came to pass, when the angel of the LORD spake these words unto all the children of Israel, that the peopl
885,re thereof is longer than the earth, and broader than the sea. 
If he cut off, and shut up, or gather together, then who can hinder him? 
For he knoweth vain men: he seeth wickedness also; will he not then consider it? 
For vain men would be wise, though man be born like a wild ass's colt. 
If thou prepare thine heart, and stretch out thine hands toward him; 
If iniquity be in thine hand, put it far away, and let not wickedness dwell in thy tabernacles. 
For then shalt thou lift up thy face without spot; yea, thou shalt be stedfast, and shalt not fear: 
Because thou shalt forget thy misery, and remember it as waters that pass away: 
And thine age shall be clearer than the noonday: thou shalt shine forth, thou shalt be as the morning. 
And thou shalt be secure, because there is hope; yea, thou shalt dig about thee, and thou shalt take thy rest in safety. 
Also thou shalt li
856,be bereaved of my children, I am bereaved. 
And the men took that present, and they took double money in their hand and Benjamin; and rose up, and went down to Egypt, and stood before Joseph. 
And when Joseph saw Benjamin with them, he said to the ruler of his house, Bring these men home, and slay, and make ready; for these men shall dine with me at noon. 
And the man did as Joseph bade; and the man brought the men into Joseph's house. 
And the men were afraid, because they were brought into Joseph's house; and they said, Because of the money that was returned in our sacks at the first time are we brought in; that he may seek occasion against us, and fall upon us, and take us for bondmen, and our asses. 
And they came near to the steward of Joseph's house, and they communed with him at the door of the house, 
And said, O sir, we came indeed dow
804,tion? 
Shall thy wonders be known in the dark? and thy righteousness in the land of forgetfulness? 
But unto thee have I cried, O LORD; and in the morning shall my prayer prevent thee. 
LORD, why castest thou off my soul? why hidest thou thy face from me? 
I am afflicted and ready to die from my youth up: while I suffer thy terrors I am distracted. 
Thy fierce wrath goeth over me; thy terrors have cut me off. 
They came round about me daily like water; they compassed me about together. 
Lover and friend hast thou put far from me, and mine acquaintance into darkness. 
I will sing of the mercies of the LORD for ever: with my mouth will I make known thy faithfulness to all generations. 
For I have said, Mercy shall be built up for ever: thy faithfulness shalt thou establish in the very heavens. 

1055,up the ark of the LORD unto his place, which he had prepared for it. 
And David assembled the children of Aaron, and the Levites: 
Of the sons of Kohath; Uriel the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Merari; Asaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Gershom; Joel the chief and his brethren an hundred and thirty: 
Of the sons of Elizaphan; Shemaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred: 
Of the sons of Hebron; Eliel the chief, and his brethren fourscore: 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Amminadab the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twelve. 
And David called for Zadok and Abiathar the priests, and for the Levites, for Uriel, Asaiah, and Joel, Shemaiah, and Eliel, and Amminadab, 
And said unto them, Ye are the chief of the fathers of the Levites: sanctify yourselves, both ye and your brethren, that ye may bring up the ark of the LORD God of Israel unto the place that I have prepared for it. 
For because ye did it not at the first, the LORD our God made a breach upon us, for that we s
963,il in the sight of the LORD, and served Baalim: 
And they forsook the LORD God of their fathers, which brought them out of the land of Egypt, and followed other gods, of the gods of the people that were round about them, and bowed themselves unto them, and provoked the LORD to anger. 
And they forsook the LORD, and served Baal and Ashtaroth. 
And the anger of the LORD was hot against Israel, and he delivered them into the hands of spoilers that spoiled them, and he sold them into the hands of their enemies round about, so that they could not any longer stand before their enemies. 
Whithersoever they went out, the hand of the LORD was against them for evil, as the LORD had said, and as the LORD had sworn unto them: and they were greatly distressed. 
Nevertheless the LORD raised up judges, which delivered them out of the hand of those that spoiled them. 
And yet they would not hearken unto their judges, but they went a whoring after other gods, and bo
1061,eek my hurt speak mischievous things, and imagine deceits all the day long. 
But I, as a deaf man, heard not; and I was as a dumb man that openeth not his mouth. 
Thus I was as a man that heareth not, and in whose mouth are no reproofs. 
For in thee, O LORD, do I hope: thou wilt hear, O Lord my God. 
For I said, Hear me, lest otherwise they should rejoice over me: when my foot slippeth, they magnify themselves against me. 
For I am ready to halt, and my sorrow is continually before me. 
For I will declare mine iniquity; I will be sorry for my sin. 
But mine enemies are lively, and they are strong: and they that hate me wrongfully are multiplied. 
They also that render evil for good are mine adversaries; because I follow the thing that good is. 
Forsake me not, O LORD: O my God, be not far from me. 
Make haste to help me, O Lord my salvation. 
I said, I will take heed to my ways, that I sin not with my tongue: I will keep my mouth with a bridle, while the wicked is before me. 
I was dumb with silence, I held my peace, even from good; and my sorro
941,ake hold of one man, saying, We will eat our own bread, and wear our own apparel: only let us be called by thy name, to take away our reproach. 
In that day shall the branch of the LORD be beautiful and glorious, and the fruit of the earth shall be excellent and comely for them that are escaped of Israel. 
And it shall come to pass, that he that is left in Zion, and he that remaineth in Jerusalem, shall be called holy, even every one that is written among the living in Jerusalem: 
When the Lord shall have washed away the filth of the daughters of Zion, and shall have purged the blood of Jerusalem from the midst thereof by the spirit of judgment, and by the spirit of burning. 
And the LORD will create upon every dwelling place of mount Zion, and upon her assemblies, a cloud and smoke by day, and the shining of a flaming fire by night: for upon all the glory shall be a defence. 
And there shall be a tabernacle for a shadow in the
867,, the Rock of Israel spake to me, He that ruleth over men must be just, ruling in the fear of God. 
And he shall be as the light of the morning, when the sun riseth, even a morning without clouds; as the tender grass springing out of the earth by clear shining after rain. 
Although my house be not so with God; yet he hath made with me an everlasting covenant, ordered in all things, and sure: for this is all my salvation, and all my desire, although he make it not to grow. 
But the sons of Belial shall be all of them as thorns thrust away, because they cannot be taken with hands: 
But the man that shall touch them must be fenced with iron and the staff of a spear; and they shall be utterly burned with fire in the same place. 
These be the names of the mighty men whom David had: The Tachmonite that sat in the seat, chief among the captains; the same was Adi
784,m, and to trouble them; that they might take the city. 
And they spake against the God of Jerusalem, as against the gods of the people of the earth, which were the work of the hands of man. 
And for this cause Hezekiah the king, and the prophet Isaiah the son of Amoz, prayed and cried to heaven. 
And the LORD sent an angel, which cut off all the mighty men of valour, and the leaders and captains in the camp of the king of Assyria. So he returned with shame of face to his own land. And when he was come into the house of his god, they that came forth of his own bowels slew him there with the sword. 
Thus the LORD saved Hezekiah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem from the hand of Sennacherib the king of Assyria, and from the hand of all other, and guided them on every side. 
And
734, 
But her end is bitter as wormwood, sharp as a two-edged sword. 
Her feet go down to death; her steps take hold on hell. 
Lest thou shouldest ponder the path of life, her ways are moveable, that thou canst not know them. 
Hear me now therefore, O ye children, and depart not from the words of my mouth. 
Remove thy way far from her, and come not nigh the door of her house: 
Lest thou give thine honour unto others, and thy years unto the cruel: 
Lest strangers be filled with thy wealth; and thy labours be in the house of a stranger; 
And thou mourn at the last, when thy flesh and thy body are consumed, 
And say, How have I hated instruction, and my heart despised reproof; 
And have not obeyed the voice of my teachers, nor incl
807,for she crieth after us. 
But he answered and said, I am not sent but unto the lost sheep of the house of Israel. 
Then came she and worshipped him, saying, Lord, help me. 
But he answered and said, It is not meet to take the children's bread, and to cast it to dogs. 
And she said, Truth, Lord: yet the dogs eat of the crumbs which fall from their masters' table. 
Then Jesus answered and said unto her, O woman, great is thy faith: be it unto thee even as thou wilt. And her daughter was made whole from that very hour. 
And Jesus departed from thence, and came nigh unto the sea of Galilee; and went up into a mountain, and sat down there. 
And great multitudes came unto him, having with them those that were lame, blind, dumb, maimed, and many others, and cast them down at Jesus' feet; and he healed t
846,t the shepherd, whose own the sheep are not, seeth the wolf coming, and leaveth the sheep, and fleeth: and the wolf catcheth them, and scattereth the sheep. 
The hireling fleeth, because he is an hireling, and careth not for the sheep. 
I am the good shepherd, and know my sheep, and am known of mine. 
As the Father knoweth me, even so know I the Father: and I lay down my life for the sheep. 
And other sheep I have, which are not of this fold: them also I must bring, and they shall hear my voice; and there shall be one fold, and one shepherd. 
Therefore doth my Father love me, because I lay down my life, that I might take it again. 
No man taketh it from me, but I lay it down of myself. I have power to lay it down, and I have power to take it again. This commandment have I received of my Father. 
There was a division therefore again am
873, the house of Israel say, The vision that he seeth is for many days to come, and he prophesieth of the times that are far off. 
Therefore say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; There shall none of my words be prolonged any more, but the word which I have spoken shall be done, saith the Lord GOD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy against the prophets of Israel that prophesy, and say thou unto them that prophesy out of their own hearts, Hear ye the word of the LORD; 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe unto the foolish prophets, that follow their own spirit, and have seen nothing! 
O Israel, thy prophets are like the foxes in the deserts. 
Ye have not gone up into the gaps, neither made up the hedge for the house of Israel to stand in the battle in the day of the LORD. 
They have seen vanity and lying divination, saying, The LORD sai
770, in the fifth year of king Rehoboam Shishak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem, because they had transgressed against the LORD, 
With twelve hundred chariots, and threescore thousand horsemen: and the people were without number that came with him out of Egypt; the Lubims, the Sukkiims, and the Ethiopians. 
And he took the fenced cities which pertained to Judah, and came to Jerusalem. 
Then came Shemaiah the prophet to Rehoboam, and to the princes of Judah, that were gathered together to Jerusalem because of Shishak, and said unto them, Thus saith the LORD, Ye have forsaken me, and therefore have I also left you in the hand of Shishak. 
Whereupon the princes of Israel and the king humbled themselves; and they said, The LORD is righteous. 
And when the LORD
861,o Shemaiah, saying, They have humbled themselves; therefore I will not destroy them, but I will grant them some deliverance; and my wrath shall not be poured out upon Jerusalem by the hand of Shishak. 
Nevertheless they shall be his servants; that they may know my service, and the service of the kingdoms of the countries. 
So Shishak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem, and took away the treasures of the house of the LORD, and the treasures of the king's house; he took all: he carried away also the shields of gold which Solomon had made. 
Instead of which king Rehoboam made shields of brass, and committed them to the hands of the chief of the guard, that kept the entrance of the king's house. 
And when the king entered into the house of the LORD, the guard came and fetched them, and brought them again into the guard chamber. 
And when he humbled
849,ghbour's door; 
Then let my wife grind unto another, and let others bow down upon her. 
For this is an heinous crime; yea, it is an iniquity to be punished by the judges. 
For it is a fire that consumeth to destruction, and would root out all mine increase. 
If I did despise the cause of my manservant or of my maidservant, when they contended with me; 
What then shall I do when God riseth up? and when he visiteth, what shall I answer him? 
Did not he that made me in the womb make him? and did not one fashion us in the womb? 
If I have withheld the poor from their desire, or have caused the eyes of the widow to fail; 
Or have eaten my morsel myself alone, and the fatherless hath not eaten thereof; 
(For from my youth he was brought up with me, as with a father, and I have guided her from my mother's womb;) 
If I have seen any perish for w
1005,he house fell upon the lords, and upon all the people that were therein. So the dead which he slew at his death were more than they which he slew in his life. 
Then his brethren and all the house of his father came down, and took him, and brought him up, and buried him between Zorah and Eshtaol in the buryingplace of Manoah his father. And he judged Israel twenty years. 
And there was a man of mount Ephraim, whose name was Micah. 
And he said unto his mother, The eleven hundred shekels of silver that were taken from thee, about which thou cursedst, and spakest of also in mine ears, behold, the silver is with me; I took it. And his mother said, Blessed be thou of the LORD, my son. 
And when he had restored the eleven hundred shekels of silver to his mother, his mother said, I had wholly dedicated the silver unto the LORD from my hand for my son, to make a graven image and a molten image: now therefore I will restore it unto thee. 
Yet he restored the money unto his mother; and his mother too
827,ld a gate toward the south: and he measured the posts thereof and the arches thereof according to these measures. 
And there were windows in it and in the arches thereof round about, like those windows: the length was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits. 
And there were seven steps to go up to it, and the arches thereof were before them: and it had palm trees, one on this side, and another on that side, upon the posts thereof. 
And there was a gate in the inner court toward the south: and he measured from gate to gate toward the south an hundred cubits. 
And he brought me to the inner court by the south gate: and he measured the south gate according to these measures; 
And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, according to these measures: and there were windows 
855,times, as the matter shall require: 
That all the people of the earth may know that the LORD is God, and that there is none else. 
Let your heart therefore be perfect with the LORD our God, to walk in his statutes, and to keep his commandments, as at this day. 
And the king, and all Israel with him, offered sacrifice before the LORD. 
And Solomon offered a sacrifice of peace offerings, which he offered unto the LORD, two and twenty thousand oxen, and an hundred and twenty thousand sheep. So the king and all the children of Israel dedicated the house of the LORD. 
The same day did the king hallow the middle of the court that was before the house of the LORD: for there he offered burnt offerings, and meat offerings, and the fat of the peace offerings: because the brasen altar that was before the LORD was too little to receive the burnt offerings
877, I fear? the LORD is the strength of my life; of whom shall I be afraid? 
When the wicked, even mine enemies and my foes, came upon me to eat up my flesh, they stumbled and fell. 
Though an host should encamp against me, my heart shall not fear: though war should rise against me, in this will I be confident. 
One thing have I desired of the LORD, that will I seek after; that I may dwell in the house of the LORD all the days of my life, to behold the beauty of the LORD, and to enquire in his temple. 
For in the time of trouble he shall hide me in his pavilion: in the secret of his tabernacle shall he hide me; he shall set me up upon a rock. 
And now shall mine head be lifted up above mine enemies round about me: therefore will I offer in his tabernacle sacrifices of joy; I will sing, yea, I will sing praises unto the LORD. 
Hear, O LORD, when I cry with my voice: ha
817,s son, Asa his son, Jehoshaphat his son, 
Joram his son, Ahaziah his son, Joash his son, 
Amaziah his son, Azariah his son, Jotham his son, 
Ahaz his son, Hezekiah his son, Manasseh his son, 
Amon his son, Josiah his son. 
And the sons of Josiah were, the firstborn Johanan, the second Jehoiakim, the third Zedekiah, the fourth Shallum. 
And the sons of Jehoiakim: Jeconiah his son, Zedekiah his son. 
And the sons of Jeconiah; Assir, Salathiel his son, 
Malchiram also, and Pedaiah, and Shenazar, Jecamiah, Hoshama, and Nedabiah. 
And the sons of Pedaiah were, Zerubbabel, and Shimei: and the sons of Zerubbabel; Meshullam, and Hananiah, and Shelomith their sister: 
And Hashubah, and Ohel, and Berechiah, and Hasadiah, Jushabhesed, five. 
And the sons of Hananiah; Pelatiah, and Jesaiah: the sons of Rephaiah, the s
760, LORD all his days. 
And he brought in the things which his father had dedicated, and the things which himself had dedicated, into the house of the LORD, silver, and gold, and vessels. 
And there was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all their days. 
And Baasha king of Israel went up against Judah, and built Ramah, that he might not suffer any to go out or come in to Asa king of Judah. 
Then Asa took all the silver and the gold that were left in the treasures of the house of the LORD, and the treasures of the king's house, and delivered them into the hand of his servants: and king Asa sent them to Benhadad, the son of Tabrimon, the son of Hezion, king of Syria, that dwelt at Damascus, saying, 
There is a league between me and thee, and betwee
784,ngs of the Gentiles exercise lordship over them; and they that exercise authority upon them are called benefactors. 
But ye shall not be so: but he that is greatest among you, let him be as the younger; and he that is chief, as he that doth serve. 
For whether is greater, he that sitteth at meat, or he that serveth? is not he that sitteth at meat? but I am among you as he that serveth. 
Ye are they which have continued with me in my temptations. 
And I appoint unto you a kingdom, as my Father hath appointed unto me; 
That ye may eat and drink at my table in my kingdom, and sit on thrones judging the twelve tribes of Israel. 
And the Lord said, Simon, Simon, behold, Satan hath desired to have you, that he may sift you as wheat: 
But I have prayed for thee, that thy faith fai
779,ses. 
And he took and put the testimony into the ark, and set the staves on the ark, and put the mercy seat above upon the ark: 
And he brought the ark into the tabernacle, and set up the vail of the covering, and covered the ark of the testimony; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he put the table in the tent of the congregation, upon the side of the tabernacle northward, without the vail. 
And he set the bread in order upon it before the LORD; as the LORD had commanded Moses. 
And he put the candlestick in the tent of the congregation, over against the table, on the side of the tabernacle southward. 
And he lighted the lamps before the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he put the golden altar in the tent of the congregation before the vail: 
And he burnt sweet i
834,elivered my soul in peace from the battle that was against me: for there were many with me. 
God shall hear, and afflict them, even he that abideth of old. Selah. Because they have no changes, therefore they fear not God. 
He hath put forth his hands against such as be at peace with him: he hath broken his covenant. 
The words of his mouth were smoother than butter, but war was in his heart: his words were softer than oil, yet were they drawn swords. 
Cast thy burden upon the LORD, and he shall sustain thee: he shall never suffer the righteous to be moved. 
But thou, O God, shalt bring them down into the pit of destruction: bloody and deceitful men shall not live out half their days; but I will trust in thee. 
Be merciful unto me, O God: for man would swallow me up; he fighting daily oppresseth me. 
Mine enemies would dail
989,
And if ye be Christ's, then are ye Abraham's seed, and heirs according to the promise. 
Now I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth nothing from a servant, though he be lord of all; 
But is under tutors and governors until the time appointed of the father. 
Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage under the elements of the world: 
But when the fulness of the time was come, God sent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, 
To redeem them that were under the law, that we might receive the adoption of sons. 
And because ye are sons, God hath sent forth the Spirit of his Son into your hearts, crying, Abba, Father. 
Wherefore thou art no more a servant, but a son; and if a son, then an heir of God through Christ. 
Howbeit then, when ye knew not God, ye did service unto them which by nature are no gods. 
But now, after that ye have known God, or rather are known of God, how turn ye again to the weak and beggarly elements, whereunto ye desir
1057,hat never bare, and the paps which never gave suck. 
Then shall they begin to say to the mountains, Fall on us; and to the hills, Cover us. 
For if they do these things in a green tree, what shall be done in the dry? 
And there were also two other, malefactors, led with him to be put to death. 
And when they were come to the place, which is called Calvary, there they crucified him, and the malefactors, one on the right hand, and the other on the left. 
Then said Jesus, Father, forgive them; for they know not what they do. And they parted his raiment, and cast lots. 
And the people stood beholding. And the rulers also with them derided him, saying, He saved others; let him save himself, if he be Christ, the chosen of God. 
And the soldiers also mocked him, coming to him, and offering him vinegar, 
And saying, If thou be the king of the Jews, save thyself. 
And a superscription also was written over him in letters of Greek, and Latin, and Hebrew, THIS IS THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
And one of the malefactors which were hanged railed on him, saying,
817,seed goeth from him; 
Or whosoever toucheth any creeping thing, whereby he may be made unclean, or a man of whom he may take uncleanness, whatsoever uncleanness he hath; 
The soul which hath touched any such shall be unclean until even, and shall not eat of the holy things, unless he wash his flesh with water. 
And when the sun is down, he shall be clean, and shall afterward eat of the holy things; because it is his food. 
That which dieth of itself, or is torn with beasts, he shall not eat to defile himself therewith; I am the LORD. 
They shall therefore keep mine ordinance, lest they bear sin for it, and die therefore, if they profane it: I the LORD do sanctify them. 
There shall no stranger eat of the holy thing: a sojourner of the priest, or an hired servant, shall not eat of the holy thing. 
But if th
784,
And the LORD said unto Cain, Why art thou wroth? and why is thy countenance fallen? 
If thou doest well, shalt thou not be accepted? and if thou doest not well, sin lieth at the door. And unto thee shall be his desire, and thou shalt rule over him. 
And Cain talked with Abel his brother: and it came to pass, when they were in the field, that Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him. 
And the LORD said unto Cain, Where is Abel thy brother? And he said, I know not: Am I my brother's keeper? 
And he said, What hast thou done? the voice of thy brother's blood crieth unto me from the ground. 
And now art thou cursed from the earth, which hath opened her mouth to receive thy brother's blood from thy hand; 
When thou tillest the ground, it shall not henceforth yield un
956,ger in the oil that is in his left hand, and shall sprinkle of the oil with his finger seven times before the LORD: 
And of the rest of the oil that is in his hand shall the priest put upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be cleansed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot, upon the blood of the trespass offering: 
And the remnant of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall pour upon the head of him that is to be cleansed: and the priest shall make an atonement for him before the LORD. 
And the priest shall offer the sin offering, and make an atonement for him that is to be cleansed from his uncleanness; and afterward he shall kill the burnt offering: 
And the priest shall offer the burnt offering and the meat offering upon the altar: and the priest shall make an atonement for him, and he shall be clean. 
And if he be poor, and cannot get so much; then he shall take one lamb for a trespa
1052, which Habakkuk the prophet did see. 
O LORD, how long shall I cry, and thou wilt not hear! even cry out unto thee of violence, and thou wilt not save! 
Why dost thou shew me iniquity, and cause me to behold grievance? for spoiling and violence are before me: and there are that raise up strife and contention. 
Therefore the law is slacked, and judgment doth never go forth: for the wicked doth compass about the righteous; therefore wrong judgment proceedeth. 
Behold ye among the heathen, and regard, and wonder marvelously: for I will work a work in your days which ye will not believe, though it be told you. 
For, lo, I raise up the Chaldeans, that bitter and hasty nation, which shall march through the breadth of the land, to possess the dwellingplaces that are not their's. 
They are terrible and dreadful: their judgment and their dignity shall proceed of themselves. 
Their horses also are swifter than the leopards, and are more fierce than the evening wolves: and their horsemen shall spread themselves, and their horsemen shall come from 
810,certain of the Pharisees said unto them, Why do ye that which is not lawful to do on the sabbath days? 
And Jesus answering them said, Have ye not read so much as this, what David did, when himself was an hungred, and they which were with him; 
How he went into the house of God, and did take and eat the shewbread, and gave also to them that were with him; which it is not lawful to eat but for the priests alone? 
And he said unto them, That the Son of man is Lord also of the sabbath. 
And it came to pass also on another sabbath, that he entered into the synagogue and taught: and there was a man whose right hand was withered. 
And the scribes and Pharisees watched him, whether he would heal on the sabbath day; that they might find an accusation against him. 
But he knew their thoughts, and said to the
929,en thy brethren, the men of thy kindred, and all the house of Israel wholly, are they unto whom the inhabitants of Jerusalem have said, Get you far from the LORD: unto us is this land given in possession. 
Therefore say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Although I have cast them far off among the heathen, and although I have scattered them among the countries, yet will I be to them as a little sanctuary in the countries where they shall come. 
Therefore say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even gather you from the people, and assemble you out of the countries where ye have been scattered, and I will give you the land of Israel. 
And they shall come thither, and they shall take away all the detestable things thereof and all the abominations thereof from thence. 
And I will give them one heart, and I will put a new spirit within you; and I will take the stony heart out of their flesh, and will give them an heart of flesh: 
Th
985,izzah: these were the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these were the sons of Aholibamah, the daughter of Anah the daughter of Zibeon, Esau's wife: and she bare to Esau Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah. 
These were dukes of the sons of Esau: the sons of Eliphaz the firstborn son of Esau; duke Teman, duke Omar, duke Zepho, duke Kenaz, 
Duke Korah, duke Gatam, and duke Amalek: these are the dukes that came of Eliphaz in the land of Edom; these were the sons of Adah. 
And these are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke Zerah, duke Shammah, duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of Reuel in the land of Edom; these are the sons of Bashemath Esau's wife. 
And these are the sons of Aholibamah Esau's wife; duke Jeush, duke Jaalam, duke Korah: these were the dukes that came of Aholibamah the daughter of Anah, Esau's wife. 
These are the sons of Esau, who is Edom, and these are their dukes. 
These are the sons of Seir the Horite, who inhabited the land; Lotan, and Sho
880, him, (for he was naked,) and did cast himself into the sea. 
And the other disciples came in a little ship; (for they were not far from land, but as it were two hundred cubits,) dragging the net with fishes. 
As soon then as they were come to land, they saw a fire of coals there, and fish laid thereon, and bread. 
Jesus saith unto them, Bring of the fish which ye have now caught. 
Simon Peter went up, and drew the net to land full of great fishes, an hundred and fifty and three: and for all there were so many, yet was not the net broken. 
Jesus saith unto them, Come and dine. And none of the disciples durst ask him, Who art thou? knowing that it was the Lord. 
Jesus then cometh, and taketh bread, and giveth them, and fish likewise. 
This is now the third time that Jesus shewed himself to his disciples, after that he was risen from the dead. 
So when they had dined, J
902,e the vineyard to others. And when they heard it, they said, God forbid. 
And he beheld them, and said, What is this then that is written, The stone which the builders rejected, the same is become the head of the corner? 
Whosoever shall fall upon that stone shall be broken; but on whomsoever it shall fall, it will grind him to powder. 
And the chief priests and the scribes the same hour sought to lay hands on him; and they feared the people: for they perceived that he had spoken this parable against them. 
And they watched him, and sent forth spies, which should feign themselves just men, that they might take hold of his words, that so they might deliver him unto the power and authority of the governor. 
And they asked him, saying, Master, we know that thou sayest and teachest rightly, neither acceptest thou the person of any, but teachest the way of God truly: 
Is it lawful for us to giv
860,e away into the land of Judah, and there eat bread, and prophesy there: 
But prophesy not again any more at Bethel: for it is the king's chapel, and it is the king's court. 
Then answered Amos, and said to Amaziah, I was no prophet, neither was I a prophet's son; but I was an herdman, and a gatherer of sycomore fruit: 
And the LORD took me as I followed the flock, and the LORD said unto me, Go, prophesy unto my people Israel. 
Now therefore hear thou the word of the LORD: Thou sayest, Prophesy not against Israel, and drop not thy word against the house of Isaac. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Thy wife shall be an harlot in the city, and thy sons and thy daughters shall fall by the sword, and thy land shall be divided by line; and thou shalt die in a polluted land: and Israel shall surely go into captivity forth of his land. 
Thus hath the Lord GOD
875,e said to the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, How long shall it be to the end of these wonders? 
And I heard the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters of the river, when he held up his right hand and his left hand unto heaven, and sware by him that liveth for ever that it shall be for a time, times, and an half; and when he shall have accomplished to scatter the power of the holy people, all these things shall be finished. 
And I heard, but I understood not: then said I, O my Lord, what shall be the end of these things? 
And he said, Go thy way, Daniel: for the words are closed up and sealed till the time of the end. 
Many shall be purified, and made white, and tried; but the wicked shall do wickedly: and none of the wicked shall understand; but the wise shall understand. 
And from the time that the daily sacrifice shall be
1069,hey have been ever of old. 
Remember not the sins of my youth, nor my transgressions: according to thy mercy remember thou me for thy goodness' sake, O LORD. 
Good and upright is the LORD: therefore will he teach sinners in the way. 
The meek will he guide in judgment: and the meek will he teach his way. 
All the paths of the LORD are mercy and truth unto such as keep his covenant and his testimonies. 
For thy name's sake, O LORD, pardon mine iniquity; for it is great. 
What man is he that feareth the LORD? him shall he teach in the way that he shall choose. 
His soul shall dwell at ease; and his seed shall inherit the earth. 
The secret of the LORD is with them that fear him; and he will shew them his covenant. 
Mine eyes are ever toward the LORD; for he shall pluck my feet out of the net. 
Turn thee unto me, and have mercy upon me; for I am desolate and afflicted. 
The troubles of my heart are enlarged: O bring thou me out of my distresses. 
Look upon mine affliction and my pain; and forgive all my sins. 
Consider mine enemies; for they are many; and 
933,ath heard the voice of my weeping. 
The LORD hath heard my supplication; the LORD will receive my prayer. 
Let all mine enemies be ashamed and sore vexed: let them return and be ashamed suddenly. 
O LORD my God, in thee do I put my trust: save me from all them that persecute me, and deliver me: 
Lest he tear my soul like a lion, rending it in pieces, while there is none to deliver. 
O LORD my God, If I have done this; if there be iniquity in my hands; 
If I have rewarded evil unto him that was at peace with me; (yea, I have delivered him that without cause is mine enemy:) 
Let the enemy persecute my soul, and take it; yea, let him tread down my life upon the earth, and lay mine honour in the dust. Selah. 
Arise, O LORD, in thine anger, lift up thyself because of the rage of mine enemies: and awake for me to the judgment that thou hast commanded. 
So shall the congregation of the people compass thee about: for their sake
947,estroyed, so that there is no man, that there is none inhabitant. 
I said, Surely thou wilt fear me, thou wilt receive instruction; so their dwelling should not be cut off, howsoever I punished them: but they rose early, and corrupted all their doings. 
Therefore wait ye upon me, saith the LORD, until the day that I rise up to the prey: for my determination is to gather the nations, that I may assemble the kingdoms, to pour upon them mine indignation, even all my fierce anger: for all the earth shall be devoured with the fire of my jealousy. 
For then will I turn to the people a pure language, that they may all call upon the name of the LORD, to serve him with one consent. 
From beyond the rivers of Ethiopia my suppliants, even the daughter of my dispersed, shall bring mine offering. 
In that day shalt thou not be ashamed for all thy doings, wherein thou hast transgressed against me: for then I will take away out of the midst of thee
965,priest shall come again the seventh day, and shall look: and, behold, if the plague be spread in the walls of the house; 
Then the priest shall command that they take away the stones in which the plague is, and they shall cast them into an unclean place without the city: 
And he shall cause the house to be scraped within round about, and they shall pour out the dust that they scrape off without the city into an unclean place: 
And they shall take other stones, and put them in the place of those stones; and he shall take other morter, and shall plaister the house. 
And if the plague come again, and break out in the house, after that he hath taken away the stones, and after he hath scraped the house, and after it is plaistered; 
Then the priest shall come and look, and, behold, if the plague be spread in the house, it is a fretting leprosy in the house; it is unclean. 
And he shall break down the house, the stones of it, and the timber thereof, and all 
756,. 
And if the house be worthy, let your peace come upon it: but if it be not worthy, let your peace return to you. 
And whosoever shall not receive you, nor hear your words, when ye depart out of that house or city, shake off the dust of your feet. 
Verily I say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for the land of Sodom and Gomorrha in the day of judgment, than for that city. 
Behold, I send you forth as sheep in the midst of wolves: be ye therefore wise as serpents, and harmless as doves. 
But beware of men: for they will deliver you up to the councils, and they will scourge you in their synagogues; 
And ye shall be brought before governors and kings for my sake, for a testimony against them and the Gentiles. 
But when they deliver you up, take 
993,of him, and all his sins, and his trespass, and the places wherein he built high places, and set up groves and graven images, before he was humbled: behold, they are written among the sayings of the seers. 
So Manasseh slept with his fathers, and they buried him in his own house: and Amon his son reigned in his stead. 
Amon was two and twenty years old when he began to reign, and reigned two years in Jerusalem. 
But he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD, as did Manasseh his father: for Amon sacrificed unto all the carved images which Manasseh his father had made, and served them; 
And humbled not himself before the LORD, as Manasseh his father had humbled himself; but Amon trespassed more and more. 
And his servants conspired against him, and slew him in his own house. 
But the people of the land slew all them that had conspired against king Amon; and the people of the land made Josiah his son king in his stead. 
Josiah was eight years old when he began to reign, a
788,le that followed Omri prevailed against the people that followed Tibni the son of Ginath: so Tibni died, and Omri reigned. 
In the thirty and first year of Asa king of Judah began Omri to reign over Israel, twelve years: six years reigned he in Tirzah. 
And he bought the hill Samaria of Shemer for two talents of silver, and built on the hill, and called the name of the city which he built, after the name of Shemer, owner of the hill, Samaria. 
But Omri wrought evil in the eyes of the LORD, and did worse than all that were before him. 
For he walked in all the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin, to provoke the LORD God of Israel to anger with their vanities. 
Now the rest of the acts of Omri which he did, and his might that he shewed
906,e taught them as one that had authority, and not as the scribes. 
And there was in their synagogue a man with an unclean spirit; and he cried out, 
Saying, Let us alone; what have we to do with thee, thou Jesus of Nazareth? art thou come to destroy us? I know thee who thou art, the Holy One of God. 
And Jesus rebuked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of him. 
And when the unclean spirit had torn him, and cried with a loud voice, he came out of him. 
And they were all amazed, insomuch that they questioned among themselves, saying, What thing is this? what new doctrine is this? for with authority commandeth he even the unclean spirits, and they do obey him. 
And immediately his fame spread abroad throughout all the region round about Galilee. 
And forthwith, when they were come out of the synagogue, they entered into the house of Simon and Andrew, with James and John. 
But Simon's wife's
752,he worse before Israel, they sent messengers, and drew forth the Syrians that were beyond the river: and Shophach the captain of the host of Hadarezer went before them. 
And it was told David; and he gathered all Israel, and passed over Jordan, and came upon them, and set the battle in array against them. So when David had put the battle in array against the Syrians, they fought with him. 
But the Syrians fled before Israel; and David slew of the Syrians seven thousand men which fought in chariots, and forty thousand footmen, and killed Shophach the captain of the host. 
And when the servants of Hadarezer saw that they were put to the worse before Israel, they made peace with David, and became his servants: neither would the Syrians help the 
955,ed against the inhabitants of Teman: Surely the least of the flock shall draw them out: surely he shall make their habitations desolate with them. 
The earth is moved at the noise of their fall, at the cry the noise thereof was heard in the Red sea. 
Behold, he shall come up and fly as the eagle, and spread his wings over Bozrah: and at that day shall the heart of the mighty men of Edom be as the heart of a woman in her pangs. 
Concerning Damascus. Hamath is confounded, and Arpad: for they have heard evil tidings: they are fainthearted; there is sorrow on the sea; it cannot be quiet. 
Damascus is waxed feeble, and turneth herself to flee, and fear hath seized on her: anguish and sorrows have taken her, as a woman in travail. 
How is the city of praise not left, the city of my joy! 
Therefore her young men shall fall in her streets, and all the men of war shall be cut off in that day, saith the LORD of hosts. 
And I will kindle a fire in the 
1074,et was she carried away, she went into captivity: her young children also were dashed in pieces at the top of all the streets: and they cast lots for her honourable men, and all her great men were bound in chains. 
Thou also shalt be drunken: thou shalt be hid, thou also shalt seek strength because of the enemy. 
All thy strong holds shall be like fig trees with the firstripe figs: if they be shaken, they shall even fall into the mouth of the eater. 
Behold, thy people in the midst of thee are women: the gates of thy land shall be set wide open unto thine enemies: the fire shall devour thy bars. 
Draw thee waters for the siege, fortify thy strong holds: go into clay, and tread the morter, make strong the brickkiln. 
There shall the fire devour thee; the sword shall cut thee off, it shall eat thee up like the cankerworm: make thyself many as the cankerworm, make thyself many as the locusts. 
Thou hast multiplied thy merchants above the stars of heaven: the cankerworm spoileth, and fleeth away. 
Thy crowned are as the locusts, and thy captains as the great gra
765,well among the children of Israel, and will not forsake my people Israel. 
So Solomon built the house, and finished it. 
And he built the walls of the house within with boards of cedar, both the floor of the house, and the walls of the ceiling: and he covered them on the inside with wood, and covered the floor of the house with planks of fir. 
And he built twenty cubits on the sides of the house, both the floor and the walls with boards of cedar: he even built them for it within, even for the oracle, even for the most holy place. 
And the house, that is, the temple before it, was forty cubits long. 
And the cedar of the house within was carved with knops and open flowers: all was cedar; there was no stone seen. 
And the oracle he prepared in the house wit
862,s it? And he said, This is an ephah that goeth forth. He said moreover, This is their resemblance through all the earth. 
And, behold, there was lifted up a talent of lead: and this is a woman that sitteth in the midst of the ephah. 
And he said, This is wickedness. And he cast it into the midst of the ephah; and he cast the weight of lead upon the mouth thereof. 
Then lifted I up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came out two women, and the wind was in their wings; for they had wings like the wings of a stork: and they lifted up the ephah between the earth and the heaven. 
Then said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do these bear the ephah? 
And he said unto me, To build it an house in the land of Shinar: and it shall be established, and set there upon her own base. 
And I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, t
1011,ore him. 
Hear diligently my speech, and my declaration with your ears. 
Behold now, I have ordered my cause; I know that I shall be justified. 
Who is he that will plead with me? for now, if I hold my tongue, I shall give up the ghost. 
Only do not two things unto me: then will I not hide myself from thee. 
Withdraw thine hand far from me: and let not thy dread make me afraid. 
Then call thou, and I will answer: or let me speak, and answer thou me. 
How many are mine iniquities and sins? make me to know my transgression and my sin. 
Wherefore hidest thou thy face, and holdest me for thine enemy? 
Wilt thou break a leaf driven to and fro? and wilt thou pursue the dry stubble? 
For thou writest bitter things against me, and makest me to possess the iniquities of my youth. 
Thou puttest my feet also in the stocks, and lookest narrowly unto all my paths; thou settest a print upon the heels of my feet. 
And he, as a rotten thing, consumeth, as a garment that is moth eaten. 
Man that is born of a woma
809,son we shall reap, if we faint not. 
As we have therefore opportunity, let us do good unto all men, especially unto them who are of the household of faith. 
Ye see how large a letter I have written unto you with mine own hand. 
As many as desire to make a fair shew in the flesh, they constrain you to be circumcised; only lest they should suffer persecution for the cross of Christ. 
For neither they themselves who are circumcised keep the law; but desire to have you circumcised, that they may glory in your flesh. 
But God forbid that I should glory, save in the cross of our Lord Jesus Christ, by whom the world is crucified unto me, and I unto the world. 
For in Christ Jesus neither circumcision availeth any thing, nor uncircumcision, but a new creature. 
And as many as walk according to this rule, p
725,l pour my fury upon Sin, the strength of Egypt; and I will cut off the multitude of No. 
And I will set fire in Egypt: Sin shall have great pain, and No shall be rent asunder, and Noph shall have distresses daily. 
The young men of Aven and of Pibeseth shall fall by the sword: and these cities shall go into captivity. 
At Tehaphnehes also the day shall be darkened, when I shall break there the yokes of Egypt: and the pomp of her strength shall cease in her: as for her, a cloud shall cover her, and her daughters shall go into captivity. 
Thus will I execute judgments in Egypt: and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the first month, in the seventh day of the month, that t
959,every island fled away, and the mountains were not found. 
And there fell upon men a great hail out of heaven, every stone about the weight of a talent: and men blasphemed God because of the plague of the hail; for the plague thereof was exceeding great. 
And there came one of the seven angels which had the seven vials, and talked with me, saying unto me, Come hither; I will shew unto thee the judgment of the great whore that sitteth upon many waters: 
With whom the kings of the earth have committed fornication, and the inhabitants of the earth have been made drunk with the wine of her fornication. 
So he carried me away in the spirit into the wilderness: and I saw a woman sit upon a scarlet coloured beast, full of names of blasphemy, having seven heads and ten horns. 
And the woman was arrayed in purple and scarlet colour, and decked with gold and precious stones and pearls, having a golden cup in her hand full of abominations and filthiness of
840,m up a deliverer, Ehud the son of Gera, a Benjamite, a man lefthanded: and by him the children of Israel sent a present unto Eglon the king of Moab. 
But Ehud made him a dagger which had two edges, of a cubit length; and he did gird it under his raiment upon his right thigh. 
And he brought the present unto Eglon king of Moab: and Eglon was a very fat man. 
And when he had made an end to offer the present, he sent away the people that bare the present. 
But he himself turned again from the quarries that were by Gilgal, and said, I have a secret errand unto thee, O king: who said, Keep silence. And all that stood by him went out from him. 
And Ehud came unto him; and he was sitting in a summer parlour, which he had for himself alone. And Ehud said, I have a message from God unto thee. And he arose out of his seat. 
And Ehud put f
940, that searched the land, rent their clothes: 
And they spake unto all the company of the children of Israel, saying, The land, which we passed through to search it, is an exceeding good land. 
If the LORD delight in us, then he will bring us into this land, and give it us; a land which floweth with milk and honey. 
Only rebel not ye against the LORD, neither fear ye the people of the land; for they are bread for us: their defence is departed from them, and the LORD is with us: fear them not. 
But all the congregation bade stone them with stones. And the glory of the LORD appeared in the tabernacle of the congregation before all the children of Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, How long will this people provoke me? and how long will it be ere they believe me, for all the signs which I have shewed among them? 
I will smite them with the pestilence, and disinherit them, and will make of thee a greater nation and mightier tha
908,ces; and the city shall be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain after the manner thereof. 
And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and they shall not be small. 
Their children also shall be as aforetime, and their congregation shall be established before me, and I will punish all that oppress them. 
And their nobles shall be of themselves, and their governor shall proceed from the midst of them; and I will cause him to draw near, and he shall approach unto me: for who is this that engaged his heart to approach unto me? saith the LORD. 
And ye shall be my people, and I will be your God. 
Behold, the whirlwind of the LORD goeth forth with fury, a continuing whirlwind: it shall fall with pain upon the head of the wicked. 
The fierce anger of the LORD shall not r
946, leaping, and praising God. 
And all the people saw him walking and praising God: 
And they knew that it was he which sat for alms at the Beautiful gate of the temple: and they were filled with wonder and amazement at that which had happened unto him. 
And as the lame man which was healed held Peter and John, all the people ran together unto them in the porch that is called Solomon's, greatly wondering. 
And when Peter saw it, he answered unto the people, Ye men of Israel, why marvel ye at this? or why look ye so earnestly on us, as though by our own power or holiness we had made this man to walk? 
The God of Abraham, and of Isaac, and of Jacob, the God of our fathers, hath glorified his Son Jesus; whom ye delivered up, and denied him in the presence of Pilate, when he was determined to let him go. 
But ye denied the Holy One and the Just, and desired a murderer to be granted unto you; 
And killed the Prince of life, whom God hath r
1017,bomination of Moab, in the hill that is before Jerusalem, and for Molech, the abomination of the children of Ammon. 
And likewise did he for all his strange wives, which burnt incense and sacrificed unto their gods. 
And the LORD was angry with Solomon, because his heart was turned from the LORD God of Israel, which had appeared unto him twice, 
And had commanded him concerning this thing, that he should not go after other gods: but he kept not that which the LORD commanded. 
Wherefore the LORD said unto Solomon, Forasmuch as this is done of thee, and thou hast not kept my covenant and my statutes, which I have commanded thee, I will surely rend the kingdom from thee, and will give it to thy servant. 
Notwithstanding in thy days I will not do it for David thy father's sake: but I will rend it out of the hand of thy son. 
Howbeit I will not rend away all the kingdom; but will give one tribe to thy son for David my servant's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake which I have chosen. 
And the LORD stirred up an 
789,. Go not from house to house. 
And into whatsoever city ye enter, and they receive you, eat such things as are set before you: 
And heal the sick that are therein, and say unto them, The kingdom of God is come nigh unto you. 
But into whatsoever city ye enter, and they receive you not, go your ways out into the streets of the same, and say, 
Even the very dust of your city, which cleaveth on us, we do wipe off against you: notwithstanding be ye sure of this, that the kingdom of God is come nigh unto you. 
But I say unto you, that it shall be more tolerable in that day for Sodom, than for that city. 
Woe unto thee, Chorazin! woe unto thee, Bethsaida! for if the mighty works had been done in Tyre and Sidon, which have been done in you, they had a great while ago repented, sitting 
993,hem, and to command them to keep the law of Moses. 
And the apostles and elders came together for to consider of this matter. 
And when there had been much disputing, Peter rose up, and said unto them, Men and brethren, ye know how that a good while ago God made choice among us, that the Gentiles by my mouth should hear the word of the gospel, and believe. 
And God, which knoweth the hearts, bare them witness, giving them the Holy Ghost, even as he did unto us; 
And put no difference between us and them, purifying their hearts by faith. 
Now therefore why tempt ye God, to put a yoke upon the neck of the disciples, which neither our fathers nor we were able to bear? 
But we believe that through the grace of the LORD Jesus Christ we shall be saved, even as they. 
Then all the multitude kept silence, and gave audience to Barnabas and Paul, declaring what miracles and wonders God had wrought among the Gentiles by them. 
And after they had held their peace, James answered, saying, Me
998,at my lord Elijah? 
And he answered him, I am: go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here. 
And he said, What have I sinned, that thou wouldest deliver thy servant into the hand of Ahab, to slay me? 
As the LORD thy God liveth, there is no nation or kingdom, whither my lord hath not sent to seek thee: and when they said, He is not there; he took an oath of the kingdom and nation, that they found thee not. 
And now thou sayest, Go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here. 
And it shall come to pass, as soon as I am gone from thee, that the Spirit of the LORD shall carry thee whither I know not; and so when I come and tell Ahab, and he cannot find thee, he shall slay me: but I thy servant fear the LORD from my youth. 
Was it not told my lord what I did when Jezebel slew the prophets of the LORD, how I hid an hundred men of the LORD's prophets by fifty in a cave, and fed them with bread and water? 
And now thou sayest, Go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here: and he shall slay me. 
And E
1003,his own conceit. 
He that sendeth a message by the hand of a fool cutteth off the feet, and drinketh damage. 
The legs of the lame are not equal: so is a parable in the mouth of fools. 
As he that bindeth a stone in a sling, so is he that giveth honour to a fool. 
As a thorn goeth up into the hand of a drunkard, so is a parable in the mouths of fools. 
The great God that formed all things both rewardeth the fool, and rewardeth transgressors. 
As a dog returneth to his vomit, so a fool returneth to his folly. 
Seest thou a man wise in his own conceit? there is more hope of a fool than of him. 
The slothful man saith, There is a lion in the way; a lion is in the streets. 
As the door turneth upon his hinges, so doth the slothful upon his bed. 
The slothful hideth his hand in his bosom; it grieveth him to bring it again to his mouth. 
The sluggard is wiser in his own conceit than seven men that can render a reason. 
He that passeth by, and meddleth with strife belonging not to him, is like o
948,be joyful, and all that is therein: then shall all the trees of the wood rejoice 
Before the LORD: for he cometh, for he cometh to judge the earth: he shall judge the world with righteousness, and the people with his truth. 
The LORD reigneth; let the earth rejoice; let the multitude of isles be glad thereof. 
Clouds and darkness are round about him: righteousness and judgment are the habitation of his throne. 
A fire goeth before him, and burneth up his enemies round about. 
His lightnings enlightened the world: the earth saw, and trembled. 
The hills melted like wax at the presence of the LORD, at the presence of the Lord of the whole earth. 
The heavens declare his righteousness, and all the people see his glory. 
Confounded be all they that serve graven images, that boast themselves of idols: worship him, all ye gods. 
Zion heard, and was glad; and the daughters of Judah rejoiced because of thy judgments, O LORD. 
For thou, LORD, 
1025,hem with the earth. 
Make thee an ark of gopher wood; rooms shalt thou make in the ark, and shalt pitch it within and without with pitch. 
And this is the fashion which thou shalt make it of: The length of the ark shall be three hundred cubits, the breadth of it fifty cubits, and the height of it thirty cubits. 
A window shalt thou make to the ark, and in a cubit shalt thou finish it above; and the door of the ark shalt thou set in the side thereof; with lower, second, and third stories shalt thou make it. 
And, behold, I, even I, do bring a flood of waters upon the earth, to destroy all flesh, wherein is the breath of life, from under heaven; and every thing that is in the earth shall die. 
But with thee will I establish my covenant; and thou shalt come into the ark, thou, and thy sons, and thy wife, and thy sons' wives with thee. 
And of every living thing of all flesh, two of every sort shalt thou bring into the ark, to keep them alive with thee; they shall be male and female. 
Of fowls after their kind, an
855,e son of Ahilud, the recorder. 
And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over the host: and Zadok and Abiathar were the priests: 
And Azariah the son of Nathan was over the officers: and Zabud the son of Nathan was principal officer, and the king's friend: 
And Ahishar was over the household: and Adoniram the son of Abda was over the tribute. 
And Solomon had twelve officers over all Israel, which provided victuals for the king and his household: each man his month in a year made provision. 
And these are their names: The son of Hur, in mount Ephraim: 
The son of Dekar, in Makaz, and in Shaalbim, and Bethshemesh, and Elonbethhanan: 
The son of Hesed, in Aruboth; to him pertained Sochoh, and all the land of Hepher: 
The son of Abinadab, in all the region of Dor; which had Taphath the daughter of Solomon to wife: 
Baana the son of Ahilud; to him pert
891,ars of the life of my fathers in the days of their pilgrimage. 
And Jacob blessed Pharaoh, and went out from before Pharaoh. 
And Joseph placed his father and his brethren, and gave them a possession in the land of Egypt, in the best of the land, in the land of Rameses, as Pharaoh had commanded. 
And Joseph nourished his father, and his brethren, and all his father's household, with bread, according to their families. 
And there was no bread in all the land; for the famine was very sore, so that the land of Egypt and all the land of Canaan fainted by reason of the famine. 
And Joseph gathered up all the money that was found in the land of Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, for the corn which they bought: and Joseph brought the money into Pharaoh's house. 
And when money failed in the land of Egypt, and in the land of Canaan, all the Egyptians came unto Joseph, and said, Give us b
980,ng ye shall hear, and shall not understand; and seeing ye shall see, and not perceive: 
For the heart of this people is waxed gross, and their ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes have they closed; lest they should see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I should heal them. 
Be it known therefore unto you, that the salvation of God is sent unto the Gentiles, and that they will hear it. 
And when he had said these words, the Jews departed, and had great reasoning among themselves. 
And Paul dwelt two whole years in his own hired house, and received all that came in unto him, 
Preaching the kingdom of God, and teaching those things which concern the Lord Jesus Christ, with all confidence, no man forbidding him. 
Paul, a servant of Jesus Christ, called to be an apostle, separated unto the gospel of God, 
(Which he had promised afore by his prophets in the holy scriptures,) 
Concerning his Son Jesu
901,e fire from the hearth, or to take water withal out of the pit. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD, the Holy One of Israel; In returning and rest shall ye be saved; in quietness and in confidence shall be your strength: and ye would not. 
But ye said, No; for we will flee upon horses; therefore shall ye flee: and, We will ride upon the swift; therefore shall they that pursue you be swift. 
One thousand shall flee at the rebuke of one; at the rebuke of five shall ye flee: till ye be left as a beacon upon the top of a mountain, and as an ensign on an hill. 
And therefore will the LORD wait, that he may be gracious unto you, and therefore will he be exalted, that he may have mercy upon you: for the LORD is a God of judgment: blessed are all they that wait for him. 
For the people shall dwell in Zion at Jerusalem: thou shalt weep no more: he will be very gracious unto thee at the voice of thy cry; 
995,e. 
Cursed shall be the fruit of thy body, and the fruit of thy land, the increase of thy kine, and the flocks of thy sheep. 
Cursed shalt thou be when thou comest in, and cursed shalt thou be when thou goest out. 
The LORD shall send upon thee cursing, vexation, and rebuke, in all that thou settest thine hand unto for to do, until thou be destroyed, and until thou perish quickly; because of the wickedness of thy doings, whereby thou hast forsaken me. 
The LORD shall make the pestilence cleave unto thee, until he have consumed thee from off the land, whither thou goest to possess it. 
The LORD shall smite thee with a consumption, and with a fever, and with an inflammation, and with an extreme burning, and with the sword, and with blasting, and with mildew; and they shall pursue thee until thou perish. 
And thy heaven that is over thy head shall be brass, and the earth that is under thee shall be iron. 
The LORD shall make the rain of thy land powder and dust: from heaven shall it 
783,erefore the five kings of the Amorites, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king of Eglon, gathered themselves together, and went up, they and all their hosts, and encamped before Gibeon, and made war against it. 
And the men of Gibeon sent unto Joshua to the camp to Gilgal, saying, Slack not thy hand from thy servants; come up to us quickly, and save us, and help us: for all the kings of the Amorites that dwell in the mountains are gathered together against us. 
So Joshua ascended from Gilgal, he, and all the people of war with him, and all the mighty men of valour. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Fear them not: for I have delivered them into thine hand; there shall not a man of them stand before thee. 
Joshua therefore
906,e afraid; yea, many shall make suit unto thee. 
But the eyes of the wicked shall fail, and they shall not escape, and their hope shall be as the giving up of the ghost. 
And Job answered and said, 
No doubt but ye are the people, and wisdom shall die with you. 
But I have understanding as well as you; I am not inferior to you: yea, who knoweth not such things as these? 
I am as one mocked of his neighbour, who calleth upon God, and he answereth him: the just upright man is laughed to scorn. 
He that is ready to slip with his feet is as a lamp despised in the thought of him that is at ease. 
The tabernacles of robbers prosper, and they that provoke God are secure; into whose hand God bringeth abundantly. 
But ask now the beasts, and they shall teach thee; and the fowls of the air, and they shall tell thee: 
Or speak to the earth, and it shall teach thee: and the fishes of the sea shall declare 
1051,o pass, that, while they communed together and reasoned, Jesus himself drew near, and went with them. 
But their eyes were holden that they should not know him. 
And he said unto them, What manner of communications are these that ye have one to another, as ye walk, and are sad? 
And the one of them, whose name was Cleopas, answering said unto him, Art thou only a stranger in Jerusalem, and hast not known the things which are come to pass there in these days? 
And he said unto them, What things? And they said unto him, Concerning Jesus of Nazareth, which was a prophet mighty in deed and word before God and all the people: 
And how the chief priests and our rulers delivered him to be condemned to death, and have crucified him. 
But we trusted that it had been he which should have redeemed Israel: and beside all this, to day is the third day since these things were done. 
Yea, and certain women also of our company made us astonished, which were early at the sepulchre; 
And when they found not his body, they came, saying, that they had als
953,ll his works are done in truth. 
He loveth righteousness and judgment: the earth is full of the goodness of the LORD. 
By the word of the LORD were the heavens made; and all the host of them by the breath of his mouth. 
He gathereth the waters of the sea together as an heap: he layeth up the depth in storehouses. 
Let all the earth fear the LORD: let all the inhabitants of the world stand in awe of him. 
For he spake, and it was done; he commanded, and it stood fast. 
The LORD bringeth the counsel of the heathen to nought: he maketh the devices of the people of none effect. 
The counsel of the LORD standeth for ever, the thoughts of his heart to all generations. 
Blessed is the nation whose God is the LORD; and the people whom he hath chosen for his own inheritance. 
The LORD looketh from heaven; he beholdeth all the sons of men. 
From the place of his habitation he looketh upon all the inhabitants of the earth. 
He fashioneth their hearts
1066,from among his people: because he brought not the offering of the LORD in his appointed season, that man shall bear his sin. 
And if a stranger shall sojourn among you, and will keep the passover unto the LORD; according to the ordinance of the passover, and according to the manner thereof, so shall he do: ye shall have one ordinance, both for the stranger, and for him that was born in the land. 
And on the day that the tabernacle was reared up the cloud covered the tabernacle, namely, the tent of the testimony: and at even there was upon the tabernacle as it were the appearance of fire, until the morning. 
So it was alway: the cloud covered it by day, and the appearance of fire by night. 
And when the cloud was taken up from the tabernacle, then after that the children of Israel journeyed: and in the place where the cloud abode, there the children of Israel pitched their tents. 
At the commandment of the LORD the children of Israel journeyed, and at the commandment of the LORD they pitched: as long as the cloud abode upon the tabernacle they rested 
989,should not be moved: 
Therefore did my heart rejoice, and my tongue was glad; moreover also my flesh shall rest in hope: 
Because thou wilt not leave my soul in hell, neither wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
Thou hast made known to me the ways of life; thou shalt make me full of joy with thy countenance. 
Men and brethren, let me freely speak unto you of the patriarch David, that he is both dead and buried, and his sepulchre is with us unto this day. 
Therefore being a prophet, and knowing that God had sworn with an oath to him, that of the fruit of his loins, according to the flesh, he would raise up Christ to sit on his throne; 
He seeing this before spake of the resurrection of Christ, that his soul was not left in hell, neither his flesh did see corruption. 
This Jesus hath God raised up, whereof we all are witnesses. 
Therefore being by the right hand of God exalted, and having received of the Father the promise of the Holy Ghost, he hath shed forth t
763,k for thee. 
And he answered them, saying, Who is my mother, or my brethren? 
And he looked round about on them which sat about him, and said, Behold my mother and my brethren! 
For whosoever shall do the will of God, the same is my brother, and my sister, and mother. 
And he began again to teach by the sea side: and there was gathered unto him a great multitude, so that he entered into a ship, and sat in the sea; and the whole multitude was by the sea on the land. 
And he taught them many things by parables, and said unto them in his doctrine, 
Hearken; Behold, there went out a sower to sow: 
And it came to pass, as he sowed, some fell by the way side, and the fowls of the air came and devoured it up. 
And some fell on stony ground, where it had not mu
1067,nd all his acquaintance, and the women that followed him from Galilee, stood afar off, beholding these things. 
And, behold, there was a man named Joseph, a counsellor; and he was a good man, and a just: 
(The same had not consented to the counsel and deed of them;) he was of Arimathaea, a city of the Jews: who also himself waited for the kingdom of God. 
This man went unto Pilate, and begged the body of Jesus. 
And he took it down, and wrapped it in linen, and laid it in a sepulchre that was hewn in stone, wherein never man before was laid. 
And that day was the preparation, and the sabbath drew on. 
And the women also, which came with him from Galilee, followed after, and beheld the sepulchre, and how his body was laid. 
And they returned, and prepared spices and ointments; and rested the sabbath day according to the commandment. 
Now upon the first day of the week, very early in the morning, they came unto the sepulchre, bringing the spices which they had prepared, and certain others with them. 
And they found the stone rolled away from the sepulch
1059, unto his father, What begettest thou? or to the woman, What hast thou brought forth? 
Thus saith the LORD, the Holy One of Israel, and his Maker, Ask me of things to come concerning my sons, and concerning the work of my hands command ye me. 
I have made the earth, and created man upon it: I, even my hands, have stretched out the heavens, and all their host have I commanded. 
I have raised him up in righteousness, and I will direct all his ways: he shall build my city, and he shall let go my captives, not for price nor reward, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Thus saith the LORD, The labour of Egypt, and merchandise of Ethiopia and of the Sabeans, men of stature, shall come over unto thee, and they shall be thine: they shall come after thee; in chains they shall come over, and they shall fall down unto thee, they shall make supplication unto thee, saying, Surely God is in thee; and there is none else, there is no God. 
Verily thou art a God that hidest thyself, O God of Israel, the Saviour. 
They shall be ashamed, and also confounded, all of them: t
894,ore them: and shalt be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth. 
And thy carcase shall be meat unto all fowls of the air, and unto the beasts of the earth, and no man shall fray them away. 
The LORD will smite thee with the botch of Egypt, and with the emerods, and with the scab, and with the itch, whereof thou canst not be healed. 
The LORD shall smite thee with madness, and blindness, and astonishment of heart: 
And thou shalt grope at noonday, as the blind gropeth in darkness, and thou shalt not prosper in thy ways: and thou shalt be only oppressed and spoiled evermore, and no man shall save thee. 
Thou shalt betroth a wife, and another man shall lie with her: thou shalt build an house, and thou shalt not dwell therein: thou shalt plant a vineyard, and shalt not gather the grapes thereof. 
Thine ox shall be slain before thine eyes, and thou shalt not eat thereof: thine ass sh
823,ive, and that it may be well with you, and that ye may prolong your days in the land which ye shall possess. 
Now these are the commandments, the statutes, and the judgments, which the LORD your God commanded to teach you, that ye might do them in the land whither ye go to possess it: 
That thou mightest fear the LORD thy God, to keep all his statutes and his commandments, which I command thee, thou, and thy son, and thy son's son, all the days of thy life; and that thy days may be prolonged. 
Hear therefore, O Israel, and observe to do it; that it may be well with thee, and that ye may increase mightily, as the LORD God of thy fathers hath promised thee, in the land that floweth with milk and honey. 
Hear, O Israel: The LORD our God is one LORD: 
And thou shalt love the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and wi
818,hat day how the king was grieved for his son. 
And the people gat them by stealth that day into the city, as people being ashamed steal away when they flee in battle. 
But the king covered his face, and the king cried with a loud voice, O my son Absalom, O Absalom, my son, my son! 
And Joab came into the house to the king, and said, Thou hast shamed this day the faces of all thy servants, which this day have saved thy life, and the lives of thy sons and of thy daughters, and the lives of thy wives, and the lives of thy concubines; 
In that thou lovest thine enemies, and hatest thy friends. For thou hast declared this day, that thou regardest neither princes nor servants: for this day I perceive, that if Absalom had lived, and all we had died this day, then it had pleased thee well. 
Now therefore arise, go 
832,tore cities that Solomon had, and all the chariot cities, and the cities of the horsemen, and all that Solomon desired to build in Jerusalem, and in Lebanon, and throughout all the land of his dominion. 
As for all the people that were left of the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, which were not of Israel, 
But of their children, who were left after them in the land, whom the children of Israel consumed not, them did Solomon make to pay tribute until this day. 
But of the children of Israel did Solomon make no servants for his work; but they were men of war, and chief of his captains, and captains of his chariots and horsemen. 
And these were the chief of king Solomon's officers, even two hundred and fifty, that bare rule over the people. 
And Solomon brought up the daugh
1050, familiar spirits, and to the wizards. 
And the Egyptians will I give over into the hand of a cruel lord; and a fierce king shall rule over them, saith the Lord, the LORD of hosts. 
And the waters shall fail from the sea, and the river shall be wasted and dried up. 
And they shall turn the rivers far away; and the brooks of defence shall be emptied and dried up: the reeds and flags shall wither. 
The paper reeds by the brooks, by the mouth of the brooks, and every thing sown by the brooks, shall wither, be driven away, and be no more. 
The fishers also shall mourn, and all they that cast angle into the brooks shall lament, and they that spread nets upon the waters shall languish. 
Moreover they that work in fine flax, and they that weave networks, shall be confounded. 
And they shall be broken in the purposes thereof, all that make sluices and ponds for fish. 
Surely the princes of Zoan are fools, the counsel of the wise counsellors of Pharaoh is become brutish: how say ye unto Pharaoh, I am the son of the wise, the son of ancient kin
736,d unto this house? 
And it shall be answered, Because they forsook the LORD God of their fathers, which brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, and laid hold on other gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath he brought all this evil upon them. 
And it came to pass at the end of twenty years, wherein Solomon had built the house of the LORD, and his own house, 
That the cities which Huram had restored to Solomon, Solomon built them, and caused the children of Israel to dwell there. 
And Solomon went to Hamathzobah, and prevailed against it. 
And he built Tadmor in the wilderness, and all the store cities, which he built in Hamath. 
Also he built Bethhoron the upper, and Bethhoron the nether, fenced cities,
895,d Jediael, and Michael, and Jozabad, and Elihu, and Zilthai, captains of the thousands that were of Manasseh. 
And they helped David against the band of the rovers: for they were all mighty men of valour, and were captains in the host. 
For at that time day by day there came to David to help him, until it was a great host, like the host of God. 
And these are the numbers of the bands that were ready armed to the war, and came to David to Hebron, to turn the kingdom of Saul to him, according to the word of the LORD. 
The children of Judah that bare shield and spear were six thousand and eight hundred, ready armed to the war. 
Of the children of Simeon, mighty men of valour for the war, seven thousand and one hundred. 
Of the children of Levi four thousand and six hundred. 
And Jehoiada was the leader of the Aaronites, and with him were three thousand and seven hundred; 
And Zadok, a 
1040,nd will recompense thee for all thine abominations. 
And mine eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity: I will recompense thee according to thy ways and thine abominations that are in the midst of thee; and ye shall know that I am the LORD that smiteth. 
Behold the day, behold, it is come: the morning is gone forth; the rod hath blossomed, pride hath budded. 
Violence is risen up into a rod of wickedness: none of them shall remain, nor of their multitude, nor of any of their's: neither shall there be wailing for them. 
The time is come, the day draweth near: let not the buyer rejoice, nor the seller mourn: for wrath is upon all the multitude thereof. 
For the seller shall not return to that which is sold, although they were yet alive: for the vision is touching the whole multitude thereof, which shall not return; neither shall any strengthen himself in the iniquity of his life. 
They have blown the trumpet, even to make all ready; but none goeth to the battle: for my wrath is upon all the multitude thereof. 
The sword i
991,, and next to him Zechariah, Jeiel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehiel, and Mattithiah, and Eliab, and Benaiah, and Obededom: and Jeiel with psalteries and with harps; but Asaph made a sound with cymbals; 
Benaiah also and Jahaziel the priests with trumpets continually before the ark of the covenant of God. 
Then on that day David delivered first this psalm to thank the LORD into the hand of Asaph and his brethren. 
Give thanks unto the LORD, call upon his name, make known his deeds among the people. 
Sing unto him, sing psalms unto him, talk ye of all his wondrous works. 
Glory ye in his holy name: let the heart of them rejoice that seek the LORD. 
Seek the LORD and his strength, seek his face continually. 
Remember his marvellous works that he hath done, his wonders, and the judgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Israel his servant, ye children of Jacob, his chosen ones. 
He is the LORD our God; his judgments are in all the earth. 
Be ye mindful always of his covenant; the word whic
772,wenty thousand in length, and ten thousand in breadth: all the length shall be five and twenty thousand, and the breadth ten thousand. 
And they shall not sell of it, neither exchange, nor alienate the firstfruits of the land: for it is holy unto the LORD. 
And the five thousand, that are left in the breadth over against the five and twenty thousand, shall be a profane place for the city, for dwelling, and for suburbs: and the city shall be in the midst thereof. 
And these shall be the measures thereof; the north side four thousand and five hundred, and the south side four thousand and five hundred, and on the east side four thousand and five hundred, and the west side four thousand and five hundred. 
And the suburbs of the city shall be toward the north two hun
797,dments and doctrines of men? 
Which things have indeed a shew of wisdom in will worship, and humility, and neglecting of the body: not in any honour to the satisfying of the flesh. 
If ye then be risen with Christ, seek those things which are above, where Christ sitteth on the right hand of God. 
Set your affection on things above, not on things on the earth. 
For ye are dead, and your life is hid with Christ in God. 
When Christ, who is our life, shall appear, then shall ye also appear with him in glory. 
Mortify therefore your members which are upon the earth; fornication, uncleanness, inordinate affection, evil concupiscence, and covetousness, which is idolatry: 
For which things' sake the wrath of God cometh on the children of disobedience: 
In the which ye also walked some time, wh
805, in the days of Eliashib, Joiada, and Johanan, and Jaddua, were recorded chief of the fathers: also the priests, to the reign of Darius the Persian. 
The sons of Levi, the chief of the fathers, were written in the book of the chronicles, even until the days of Johanan the son of Eliashib. 
And the chief of the Levites: Hashabiah, Sherebiah, and Jeshua the son of Kadmiel, with their brethren over against them, to praise and to give thanks, according to the commandment of David the man of God, ward over against ward. 
Mattaniah, and Bakbukiah, Obadiah, Meshullam, Talmon, Akkub, were porters keeping the ward at the thresholds of the gates. 
These were in the days of Joiakim the son of Jeshua, the son of Jozadak, and in the days of Nehemiah the governor, and of Ezra the priest, the scribe. 
And at 
897,om them for your inheritance, then ye shall offer up an heave offering of it for the LORD, even a tenth part of the tithe. 
And this your heave offering shall be reckoned unto you, as though it were the corn of the threshingfloor, and as the fulness of the winepress. 
Thus ye also shall offer an heave offering unto the LORD of all your tithes, which ye receive of the children of Israel; and ye shall give thereof the LORD'S heave offering to Aaron the priest. 
Out of all your gifts ye shall offer every heave offering of the LORD, of all the best thereof, even the hallowed part thereof out of it. 
Therefore thou shalt say unto them, When ye have heaved the best thereof from it, then it shall be counted unto the Levites as the increase of the threshingfloor, and as the increase of the winepress. 
And ye shall eat it in every place, ye and your households: for it is your reward for your s
772,bites, Ammonites, Edomites, Zidonians, and Hittites: 
Of the nations concerning which the LORD said unto the children of Israel, Ye shall not go in to them, neither shall they come in unto you: for surely they will turn away your heart after their gods: Solomon clave unto these in love. 
And he had seven hundred wives, princesses, and three hundred concubines: and his wives turned away his heart. 
For it came to pass, when Solomon was old, that his wives turned away his heart after other gods: and his heart was not perfect with the LORD his God, as was the heart of David his father. 
For Solomon went after Ashtoreth the goddess of the Zidonians, and after Milcom the abomination of the Ammonites. 
And Solomon did evil in the sight of the LORD, and went not fully 
995, sit on the ground: there is no throne, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for thou shalt no more be called tender and delicate. 
Take the millstones, and grind meal: uncover thy locks, make bare the leg, uncover the thigh, pass over the rivers. 
Thy nakedness shall be uncovered, yea, thy shame shall be seen: I will take vengeance, and I will not meet thee as a man. 
As for our redeemer, the LORD of hosts is his name, the Holy One of Israel. 
Sit thou silent, and get thee into darkness, O daughter of the Chaldeans: for thou shalt no more be called, The lady of kingdoms. 
I was wroth with my people, I have polluted mine inheritance, and given them into thine hand: thou didst shew them no mercy; upon the ancient hast thou very heavily laid thy yoke. 
And thou saidst, I shall be a lady for ever: so that thou didst not lay these things to thy heart, neither didst remember the latter end of it. 
Therefore hear now this, thou that art given to pleasures, that dwellest carelessly, that sayest 
977,ple. 
I say then, Hath God cast away his people? God forbid. For I also am an Israelite, of the seed of Abraham, of the tribe of Benjamin. 
God hath not cast away his people which he foreknew. Wot ye not what the scripture saith of Elias? how he maketh intercession to God against Israel saying, 
Lord, they have killed thy prophets, and digged down thine altars; and I am left alone, and they seek my life. 
But what saith the answer of God unto him? I have reserved to myself seven thousand men, who have not bowed the knee to the image of Baal. 
Even so then at this present time also there is a remnant according to the election of grace. 
And if by grace, then is it no more of works: otherwise grace is no more grace. But if it be of works, then it is no more grace: otherwise work is no more work. 
What then? Israel hath not obtained that which he seeketh for; but the election hath obtained it, and the rest were blinded. 
(According as it is written, God hath given t
974,of the most High shall abide under the shadow of the Almighty. 
I will say of the LORD, He is my refuge and my fortress: my God; in him will I trust. 
Surely he shall deliver thee from the snare of the fowler, and from the noisome pestilence. 
He shall cover thee with his feathers, and under his wings shalt thou trust: his truth shall be thy shield and buckler. 
Thou shalt not be afraid for the terror by night; nor for the arrow that flieth by day; 
Nor for the pestilence that walketh in darkness; nor for the destruction that wasteth at noonday. 
A thousand shall fall at thy side, and ten thousand at thy right hand; but it shall not come nigh thee. 
Only with thine eyes shalt thou behold and see the reward of the wicked. 
Because thou hast made the LORD, which is my refuge, even the most High, thy habitation; 
There shall no evil befall thee, neither shall any plague come nigh thy dwelling. 
For he shall give his angels charge over thee, to keep thee in all th
757, wheat, and barley, and vines, and fig trees, and pomegranates; a land of oil olive, and honey; 
A land wherein thou shalt eat bread without scarceness, thou shalt not lack any thing in it; a land whose stones are iron, and out of whose hills thou mayest dig brass. 
When thou hast eaten and art full, then thou shalt bless the LORD thy God for the good land which he hath given thee. 
Beware that thou forget not the LORD thy God, in not keeping his commandments, and his judgments, and his statutes, which I command thee this day: 
Lest when thou hast eaten and art full, and hast built goodly houses, and dwelt therein; 
And when thy herds and thy flocks multiply, and thy silver and thy gold is multiplied, and all that thou hast is multiplied; 
Then th
873,of God revealed from faith to faith: as it is written, The just shall live by faith. 
For the wrath of God is revealed from heaven against all ungodliness and unrighteousness of men, who hold the truth in unrighteousness; 
Because that which may be known of God is manifest in them; for God hath shewed it unto them. 
For the invisible things of him from the creation of the world are clearly seen, being understood by the things that are made, even his eternal power and Godhead; so that they are without excuse: 
Because that, when they knew God, they glorified him not as God, neither were thankful; but became vain in their imaginations, and their foolish heart was darkened. 
Professing themselves to be wise, they became fools, 
And changed the glory of the uncorruptible God into an image made like to corruptible man, and to birds, and fourfooted beasts, and creepi
1009,red their heads. 
Because the ground is chapt, for there was no rain in the earth, the plowmen were ashamed, they covered their heads. 
Yea, the hind also calved in the field, and forsook it, because there was no grass. 
And the wild asses did stand in the high places, they snuffed up the wind like dragons; their eyes did fail, because there was no grass. 
O LORD, though our iniquities testify against us, do thou it for thy name's sake: for our backslidings are many; we have sinned against thee. 
O the hope of Israel, the saviour thereof in time of trouble, why shouldest thou be as a stranger in the land, and as a wayfaring man that turneth aside to tarry for a night? 
Why shouldest thou be as a man astonied, as a mighty man that cannot save? yet thou, O LORD, art in the midst of us, and we are called by thy name; leave us not. 
Thus saith the LORD unto this people, Thus have they loved to wander, they have not refrained their feet, therefore the LORD doth not accept them; he will now remember 
743,he shall be burnt with fire. 
And he that is the high priest among his brethren, upon whose head the anointing oil was poured, and that is consecrated to put on the garments, shall not uncover his head, nor rend his clothes; 
Neither shall he go in to any dead body, nor defile himself for his father, or for his mother; 
Neither shall he go out of the sanctuary, nor profane the sanctuary of his God; for the crown of the anointing oil of his God is upon him: I am the LORD. 
And he shall take a wife in her virginity. 
A widow, or a divorced woman, or profane, or an harlot, these shall he not take: but he shall take a virgin of his own people to wife. 
Neither shall he profane his seed among his people: for I the LORD do sanctify him. 
A
967,im, sing psalms unto him: talk ye of all his wondrous works. 
Glory ye in his holy name: let the heart of them rejoice that seek the LORD. 
Seek the LORD, and his strength: seek his face evermore. 
Remember his marvellous works that he hath done; his wonders, and the judgments of his mouth; 
O ye seed of Abraham his servant, ye children of Jacob his chosen. 
He is the LORD our God: his judgments are in all the earth. 
He hath remembered his covenant for ever, the word which he commanded to a thousand generations. 
Which covenant he made with Abraham, and his oath unto Isaac; 
And confirmed the same unto Jacob for a law, and to Israel for an everlasting covenant: 
Saying, Unto thee will I give the land of Canaan, the lot of your inheritance: 
When they were but a few men in number; yea, very few, and strangers in it. 
When they went from one nation to another, from one kingdom to another people; 
He suffered no man to do them wrong: yea, he reproved king
1045,not he the son of Jerubbaal? and Zebul his officer? serve the men of Hamor the father of Shechem: for why should we serve him? 
And would to God this people were under my hand! then would I remove Abimelech. And he said to Abimelech, Increase thine army, and come out. 
And when Zebul the ruler of the city heard the words of Gaal the son of Ebed, his anger was kindled. 
And he sent messengers unto Abimelech privily, saying, Behold, Gaal the son of Ebed and his brethren be come to Shechem; and, behold, they fortify the city against thee. 
Now therefore up by night, thou and the people that is with thee, and lie in wait in the field: 
And it shall be, that in the morning, as soon as the sun is up, thou shalt rise early, and set upon the city: and, behold, when he and the people that is with him come out against thee, then mayest thou do to them as thou shalt find occasion. 
And Abimelech rose up, and all the people that were with him, by night, and they laid wait against Shechem in four companies. 
And Gaal the son of Ebed went out,
858,af falleth off from the vine, and as a falling fig from the fig tree. 
For my sword shall be bathed in heaven: behold, it shall come down upon Idumea, and upon the people of my curse, to judgment. 
The sword of the LORD is filled with blood, it is made fat with fatness, and with the blood of lambs and goats, with the fat of the kidneys of rams: for the LORD hath a sacrifice in Bozrah, and a great slaughter in the land of Idumea. 
And the unicorns shall come down with them, and the bullocks with the bulls; and their land shall be soaked with blood, and their dust made fat with fatness. 
For it is the day of the LORD's vengeance, and the year of recompences for the controversy of Zion. 
And the streams thereof shall be turned into pitch, and the dust thereof into brimstone, and the land thereof shall become burning pitch. 
It shall not be quenched 
796,e children of Ammon, and from the Philistines? 
The Zidonians also, and the Amalekites, and the Maonites, did oppress you; and ye cried to me, and I delivered you out of their hand. 
Yet ye have forsaken me, and served other gods: wherefore I will deliver you no more. 
Go and cry unto the gods which ye have chosen; let them deliver you in the time of your tribulation. 
And the children of Israel said unto the LORD, We have sinned: do thou unto us whatsoever seemeth good unto thee; deliver us only, we pray thee, this day. 
And they put away the strange gods from among them, and served the LORD: and his soul was grieved for the misery of Israel. 
Then the children of Ammon were gathered together, and encamped in Gilead. And the children of Israel assembled themselves together, and encamp
738,. 
Then these men were bound in their coats, their hosen, and their hats, and their other garments, and were cast into the midst of the burning fiery furnace. 
Therefore because the king's commandment was urgent, and the furnace exceeding hot, the flames of the fire slew those men that took up Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego. 
And these three men, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, fell down bound into the midst of the burning fiery furnace. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar the king was astonied, and rose up in haste, and spake, and said unto his counsellors, Did not we cast three men bound into the midst of the fire? They answered and said unto the king, True, O king. 
He answered and said, Lo, I see four men loose, walking in the midst of t
829,e strength of the bearers of burdens is decayed, and there is much rubbish; so that we are not able to build the wall. 
And our adversaries said, They shall not know, neither see, till we come in the midst among them, and slay them, and cause the work to cease. 
And it came to pass, that when the Jews which dwelt by them came, they said unto us ten times, From all places whence ye shall return unto us they will be upon you. 
Therefore set I in the lower places behind the wall, and on the higher places, I even set the people after their families with their swords, their spears, and their bows. 
And I looked, and rose up, and said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, Be not ye afraid of them: remember the LORD, which is great and terrible, and fight for your brethren, your sons, and your da
738, neither hammer nor axe nor any tool of iron heard in the house, while it was in building. 
The door for the middle chamber was in the right side of the house: and they went up with winding stairs into the middle chamber, and out of the middle into the third. 
So he built the house, and finished it; and covered the house with beams and boards of cedar. 
And then he built chambers against all the house, five cubits high: and they rested on the house with timber of cedar. 
And the word of the LORD came to Solomon, saying, 
Concerning this house which thou art in building, if thou wilt walk in my statutes, and execute my judgments, and keep all my commandments to walk in them; then will I perform my word with thee, which I spake un
771,n of Hosah were thirteen. 
Among these were the divisions of the porters, even among the chief men, having wards one against another, to minister in the house of the LORD. 
And they cast lots, as well the small as the great, according to the house of their fathers, for every gate. 
And the lot eastward fell to Shelemiah. Then for Zechariah his son, a wise counsellor, they cast lots; and his lot came out northward. 
To Obededom southward; and to his sons the house of Asuppim. 
To Shuppim and Hosah the lot came forth westward, with the gate Shallecheth, by the causeway of the going up, ward against ward. 
Eastward were six Levites, northward four a day, southward four a day, and toward Asuppim two and two. 
At Parbar westward, four at the causeway, and two at Par
1049,s, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and the meat offering thereof, and their drink offerings. 
And on the third day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish; 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fourth day ten bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish: 
Their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fifth day nine bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without spot: 

761,LORD: and he shall not judge after the sight of his eyes, neither reprove after the hearing of his ears: 
But with righteousness shall he judge the poor, and reprove with equity for the meek of the earth: and he shall smite the earth: with the rod of his mouth, and with the breath of his lips shall he slay the wicked. 
And righteousness shall be the girdle of his loins, and faithfulness the girdle of his reins. 
The wolf also shall dwell with the lamb, and the leopard shall lie down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling together; and a little child shall lead them. 
And the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie down together: and the lion shall eat straw like the ox. 
And the sucking child shall play on the ho
775,: therefore shall they fall among them that fall: in the time of their visitation they shall be cast down, saith the LORD. 
I will surely consume them, saith the LORD: there shall be no grapes on the vine, nor figs on the fig tree, and the leaf shall fade; and the things that I have given them shall pass away from them. 
Why do we sit still? assemble yourselves, and let us enter into the defenced cities, and let us be silent there: for the LORD our God hath put us to silence, and given us water of gall to drink, because we have sinned against the LORD. 
We looked for peace, but no good came; and for a time of health, and behold trouble! 
The snorting of his horses was heard from Dan: the whole land trembled at the sound of the neighing of his strong ones; for they 
884,afflicted pity should be shewed from his friend; but he forsaketh the fear of the Almighty. 
My brethren have dealt deceitfully as a brook, and as the stream of brooks they pass away; 
Which are blackish by reason of the ice, and wherein the snow is hid: 
What time they wax warm, they vanish: when it is hot, they are consumed out of their place. 
The paths of their way are turned aside; they go to nothing, and perish. 
The troops of Tema looked, the companies of Sheba waited for them. 
They were confounded because they had hoped; they came thither, and were ashamed. 
For now ye are nothing; ye see my casting down, and are afraid. 
Did I say, Bring unto me? or, Give a reward for me of your substance? 
Or, Deliver me from the enemy's hand? or, Redeem me from the hand of the mighty? 
Teach me, and I will hold my tongue: and cause me to understand wherein I have erred. 
How f
886,they are! 
And thou sayest, How doth God know? can he judge through the dark cloud? 
Thick clouds are a covering to him, that he seeth not; and he walketh in the circuit of heaven. 
Hast thou marked the old way which wicked men have trodden? 
Which were cut down out of time, whose foundation was overflown with a flood: 
Which said unto God, Depart from us: and what can the Almighty do for them? 
Yet he filled their houses with good things: but the counsel of the wicked is far from me. 
The righteous see it, and are glad: and the innocent laugh them to scorn. 
Whereas our substance is not cut down, but the remnant of them the fire consumeth. 
Acquaint now thyself with him, and be at peace: thereby good shall come unto thee. 
Receive, I pray thee, the law from his mouth, and lay up his words in thine heart. 
If thou return to the Almighty, thou shalt be built up, thou shalt p
842,
And will send unto Babylon fanners, that shall fan her, and shall empty her land: for in the day of trouble they shall be against her round about. 
Against him that bendeth let the archer bend his bow, and against him that lifteth himself up in his brigandine: and spare ye not her young men; destroy ye utterly all her host. 
Thus the slain shall fall in the land of the Chaldeans, and they that are thrust through in her streets. 
For Israel hath not been forsaken, nor Judah of his God, of the LORD of hosts; though their land was filled with sin against the Holy One of Israel. 
Flee out of the midst of Babylon, and deliver every man his soul: be not cut off in her iniquity; for this is the time of the LORD's vengeance; he will render unto her a recompence. 
Babylon hath been a golden cup in the LORD's hand, that made all the earth 
1039,f thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not defraud thy neighbour, neither rob him: the wages of him that is hired shall not abide with thee all night until the morning. 
Thou shalt not curse the deaf, nor put a stumblingblock before the blind, but shalt fear thy God: I am the LORD. 
Ye shall do no unrighteousness in judgment: thou shalt not respect the person of the poor, nor honor the person of the mighty: but in righteousness shalt thou judge thy neighbour. 
Thou shalt not go up and down as a talebearer among thy people: neither shalt thou stand against the blood of thy neighbour; I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not hate thy brother in thine heart: thou shalt in any wise rebuke thy neighbour, and not suffer sin upon him. 
Thou shalt not avenge, nor bear any grudge against the children of thy people, but thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself: I am the LORD. 
Ye shall keep my statutes. Thou shalt not let thy cattle gender with a diverse kind: thou shalt not sow thy field with mingled seed: neither shall a garment mingled of li
1000,h the stumblingblock of his iniquity before his face, and cometh to the prophet; I the LORD will answer him that cometh according to the multitude of his idols; 
That I may take the house of Israel in their own heart, because they are all estranged from me through their idols. 
Therefore say unto the house of Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Repent, and turn yourselves from your idols; and turn away your faces from all your abominations. 
For every one of the house of Israel, or of the stranger that sojourneth in Israel, which separateth himself from me, and setteth up his idols in his heart, and putteth the stumblingblock of his iniquity before his face, and cometh to a prophet to enquire of him concerning me; I the LORD will answer him by myself: 
And I will set my face against that man, and will make him a sign and a proverb, and I will cut him off from the midst of my people; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
And if the prophet be deceived when he hath spoken a thing, I the LO
943,battle against Benjamin; and the men of Israel put themselves in array to fight against them at Gibeah. 
And the children of Benjamin came forth out of Gibeah, and destroyed down to the ground of the Israelites that day twenty and two thousand men. 
And the people the men of Israel encouraged themselves, and set their battle again in array in the place where they put themselves in array the first day. 
(And the children of Israel went up and wept before the LORD until even, and asked counsel of the LORD, saying, Shall I go up again to battle against the children of Benjamin my brother? And the LORD said, Go up against him.) 
And the children of Israel came near against the children of Benjamin the second day. 
And Benjamin went forth against them out of Gibeah the second day, and destroyed down to the ground of the children of Israel again eighteen thousand men; all these drew the sword. 
Then all the children of Israel, and all 
771,to pass at noon, that Elijah mocked them, and said, Cry aloud: for he is a god; either he is talking, or he is pursuing, or he is in a journey, or peradventure he sleepeth, and must be awaked. 
And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their manner with knives and lancets, till the blood gushed out upon them. 
And it came to pass, when midday was past, and they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice, that there was neither voice, nor any to answer, nor any that regarded. 
And Elijah said unto all the people, Come near unto me. And all the people came near unto him. And he repaired the altar of the LORD that was broken down. 
And Elijah took twelve stones, according to the number of the tribes of the sons of Jacob, unto whom the 
779,kened unto a foolish man, which built his house upon the sand: 
And the rain descended, and the floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house; and it fell: and great was the fall of it. 
And it came to pass, when Jesus had ended these sayings, the people were astonished at his doctrine: 
For he taught them as one having authority, and not as the scribes. 
When he was come down from the mountain, great multitudes followed him. 
And, behold, there came a leper and worshipped him, saying, Lord, if thou wilt, thou canst make me clean. 
And Jesus put forth his hand, and touched him, saying, I will; be thou clean. And immediately his leprosy was cleansed. 
And Jesus saith unto him, See thou tell no man; but go thy way, shew thyself to the priest, and offer the gi
852,ter in by it; because the LORD, the God of Israel, hath entered in by it, therefore it shall be shut. 
It is for the prince; the prince, he shall sit in it to eat bread before the LORD; he shall enter by the way of the porch of that gate, and shall go out by the way of the same. 
Then brought he me the way of the north gate before the house: and I looked, and, behold, the glory of the LORD filled the house of the LORD: and I fell upon my face. 
And the LORD said unto me, Son of man, mark well, and behold with thine eyes, and hear with thine ears all that I say unto thee concerning all the ordinances of the house of the LORD, and all the laws thereof; and mark well the entering in of the house, with every going forth of the sanctuary. 
And thou shalt say to the rebellious, even to the house of Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD; O ye house of I
880,
Now therefore let me alone, that my wrath may wax hot against them, and that I may consume them: and I will make of thee a great nation. 
And Moses besought the LORD his God, and said, LORD, why doth thy wrath wax hot against thy people, which thou hast brought forth out of the land of Egypt with great power, and with a mighty hand? 
Wherefore should the Egyptians speak, and say, For mischief did he bring them out, to slay them in the mountains, and to consume them from the face of the earth? Turn from thy fierce wrath, and repent of this evil against thy people. 
Remember Abraham, Isaac, and Israel, thy servants, to whom thou swarest by thine own self, and saidst unto them, I will multiply your seed as the stars of heaven, and all this land that I have spoken of will I give unto your seed, and they shall inherit it for ever. 
And the LORD repented of the evil which 
780,ill visit you, and perform my good word toward you, in causing you to return to this place. 
For I know the thoughts that I think toward you, saith the LORD, thoughts of peace, and not of evil, to give you an expected end. 
Then shall ye call upon me, and ye shall go and pray unto me, and I will hearken unto you. 
And ye shall seek me, and find me, when ye shall search for me with all your heart. 
And I will be found of you, saith the LORD: and I will turn away your captivity, and I will gather you from all the nations, and from all the places whither I have driven you, saith the LORD; and I will bring you again into the place whence I caused you to be carried away captive. 
Because ye have said, The LORD hath raised us up prophets in Babylon; 
Know that thus saith the 
766,r thou didst it secretly: but I will do this thing before all Israel, and before the sun. 
And David said unto Nathan, I have sinned against the LORD. And Nathan said unto David, The LORD also hath put away thy sin; thou shalt not die. 
Howbeit, because by this deed thou hast given great occasion to the enemies of the LORD to blaspheme, the child also that is born unto thee shall surely die. 
And Nathan departed unto his house. And the LORD struck the child that Uriah's wife bare unto David, and it was very sick. 
David therefore besought God for the child; and David fasted, and went in, and lay all night upon the earth. 
And the elders of his house arose, and went to him, to raise him up from the earth: but he would not, neither did he eat bread with them
910,id so. 
And it was told the king of Egypt that the people fled: and the heart of Pharaoh and of his servants was turned against the people, and they said, Why have we done this, that we have let Israel go from serving us? 
And he made ready his chariot, and took his people with him: 
And he took six hundred chosen chariots, and all the chariots of Egypt, and captains over every one of them. 
And the LORD hardened the heart of Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he pursued after the children of Israel: and the children of Israel went out with an high hand. 
But the Egyptians pursued after them, all the horses and chariots of Pharaoh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them encamping by the sea, beside Pihahiroth, before Baalzephon. 
And when Pharaoh drew nigh, the children of Israel lifted up their eyes, and, behold, the Egyptians marched after them; and they were sore afraid: and the children of 
737,e blind also? 
Jesus said unto them, If ye were blind, ye should have no sin: but now ye say, We see; therefore your sin remaineth. 
Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that entereth not by the door into the sheepfold, but climbeth up some other way, the same is a thief and a robber. 
But he that entereth in by the door is the shepherd of the sheep. 
To him the porter openeth; and the sheep hear his voice: and he calleth his own sheep by name, and leadeth them out. 
And when he putteth forth his own sheep, he goeth before them, and the sheep follow him: for they know his voice. 
And a stranger will they not follow, but will flee from him: for they know not the voice of strangers. 
This parable spake Jesus unto them: but they und
899,him, 
Saying, Behold, we go up to Jerusalem; and the Son of man shall be delivered unto the chief priests, and unto the scribes; and they shall condemn him to death, and shall deliver him to the Gentiles: 
And they shall mock him, and shall scourge him, and shall spit upon him, and shall kill him: and the third day he shall rise again. 
And James and John, the sons of Zebedee, come unto him, saying, Master, we would that thou shouldest do for us whatsoever we shall desire. 
And he said unto them, What would ye that I should do for you? 
They said unto him, Grant unto us that we may sit, one on thy right hand, and the other on thy left hand, in thy glory. 
But Jesus said unto them, Ye know not what ye ask: can ye drink of the cup that I drink of? and be baptized with the baptism that I am baptized with? 
And they said unto him, We can. And Jesus said unto them, Ye shall indeed drink of t
766,of iron: and one bearing a shield went before him. 
And he stood and cried unto the armies of Israel, and said unto them, Why are ye come out to set your battle in array? am not I a Philistine, and ye servants to Saul? choose you a man for you, and let him come down to me. 
If he be able to fight with me, and to kill me, then will we be your servants: but if I prevail against him, and kill him, then shall ye be our servants, and serve us. 
And the Philistine said, I defy the armies of Israel this day; give me a man, that we may fight together. 
When Saul and all Israel heard those words of the Philistine, they were dismayed, and greatly afraid. 
Now David was the son of that Ephrathite of Bethlehemjudah, whose name was Jesse; and he had eight sons: and the
765,hall return even to the LORD, and he shall be intreated of them, and shall heal them. 
In that day shall there be a highway out of Egypt to Assyria, and the Assyrian shall come into Egypt, and the Egyptian into Assyria, and the Egyptians shall serve with the Assyrians. 
In that day shall Israel be the third with Egypt and with Assyria, even a blessing in the midst of the land: 
Whom the LORD of hosts shall bless, saying, Blessed be Egypt my people, and Assyria the work of my hands, and Israel mine inheritance. 
In the year that Tartan came unto Ashdod, (when Sargon the king of Assyria sent him,) and fought against Ashdod, and took it; 
At the same time spake the LORD by Isaiah the son of Amoz, saying, Go and loose the sackcloth from off thy loins, and put
959,o thy way for this time; when I have a convenient season, I will call for thee. 
He hoped also that money should have been given him of Paul, that he might loose him: wherefore he sent for him the oftener, and communed with him. 
But after two years Porcius Festus came into Felix' room: and Felix, willing to shew the Jews a pleasure, left Paul bound. 
Now when Festus was come into the province, after three days he ascended from Caesarea to Jerusalem. 
Then the high priest and the chief of the Jews informed him against Paul, and besought him, 
And desired favour against him, that he would send for him to Jerusalem, laying wait in the way to kill him. 
But Festus answered, that Paul should be kept at Caesarea, and that he himself would depart shortly thither. 
Let them therefore, said he, which among you are able, go down with me, and accuse this man, if there be any wickedness in him. 
And when he had tarried among them more than ten days, he wen
847, 
And Judah gathered themselves together, to ask help of the LORD: even out of all the cities of Judah they came to seek the LORD. 
And Jehoshaphat stood in the congregation of Judah and Jerusalem, in the house of the LORD, before the new court, 
And said, O LORD God of our fathers, art not thou God in heaven? and rulest not thou over all the kingdoms of the heathen? and in thine hand is there not power and might, so that none is able to withstand thee? 
Art not thou our God, who didst drive out the inhabitants of this land before thy people Israel, and gavest it to the seed of Abraham thy friend for ever? 
And they dwelt therein, and have built thee a sanctuary therein for thy name, saying, 
If, when evil cometh upon us, as the sword, judgment, or pestilence, or famine, we stand before this house, and in thy presence, (for thy name is
913,zer, and brought them to Jerusalem. 
And from Betah, and from Berothai, cities of Hadadezer, king David took exceeding much brass. 
When Toi king of Hamath heard that David had smitten all the host of Hadadezer, 
Then Toi sent Joram his son unto king David, to salute him, and to bless him, because he had fought against Hadadezer, and smitten him: for Hadadezer had wars with Toi. And Joram brought with him vessels of silver, and vessels of gold, and vessels of brass: 
Which also king David did dedicate unto the LORD, with the silver and gold that he had dedicated of all nations which he subdued; 
Of Syria, and of Moab, and of the children of Ammon, and of the Philistines, and of Amalek, and of the spoil of Hadadezer, son of Rehob, king of Zobah. 
And David gat him a name when he returned from smiting of the Syrians in the valley of salt, being eighteen thousand men. 
And he put garrisons in Edom; thro
762,y should seek the Lord, if haply they might feel after him, and find him, though he be not far from every one of us: 
For in him we live, and move, and have our being; as certain also of your own poets have said, For we are also his offspring. 
Forasmuch then as we are the offspring of God, we ought not to think that the Godhead is like unto gold, or silver, or stone, graven by art and man's device. 
And the times of this ignorance God winked at; but now commandeth all men every where to repent: 
Because he hath appointed a day, in the which he will judge the world in righteousness by that man whom he hath ordained; whereof he hath given assurance unto all men, in that he hath raised him from the dead. 
And when they heard of the resurrection of the de
951,not Naomi, call me Mara: for the Almighty hath dealt very bitterly with me. 
I went out full and the LORD hath brought me home again empty: why then call ye me Naomi, seeing the LORD hath testified against me, and the Almighty hath afflicted me? 
So Naomi returned, and Ruth the Moabitess, her daughter in law, with her, which returned out of the country of Moab: and they came to Bethlehem in the beginning of barley harvest. 
And Naomi had a kinsman of her husband's, a mighty man of wealth, of the family of Elimelech; and his name was Boaz. 
And Ruth the Moabitess said unto Naomi, Let me now go to the field, and glean ears of corn after him in whose sight I shall find grace. And she said unto her, Go, my daughter. 
And she went, and came, and gleaned in the field after the reapers: and her hap was to light on a part of the field belonging unto Boaz, who was of the kindred of Elimelech. 
And, behold, Boaz came from Bethlehem, and said unto 
1077,for them that remain, seeing we have sworn by the LORD that we will not give them of our daughters to wives? 
And they said, What one is there of the tribes of Israel that came not up to Mizpeh to the LORD? And, behold, there came none to the camp from Jabeshgilead to the assembly. 
For the people were numbered, and, behold, there were none of the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead there. 
And the congregation sent thither twelve thousand men of the valiantest, and commanded them, saying, Go and smite the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead with the edge of the sword, with the women and the children. 
And this is the thing that ye shall do, Ye shall utterly destroy every male, and every woman that hath lain by man. 
And they found among the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead four hundred young virgins, that had known no man by lying with any male: and they brought them unto the camp to Shiloh, which is in the land of Canaan. 
And the whole congregation sent some to speak to the children of Benjamin that were in the rock Rimmon, and to call peaceably unto them. 
And Benjamin came aga
821,nd fifty. 
These were they that were numbered of the families of the Kohathites, all that might do service in the tabernacle of the congregation, which Moses and Aaron did number according to the commandment of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And those that were numbered of the sons of Gershon, throughout their families, and by the house of their fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old, every one that entereth into the service, for the work in the tabernacle of the congregation, 
Even those that were numbered of them, throughout their families, by the house of their fathers, were two thousand and six hundred and thirty. 
These are they that were numbered of the families of the sons of Gershon, of all that might do service in the tabernacle of the congregation, whom Moses and Aaron 
967, thou Jesus of Nazareth? art thou come to destroy us? I know thee who thou art; the Holy One of God. 
And Jesus rebuked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of him. And when the devil had thrown him in the midst, he came out of him, and hurt him not. 
And they were all amazed, and spake among themselves, saying, What a word is this! for with authority and power he commandeth the unclean spirits, and they come out. 
And the fame of him went out into every place of the country round about. 
And he arose out of the synagogue, and entered into Simon's house. And Simon's wife's mother was taken with a great fever; and they besought him for her. 
And he stood over her, and rebuked the fever; and it left her: and immediately she arose and ministered unto them. 
Now when the sun was setting, all they that had any sick with divers diseases brought them unto him; and he laid his hands on every one of them, and healed them. 
And devils also came out of many, 
1029, abomination. 
Whatsoever hath no fins nor scales in the waters, that shall be an abomination unto you. 
And these are they which ye shall have in abomination among the fowls; they shall not be eaten, they are an abomination: the eagle, and the ossifrage, and the ospray, 
And the vulture, and the kite after his kind; 
Every raven after his kind; 
And the owl, and the night hawk, and the cuckow, and the hawk after his kind, 
And the little owl, and the cormorant, and the great owl, 
And the swan, and the pelican, and the gier eagle, 
And the stork, the heron after her kind, and the lapwing, and the bat. 
All fowls that creep, going upon all four, shall be an abomination unto you. 
Yet these may ye eat of every flying creeping thing that goeth upon all four, which have legs above their feet, to leap withal upon the earth; 
Even these of them ye may eat; the locust after his kind, and the bald locust after his kind, and the beetle after his kind, and the grasshopper after his kind. 
But all other flying creeping thin
1041, it. 
And in the eleventh year of Zedekiah, in the fourth month, the ninth day of the month, the city was broken up. 
And all the princes of the king of Babylon came in, and sat in the middle gate, even Nergalsharezer, Samgarnebo, Sarsechim, Rabsaris, Nergalsharezer, Rabmag, with all the residue of the princes of the king of Babylon. 
And it came to pass, that when Zedekiah the king of Judah saw them, and all the men of war, then they fled, and went forth out of the city by night, by the way of the king's garden, by the gate betwixt the two walls: and he went out the way of the plain. 
But the Chaldeans' army pursued after them, and overtook Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho: and when they had taken him, they brought him up to Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon to Riblah in the land of Hamath, where he gave judgment upon him. 
Then the king of Babylon slew the sons of Zedekiah in Riblah before his eyes: also the king of Babylon slew all the nobles of Judah. 
Moreover he put out Zedekiah's eyes, and bound him with chains, to carry
1079,r an inheritance for your children after you for ever. 
And thou, Solomon my son, know thou the God of thy father, and serve him with a perfect heart and with a willing mind: for the LORD searcheth all hearts, and understandeth all the imaginations of the thoughts: if thou seek him, he will be found of thee; but if thou forsake him, he will cast thee off for ever. 
Take heed now; for the LORD hath chosen thee to build an house for the sanctuary: be strong, and do it. 
Then David gave to Solomon his son the pattern of the porch, and of the houses thereof, and of the treasuries thereof, and of the upper chambers thereof, and of the inner parlours thereof, and of the place of the mercy seat, 
And the pattern of all that he had by the spirit, of the courts of the house of the LORD, and of all the chambers round about, of the treasuries of the house of God, and of the treasuries of the dedicated things: 
Also for the courses of the priests and the Levites, and for all the work of the service of the house of the LORD, and for all the vessels of service in the house of 
1029,ildren of Israel pitched their tents. 
At the commandment of the LORD the children of Israel journeyed, and at the commandment of the LORD they pitched: as long as the cloud abode upon the tabernacle they rested in their tents. 
And when the cloud tarried long upon the tabernacle many days, then the children of Israel kept the charge of the LORD, and journeyed not. 
And so it was, when the cloud was a few days upon the tabernacle; according to the commandment of the LORD they abode in their tents, and according to the commandment of the LORD they journeyed. 
And so it was, when the cloud abode from even unto the morning, and that the cloud was taken up in the morning, then they journeyed: whether it was by day or by night that the cloud was taken up, they journeyed. 
Or whether it were two days, or a month, or a year, that the cloud tarried upon the tabernacle, remaining thereon, the children of Israel abode in their tents, and journeyed not: but when it was taken up, they journeyed. 
At the commandment of the LOR
981,him. 
For whosoever shall call upon the name of the Lord shall be saved. 
How then shall they call on him in whom they have not believed? and how shall they believe in him of whom they have not heard? and how shall they hear without a preacher? 
And how shall they preach, except they be sent? as it is written, How beautiful are the feet of them that preach the gospel of peace, and bring glad tidings of good things! 
But they have not all obeyed the gospel. For Esaias saith, Lord, who hath believed our report? 
So then faith cometh by hearing, and hearing by the word of God. 
But I say, Have they not heard? Yes verily, their sound went into all the earth, and their words unto the ends of the world. 
But I say, Did not Israel know? First Moses saith, I will provoke you to jealousy by them that are no people, and by a foolish nation I will anger you. 
But Esaias is very bold, and saith, I was found of them that sought me not; I was made manifest unto them that asked not
1049,mcised; for that were a reproach unto us: 
But in this will we consent unto you: If ye will be as we be, that every male of you be circumcised; 
Then will we give our daughters unto you, and we will take your daughters to us, and we will dwell with you, and we will become one people. 
But if ye will not hearken unto us, to be circumcised; then will we take our daughter, and we will be gone. 
And their words pleased Hamor, and Shechem Hamor's son. 
And the young man deferred not to do the thing, because he had delight in Jacob's daughter: and he was more honourable than all the house of his father. 
And Hamor and Shechem his son came unto the gate of their city, and communed with the men of their city, saying, 
These men are peaceable with us; therefore let them dwell in the land, and trade therein; for the land, behold, it is large enough for them; let us take their daughters to us for wives, and let us give them our daughters. 
Only herein will the men consent unto us for to dwell with us, to be one people, if every male among us be
769, thou judgest. 
Behold, I was shapen in iniquity; and in sin did my mother conceive me. 
Behold, thou desirest truth in the inward parts: and in the hidden part thou shalt make me to know wisdom. 
Purge me with hyssop, and I shall be clean: wash me, and I shall be whiter than snow. 
Make me to hear joy and gladness; that the bones which thou hast broken may rejoice. 
Hide thy face from my sins, and blot out all mine iniquities. 
Create in me a clean heart, O God; and renew a right spirit within me. 
Cast me not away from thy presence; and take not thy holy spirit from me. 
Restore unto me the joy of thy salvation; and uphold me with thy free spirit. 
Then will I teach transgressors thy ways; and sinners shall be converted unto thee. 
Deliver me from bloodguil
1060,ow by reason of the cold; therefore shall he beg in harvest, and have nothing. 
Counsel in the heart of man is like deep water; but a man of understanding will draw it out. 
Most men will proclaim every one his own goodness: but a faithful man who can find? 
The just man walketh in his integrity: his children are blessed after him. 
A king that sitteth in the throne of judgment scattereth away all evil with his eyes. 
Who can say, I have made my heart clean, I am pure from my sin? 
Divers weights, and divers measures, both of them are alike abomination to the LORD. 
Even a child is known by his doings, whether his work be pure, and whether it be right. 
The hearing ear, and the seeing eye, the LORD hath made even both of them. 
Love not sleep, lest thou come to poverty; open thine eyes, and thou shalt be satisfied with bread. 
It is naught, it is naught, saith the buyer: but when he is gone his way, then he boasteth. 
There is gold, and a multitude of rubies: but the lips of knowledge are a precious jewel. 
Take his garment that is surety for a
780,ild this house, and to make up these walls? 
We asked their names also, to certify thee, that we might write the names of the men that were the chief of them. 
And thus they returned us answer, saying, We are the servants of the God of heaven and earth, and build the house that was builded these many years ago, which a great king of Israel builded and set up. 
But after that our fathers had provoked the God of heaven unto wrath, he gave them into the hand of Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon, the Chaldean, who destroyed this house, and carried the people away into Babylon. 
But in the first year of Cyrus the king of Babylon the same king Cyrus made a decree to build this house of God. 
And the vessels also of gold and silver of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar to
785,make it desolate from Teman; and they of Dedan shall fall by the sword. 
And I will lay my vengeance upon Edom by the hand of my people Israel: and they shall do in Edom according to mine anger and according to my fury; and they shall know my vengeance, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because the Philistines have dealt by revenge, and have taken vengeance with a despiteful heart, to destroy it for the old hatred; 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will stretch out mine hand upon the Philistines, and I will cut off the Cherethims, and destroy the remnant of the sea coast. 
And I will execute great vengeance upon them with furious rebukes; and they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall lay my vengeance upon them. 
And it came to pass in the eleve
873,very great trembling. 
And the watchmen of Saul in Gibeah of Benjamin looked; and, behold, the multitude melted away, and they went on beating down one another. 
Then said Saul unto the people that were with him, Number now, and see who is gone from us. And when they had numbered, behold, Jonathan and his armourbearer were not there. 
And Saul said unto Ahiah, Bring hither the ark of God. For the ark of God was at that time with the children of Israel. 
And it came to pass, while Saul talked unto the priest, that the noise that was in the host of the Philistines went on and increased: and Saul said unto the priest, Withdraw thine hand. 
And Saul and all the people that were with him assembled themselves, and they came to the battle: and, behold, every man's sword was against his fellow, and there was a very great discomfiture. 
Moreover the Hebrews that were wi
969,, behold, two men stood by them in shining garments: 
And as they were afraid, and bowed down their faces to the earth, they said unto them, Why seek ye the living among the dead? 
He is not here, but is risen: remember how he spake unto you when he was yet in Galilee, 
Saying, The Son of man must be delivered into the hands of sinful men, and be crucified, and the third day rise again. 
And they remembered his words, 
And returned from the sepulchre, and told all these things unto the eleven, and to all the rest. 
It was Mary Magdalene and Joanna, and Mary the mother of James, and other women that were with them, which told these things unto the apostles. 
And their words seemed to them as idle tales, and they believed them not. 
Then arose Peter, and ran unto the sepulchre; and stooping down, he beheld the linen clothes laid by themselves, and departed, wondering in himself at that which was come to pass. 
And, behold, two of them went that same day to 
801,saph the son of Reuel. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty and five thousand and six hundred and fifty. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Reuben were an hundred thousand and fifty and one thousand and four hundred and fifty, throughout their armies. And they shall set forth in the second rank. 
Then the tabernacle of the congregation shall set forward with the camp of the Levites in the midst of the camp: as they encamp, so shall they set forward, every man in his place by their standards. 
On the west side shall be the standard of the camp of Ephraim according to their armies: and the captain of the sons of Ephraim shall be Elishama the son of Ammihud. 
And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were forty thousand and five hundred. 
And by him sha
914,en shall he bring with a bullock a meat offering of three tenth deals of flour mingled with half an hin of oil. 
And thou shalt bring for a drink offering half an hin of wine, for an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
Thus shall it be done for one bullock, or for one ram, or for a lamb, or a kid. 
According to the number that ye shall prepare, so shall ye do to every one according to their number. 
All that are born of the country shall do these things after this manner, in offering an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And if a stranger sojourn with you, or whosoever be among you in your generations, and will offer an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD; as ye do, so he shall do. 
One ordinance shall be both for you of the congregation, and also for the stranger that sojourneth with you, an ordinance for ever in your generations: as ye ar
1034, they might send them out of the land in haste; for they said, We be all dead men. 
And the people took their dough before it was leavened, their kneadingtroughs being bound up in their clothes upon their shoulders. 
And the children of Israel did according to the word of Moses; and they borrowed of the Egyptians jewels of silver, and jewels of gold, and raiment: 
And the LORD gave the people favour in the sight of the Egyptians, so that they lent unto them such things as they required. And they spoiled the Egyptians. 
And the children of Israel journeyed from Rameses to Succoth, about six hundred thousand on foot that were men, beside children. 
And a mixed multitude went up also with them; and flocks, and herds, even very much cattle. 
And they baked unleavened cakes of the dough which they brought forth out of Egypt, for it was not leavened; because they were thrust out of Egypt, and could not tarry, neither had they prepared for themselves any victual. 
Now the sojourning of the children of Israel, who dwelt in Egy
1045,his two tenons. 
And for the other side of the tabernacle, which is toward the north corner, he made twenty boards, 
And their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward he made six boards. 
And two boards made he for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they were coupled beneath, and coupled together at the head thereof, to one ring: thus he did to both of them in both the corners. 
And there were eight boards; and their sockets were sixteen sockets of silver, under every board two sockets. 
And he made bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the one side of the tabernacle, 
And five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle, and five bars for the boards of the tabernacle for the sides westward. 
And he made the middle bar to shoot through the boards from the one end to the other. 
And he overlaid the boards with gold, and made their rings of gold to be places for the bars, and overlaid the bars with g
1048,prophet is a snare of a fowler in all his ways, and hatred in the house of his God. 
They have deeply corrupted themselves, as in the days of Gibeah: therefore he will remember their iniquity, he will visit their sins. 
I found Israel like grapes in the wilderness; I saw your fathers as the firstripe in the fig tree at her first time: but they went to Baalpeor, and separated themselves unto that shame; and their abominations were according as they loved. 
As for Ephraim, their glory shall fly away like a bird, from the birth, and from the womb, and from the conception. 
Though they bring up their children, yet will I bereave them, that there shall not be a man left: yea, woe also to them when I depart from them! 
Ephraim, as I saw Tyrus, is planted in a pleasant place: but Ephraim shall bring forth his children to the murderer. 
Give them, O LORD: what wilt thou give? give them a miscarrying womb and dry breasts. 
All their wickedness is in Gilgal: for there I hated them: for the wickedness of their doings I will drive them out of m
857,ead, or in his bald forehead, as the leprosy appeareth in the skin of the flesh; 
He is a leprous man, he is unclean: the priest shall pronounce him utterly unclean; his plague is in his head. 
And the leper in whom the plague is, his clothes shall be rent, and his head bare, and he shall put a covering upon his upper lip, and shall cry, Unclean, unclean. 
All the days wherein the plague shall be in him he shall be defiled; he is unclean: he shall dwell alone; without the camp shall his habitation be. 
The garment also that the plague of leprosy is in, whether it be a woollen garment, or a linen garment; 
Whether it be in the warp, or woof; of linen, or of woollen; whether in a skin, or in any thing made of skin; 
And if the plague be greenish or reddish in the garment, or in the skin, either in the warp, or in the woof, or in any thing of skin;
1035,he four winds of the earth, that the wind should not blow on the earth, nor on the sea, nor on any tree. 
And I saw another angel ascending from the east, having the seal of the living God: and he cried with a loud voice to the four angels, to whom it was given to hurt the earth and the sea, 
Saying, Hurt not the earth, neither the sea, nor the trees, till we have sealed the servants of our God in their foreheads. 
And I heard the number of them which were sealed: and there were sealed an hundred and forty and four thousand of all the tribes of the children of Israel. 
Of the tribe of Juda were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Reuben were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Gad were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Aser were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Nephthalim were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Manasses were sealed twelve thousand. 
Of the tribe of Simeon were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Levi were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Issachar were sealed twelve 
882,em; 
And say unto them, Hear ye the word of the LORD, ye kings of Judah, and all Judah, and all the inhabitants of Jerusalem, that enter in by these gates: 
Thus saith the LORD; Take heed to yourselves, and bear no burden on the sabbath day, nor bring it in by the gates of Jerusalem; 
Neither carry forth a burden out of your houses on the sabbath day, neither do ye any work, but hallow ye the sabbath day, as I commanded your fathers. 
But they obeyed not, neither inclined their ear, but made their neck stiff, that they might not hear, nor receive instruction. 
And it shall come to pass, if ye diligently hearken unto me, saith the LORD, to bring in no burden through the gates of this city on the sabbath day, but hallow the sabbath day, to do no work therein; 
Then shall there enter into the gates of this city kings and princes sitting upon the throne of David, riding in 
933,rd him, and saved him out of all his troubles. 
The angel of the LORD encampeth round about them that fear him, and delivereth them. 
O taste and see that the LORD is good: blessed is the man that trusteth in him. 
O fear the LORD, ye his saints: for there is no want to them that fear him. 
The young lions do lack, and suffer hunger: but they that seek the LORD shall not want any good thing. 
Come, ye children, hearken unto me: I will teach you the fear of the LORD. 
What man is he that desireth life, and loveth many days, that he may see good? 
Keep thy tongue from evil, and thy lips from speaking guile. 
Depart from evil, and do good; seek peace, and pursue it. 
The eyes of the LORD are upon the righteous, and his ears are open unto their cry. 
The face of the LORD is against them that do evil, to cut off the remembrance of them from the earth. 
The righteous cry, and the LORD heareth, and delivereth them out of all t
762,which he spake in the name of the LORD. 
And Ornan turned back, and saw the angel; and his four sons with him hid themselves. Now Ornan was threshing wheat. 
And as David came to Ornan, Ornan looked and saw David, and went out of the threshingfloor, and bowed himself to David with his face to the ground. 
Then David said to Ornan, Grant me the place of this threshingfloor, that I may build an altar therein unto the LORD: thou shalt grant it me for the full price: that the plague may be stayed from the people. 
And Ornan said unto David, Take it to thee, and let my lord the king do that which is good in his eyes: lo, I give thee the oxen also for burnt offerings, and the threshing instruments for wood, and the wheat for the meat offering; I give it all.
803,ut the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken away from them, and then shall they fast in those days. 
And he spake also a parable unto them; No man putteth a piece of a new garment upon an old; if otherwise, then both the new maketh a rent, and the piece that was taken out of the new agreeth not with the old. 
And no man putteth new wine into old bottles; else the new wine will burst the bottles, and be spilled, and the bottles shall perish. 
But new wine must be put into new bottles; and both are preserved. 
No man also having drunk old wine straightway desireth new: for he saith, The old is better. 
And it came to pass on the second sabbath after the first, that he went through the corn fields; and his disciples plucked the ears of corn, and did eat, rubbing them in their hands
850,even years let ye go every man his brother an Hebrew, which hath been sold unto thee; and when he hath served thee six years, thou shalt let him go free from thee: but your fathers hearkened not unto me, neither inclined their ear. 
And ye were now turned, and had done right in my sight, in proclaiming liberty every man to his neighbour; and ye had made a covenant before me in the house which is called by my name: 
But ye turned and polluted my name, and caused every man his servant, and every man his handmaid, whom he had set at liberty at their pleasure, to return, and brought them into subjection, to be unto you for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ye have not hearkened unto me, in proclaiming liberty, every one to his brother, and every man to his neighbour: behold, I proclaim a liberty for you, saith the LO
847,in the house of the LORD. 
And the king stood in his place, and made a covenant before the LORD, to walk after the LORD, and to keep his commandments, and his testimonies, and his statutes, with all his heart, and with all his soul, to perform the words of the covenant which are written in this book. 
And he caused all that were present in Jerusalem and Benjamin to stand to it. And the inhabitants of Jerusalem did according to the covenant of God, the God of their fathers. 
And Josiah took away all the abominations out of all the countries that pertained to the children of Israel, and made all that were present in Israel to serve, even to serve the LORD their God. And all his days they departed not from following the LORD, the God of their fathers. 
Moreover Josiah kept a passover unto the LORD in Jerusalem: and they killed the passove
997,min before Israel: and the children of Israel destroyed of the Benjamites that day twenty and five thousand and an hundred men: all these drew the sword. 
So the children of Benjamin saw that they were smitten: for the men of Israel gave place to the Benjamites, because they trusted unto the liers in wait which they had set beside Gibeah. 
And the liers in wait hasted, and rushed upon Gibeah; and the liers in wait drew themselves along, and smote all the city with the edge of the sword. 
Now there was an appointed sign between the men of Israel and the liers in wait, that they should make a great flame with smoke rise up out of the city. 
And when the men of Israel retired in the battle, Benjamin began to smite and kill of the men of Israel about thirty persons: for they said, Surely they are smitten down before us, as in the first battle. 
But when the flame began to arise up out of the city with a pillar of smoke, the Benjamites looked behind them, and, behold, the flame of the ci
962,or Moses in the plains of Moab thirty days: so the days of weeping and mourning for Moses were ended. 
And Joshua the son of Nun was full of the spirit of wisdom; for Moses had laid his hands upon him: and the children of Israel hearkened unto him, and did as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And there arose not a prophet since in Israel like unto Moses, whom the LORD knew face to face, 
In all the signs and the wonders, which the LORD sent him to do in the land of Egypt to Pharaoh, and to all his servants, and to all his land, 
And in all that mighty hand, and in all the great terror which Moses shewed in the sight of all Israel. 
Now after the death of Moses the servant of the LORD it came to pass, that the LORD spake unto Joshua the son of Nun, Moses' minister, saying, 
Moses my servant is dead; now therefore arise, go over this Jordan, thou, and all this people, unto the land which I do give to them, even to the children of Israel. 
Every place that t
905,d when he had tasted thereof, he would not drink. 
And they crucified him, and parted his garments, casting lots: that it might be fulfilled which was spoken by the prophet, They parted my garments among them, and upon my vesture did they cast lots. 
And sitting down they watched him there; 
And set up over his head his accusation written, THIS IS JESUS THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
Then were there two thieves crucified with him, one on the right hand, and another on the left. 
And they that passed by reviled him, wagging their heads, 
And saying, Thou that destroyest the temple, and buildest it in three days, save thyself. If thou be the Son of God, come down from the cross. 
Likewise also the chief priests mocking him, with the scribes and elders, said, 
He saved others; himself he cannot save. If he be the King of Israel, let him now come down from the cross, and we will believe him. 
He trusted 
1070,e, O LORD; for thy lovingkindness is good: turn unto me according to the multitude of thy tender mercies. 
And hide not thy face from thy servant; for I am in trouble: hear me speedily. 
Draw nigh unto my soul, and redeem it: deliver me because of mine enemies. 
Thou hast known my reproach, and my shame, and my dishonour: mine adversaries are all before thee. 
Reproach hath broken my heart; and I am full of heaviness: and I looked for some to take pity, but there was none; and for comforters, but I found none. 
They gave me also gall for my meat; and in my thirst they gave me vinegar to drink. 
Let their table become a snare before them: and that which should have been for their welfare, let it become a trap. 
Let their eyes be darkened, that they see not; and make their loins continually to shake. 
Pour out thine indignation upon them, and let thy wrathful anger take hold of them. 
Let their habitation be desolate; and let none dwell in their tents. 
For they persecute him whom thou hast smitten; and they talk to the grief of those whom thou hast wounde
806,son of dragons, and the cruel venom of asps. 
Is not this laid up in store with me, and sealed up among my treasures? 
To me belongeth vengeance and recompence; their foot shall slide in due time: for the day of their calamity is at hand, and the things that shall come upon them make haste. 
For the LORD shall judge his people, and repent himself for his servants, when he seeth that their power is gone, and there is none shut up, or left. 
And he shall say, Where are their gods, their rock in whom they trusted, 
Which did eat the fat of their sacrifices, and drank the wine of their drink offerings? let them rise up and help you, and be your protection. 
See now that I, even I, am he, and there is no god with me: I kill, and I make alive; I wound, and I heal: neither is there any that can deliver
1060,rom the dead dwell in you, he that raised up Christ from the dead shall also quicken your mortal bodies by his Spirit that dwelleth in you. 
Therefore, brethren, we are debtors, not to the flesh, to live after the flesh. 
For if ye live after the flesh, ye shall die: but if ye through the Spirit do mortify the deeds of the body, ye shall live. 
For as many as are led by the Spirit of God, they are the sons of God. 
For ye have not received the spirit of bondage again to fear; but ye have received the Spirit of adoption, whereby we cry, Abba, Father. 
The Spirit itself beareth witness with our spirit, that we are the children of God: 
And if children, then heirs; heirs of God, and joint-heirs with Christ; if so be that we suffer with him, that we may be also glorified together. 
For I reckon that the sufferings of this present time are not worthy to be compared with the glory which shall be revealed in us. 
For the earnest expectation of the creature waiteth for the manifestation of the sons of God. 
For the creature was made subject to vanity, 
805,hich was written was upright, even words of truth. 
The words of the wise are as goads, and as nails fastened by the masters of assemblies, which are given from one shepherd. 
And further, by these, my son, be admonished: of making many books there is no end; and much study is a weariness of the flesh. 
Let us hear the conclusion of the whole matter: Fear God, and keep his commandments: for this is the whole duty of man. 
For God shall bring every work into judgment, with every secret thing, whether it be good, or whether it be evil. 
The song of songs, which is Solomon's. 
Let him kiss me with the kisses of his mouth: for thy love is better than wine. 
Because of the savour of thy good ointments thy name is as ointment poured forth, therefore do the virgins love thee. 
Draw me, we will run aft
995,child; and David fasted, and went in, and lay all night upon the earth. 
And the elders of his house arose, and went to him, to raise him up from the earth: but he would not, neither did he eat bread with them. 
And it came to pass on the seventh day, that the child died. And the servants of David feared to tell him that the child was dead: for they said, Behold, while the child was yet alive, we spake unto him, and he would not hearken unto our voice: how will he then vex himself, if we tell him that the child is dead? 
But when David saw that his servants whispered, David perceived that the child was dead: therefore David said unto his servants, Is the child dead? And they said, He is dead. 
Then David arose from the earth, and washed, and anointed himself, and changed his apparel, and came into the house of the LORD, and worshipped: then he came to his own house; and when he required, they set bread before him, and he did eat. 
Then said his servants unto him, What thing is thi
873,fied the armies of the living God. 
David said moreover, The LORD that delivered me out of the paw of the lion, and out of the paw of the bear, he will deliver me out of the hand of this Philistine. And Saul said unto David, Go, and the LORD be with thee. 
And Saul armed David with his armour, and he put an helmet of brass upon his head; also he armed him with a coat of mail. 
And David girded his sword upon his armour, and he assayed to go; for he had not proved it. And David said unto Saul, I cannot go with these; for I have not proved them. And David put them off him. 
And he took his staff in his hand, and chose him five smooth stones out of the brook, and put them in a shepherd's bag which he had, even in a scrip; and his sling was in his hand: and he drew near to the Philistine. 
And the Philistine came on and drew near unto David; and the man that bare t
1027, on before the LORD, and blew with the trumpets: and the ark of the covenant of the LORD followed them. 
And the armed men went before the priests that blew with the trumpets, and the rereward came after the ark, the priests going on, and blowing with the trumpets. 
And Joshua had commanded the people, saying, Ye shall not shout, nor make any noise with your voice, neither shall any word proceed out of your mouth, until the day I bid you shout; then shall ye shout. 
So the ark of the LORD compassed the city, going about it once: and they came into the camp, and lodged in the camp. 
And Joshua rose early in the morning, and the priests took up the ark of the LORD. 
And seven priests bearing seven trumpets of rams' horns before the ark of the LORD went on continually, and blew with the trumpets: and the armed men went before them; but the rereward came after the ark of the LORD, the priests going on, and blowing with the trumpets. 
And the second day they compassed the city once, and returned into the camp: so the
743,on. 
His roots shall be dried up beneath, and above shall his branch be cut off. 
His remembrance shall perish from the earth, and he shall have no name in the street. 
He shall be driven from light into darkness, and chased out of the world. 
He shall neither have son nor nephew among his people, nor any remaining in his dwellings. 
They that come after him shall be astonied at his day, as they that went before were affrighted. 
Surely such are the dwellings of the wicked, and this is the place of him that knoweth not God. 
Then Job answered and said, 
How long will ye vex my soul, and break me in pieces with words? 
These ten times have ye reproached me: ye are not ashamed that ye make yourselves strange to me. 
And be it indeed th
744,LORD; blood shall be imputed unto that man; he hath shed blood; and that man shall be cut off from among his people: 
To the end that the children of Israel may bring their sacrifices, which they offer in the open field, even that they may bring them unto the LORD, unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, unto the priest, and offer them for peace offerings unto the LORD. 
And the priest shall sprinkle the blood upon the altar of the LORD at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and burn the fat for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And they shall no more offer their sacrifices unto devils, after whom they have gone a whoring. This shall be a statute for ever unto them throughout their generations. 
And thou shalt sa
1022,ibe of the children of Judah toward the coast of Edom southward were Kabzeel, and Eder, and Jagur, 
And Kinah, and Dimonah, and Adadah, 
And Kedesh, and Hazor, and Ithnan, 
Ziph, and Telem, and Bealoth, 
And Hazor, Hadattah, and Kerioth, and Hezron, which is Hazor, 
Amam, and Shema, and Moladah, 
And Hazargaddah, and Heshmon, and Bethpalet, 
And Hazarshual, and Beersheba, and Bizjothjah, 
Baalah, and Iim, and Azem, 
And Eltolad, and Chesil, and Hormah, 
And Ziklag, and Madmannah, and Sansannah, 
And Lebaoth, and Shilhim, and Ain, and Rimmon: all the cities are twenty and nine, with their villages: 
And in the valley, Eshtaol, and Zoreah, and Ashnah, 
And Zanoah, and Engannim, Tappuah, and Enam, 
Jarmuth, and Adullam, Socoh, and Azekah, 
And Sharaim, and Adithaim, and Gederah, and Gederothaim; fourteen cities with their villages: 
Zenan, and Hadashah, and Migdalgad, 
And Dilean, and Mizpeh, and Joktheel, 
Lachish, and Bozkath, and Eglon, 
And Cabbon, and Lahmam, and Kithlish, 
And Gederoth, Bethdagon, and Na
806,d Jebusites, which were not of the children of Israel, 
Their children that were left after them in the land, whom the children of Israel also were not able utterly to destroy, upon those did Solomon levy a tribute of bondservice unto this day. 
But of the children of Israel did Solomon make no bondmen: but they were men of war, and his servants, and his princes, and his captains, and rulers of his chariots, and his horsemen. 
These were the chief of the officers that were over Solomon's work, five hundred and fifty, which bare rule over the people that wrought in the work. 
But Pharaoh's daughter came up out of the city of David unto her house which Solomon had built for her: then did he build Millo. 
And three times in a year did Solomon offer burnt offerings and peace offerings upon the altar
851,my steps, when they wait for my soul. 
Shall they escape by iniquity? in thine anger cast down the people, O God. 
Thou tellest my wanderings: put thou my tears into thy bottle: are they not in thy book? 
When I cry unto thee, then shall mine enemies turn back: this I know; for God is for me. 
In God will I praise his word: in the LORD will I praise his word. 
In God have I put my trust: I will not be afraid what man can do unto me. 
Thy vows are upon me, O God: I will render praises unto thee. 
For thou hast delivered my soul from death: wilt not thou deliver my feet from falling, that I may walk before God in the light of the living? 
Be merciful unto me, O God, be merciful unto me: for my soul trusteth in thee: yea, in the shadow of thy wings will I make my refuge, until these calamities be overpast. 
I will cry unto God most high; unto
986,that the LORD thy God brought thee out thence through a mighty hand and by a stretched out arm: therefore the LORD thy God commanded thee to keep the sabbath day. 
Honour thy father and thy mother, as the LORD thy God hath commanded thee; that thy days may be prolonged, and that it may go well with thee, in the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
Thou shalt not kill. 
Neither shalt thou commit adultery. 
Neither shalt thou steal. 
Neither shalt thou bear false witness against thy neighbour. 
Neither shalt thou desire thy neighbour's wife, neither shalt thou covet thy neighbour's house, his field, or his manservant, or his maidservant, his ox, or his ass, or any thing that is thy neighbour's. 
These words the LORD spake unto all your assembly in the mount out of the midst of the fire, of the cloud, and of the thick darkness, with a great voice: and he added no more. And he wrote them in two tables of stone, and delivered them unto me. 
And it came to pass, when ye he
734,t my table with horses and chariots, with mighty men, and with all men of war, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will set my glory among the heathen, and all the heathen shall see my judgment that I have executed, and my hand that I have laid upon them. 
So the house of Israel shall know that I am the LORD their God from that day and forward. 
And the heathen shall know that the house of Israel went into captivity for their iniquity: because they trespassed against me, therefore hid I my face from them, and gave them into the hand of their enemies: so fell they all by the sword. 
According to their uncleanness and according to their transgressions have I done unto them, and hid my face from them. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD;
872, up; ye shall leave none of it until the morrow: I am the LORD. 
Therefore shall ye keep my commandments, and do them: I am the LORD. 
Neither shall ye profane my holy name; but I will be hallowed among the children of Israel: I am the LORD which hallow you, 
That brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and say unto them, Concerning the feasts of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be holy convocations, even these are my feasts. 
Six days shall work be done: but the seventh day is the sabbath of rest, an holy convocation; ye shall do no work therein: it is the sabbath of the LORD in all your dwellings. 
These are the feasts of the LORD, even holy convocations, which ye shall proclaim in their seasons. 
In the fourteenth day of the first month at even is th
770,e nations were angry, and thy wrath is come, and the time of the dead, that they should be judged, and that thou shouldest give reward unto thy servants the prophets, and to the saints, and them that fear thy name, small and great; and shouldest destroy them which destroy the earth. 
And the temple of God was opened in heaven, and there was seen in his temple the ark of his testament: and there were lightnings, and voices, and thunderings, and an earthquake, and great hail. 
And there appeared a great wonder in heaven; a woman clothed with the sun, and the moon under her feet, and upon her head a crown of twelve stars: 
And she being with child cried, travailing in birth, and pained to be delivered. 
And there appeared another wonder in heaven; and behold a gr
757,, to drink water; but they were not satisfied: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have smitten you with blasting and mildew: when your gardens and your vineyards and your fig trees and your olive trees increased, the palmerworm devoured them: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have sent among you the pestilence after the manner of Egypt: your young men have I slain with the sword, and have taken away your horses; and I have made the stink of your camps to come up unto your nostrils: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
I have overthrown some of you, as God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah, and ye were as a firebrand plucked out of the burning: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
Therefor
985,d three ribs in the mouth of it between the teeth of it: and they said thus unto it, Arise, devour much flesh. 
After this I beheld, and lo another, like a leopard, which had upon the back of it four wings of a fowl; the beast had also four heads; and dominion was given to it. 
After this I saw in the night visions, and behold a fourth beast, dreadful and terrible, and strong exceedingly; and it had great iron teeth: it devoured and brake in pieces, and stamped the residue with the feet of it: and it was diverse from all the beasts that were before it; and it had ten horns. 
I considered the horns, and, behold, there came up among them another little horn, before whom there were three of the first horns plucked up by the roots: and, behold, in this horn were eyes like the eyes of man, and a mouth speaking great things. 
I beheld till the thrones were cast down, and the Ancient of days did sit, whose garment was white as snow, and the hair of his head like the pure wool: 
846,unto him, The Master saith, My time is at hand; I will keep the passover at thy house with my disciples. 
And the disciples did as Jesus had appointed them; and they made ready the passover. 
Now when the even was come, he sat down with the twelve. 
And as they did eat, he said, Verily I say unto you, that one of you shall betray me. 
And they were exceeding sorrowful, and began every one of them to say unto him, Lord, is it I? 
And he answered and said, He that dippeth his hand with me in the dish, the same shall betray me. 
The Son of man goeth as it is written of him: but woe unto that man by whom the Son of man is betrayed! it had been good for that man if he had not been born. 
Then Judas, which betrayed him, answered and said, Master, is it I? He said unto him, Thou hast said. 
And as they were eating, Jesus took bread, and bles
985,s offering was one silver charger, the weight thereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them were full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One spoon of ten shekels of gold, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 
One kid of the goats for a sin offering: 
And for a sacrifice of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this was the offering of Nahshon the son of Amminadab. 
On the second day Nethaneel the son of Zuar, prince of Issachar, did offer: 
He offered for his offering one silver charger, the weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 
One spoon of gold of ten shekels, full of incense: 
One young bullock, one ram, one lamb of t
871,ed of them entered into fenced cities. 
And all the people returned to the camp to Joshua at Makkedah in peace: none moved his tongue against any of the children of Israel. 
Then said Joshua, Open the mouth of the cave, and bring out those five kings unto me out of the cave. 
And they did so, and brought forth those five kings unto him out of the cave, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, and the king of Eglon. 
And it came to pass, when they brought out those kings unto Joshua, that Joshua called for all the men of Israel, and said unto the captains of the men of war which went with him, Come near, put your feet upon the necks of these kings. And they came near, and put their feet upon the necks of them. 
And Joshua said unto them, Fear not, nor be dismayed, be strong and of good courage: for thus shall the LOR
869, that are such we command and exhort by our Lord Jesus Christ, that with quietness they work, and eat their own bread. 
But ye, brethren, be not weary in well doing. 
And if any man obey not our word by this epistle, note that man, and have no company with him, that he may be ashamed. 
Yet count him not as an enemy, but admonish him as a brother. 
Now the Lord of peace himself give you peace always by all means. The Lord be with you all. 
The salutation of Paul with mine own hand, which is the token in every epistle: so I write. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the commandment of God our Saviour, and Lord Jesus Christ, which is our hope; 
Unto Timothy, my own son in the faith: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God our Father and Jesus Christ our Lord. 
As I besought thee to abide still at Ephesus, w
973,they gave him audience unto this word, and then lifted up their voices, and said, Away with such a fellow from the earth: for it is not fit that he should live. 
And as they cried out, and cast off their clothes, and threw dust into the air, 
The chief captain commanded him to be brought into the castle, and bade that he should be examined by scourging; that he might know wherefore they cried so against him. 
And as they bound him with thongs, Paul said unto the centurion that stood by, Is it lawful for you to scourge a man that is a Roman, and uncondemned? 
When the centurion heard that, he went and told the chief captain, saying, Take heed what thou doest: for this man is a Roman. 
Then the chief captain came, and said unto him, Tell me, art thou a Roman? He said, Yea. 
And the chief captain answered, With a great sum obtained I this freedom. And Paul said, But I was free born. 
Then straightway they departed from him which should have examined him: and the
857,ountain of Zion, which is desolate, the foxes walk upon it. 
Thou, O LORD, remainest for ever; thy throne from generation to generation. 
Wherefore dost thou forget us for ever, and forsake us so long time? 
Turn thou us unto thee, O LORD, and we shall be turned; renew our days as of old. 
But thou hast utterly rejected us; thou art very wroth against us. 
Now it came to pass in the thirtieth year, in the fourth month, in the fifth day of the month, as I was among the captives by the river of Chebar, that the heavens were opened, and I saw visions of God. 
In the fifth day of the month, which was the fifth year of king Jehoiachin's captivity, 
The word of the LORD came expressly unto Ezekiel the priest, the son of Buzi, in the land of the Chaldeans by the river Chebar; and the hand of the LORD was there upon him. 
And I looked, and, behold, a wh
898,s is the work of God, that ye believe on him whom he hath sent. 
They said therefore unto him, What sign shewest thou then, that we may see, and believe thee? what dost thou work? 
Our fathers did eat manna in the desert; as it is written, He gave them bread from heaven to eat. 
Then Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Moses gave you not that bread from heaven; but my Father giveth you the true bread from heaven. 
For the bread of God is he which cometh down from heaven, and giveth life unto the world. 
Then said they unto him, Lord, evermore give us this bread. 
And Jesus said unto them, I am the bread of life: he that cometh to me shall never hunger; and he that believeth on me shall never thirst. 
But I said unto you, That ye also have seen me, and believe not. 
All that the Father giveth me shall come to me; and him that cometh to me I will in no wise cast out. 
F
985,throne above the stars of God: I will sit also upon the mount of the congregation, in the sides of the north: 
I will ascend above the heights of the clouds; I will be like the most High. 
Yet thou shalt be brought down to hell, to the sides of the pit. 
They that see thee shall narrowly look upon thee, and consider thee, saying, Is this the man that made the earth to tremble, that did shake kingdoms; 
That made the world as a wilderness, and destroyed the cities thereof; that opened not the house of his prisoners? 
All the kings of the nations, even all of them, lie in glory, every one in his own house. 
But thou art cast out of thy grave like an abominable branch, and as the raiment of those that are slain, thrust through with a sword, that go down to the stones of the pit; as a carcase trodden under feet. 
Thou shalt not be joined with them in burial, because thou hast destroyed thy land, and slain thy people: the seed of evildoers shall never be renowned. 
Prepare sl
809, Hagar bare Ishmael to Abram. 
And when Abram was ninety years old and nine, the LORD appeared to Abram, and said unto him, I am the Almighty God; walk before me, and be thou perfect. 
And I will make my covenant between me and thee, and will multiply thee exceedingly. 
And Abram fell on his face: and God talked with him, saying, 
As for me, behold, my covenant is with thee, and thou shalt be a father of many nations. 
Neither shall thy name any more be called Abram, but thy name shall be Abraham; for a father of many nations have I made thee. 
And I will make thee exceeding fruitful, and I will make nations of thee, and kings shall come out of thee. 
And I will establish my covenant between me and thee and thy seed after thee in their generations for an everlasting covenant, to be a God unto thee,
1079,s come to pass in Israel, that there should be to day one tribe lacking in Israel? 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the people rose early, and built there an altar, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings. 
And the children of Israel said, Who is there among all the tribes of Israel that came not up with the congregation unto the LORD? For they had made a great oath concerning him that came not up to the LORD to Mizpeh, saying, He shall surely be put to death. 
And the children of Israel repented them for Benjamin their brother, and said, There is one tribe cut off from Israel this day. 
How shall we do for wives for them that remain, seeing we have sworn by the LORD that we will not give them of our daughters to wives? 
And they said, What one is there of the tribes of Israel that came not up to Mizpeh to the LORD? And, behold, there came none to the camp from Jabeshgilead to the assembly. 
For the people were numbered, and, behold, there were none of the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead there. 
And the congregation sent thither twelve thousand men of
742,e that curseth his father, or his mother, shall surely be put to death. 
And if men strive together, and one smite another with a stone, or with his fist, and he die not, but keepeth his bed: 
If he rise again, and walk abroad upon his staff, then shall he that smote him be quit: only he shall pay for the loss of his time, and shall cause him to be thoroughly healed. 
And if a man smite his servant, or his maid, with a rod, and he die under his hand; he shall be surely punished. 
Notwithstanding, if he continue a day or two, he shall not be punished: for he is his money. 
If men strive, and hurt a woman with child, so that her fruit depart from her, and yet no mischief follow: he shall be surely punished, according as the woman's hu
741,RD hath promised: for we have sinned. 
And Moses said, Wherefore now do ye transgress the commandment of the LORD? but it shall not prosper. 
Go not up, for the LORD is not among you; that ye be not smitten before your enemies. 
For the Amalekites and the Canaanites are there before you, and ye shall fall by the sword: because ye are turned away from the LORD, therefore the LORD will not be with you. 
But they presumed to go up unto the hill top: nevertheless the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and Moses, departed not out of the camp. 
Then the Amalekites came down, and the Canaanites which dwelt in that hill, and smote them, and discomfited them, even unto Hormah. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children o
811,ORD, were keepers of the entry. 
And Phinehas the son of Eleazar was the ruler over them in time past, and the LORD was with him. 
And Zechariah the son of Meshelemiah was porter of the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
All these which were chosen to be porters in the gates were two hundred and twelve. These were reckoned by their genealogy in their villages, whom David and Samuel the seer did ordain in their set office. 
So they and their children had the oversight of the gates of the house of the LORD, namely, the house of the tabernacle, by wards. 
In four quarters were the porters, toward the east, west, north, and south. 
And their brethren, which were in their villages, were to come after seven days from time to time with them. 
For these Levites, the four chief porters, were in thei
915,ckets under another board for his two tenons. 
And for the other side of the tabernacle, which is toward the north corner, he made twenty boards, 
And their forty sockets of silver; two sockets under one board, and two sockets under another board. 
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward he made six boards. 
And two boards made he for the corners of the tabernacle in the two sides. 
And they were coupled beneath, and coupled together at the head thereof, to one ring: thus he did to both of them in both the corners. 
And there were eight boards; and their sockets were sixteen sockets of silver, under every board two sockets. 
And he made bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the one side of the tabernacle, 
And five bars for the boards of the other side of the tabernacle, and five bars for the boards of the tabernacle for the sides westward. 
And he made the middle bar to shoot through the b
868, shall not take of thee a stone for a corner, nor a stone for foundations; but thou shalt be desolate for ever, saith the LORD. 
Set ye up a standard in the land, blow the trumpet among the nations, prepare the nations against her, call together against her the kingdoms of Ararat, Minni, and Ashchenaz; appoint a captain against her; cause the horses to come up as the rough caterpillers. 
Prepare against her the nations with the kings of the Medes, the captains thereof, and all the rulers thereof, and all the land of his dominion. 
And the land shall tremble and sorrow: for every purpose of the LORD shall be performed against Babylon, to make the land of Babylon a desolation without an inhabitant. 
The mighty men of Babylon have forborn to fight, they have remained in their holds: their might hath failed; they became as women: they have burned her dwellingp
805,ey my voice, and go fetch me them. 
And he went, and fetched, and brought them to his mother: and his mother made savoury meat, such as his father loved. 
And Rebekah took goodly raiment of her eldest son Esau, which were with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son: 
And she put the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands, and upon the smooth of his neck: 
And she gave the savoury meat and the bread, which she had prepared, into the hand of her son Jacob. 
And he came unto his father, and said, My father: and he said, Here am I; who art thou, my son? 
And Jacob said unto his father, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou badest me: arise, I pray thee, sit and eat of my venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac said unto his son, How is it that tho
748,d Ahab said to Elijah, Hast thou found me, O mine enemy? And he answered, I have found thee: because thou hast sold thyself to work evil in the sight of the LORD. 
Behold, I will bring evil upon thee, and will take away thy posterity, and will cut off from Ahab him that pisseth against the wall, and him that is shut up and left in Israel, 
And will make thine house like the house of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and like the house of Baasha the son of Ahijah, for the provocation wherewith thou hast provoked me to anger, and made Israel to sin. 
And of Jezebel also spake the LORD, saying, The dogs shall eat Jezebel by the wall of Jezreel. 
Him that dieth of Ahab in the city the dogs shall eat; and him that dieth in the field shall the fowls o
975, mine own land, and to my kindred. 
And he said, Leave us not, I pray thee; forasmuch as thou knowest how we are to encamp in the wilderness, and thou mayest be to us instead of eyes. 
And it shall be, if thou go with us, yea, it shall be, that what goodness the LORD shall do unto us, the same will we do unto thee. 
And they departed from the mount of the LORD three days' journey: and the ark of the covenant of the LORD went before them in the three days' journey, to search out a resting place for them. 
And the cloud of the LORD was upon them by day, when they went out of the camp. 
And it came to pass, when the ark set forward, that Moses said, Rise up, LORD, and let thine enemies be scattered; and let them that hate thee flee before thee. 
And when it rested, he said, Return, O LORD, unto the many thousands of Israel. 
And when the people complained, it displeased the LORD: and the LORD heard it; and his anger was kindled; and the fire of the LORD burnt amon
1068,grace of God. 
And the next sabbath day came almost the whole city together to hear the word of God. 
But when the Jews saw the multitudes, they were filled with envy, and spake against those things which were spoken by Paul, contradicting and blaspheming. 
Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary that the word of God should first have been spoken to you: but seeing ye put it from you, and judge yourselves unworthy of everlasting life, lo, we turn to the Gentiles. 
For so hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be a light of the Gentiles, that thou shouldest be for salvation unto the ends of the earth. 
And when the Gentiles heard this, they were glad, and glorified the word of the Lord: and as many as were ordained to eternal life believed. 
And the word of the Lord was published throughout all the region. 
But the Jews stirred up the devout and honourable women, and the chief men of the city, and raised persecution against Paul and Barnabas, and expelled them out of their coasts. 
But they shook off the dust of the
937,hat reproveth in the gate, and turn aside the just for a thing of nought. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD, who redeemed Abraham, concerning the house of Jacob, Jacob shall not now be ashamed, neither shall his face now wax pale. 
But when he seeth his children, the work of mine hands, in the midst of him, they shall sanctify my name, and sanctify the Holy One of Jacob, and shall fear the God of Israel. 
They also that erred in spirit shall come to understanding, and they that murmured shall learn doctrine. 
Woe to the rebellious children, saith the LORD, that take counsel, but not of me; and that cover with a covering, but not of my spirit, that they may add sin to sin: 
That walk to go down into Egypt, and have not asked at my mouth; to strengthen themselves in the strength of Pharaoh, and to trust in the shadow of Egypt! 
Therefore shall the strength of Pharaoh be your shame, and the trust in the shadow of Egypt your confu
877,t calm. 
And he said unto them, Why are ye so fearful? how is it that ye have no faith? 
And they feared exceedingly, and said one to another, What manner of man is this, that even the wind and the sea obey him? 
And they came over unto the other side of the sea, into the country of the Gadarenes. 
And when he was come out of the ship, immediately there met him out of the tombs a man with an unclean spirit, 
Who had his dwelling among the tombs; and no man could bind him, no, not with chains: 
Because that he had been often bound with fetters and chains, and the chains had been plucked asunder by him, and the fetters broken in pieces: neither could any man tame him. 
And always, night and day, he was in the mountains, and in the tombs, crying, and cutting himself with stones. 
But when he saw Jesus afar off, he ran and worshipped him, 
And cried with a loud voice, 
816,ant. 
O LORD, for thy servant's sake, and according to thine own heart, hast thou done all this greatness, in making known all these great things. 
O LORD, there is none like thee, neither is there any God beside thee, according to all that we have heard with our ears. 
And what one nation in the earth is like thy people Israel, whom God went to redeem to be his own people, to make thee a name of greatness and terribleness, by driving out nations from before thy people whom thou hast redeemed out of Egypt? 
For thy people Israel didst thou make thine own people for ever; and thou, LORD, becamest their God. 
Therefore now, LORD, let the thing that thou hast spoken concerning thy servant and concerning his house be established for ever, and do as thou hast said. 
Let it even be established, that thy name ma
1032,e doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof, and the wall of the pool of Siloah by the king's garden, and unto the stairs that go down from the city of David. 
After him repaired Nehemiah the son of Azbuk, the ruler of the half part of Bethzur, unto the place over against the sepulchres of David, and to the pool that was made, and unto the house of the mighty. 
After him repaired the Levites, Rehum the son of Bani. Next unto him repaired Hashabiah, the ruler of the half part of Keilah, in his part. 
After him repaired their brethren, Bavai the son of Henadad, the ruler of the half part of Keilah. 
And next to him repaired Ezer the son of Jeshua, the ruler of Mizpah, another piece over against the going up to the armoury at the turning of the wall. 
After him Baruch the son of Zabbai earnestly repaired the other piece, from the turning of the wall unto the door of the house of Eliashib the high priest. 
After him repaired Meremoth the son of Urijah the son of Koz another piece, from the door of the house 
899,as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and bid them that they make them fringes in the borders of their garments throughout their generations, and that they put upon the fringe of the borders a ribband of blue: 
And it shall be unto you for a fringe, that ye may look upon it, and remember all the commandments of the LORD, and do them ; and that ye seek not after your own heart and your own eyes, after which ye use to go a whoring: 
That ye may remember, and do all my commandments, and be holy unto your God. 
I am the LORD your God, which brought you out of the land of Egypt, to be your God: I am the LORD your God. 
Now Korah, the son of Izhar, the son of Kohath, the son of Levi, and Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab, and On, the son of Peleth, sons of Reuben, took men: 
And they rose up before Moses, with certain of th
1056,e them in full tale to the king, that he might be the king's son in law. And Saul gave him Michal his daughter to wife. 
And Saul saw and knew that the LORD was with David, and that Michal Saul's daughter loved him. 
And Saul was yet the more afraid of David; and Saul became David's enemy continually. 
Then the princes of the Philistines went forth: and it came to pass, after they went forth, that David behaved himself more wisely than all the servants of Saul; so that his name was much set by. 
And Saul spake to Jonathan his son, and to all his servants, that they should kill David. 
But Jonathan Saul's son delighted much in David: and Jonathan told David, saying, Saul my father seeketh to kill thee: now therefore, I pray thee, take heed to thyself until the morning, and abide in a secret place, and hide thyself: 
And I will go out and stand beside my father in the field where thou art, and I will commune with my father of thee; and what I see, that I will tell thee. 
And Jonathan spake good of David unto Saul his father, and said unto him
935,ward the sea of the plain, even the salt sea, failed, and were cut off: and the people passed over right against Jericho. 
And the priests that bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD stood firm on dry ground in the midst of Jordan, and all the Israelites passed over on dry ground, until all the people were passed clean over Jordan. 
And it came to pass, when all the people were clean passed over Jordan, that the LORD spake unto Joshua, saying, 
Take you twelve men out of the people, out of every tribe a man, 
And command ye them, saying, Take you hence out of the midst of Jordan, out of the place where the priests' feet stood firm, twelve stones, and ye shall carry them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where ye shall lodge this night. 
Then Joshua called the twelve men, whom he had prepared of the children of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 
And Joshua said unto them, Pass over before the ark of the
789, remained of them entered into fenced cities. 
And all the people returned to the camp to Joshua at Makkedah in peace: none moved his tongue against any of the children of Israel. 
Then said Joshua, Open the mouth of the cave, and bring out those five kings unto me out of the cave. 
And they did so, and brought forth those five kings unto him out of the cave, the king of Jerusalem, the king of Hebron, the king of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, and the king of Eglon. 
And it came to pass, when they brought out those kings unto Joshua, that Joshua called for all the men of Israel, and said unto the captains of the men of war which went with him, Come near, put your feet upon the necks of these kings. And they came near, and put their feet upon the necks of them. 
And Joshua said un
771,he thus spake, there came a cloud, and overshadowed them: and they feared as they entered into the cloud. 
And there came a voice out of the cloud, saying, This is my beloved Son: hear him. 
And when the voice was past, Jesus was found alone. And they kept it close, and told no man in those days any of those things which they had seen. 
And it came to pass, that on the next day, when they were come down from the hill, much people met him. 
And, behold, a man of the company cried out, saying, Master, I beseech thee, look upon my son: for he is mine only child. 
And, lo, a spirit taketh him, and he suddenly crieth out; and it teareth him that he foameth again, and bruising him hardly departeth from him. 
And I besought thy disciples to cast him out; and they coul
908,less I say unto you, Hereafter shall ye see the Son of man sitting on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of heaven. 
Then the high priest rent his clothes, saying, He hath spoken blasphemy; what further need have we of witnesses? behold, now ye have heard his blasphemy. 
What think ye? They answered and said, He is guilty of death. 
Then did they spit in his face, and buffeted him; and others smote him with the palms of their hands, 
Saying, Prophesy unto us, thou Christ, Who is he that smote thee? 
Now Peter sat without in the palace: and a damsel came unto him, saying, Thou also wast with Jesus of Galilee. 
But he denied before them all, saying, I know not what thou sayest. 
And when he was gone out into the porch, another maid saw him, and said unto them that were there, This fellow was also with Jesus of Nazareth. 
And again he denied with an oath, I do not know the man. 
And 
889,idst of it is burned. Is it meet for any work? 
Behold, when it was whole, it was meet for no work: how much less shall it be meet yet for any work, when the fire hath devoured it, and it is burned? 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; As the vine tree among the trees of the forest, which I have given to the fire for fuel, so will I give the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And I will set my face against them; they shall go out from one fire, and another fire shall devour them; and ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I set my face against them. 
And I will make the land desolate, because they have committed a trespass, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, cause Jerusalem to know her abominations, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD unto Jerusalem; Thy birth and thy nativity is of the land of Canaan; thy father was an Amorite, and thy mot
1006,ore also, if Adonijah have not spoken this word against his own life. 
Now therefore, as the LORD liveth, which hath established me, and set me on the throne of David my father, and who hath made me an house, as he promised, Adonijah shall be put to death this day. 
And king Solomon sent by the hand of Benaiah the son of Jehoiada; and he fell upon him that he died. 
And unto Abiathar the priest said the king, Get thee to Anathoth, unto thine own fields; for thou art worthy of death: but I will not at this time put thee to death, because thou barest the ark of the LORD God before David my father, and because thou hast been afflicted in all wherein my father was afflicted. 
So Solomon thrust out Abiathar from being priest unto the LORD; that he might fulfil the word of the LORD, which he spake concerning the house of Eli in Shiloh. 
Then tidings came to Joab: for Joab had turned after Adonijah, though he turned not after Absalom. And Joab fled unto the tabernacle of the LORD, and caught hold o
911,at sitteth thereon. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye pay tithe of mint and anise and cummin, and have omitted the weightier matters of the law, judgment, mercy, and faith: these ought ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone. 
Ye blind guides, which strain at a gnat, and swallow a camel. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye make clean the outside of the cup and of the platter, but within they are full of extortion and excess. 
Thou blind Pharisee, cleanse first that which is within the cup and platter, that the outside of them may be clean also. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye are like unto whited sepulchres, which indeed appear beautiful outward, but are within full of dead men's bones, and of all uncleanness. 
Even so ye also outwardly appear righteous unto men, but within ye are full of hypocrisy and iniquity. 
Woe un
904,r regardeth he the crying of the driver. 
The range of the mountains is his pasture, and he searcheth after every green thing. 
Will the unicorn be willing to serve thee, or abide by thy crib? 
Canst thou bind the unicorn with his band in the furrow? or will he harrow the valleys after thee? 
Wilt thou trust him, because his strength is great? or wilt thou leave thy labour to him? 
Wilt thou believe him, that he will bring home thy seed, and gather it into thy barn? 
Gavest thou the goodly wings unto the peacocks? or wings and feathers unto the ostrich? 
Which leaveth her eggs in the earth, and warmeth them in dust, 
And forgetteth that the foot may crush them, or that the wild beast may break them. 
She is hardened against her young ones, as though they were not her's: her labour is in vain without fear; 
Because God hath deprived her of wisdom, neither hath he imparted to her understanding
793,phets, which was shed from the foundation of the world, may be required of this generation; 
From the blood of Abel unto the blood of Zacharias which perished between the altar and the temple: verily I say unto you, It shall be required of this generation. 
Woe unto you, lawyers! for ye have taken away the key of knowledge: ye entered not in yourselves, and them that were entering in ye hindered. 
And as he said these things unto them, the scribes and the Pharisees began to urge him vehemently, and to provoke him to speak of many things: 
Laying wait for him, and seeking to catch something out of his mouth, that they might accuse him. 
In the mean time, when there were gathered together an innumerable multitude of people, insomuch that they trode one upon another, he began to say un
729,ord, whom thou didst send. 
Now therefore, my lord, as the LORD liveth, and as thy soul liveth, seeing the LORD hath withholden thee from coming to shed blood, and from avenging thyself with thine own hand, now let thine enemies, and they that seek evil to my lord, be as Nabal. 
And now this blessing which thine handmaid hath brought unto my lord, let it even be given unto the young men that follow my lord. 
I pray thee, forgive the trespass of thine handmaid: for the LORD will certainly make my lord a sure house; because my lord fighteth the battles of the LORD, and evil hath not been found in thee all thy days. 
Yet a man is risen to pursue thee, and to seek thy soul: but the soul of my lord shall be bound in the bund
1011,shall bear their shame. 
But ye, O mountains of Israel, ye shall shoot forth your branches, and yield your fruit to my people of Israel; for they are at hand to come. 
For, behold, I am for you, and I will turn unto you, and ye shall be tilled and sown: 
And I will multiply men upon you, all the house of Israel, even all of it: and the cities shall be inhabited, and the wastes shall be builded: 
And I will multiply upon you man and beast; and they shall increase and bring fruit: and I will settle you after your old estates, and will do better unto you than at your beginnings: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Yea, I will cause men to walk upon you, even my people Israel; and they shall possess thee, and thou shalt be their inheritance, and thou shalt no more henceforth bereave them of men. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they say unto you, Thou land devourest up men, and hast bereaved thy nations: 
Therefore thou shalt devour men no more, neither bereave thy nations any more, saith the Lor
823,e king sent men into Egypt, namely, Elnathan the son of Achbor, and certain men with him into Egypt. 
And they fetched forth Urijah out of Egypt, and brought him unto Jehoiakim the king; who slew him with the sword, and cast his dead body into the graves of the common people. 
Nevertheless the hand of Ahikam the son of Shaphan was with Jeremiah, that they should not give him into the hand of the people to put him to death. 
In the beginning of the reign of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah came this word unto Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD to me; Make thee bonds and yokes, and put them upon thy neck, 
And send them to the king of Edom, and to the king of Moab, and to the king of the Ammonites, and to the king of Tyrus, and to the king of Zidon, by the hand of the messengers which co
801,im, the third Zedekiah, the fourth Shallum. 
And the sons of Jehoiakim: Jeconiah his son, Zedekiah his son. 
And the sons of Jeconiah; Assir, Salathiel his son, 
Malchiram also, and Pedaiah, and Shenazar, Jecamiah, Hoshama, and Nedabiah. 
And the sons of Pedaiah were, Zerubbabel, and Shimei: and the sons of Zerubbabel; Meshullam, and Hananiah, and Shelomith their sister: 
And Hashubah, and Ohel, and Berechiah, and Hasadiah, Jushabhesed, five. 
And the sons of Hananiah; Pelatiah, and Jesaiah: the sons of Rephaiah, the sons of Arnan, the sons of Obadiah, the sons of Shechaniah. 
And the sons of Shechaniah; Shemaiah: and the sons of Shemaiah; Hattush, and Igeal, and Bariah, and Neariah, and Shaphat, six. 
And the sons of Neariah; Elioenai, and Hezekiah, and Azrikam, three. 
And the sons of Eli
1048,ver kings? he gave them as the dust to his sword, and as driven stubble to his bow. 
He pursued them, and passed safely; even by the way that he had not gone with his feet. 
Who hath wrought and done it, calling the generations from the beginning? I the LORD, the first, and with the last; I am he. 
The isles saw it, and feared; the ends of the earth were afraid, drew near, and came. 
They helped every one his neighbour; and every one said to his brother, Be of good courage. 
So the carpenter encouraged the goldsmith, and he that smootheth with the hammer him that smote the anvil, saying, It is ready for the sodering: and he fastened it with nails, that it should not be moved. 
But thou, Israel, art my servant, Jacob whom I have chosen, the seed of Abraham my friend. 
Thou whom I have taken from the ends of the earth, and called thee from the chief men thereof, and said unto thee, Thou art my servant; I have chosen thee, and not cast thee away. 
Fear thou not; for I am with thee: be not dismayed; for I am thy God: I will strengthen t
1055, the threshingfloor of Chidon, Uzza put forth his hand to hold the ark; for the oxen stumbled. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzza, and he smote him, because he put his hand to the ark: and there he died before God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon Uzza: wherefore that place is called Perezuzza to this day. 
And David was afraid of God that day, saying, How shall I bring the ark of God home to me? 
So David brought not the ark home to himself to the city of David, but carried it aside into the house of Obededom the Gittite. 
And the ark of God remained with the family of Obededom in his house three months. And the LORD blessed the house of Obededom, and all that he had. 
Now Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and timber of cedars, with masons and carpenters, to build him an house. 
And David perceived that the LORD had confirmed him king over Israel, for his kingdom was lifted up on high, because of his people Israel. 
And David took more wives at Jerusalem: and David begat more s
1038,ive ear to my words, O LORD, consider my meditation. 
Hearken unto the voice of my cry, my King, and my God: for unto thee will I pray. 
My voice shalt thou hear in the morning, O LORD; in the morning will I direct my prayer unto thee, and will look up. 
For thou art not a God that hath pleasure in wickedness: neither shall evil dwell with thee. 
The foolish shall not stand in thy sight: thou hatest all workers of iniquity. 
Thou shalt destroy them that speak leasing: the LORD will abhor the bloody and deceitful man. 
But as for me, I will come into thy house in the multitude of thy mercy: and in thy fear will I worship toward thy holy temple. 
Lead me, O LORD, in thy righteousness because of mine enemies; make thy way straight before my face. 
For there is no faithfulness in their mouth; their inward part is very wickedness; their throat is an open sepulchre; they flatter with their tongue. 
Destroy thou them, O God; let them fall by their own counsels; cast them out in the multitude of their transgressions; for they have
901,iege it: 
And when the LORD thy God hath delivered it into thine hands, thou shalt smite every male thereof with the edge of the sword: 
But the women, and the little ones, and the cattle, and all that is in the city, even all the spoil thereof, shalt thou take unto thyself; and thou shalt eat the spoil of thine enemies, which the LORD thy God hath given thee. 
Thus shalt thou do unto all the cities which are very far off from thee, which are not of the cities of these nations. 
But of the cities of these people, which the LORD thy God doth give thee for an inheritance, thou shalt save alive nothing that breatheth: 
But thou shalt utterly destroy them; namely, the Hittites, and the Amorites, the Canaanites, and the Perizzites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites; as the LORD thy God hath commanded thee: 
That they teach you not to do after all their abominations, which they have done unto thei
1026,oved. 
Thy throne is established of old: thou art from everlasting. 
The floods have lifted up, O LORD, the floods have lifted up their voice; the floods lift up their waves. 
The LORD on high is mightier than the noise of many waters, yea, than the mighty waves of the sea. 
Thy testimonies are very sure: holiness becometh thine house, O LORD, for ever. 
O Lord God, to whom vengeance belongeth; O God, to whom vengeance belongeth, shew thyself. 
Lift up thyself, thou judge of the earth: render a reward to the proud. 
LORD, how long shall the wicked, how long shall the wicked triumph? 
How long shall they utter and speak hard things? and all the workers of iniquity boast themselves? 
They break in pieces thy people, O LORD, and afflict thine heritage. 
They slay the widow and the stranger, and murder the fatherless. 
Yet they say, The LORD shall not see, neither shall the God of Jacob regard it. 
Understand, ye brutish among the people: and ye fools, when will ye be wise? 
He that planted the ear, shall he not he
787,people went out into the field; and they told Abimelech. 
And he took the people, and divided them into three companies, and laid wait in the field, and looked, and, behold, the people were come forth out of the city; and he rose up against them, and smote them. 
And Abimelech, and the company that was with him, rushed forward, and stood in the entering of the gate of the city: and the two other companies ran upon all the people that were in the fields, and slew them. 
And Abimelech fought against the city all that day; and he took the city, and slew the people that was therein, and beat down the city, and sowed it with salt. 
And when all the men of the tower of Shechem heard that, they entered into an hold of the house of the god Berith. 
And it was told Abimelech, that all 
778,ildren: for blessed are they that keep my ways. 
Hear instruction, and be wise, and refuse it not. 
Blessed is the man that heareth me, watching daily at my gates, waiting at the posts of my doors. 
For whoso findeth me findeth life, and shall obtain favour of the LORD. 
But he that sinneth against me wrongeth his own soul: all they that hate me love death. 
Wisdom hath builded her house, she hath hewn out her seven pillars: 
She hath killed her beasts; she hath mingled her wine; she hath also furnished her table. 
She hath sent forth her maidens: she crieth upon the highest places of the city, 
Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: as for him that wanteth understanding, she saith to him, 
Come, eat of my bread, and drink of the wine which I have mingled. 
Forsake 
769, hearkened unto me, saith the LORD; that ye might provoke me to anger with the works of your hands to your own hurt. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts; Because ye have not heard my words, 
Behold, I will send and take all the families of the north, saith the LORD, and Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon, my servant, and will bring them against this land, and against the inhabitants thereof, and against all these nations round about, and will utterly destroy them, and make them an astonishment, and an hissing, and perpetual desolations. 
Moreover I will take from them the voice of mirth, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride, the sound of the millstones, and the light of the candle. 
And this whole land shall b
849, hand from thy servants; come up to us quickly, and save us, and help us: for all the kings of the Amorites that dwell in the mountains are gathered together against us. 
So Joshua ascended from Gilgal, he, and all the people of war with him, and all the mighty men of valour. 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Fear them not: for I have delivered them into thine hand; there shall not a man of them stand before thee. 
Joshua therefore came unto them suddenly, and went up from Gilgal all night. 
And the LORD discomfited them before Israel, and slew them with a great slaughter at Gibeon, and chased them along the way that goeth up to Bethhoron, and smote them to Azekah, and unto Makkedah. 
And it came to pass, as they fled from before Israel, and were in the going down to Bethhoron, that the LORD cast down great stones from heaven upon them unt
899,riest shall see the plague: and, behold, if it be in sight deeper than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair; then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a leprosy upon the head or beard. 
And if the priest look on the plague of the scall, and, behold, it be not in sight deeper than the skin, and that there is no black hair in it; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague of the scall seven days: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague: and, behold, if the scall spread not, and there be in it no yellow hair, and the scall be not in sight deeper than the skin; 
He shall be shaven, but the scall shall he not shave; and the priest shall shut up him that hath the scall seven days more: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the scall: and, behold, if the scall be not spread in the skin, nor be in sight deeper than
926, came up from the king's house unto the house of the LORD, and sat down in the entry of the new gate of the LORD's house. 
Then spake the priests and the prophets unto the princes and to all the people, saying, This man is worthy to die; for he hath prophesied against this city, as ye have heard with your ears. 
Then spake Jeremiah unto all the princes and to all the people, saying, The LORD sent me to prophesy against this house and against this city all the words that ye have heard. 
Therefore now amend your ways and your doings, and obey the voice of the LORD your God; and the LORD will repent him of the evil that he hath pronounced against you. 
As for me, behold, I am in your hand: do with me as seemeth good and meet unto you. 
But know ye for certain, that if ye put me to death, ye shall surely bring innocent blood upon yourselves, and upon this city, and upon the inhabitants thereof: for of a truth the LOR
723,D, the Holy One of Israel, and his Maker, Ask me of things to come concerning my sons, and concerning the work of my hands command ye me. 
I have made the earth, and created man upon it: I, even my hands, have stretched out the heavens, and all their host have I commanded. 
I have raised him up in righteousness, and I will direct all his ways: he shall build my city, and he shall let go my captives, not for price nor reward, saith the LORD of hosts. 
Thus saith the LORD, The labour of Egypt, and merchandise of Ethiopia and of the Sabeans, men of stature, shall come over unto thee, and they shall be thine: they shall come after thee; in chains they shall come over, and they shall fall down unto thee, they shall mak
722,eir lord, even unto Rehoboam king of Judah, and they shall kill me, and go again to Rehoboam king of Judah. 
Whereupon the king took counsel, and made two calves of gold, and said unto them, It is too much for you to go up to Jerusalem: behold thy gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And he set the one in Bethel, and the other put he in Dan. 
And this thing became a sin: for the people went to worship before the one, even unto Dan. 
And he made an house of high places, and made priests of the lowest of the people, which were not of the sons of Levi. 
And Jeroboam ordained a feast in the eighth month, on the fifteenth day of the month, like unto the feast that is in Judah, and he offere
1042,the sword, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold, evil shall go forth from nation to nation, and a great whirlwind shall be raised up from the coasts of the earth. 
And the slain of the LORD shall be at that day from one end of the earth even unto the other end of the earth: they shall not be lamented, neither gathered, nor buried; they shall be dung upon the ground. 
Howl, ye shepherds, and cry; and wallow yourselves in the ashes, ye principal of the flock: for the days of your slaughter and of your dispersions are accomplished; and ye shall fall like a pleasant vessel. 
And the shepherds shall have no way to flee, nor the principal of the flock to escape. 
A voice of the cry of the shepherds, and an howling of the principal of the flock, shall be heard: for the LORD hath spoiled their pasture. 
And the peaceable habitations are cut down because of the fierce anger of the LORD. 
He hath forsaken his covert, as the lion: for their land is desolate because of the fierceness of the oppressor, and because of his f
981,s served that were on the other side of the flood, or the gods of the Amorites, in whose land ye dwell: but as for me and my house, we will serve the LORD. 
And the people answered and said, God forbid that we should forsake the LORD, to serve other gods; 
For the LORD our God, he it is that brought us up and our fathers out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage, and which did those great signs in our sight, and preserved us in all the way wherein we went, and among all the people through whom we passed: 
And the LORD drave out from before us all the people, even the Amorites which dwelt in the land: therefore will we also serve the LORD; for he is our God. 
And Joshua said unto the people, Ye cannot serve the LORD: for he is an holy God; he is a jealous God; he will not forgive your transgressions nor your sins. 
If ye forsake the LORD, and serve strange gods, then he will turn and do you hurt, and consume you, after that he hath done you good. 
And the pe
820,ut it shall accomplish that which I please, and it shall prosper in the thing whereto I sent it. 
For ye shall go out with joy, and be led forth with peace: the mountains and the hills shall break forth before you into singing, and all the trees of the field shall clap their hands. 
Instead of the thorn shall come up the fir tree, and instead of the brier shall come up the myrtle tree: and it shall be to the LORD for a name, for an everlasting sign that shall not be cut off. 
Thus saith the LORD, Keep ye judgment, and do justice: for my salvation is near to come, and my righteousness to be revealed. 
Blessed is the man that doeth this, and the son of man that layeth hold on it; that keepeth the sabbath from polluting it, and keepeth his hand from doing any evil. 
Neither let the son of the stranger, that hath
902,n. 
And he shewed me Joshua the high priest standing before the angel of the LORD, and Satan standing at his right hand to resist him. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, The LORD rebuke thee, O Satan; even the LORD that hath chosen Jerusalem rebuke thee: is not this a brand plucked out of the fire? 
Now Joshua was clothed with filthy garments, and stood before the angel. 
And he answered and spake unto those that stood before him, saying, Take away the filthy garments from him. And unto him he said, Behold, I have caused thine iniquity to pass from thee, and I will clothe thee with change of raiment. 
And I said, Let them set a fair mitre upon his head. So they set a fair mitre upon his head, and clothed him with garments. And the angel of the LORD stood by. 
And the angel of the LORD protested unto Joshua, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; If thou wilt walk in my ways, and if thou wilt k
770,he prophet, after that Hananiah the prophet had broken the yoke from off the neck of the prophet Jeremiah, saying, 
Go and tell Hananiah, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Thou hast broken the yokes of wood; but thou shalt make for them yokes of iron. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; I have put a yoke of iron upon the neck of all these nations, that they may serve Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon; and they shall serve him: and I have given him the beasts of the field also. 
Then said the prophet Jeremiah unto Hananiah the prophet, Hear now, Hananiah; The LORD hath not sent thee; but thou makest this people to trust in a lie. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will cast thee from off the face of the earth: this year thou shalt die, because 
864, altar. 
And he shall take of it his handful, of the flour of the meat offering, and of the oil thereof, and all the frankincense which is upon the meat offering, and shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet savour, even the memorial of it, unto the LORD. 
And the remainder thereof shall Aaron and his sons eat: with unleavened bread shall it be eaten in the holy place; in the court of the tabernacle of the congregation they shall eat it. 
It shall not be baken with leaven. I have given it unto them for their portion of my offerings made by fire; it is most holy, as is the sin offering, and as the trespass offering. 
All the males among the children of Aaron shall eat of it. It shall be a statute for ever in your generations concerning the offerings of the LORD made by fire: every one that toucheth them shall be holy. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, say
826,through the isle unto Paphos, they found a certain sorcerer, a false prophet, a Jew, whose name was Barjesus: 
Which was with the deputy of the country, Sergius Paulus, a prudent man; who called for Barnabas and Saul, and desired to hear the word of God. 
But Elymas the sorcerer (for so is his name by interpretation) withstood them, seeking to turn away the deputy from the faith. 
Then Saul, (who also is called Paul,) filled with the Holy Ghost, set his eyes on him. 
And said, O full of all subtilty and all mischief, thou child of the devil, thou enemy of all righteousness, wilt thou not cease to pervert the right ways of the Lord? 
And now, behold, the hand of the Lord is upon thee, and thou shalt be blind, not seeing the sun for a season. And immediately there fell on him a mist and a darkness; and he went about 
823, 
The LORD hath sworn by the excellency of Jacob, Surely I will never forget any of their works. 
Shall not the land tremble for this, and every one mourn that dwelleth therein? and it shall rise up wholly as a flood; and it shall be cast out and drowned, as by the flood of Egypt. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the Lord GOD, that I will cause the sun to go down at noon, and I will darken the earth in the clear day: 
And I will turn your feasts into mourning, and all your songs into lamentation; and I will bring up sackcloth upon all loins, and baldness upon every head; and I will make it as the mourning of an only son, and the end thereof as a bitter day. 
Behold, the days come, saith the Lord GOD, that I will send a famine in the land, not a famine of bread, nor a thirst for water, but of hearing
882,y mother's belly. 
Be not far from me; for trouble is near; for there is none to help. 
Many bulls have compassed me: strong bulls of Bashan have beset me round. 
They gaped upon me with their mouths, as a ravening and a roaring lion. 
I am poured out like water, and all my bones are out of joint: my heart is like wax; it is melted in the midst of my bowels. 
My strength is dried up like a potsherd; and my tongue cleaveth to my jaws; and thou hast brought me into the dust of death. 
For dogs have compassed me: the assembly of the wicked have inclosed me: they pierced my hands and my feet. 
I may tell all my bones: they look and stare upon me. 
They part my garments among them, and cast lots upon my vesture. 
But be not thou far from me, O LORD: O my strength, haste thee to help me. 
Deliver my soul from the sword; my darling from the power of the dog. 
Save me from the 
1069,y. 
Meditate upon these things; give thyself wholly to them; that thy profiting may appear to all. 
Take heed unto thyself, and unto the doctrine; continue in them: for in doing this thou shalt both save thyself, and them that hear thee. 
Rebuke not an elder, but intreat him as a father; and the younger men as brethren; 
The elder women as mothers; the younger as sisters, with all purity. 
Honour widows that are widows indeed. 
But if any widow have children or nephews, let them learn first to shew piety at home, and to requite their parents: for that is good and acceptable before God. 
Now she that is a widow indeed, and desolate, trusteth in God, and continueth in supplications and prayers night and day. 
But she that liveth in pleasure is dead while she liveth. 
And these things give in charge, that they may be blameless. 
But if any provide not for his own, and specially for those of his own house, he hath denied the faith, and is worse than an infidel. 
Let not a widow be taken into the number under threescore years old, having been the wife of one
745,helped him not. 
And in the time of his distress did he trespass yet more against the LORD: this is that king Ahaz. 
For he sacrificed unto the gods of Damascus, which smote him: and he said, Because the gods of the kings of Syria help them, therefore will I sacrifice to them, that they may help me. But they were the ruin of him, and of all Israel. 
And Ahaz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and cut in pieces the vessels of the house of God, and shut up the doors of the house of the LORD, and he made him altars in every corner of Jerusalem. 
And in every several city of Judah he made high places to burn incense unto other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his fathers. 
Now the rest of his acts and of all his 
1052,ifully with thee. 
For thou hast delivered my soul from death, mine eyes from tears, and my feet from falling. 
I will walk before the LORD in the land of the living. 
I believed, therefore have I spoken: I was greatly afflicted: 
I said in my haste, All men are liars. 
What shall I render unto the LORD for all his benefits toward me? 
I will take the cup of salvation, and call upon the name of the LORD. 
I will pay my vows unto the LORD now in the presence of all his people. 
Precious in the sight of the LORD is the death of his saints. 
O LORD, truly I am thy servant; I am thy servant, and the son of thine handmaid: thou hast loosed my bonds. 
I will offer to thee the sacrifice of thanksgiving, and will call upon the name of the LORD. 
I will pay my vows unto the LORD now in the presence of all his people. 
In the courts of the LORD's house, in the midst of thee, O Jerusalem. Praise ye the LORD. 
O praise the LORD, all ye nations: praise him, all ye people. 
For his merciful kindness is great toward us: and the truth of the LORD endur
1031,bottles. 
I will speak, that I may be refreshed: I will open my lips and answer. 
Let me not, I pray you, accept any man's person, neither let me give flattering titles unto man. 
For I know not to give flattering titles; in so doing my maker would soon take me away. 
Wherefore, Job, I pray thee, hear my speeches, and hearken to all my words. 
Behold, now I have opened my mouth, my tongue hath spoken in my mouth. 
My words shall be of the uprightness of my heart: and my lips shall utter knowledge clearly. 
The spirit of God hath made me, and the breath of the Almighty hath given me life. 
If thou canst answer me, set thy words in order before me, stand up. 
Behold, I am according to thy wish in God's stead: I also am formed out of the clay. 
Behold, my terror shall not make thee afraid, neither shall my hand be heavy upon thee. 
Surely thou hast spoken in mine hearing, and I have heard the voice of thy words, saying, 
I am clean without transgression, I am innocent; neither is there iniquity in me. 
Behold, he finde
756, it. 
And Mordecai walked every day before the court of the women's house, to know how Esther did, and what should become of her. 
Now when every maid's turn was come to go in to king Ahasuerus, after that she had been twelve months, according to the manner of the women, (for so were the days of their purifications accomplished, to wit, six months with oil of myrrh, and six months with sweet odours, and with other things for the purifying of the women;) 
Then thus came every maiden unto the king; whatsoever she desired was given her to go with her out of the house of the women unto the king's house. 
In the evening she went, and on the morrow she returned into the second house of the women, to the custody of Shaashgaz, the king's chamberlain, whi
1053,and Zabdi, 
And Elienai, and Zilthai, and Eliel, 
And Adaiah, and Beraiah, and Shimrath, the sons of Shimhi; 
And Ishpan, and Heber, and Eliel, 
And Abdon, and Zichri, and Hanan, 
And Hananiah, and Elam, and Antothijah, 
And Iphedeiah, and Penuel, the sons of Shashak; 
And Shamsherai, and Shehariah, and Athaliah, 
And Jaresiah, and Eliah, and Zichri, the sons of Jeroham. 
These were heads of the fathers, by their generations, chief men. These dwelt in Jerusalem. 
And at Gibeon dwelt the father of Gibeon; whose wife's name was Maachah: 
And his firstborn son Abdon, and Zur, and Kish, and Baal, and Nadab, 
And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zacher. 
And Mikloth begat Shimeah. And these also dwelt with their brethren in Jerusalem, over against them. 
And Ner begat Kish, and Kish begat Saul, and Saul begat Jonathan, and Malchishua, and Abinadab, and Eshbaal. 
And the son of Jonathan was Meribbaal; and Meribbaal begat Micah. 
And the sons of Micah were, Pithon, and Melech, and Tarea, and Ahaz. 
And Ahaz begat Jehoadah; and Jehoadah begat Alemeth, and A
908,ings be done with charity. 
I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints,) 
That ye submit yourselves unto such, and to every one that helpeth with us, and laboureth. 
I am glad of the coming of Stephanas and Fortunatus and Achaicus: for that which was lacking on your part they have supplied. 
For they have refreshed my spirit and your's: therefore acknowledge ye them that are such. 
The churches of Asia salute you. Aquila and Priscilla salute you much in the Lord, with the church that is in their house. 
All the brethren greet you. Greet ye one another with an holy kiss. 
The salutation of me Paul with mine own hand. 
If any man love not the Lord Jesus Christ, let him be Anathema Maranatha. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you. 
My love be with you all in Christ Jes
803, sons of the concubines, and Tamar their sister. 
And Solomon's son was Rehoboam, Abia his son, Asa his son, Jehoshaphat his son, 
Joram his son, Ahaziah his son, Joash his son, 
Amaziah his son, Azariah his son, Jotham his son, 
Ahaz his son, Hezekiah his son, Manasseh his son, 
Amon his son, Josiah his son. 
And the sons of Josiah were, the firstborn Johanan, the second Jehoiakim, the third Zedekiah, the fourth Shallum. 
And the sons of Jehoiakim: Jeconiah his son, Zedekiah his son. 
And the sons of Jeconiah; Assir, Salathiel his son, 
Malchiram also, and Pedaiah, and Shenazar, Jecamiah, Hoshama, and Nedabiah. 
And the sons of Pedaiah were, Zerubbabel, and Shimei: and the sons of Zerubbabel; Meshullam, and Hananiah, and Shelomith their sister: 
And Hashubah, and Ohel, and Berechiah, and Has
936, divide it into seven parts: Judah shall abide in their coast on the south, and the house of Joseph shall abide in their coasts on the north. 
Ye shall therefore describe the land into seven parts, and bring the description hither to me, that I may cast lots for you here before the LORD our God. 
But the Levites have no part among you; for the priesthood of the LORD is their inheritance: and Gad, and Reuben, and half the tribe of Manasseh, have received their inheritance beyond Jordan on the east, which Moses the servant of the LORD gave them. 
And the men arose, and went away: and Joshua charged them that went to describe the land, saying, Go and walk through the land, and describe it, and come again to me, that I may here cast lots for you before the LORD in Shiloh. 
And the men went and passed through the land, and described it by cities into seven parts in a book, and came again to Joshua to the host at Shiloh. 
And Jo
976,t. And when she held it, he measured six measures of barley, and laid it on her: and she went into the city. 
And when she came to her mother in law, she said, Who art thou, my daughter? And she told her all that the man had done to her. 
And she said, These six measures of barley gave he me; for he said to me, Go not empty unto thy mother in law. 
Then said she, Sit still, my daughter, until thou know how the matter will fall: for the man will not be in rest, until he have finished the thing this day. 
Then went Boaz up to the gate, and sat him down there: and, behold, the kinsman of whom Boaz spake came by; unto whom he said, Ho, such a one! turn aside, sit down here. And he turned aside, and sat down. 
And he took ten men of the elders of the city, and said, Sit ye down here. And they sat down. 
And he said unto the kinsman, Naomi, that is come again out of the country of Moab, selleth a parcel of land, which was our brother Elimelech's: 
And I thought to adv
918,sdom. 
Return, O LORD, how long? and let it repent thee concerning thy servants. 
O satisfy us early with thy mercy; that we may rejoice and be glad all our days. 
Make us glad according to the days wherein thou hast afflicted us, and the years wherein we have seen evil. 
Let thy work appear unto thy servants, and thy glory unto their children. 
And let the beauty of the LORD our God be upon us: and establish thou the work of our hands upon us; yea, the work of our hands establish thou it. 
He that dwelleth in the secret place of the most High shall abide under the shadow of the Almighty. 
I will say of the LORD, He is my refuge and my fortress: my God; in him will I trust. 
Surely he shall deliver thee from the snare of the fowler, and from the noisome pestilence. 
He shall cover thee with his feathers, and under his wings shalt thou trust: his truth shall be thy shield and buckler. 
Thou shalt not be af
837,the names of them out of that place. 
Ye shall not do so unto the LORD your God. 
But unto the place which the LORD your God shall choose out of all your tribes to put his name there, even unto his habitation shall ye seek, and thither thou shalt come: 
And thither ye shall bring your burnt offerings, and your sacrifices, and your tithes, and heave offerings of your hand, and your vows, and your freewill offerings, and the firstlings of your herds and of your flocks: 
And there ye shall eat before the LORD your God, and ye shall rejoice in all that ye put your hand unto, ye and your households, wherein the LORD thy God hath blessed thee. 
Ye shall not do after all the things that we do here this day, every man whatsoever is right in his own eyes. 
For ye are not as yet come to the rest and to the inheritance, which the LORD y
897,re. 
Can the Ethiopian change his skin, or the leopard his spots? then may ye also do good, that are accustomed to do evil. 
Therefore will I scatter them as the stubble that passeth away by the wind of the wilderness. 
This is thy lot, the portion of thy measures from me, saith the LORD; because thou hast forgotten me, and trusted in falsehood. 
Therefore will I discover thy skirts upon thy face, that thy shame may appear. 
I have seen thine adulteries, and thy neighings, the lewdness of thy whoredom, and thine abominations on the hills in the fields. Woe unto thee, O Jerusalem! wilt thou not be made clean? when shall it once be? 
The word of the LORD that came to Jeremiah concerning the dearth. 
Judah mourneth, and the gates thereof languish; they are black unto the ground; and the cry of Jerusalem is gone up. 
And their nobles have sent their little ones to the waters: they came to
730,ine enemy:) 
Let the enemy persecute my soul, and take it; yea, let him tread down my life upon the earth, and lay mine honour in the dust. Selah. 
Arise, O LORD, in thine anger, lift up thyself because of the rage of mine enemies: and awake for me to the judgment that thou hast commanded. 
So shall the congregation of the people compass thee about: for their sakes therefore return thou on high. 
The LORD shall judge the people: judge me, O LORD, according to my righteousness, and according to mine integrity that is in me. 
Oh let the wickedness of the wicked come to an end; but establish the just: for the righteous God trieth the hearts and reins. 
My defence is of God, which saveth the upright in heart. 
God judgeth th
996, inherit them for a possession; they shall be your bondmen for ever: but over your brethren the children of Israel, ye shall not rule one over another with rigour. 
And if a sojourner or stranger wax rich by thee, and thy brother that dwelleth by him wax poor, and sell himself unto the stranger or sojourner by thee, or to the stock of the stranger's family: 
After that he is sold he may be redeemed again; one of his brethren may redeem him: 
Either his uncle, or his uncle's son, may redeem him, or any that is nigh of kin unto him of his family may redeem him; or if he be able, he may redeem himself. 
And he shall reckon with him that bought him from the year that he was sold to him unto the year of jubile: and the price of his sale shall be according unto the number of years, according to the time of an hired servant shall it be with him. 
If there be yet many years behind, according unto them he shall give again the price of his redemption out of the money that he was bought for. 
981,was bestowed upon me was not in vain; but I laboured more abundantly than they all: yet not I, but the grace of God which was with me. 
Therefore whether it were I or they, so we preach, and so ye believed. 
Now if Christ be preached that he rose from the dead, how say some among you that there is no resurrection of the dead? 
But if there be no resurrection of the dead, then is Christ not risen: 
And if Christ be not risen, then is our preaching vain, and your faith is also vain. 
Yea, and we are found false witnesses of God; because we have testified of God that he raised up Christ: whom he raised not up, if so be that the dead rise not. 
For if the dead rise not, then is not Christ raised: 
And if Christ be not raised, your faith is vain; ye are yet in your sins. 
Then they also which are fallen asleep in Christ are perished. 
If in this life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men most miserable. 
But now is Christ risen from the dead, and become the first
984,days of his father Asa, he took out of the land. 
There was then no king in Edom: a deputy was king. 
Jehoshaphat made ships of Tharshish to go to Ophir for gold: but they went not; for the ships were broken at Eziongeber. 
Then said Ahaziah the son of Ahab unto Jehoshaphat, Let my servants go with thy servants in the ships. But Jehoshaphat would not. 
And Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David his father: and Jehoram his son reigned in his stead. 
Ahaziah the son of Ahab began to reign over Israel in Samaria the seventeenth year of Jehoshaphat king of Judah, and reigned two years over Israel. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of his father, and in the way of his mother, and in the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made Israel to sin: 
For he served Baal, and worshipped him, and provoked to anger the LORD God of Israel, according to all that his father had done. 
Adam, Sheth, Enosh, 
Ke
921,, which are given from one shepherd. 
And further, by these, my son, be admonished: of making many books there is no end; and much study is a weariness of the flesh. 
Let us hear the conclusion of the whole matter: Fear God, and keep his commandments: for this is the whole duty of man. 
For God shall bring every work into judgment, with every secret thing, whether it be good, or whether it be evil. 
The song of songs, which is Solomon's. 
Let him kiss me with the kisses of his mouth: for thy love is better than wine. 
Because of the savour of thy good ointments thy name is as ointment poured forth, therefore do the virgins love thee. 
Draw me, we will run after thee: the king hath brought me into his chambers: we will be glad and rejoice in thee, we will remember thy love more than wine: the upright love thee. 
I am black, but comely, O ye daughters of Jerusalem, as the tents of Kedar, as the curtains of Sol
850,thou hid in thine heart: I know that this is with thee. 
If I sin, then thou markest me, and thou wilt not acquit me from mine iniquity. 
If I be wicked, woe unto me; and if I be righteous, yet will I not lift up my head. I am full of confusion; therefore see thou mine affliction; 
For it increaseth. Thou huntest me as a fierce lion: and again thou shewest thyself marvellous upon me. 
Thou renewest thy witnesses against me, and increasest thine indignation upon me; changes and war are against me. 
Wherefore then hast thou brought me forth out of the womb? Oh that I had given up the ghost, and no eye had seen me! 
I should have been as though I had not been; I should have been carried from the womb to the grave. 
Are not my days few? cease then, and let me alone, that I may take comfort a little, 
Before I go whence I shall not return, eve
772,t off from mine altar, shall be to consume thine eyes, and to grieve thine heart: and all the increase of thine house shall die in the flower of their age. 
And this shall be a sign unto thee, that shall come upon thy two sons, on Hophni and Phinehas; in one day they shall die both of them. 
And I will raise me up a faithful priest, that shall do according to that which is in mine heart and in my mind: and I will build him a sure house; and he shall walk before mine anointed for ever. 
And it shall come to pass, that every one that is left in thine house shall come and crouch to him for a piece of silver and a morsel of bread, and shall say, Put me, I pray thee, into one of the priests' offices, that I may eat a piece of bread. 
And the child Samuel ministered u
1066,Joab, and all the host of the mighty men. 
And the children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array before the gate of the city: and the kings that were come were by themselves in the field. 
Now when Joab saw that the battle was set against him before and behind, he chose out of all the choice of Israel, and put them in array against the Syrians. 
And the rest of the people he delivered unto the hand of Abishai his brother, and they set themselves in array against the children of Ammon. 
And he said, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then thou shalt help me: but if the children of Ammon be too strong for thee, then I will help thee. 
Be of good courage, and let us behave ourselves valiantly for our people, and for the cities of our God: and let the LORD do that which is good in his sight. 
So Joab and the people that were with him drew nigh before the Syrians unto the battle; and they fled before him. 
And when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled, they likewise fled before Abishai his brother, and entered into the city. Th
864,inly heard that Saul seeketh to come to Keilah, to destroy the city for my sake. 
Will the men of Keilah deliver me up into his hand? will Saul come down, as thy servant hath heard? O LORD God of Israel, I beseech thee, tell thy servant. And the LORD said, He will come down. 
Then said David, Will the men of Keilah deliver me and my men into the hand of Saul? And the LORD said, They will deliver thee up. 
Then David and his men, which were about six hundred, arose and departed out of Keilah, and went whithersoever they could go. And it was told Saul that David was escaped from Keilah; and he forbare to go forth. 
And David abode in the wilderness in strong holds, and remained in a mountain in the wilderness of Ziph. And Saul sought him every day, but God delivered him not into his hand. 
And David saw that Saul was come out to seek his life: and David 
978,tle while, and the world seeth me no more; but ye see me: because I live, ye shall live also. 
At that day ye shall know that I am in my Father, and ye in me, and I in you. 
He that hath my commandments, and keepeth them, he it is that loveth me: and he that loveth me shall be loved of my Father, and I will love him, and will manifest myself to him. 
Judas saith unto him, not Iscariot, Lord, how is it that thou wilt manifest thyself unto us, and not unto the world? 
Jesus answered and said unto him, If a man love me, he will keep my words: and my Father will love him, and we will come unto him, and make our abode with him. 
He that loveth me not keepeth not my sayings: and the word which ye hear is not mine, but the Father's which sent me. 
These things have I spoken unto you, being yet present with you. 
But the Comforter, which is the Holy Ghost, whom the Father will send in my name, he shall teach you all things, and bring all things to your remembrance, whatso
981,ch is left shall escape. 
And Jacob said, O God of my father Abraham, and God of my father Isaac, the LORD which saidst unto me, Return unto thy country, and to thy kindred, and I will deal well with thee: 
I am not worthy of the least of all the mercies, and of all the truth, which thou hast shewed unto thy servant; for with my staff I passed over this Jordan; and now I am become two bands. 
Deliver me, I pray thee, from the hand of my brother, from the hand of Esau: for I fear him, lest he will come and smite me, and the mother with the children. 
And thou saidst, I will surely do thee good, and make thy seed as the sand of the sea, which cannot be numbered for multitude. 
And he lodged there that same night; and took of that which came to his hand a present for Esau his brother; 
Two hundred she goats, and twenty he goats, two hundred ewes, and twenty rams, 
Thirty milch camels with their colts, forty kine, and ten bulls, twenty she asses, and ten foals. 
And he d
1071,on. 
And the same time there arose no small stir about that way. 
For a certain man named Demetrius, a silversmith, which made silver shrines for Diana, brought no small gain unto the craftsmen; 
Whom he called together with the workmen of like occupation, and said, Sirs, ye know that by this craft we have our wealth. 
Moreover ye see and hear, that not alone at Ephesus, but almost throughout all Asia, this Paul hath persuaded and turned away much people, saying that they be no gods, which are made with hands: 
So that not only this our craft is in danger to be set at nought; but also that the temple of the great goddess Diana should be despised, and her magnificence should be destroyed, whom all Asia and the world worshippeth. 
And when they heard these sayings, they were full of wrath, and cried out, saying, Great is Diana of the Ephesians. 
And the whole city was filled with confusion: and having caught Gaius and Aristarchus, men of Macedonia, Paul's companions in travel, they rushed with one accord into the theatre. 
And when Paul would have entered i
811,ing of Judah, in the tenth month, came Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon and all his army against Jerusalem, and they besieged it. 
And in the eleventh year of Zedekiah, in the fourth month, the ninth day of the month, the city was broken up. 
And all the princes of the king of Babylon came in, and sat in the middle gate, even Nergalsharezer, Samgarnebo, Sarsechim, Rabsaris, Nergalsharezer, Rabmag, with all the residue of the princes of the king of Babylon. 
And it came to pass, that when Zedekiah the king of Judah saw them, and all the men of war, then they fled, and went forth out of the city by night, by the way of the king's garden, by the gate betwixt the two walls: and he went out the way of the plain. 
But the Chaldeans' army pursued after them, and overtook Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho: and
761,all the evil which we did unto him. 
And they sent a messenger unto Joseph, saying, Thy father did command before he died, saying, 
So shall ye say unto Joseph, Forgive, I pray thee now, the trespass of thy brethren, and their sin; for they did unto thee evil: and now, we pray thee, forgive the trespass of the servants of the God of thy father. And Joseph wept when they spake unto him. 
And his brethren also went and fell down before his face; and they said, Behold, we be thy servants. 
And Joseph said unto them, Fear not: for am I in the place of God? 
But as for you, ye thought evil against me; but God meant it unto good, to bring to pass, as it is this day, to save much people alive. 
Now therefore fear ye not: I will nourish you, and your little o
769,e, there shall be as the shaking of an olive tree, and as the gleaning grapes when the vintage is done. 
They shall lift up their voice, they shall sing for the majesty of the LORD, they shall cry aloud from the sea. 
Wherefore glorify ye the LORD in the fires, even the name of the LORD God of Israel in the isles of the sea. 
From the uttermost part of the earth have we heard songs, even glory to the righteous. But I said, My leanness, my leanness, woe unto me! the treacherous dealers have dealt treacherously; yea, the treacherous dealers have dealt very treacherously. 
Fear, and the pit, and the snare, are upon thee, O inhabitant of the earth. 
And it shall come to pass, that he who fleeth from the noise of the fear shall fall into the pit; and he that comet
1031,endureth for ever: forsake not the works of thine own hands. 
O lord, thou hast searched me, and known me. 
Thou knowest my downsitting and mine uprising, thou understandest my thought afar off. 
Thou compassest my path and my lying down, and art acquainted with all my ways. 
For there is not a word in my tongue, but, lo, O LORD, thou knowest it altogether. 
Thou hast beset me behind and before, and laid thine hand upon me. 
Such knowledge is too wonderful for me; it is high, I cannot attain unto it. 
Whither shall I go from thy spirit? or whither shall I flee from thy presence? 
If I ascend up into heaven, thou art there: if I make my bed in hell, behold, thou art there. 
If I take the wings of the morning, and dwell in the uttermost parts of the sea; 
Even there shall thy hand lead me, and thy right hand shall hold me. 
If I say, Surely the darkness shall cover me; even the night shall be light about me. 
Yea, the darkness hideth not from thee; but the night shineth as the day: the darkness and the light are both 
737,ith us? return to thy place, and abide with the king: for thou art a stranger, and also an exile. 
Whereas thou camest but yesterday, should I this day make thee go up and down with us? seeing I go whither I may, return thou, and take back thy brethren: mercy and truth be with thee. 
And Ittai answered the king, and said, As the LORD liveth, and as my lord the king liveth, surely in what place my lord the king shall be, whether in death or life, even there also will thy servant be. 
And David said to Ittai, Go and pass over. And Ittai the Gittite passed over, and all his men, and all the little ones that were with him. 
And all the country wept with a loud voice, and all the people passed over: the king also himself passed over
832,ouse of thy servant, that it may continue for ever before thee: for thou, O Lord GOD, hast spoken it: and with thy blessing let the house of thy servant be blessed for ever. 
And after this it came to pass that David smote the Philistines, and subdued them: and David took Methegammah out of the hand of the Philistines. 
And he smote Moab, and measured them with a line, casting them down to the ground; even with two lines measured he to put to death, and with one full line to keep alive. And so the Moabites became David's servants, and brought gifts. 
David smote also Hadadezer, the son of Rehob, king of Zobah, as he went to recover his border at the river Euphrates. 
And David took from him a thousand chariots, and seven hundred horsemen, and twenty thousand footmen: and David houghed all the chariot horses, but reserved
729,is is the record, that God hath given to us eternal life, and this life is in his Son. 
He that hath the Son hath life; and he that hath not the Son of God hath not life. 
These things have I written unto you that believe on the name of the Son of God; that ye may know that ye have eternal life, and that ye may believe on the name of the Son of God. 
And this is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask any thing according to his will, he heareth us: 
And if we know that he hear us, whatsoever we ask, we know that we have the petitions that we desired of him. 
If any man see his brother sin a sin which is not unto death, he shall ask, and he shall give him life for them that sin not unto death. There is a sin 
865,LORD. 
And the LORD'S anger was kindled against Israel, and he made them wander in the wilderness forty years, until all the generation, that had done evil in the sight of the LORD, was consumed. 
And, behold, ye are risen up in your fathers' stead, an increase of sinful men, to augment yet the fierce anger of the LORD toward Israel. 
For if ye turn away from after him, he will yet again leave them in the wilderness; and ye shall destroy all this people. 
And they came near unto him, and said, We will build sheepfolds here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones: 
But we ourselves will go ready armed before the children of Israel, until we have brought them unto their place: and our little ones shall dwell in the fenced cities because of the inhabitants of the land. 
We will not return unto our houses, until the children of Israel have inherited 
971,s it began to dawn toward the first day of the week, came Mary Magdalene and the other Mary to see the sepulchre. 
And, behold, there was a great earthquake: for the angel of the Lord descended from heaven, and came and rolled back the stone from the door, and sat upon it. 
His countenance was like lightning, and his raiment white as snow: 
And for fear of him the keepers did shake, and became as dead men. 
And the angel answered and said unto the women, Fear not ye: for I know that ye seek Jesus, which was crucified. 
He is not here: for he is risen, as he said. Come, see the place where the Lord lay. 
And go quickly, and tell his disciples that he is risen from the dead; and, behold, he goeth before you into Galilee; there shall ye see him: lo, I have told you. 
And they departed quickly from the sepulchre with fear and great joy; and did run to bring his disciples word. 
And as they went to tell his disciples, behold, Jesus met them, saying, All hail. An
962,salem. 
And when his disciples James and John saw this, they said, Lord, wilt thou that we command fire to come down from heaven, and consume them, even as Elias did? 
But he turned, and rebuked them, and said, Ye know not what manner of spirit ye are of. 
For the Son of man is not come to destroy men's lives, but to save them. And they went to another village. 
And it came to pass, that, as they went in the way, a certain man said unto him, Lord, I will follow thee whithersoever thou goest. 
And Jesus said unto him, Foxes have holes, and birds of the air have nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head. 
And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father. 
Jesus said unto him, Let the dead bury their dead: but go thou and preach the kingdom of God. 
And another also said, Lord, I will follow thee; but let me first go bid them farewell, which are at home at my house. 
And Jesus said unto hi
741,Jesus, moved with compassion, put forth his hand, and touched him, and saith unto him, I will; be thou clean. 
And as soon as he had spoken, immediately the leprosy departed from him, and he was cleansed. 
And he straitly charged him, and forthwith sent him away; 
And saith unto him, See thou say nothing to any man: but go thy way, shew thyself to the priest, and offer for thy cleansing those things which Moses commanded, for a testimony unto them. 
But he went out, and began to publish it much, and to blaze abroad the matter, insomuch that Jesus could no more openly enter into the city, but was without in desert places: and they came to him from every quarter. 
And again he entered into Capernaum after some days; and it was noised
928,orted over you in all our affliction and distress by your faith: 
For now we live, if ye stand fast in the Lord. 
For what thanks can we render to God again for you, for all the joy wherewith we joy for your sakes before our God; 
Night and day praying exceedingly that we might see your face, and might perfect that which is lacking in your faith? 
Now God himself and our Father, and our Lord Jesus Christ, direct our way unto you. 
And the Lord make you to increase and abound in love one toward another, and toward all men, even as we do toward you: 
To the end he may stablish your hearts unblameable in holiness before God, even our Father, at the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ with all his saints. 
Furthermore then we beseech you, brethren, and exhort you by the Lord Jesus, that as ye have received of us how ye ought to walk and to please God, so ye would abound more and more. 
For ye know what commandments we gave
759, told Abraham, saying, Behold, Milcah, she hath also born children unto thy brother Nahor; 
Huz his firstborn, and Buz his brother, and Kemuel the father of Aram, 
And Chesed, and Hazo, and Pildash, and Jidlaph, and Bethuel. 
And Bethuel begat Rebekah: these eight Milcah did bear to Nahor, Abraham's brother. 
And his concubine, whose name was Reumah, she bare also Tebah, and Gaham, and Thahash, and Maachah. 
And Sarah was an hundred and seven and twenty years old: these were the years of the life of Sarah. 
And Sarah died in Kirjatharba; the same is Hebron in the land of Canaan: and Abraham came to mourn for Sarah, and to weep for her. 
And Abraham stood up from before his dead, and spake unto the sons of Heth, saying, 
I am a stranger and a sojourn
993,he wicked: and that the righteous should be as the wicked, that be far from thee: Shall not the Judge of all the earth do right? 
And the LORD said, If I find in Sodom fifty righteous within the city, then I will spare all the place for their sakes. 
And Abraham answered and said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak unto the LORD, which am but dust and ashes: 
Peradventure there shall lack five of the fifty righteous: wilt thou destroy all the city for lack of five? And he said, If I find there forty and five, I will not destroy it. 
And he spake unto him yet again, and said, Peradventure there shall be forty found there. And he said, I will not do it for forty's sake. 
And he said unto him, Oh let not the LORD be angry, and I will speak: Peradventure there shall thirty be found there. And he said, I will not do it, if I find thirty there. 
And he said, Behold now, I have taken upon me to speak unto the LORD: Peradventure there shall be twenty found there. And he said, I w
879,ld time, Thou shalt not kill; and whosoever shall kill shall be in danger of the judgment: 
But I say unto you, That whosoever is angry with his brother without a cause shall be in danger of the judgment: and whosoever shall say to his brother, Raca, shall be in danger of the council: but whosoever shall say, Thou fool, shall be in danger of hell fire. 
Therefore if thou bring thy gift to the altar, and there rememberest that thy brother hath ought against thee; 
Leave there thy gift before the altar, and go thy way; first be reconciled to thy brother, and then come and offer thy gift. 
Agree with thine adversary quickly, whiles thou art in the way with him; lest at any time the adversary deliver thee to the judge, and the judge deliver thee to the officer, and thou be cast into prison. 
Verily I say unto thee, Thou shalt by no means come out thence, till thou hast p
755,s, until we were gone over: 
That all the people of the earth might know the hand of the LORD, that it is mighty: that ye might fear the LORD your God for ever. 
And it came to pass, when all the kings of the Amorites, which were on the side of Jordan westward, and all the kings of the Canaanites, which were by the sea, heard that the LORD had dried up the waters of Jordan from before the children of Israel, until we were passed over, that their heart melted, neither was there spirit in them any more, because of the children of Israel. 
At that time the LORD said unto Joshua, Make thee sharp knives, and circumcise again the children of Israel the second time. 
And Joshua made him sharp knives, and circumcised the children of Israel at the hill o
1052,not profit; and they are their own witnesses; they see not, nor know; that they may be ashamed. 
Who hath formed a god, or molten a graven image that is profitable for nothing? 
Behold, all his fellows shall be ashamed: and the workmen, they are of men: let them all be gathered together, let them stand up; yet they shall fear, and they shall be ashamed together. 
The smith with the tongs both worketh in the coals, and fashioneth it with hammers, and worketh it with the strength of his arms: yea, he is hungry, and his strength faileth: he drinketh no water, and is faint. 
The carpenter stretcheth out his rule; he marketh it out with a line; he fitteth it with planes, and he marketh it out with the compass, and maketh it after the figure of a man, according to the beauty of a man; that it may remain in the house. 
He heweth him down cedars, and taketh the cypress and the oak, which he strengtheneth for himself among the trees of the forest: he planteth an ash, and the rain doth nourish it. 
Then shall it be for a man to burn: for he will 
1058, of feasting: for that is the end of all men; and the living will lay it to his heart. 
Sorrow is better than laughter: for by the sadness of the countenance the heart is made better. 
The heart of the wise is in the house of mourning; but the heart of fools is in the house of mirth. 
It is better to hear the rebuke of the wise, than for a man to hear the song of fools. 
For as the crackling of thorns under a pot, so is the laughter of the fool: this also is vanity. 
Surely oppression maketh a wise man mad; and a gift destroyeth the heart. 
Better is the end of a thing than the beginning thereof: and the patient in spirit is better than the proud in spirit. 
Be not hasty in thy spirit to be angry: for anger resteth in the bosom of fools. 
Say not thou, What is the cause that the former days were better than these? for thou dost not enquire wisely concerning this. 
Wisdom is good with an inheritance: and by it there is profit to them that see the sun. 
For wisdom is a defence, and money is a defence: but the excellency of knowledge is, that wi
955,th you: and I gave them into your hand, that ye might possess their land; and I destroyed them from before you. 
Then Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab, arose and warred against Israel, and sent and called Balaam the son of Beor to curse you: 
But I would not hearken unto Balaam; therefore he blessed you still: so I delivered you out of his hand. 
And you went over Jordan, and came unto Jericho: and the men of Jericho fought against you, the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Girgashites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites; and I delivered them into your hand. 
And I sent the hornet before you, which drave them out from before you, even the two kings of the Amorites; but not with thy sword, nor with thy bow. 
And I have given you a land for which ye did not labour, and cities which ye built not, and ye dwell in them; of the vineyards and oliveyards which ye planted not do ye eat. 
Now therefore fear t
740,nd: and thou hast destroyed cities; their memorial is perished with them. 
But the LORD shall endure for ever: he hath prepared his throne for judgment. 
And he shall judge the world in righteousness, he shall minister judgment to the people in uprightness. 
The LORD also will be a refuge for the oppressed, a refuge in times of trouble. 
And they that know thy name will put their trust in thee: for thou, LORD, hast not forsaken them that seek thee. 
Sing praises to the LORD, which dwelleth in Zion: declare among the people his doings. 
When he maketh inquisition for blood, he remembereth them: he forgetteth not the cry of the humble. 
Have mercy upon me, O LORD; consider my trouble which I suffer of them that hate me, thou that li
753,fore, if ye have done truly and sincerely, in that ye have made Abimelech king, and if ye have dealt well with Jerubbaal and his house, and have done unto him according to the deserving of his hands; 
(For my father fought for you, and adventured his life far, and delivered you out of the hand of Midian: 
And ye are risen up against my father's house this day, and have slain his sons, threescore and ten persons, upon one stone, and have made Abimelech, the son of his maidservant, king over the men of Shechem, because he is your brother;) 
If ye then have dealt truly and sincerely with Jerubbaal and with his house this day, then rejoice ye in Abimelech, and let him also rejoice in you: 
But if not, let fire come out from Abimelech, and devour t
770,ts and his cattle flee into the houses: 
And he that regarded not the word of the LORD left his servants and his cattle in the field. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Stretch forth thine hand toward heaven, that there may be hail in all the land of Egypt, upon man, and upon beast, and upon every herb of the field, throughout the land of Egypt. 
And Moses stretched forth his rod toward heaven: and the LORD sent thunder and hail, and the fire ran along upon the ground; and the LORD rained hail upon the land of Egypt. 
So there was hail, and fire mingled with the hail, very grievous, such as there was none like it in all the land of Egypt since it became a nation. 
And the hail smote throughout all the land of Egypt all that was in the field, both man and beast; an
868,they departed from him in peace. 
And it came to pass the same day, that Isaac's servants came, and told him concerning the well which they had digged, and said unto him, We have found water. 
And he called it Shebah: therefore the name of the city is Beersheba unto this day. 
And Esau was forty years old when he took to wife Judith the daughter of Beeri the Hittite, and Bashemath the daughter of Elon the Hittite: 
Which were a grief of mind unto Isaac and to Rebekah. 
And it came to pass, that when Isaac was old, and his eyes were dim, so that he could not see, he called Esau his eldest son, and said unto him, My son: and he said unto him, Behold, here am I. 
And he said, Behold now, I am old, I know not the day of my death: 
Now therefore take, I pray thee, thy weapons, thy quiver and thy bow, and go out to the field, and take me some venison; 
And make 
853,ng, as small as the hoar frost on the ground. 
And when the children of Israel saw it, they said one to another, It is manna: for they wist not what it was. And Moses said unto them, This is the bread which the LORD hath given you to eat. 
This is the thing which the LORD hath commanded, Gather of it every man according to his eating, an omer for every man, according to the number of your persons; take ye every man for them which are in his tents. 
And the children of Israel did so, and gathered, some more, some less. 
And when they did mete it with an omer, he that gathered much had nothing over, and he that gathered little had no lack; they gathered every man according to his eating. 
And Moses said, Let no man leave of it till the morning. 
Notwithstanding they hearkened not unto Moses; but some of them left of it until the morning, and i
770,ffering: and the kids of the goats for sin offering twelve. 
And all the oxen for the sacrifice of the peace offerings were twenty and four bullocks, the rams sixty, the he goats sixty, the lambs of the first year sixty. This was the dedication of the altar, after that it was anointed. 
And when Moses was gone into the tabernacle of the congregation to speak with him, then he heard the voice of one speaking unto him from off the mercy seat that was upon the ark of testimony, from between the two cherubims: and he spake unto him. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron and say unto him, When thou lightest the lamps, the seven lamps shall give light over against the candlestick. 
And Aaron did so; he lighted the lamps thereof over against the c
942,lift up thy voice to the clouds, that abundance of waters may cover thee? 
Canst thou send lightnings, that they may go and say unto thee, Here we are? 
Who hath put wisdom in the inward parts? or who hath given understanding to the heart? 
Who can number the clouds in wisdom? or who can stay the bottles of heaven, 
When the dust groweth into hardness, and the clods cleave fast together? 
Wilt thou hunt the prey for the lion? or fill the appetite of the young lions, 
When they couch in their dens, and abide in the covert to lie in wait? 
Who provideth for the raven his food? when his young ones cry unto God, they wander for lack of meat. 
Knowest thou the time when the wild goats of the rock bring forth? or canst thou mark when the hinds do calve? 
Canst thou number the months that they fulfil? or knowest thou the time when they bring forth? 
They bow themselves, they bring forth their young ones, they cast out their sorrows. 
T
901,d to minister unto him for ever. 
And David gathered all Israel together to Jerusalem, to bring up the ark of the LORD unto his place, which he had prepared for it. 
And David assembled the children of Aaron, and the Levites: 
Of the sons of Kohath; Uriel the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Merari; Asaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred and twenty: 
Of the sons of Gershom; Joel the chief and his brethren an hundred and thirty: 
Of the sons of Elizaphan; Shemaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred: 
Of the sons of Hebron; Eliel the chief, and his brethren fourscore: 
Of the sons of Uzziel; Amminadab the chief, and his brethren an hundred and twelve. 
And David called for Zadok and Abiathar the priests, and for the Levites, for Uriel, Asaiah, and Joel, Shemaiah, and Eliel, and Amminadab, 
And said unto them, Ye are the chief of the fathers of the 
776,vered. 
Fifteen cubits upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains were covered. 
And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both of fowl, and of cattle, and of beast, and of every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth, and every man: 
All in whose nostrils was the breath of life, of all that was in the dry land, died. 
And every living substance was destroyed which was upon the face of the ground, both man, and cattle, and the creeping things, and the fowl of the heaven; and they were destroyed from the earth: and Noah only remained alive, and they that were with him in the ark. 
And the waters prevailed upon the earth an hundred and fifty days. 
And God remembered Noah, and every living thing, and all the cattle that was with him in the ark: and God 
836,, without blemish, and offer them before the LORD. 
And unto the children of Israel thou shalt speak, saying, Take ye a kid of the goats for a sin offering; and a calf and a lamb, both of the first year, without blemish, for a burnt offering; 
Also a bullock and a ram for peace offerings, to sacrifice before the LORD; and a meat offering mingled with oil: for to day the LORD will appear unto you. 
And they brought that which Moses commanded before the tabernacle of the congregation: and all the congregation drew near and stood before the LORD. 
And Moses said, This is the thing which the LORD commanded that ye should do: and the glory of the LORD shall appear unto you. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, Go unto the altar, and offer thy sin offering, and thy burnt offering, and make an atonement for thyself, and for the people: and 
759,the ass and the lion standing by the carcase: the lion had not eaten the carcase, nor torn the ass. 
And the prophet took up the carcase of the man of God, and laid it upon the ass, and brought it back: and the old prophet came to the city, to mourn and to bury him. 
And he laid his carcase in his own grave; and they mourned over him, saying, Alas, my brother! 
And it came to pass, after he had buried him, that he spake to his sons, saying, When I am dead, then bury me in the sepulchre wherein the man of God is buried; lay my bones beside his bones: 
For the saying which he cried by the word of the LORD against the altar in Bethel, and against all the houses of the high places which are in the cities of Samaria, shall surely come to pass. 
After thi
833,en: 
And the border went up toward Debir from the valley of Achor, and so northward, looking toward Gilgal, that is before the going up to Adummim, which is on the south side of the river: and the border passed toward the waters of Enshemesh, and the goings out thereof were at Enrogel: 
And the border went up by the valley of the son of Hinnom unto the south side of the Jebusite; the same is Jerusalem: and the border went up to the top of the mountain that lieth before the valley of Hinnom westward, which is at the end of the valley of the giants northward: 
And the border was drawn from the top of the hill unto the fountain of the water of Nephtoah, and went out to the cities of mount Ephron; and the border was drawn to Baalah, which is Kirjathjearim: 
And the border compassed from Baalah westward unto mount Seir, and pa
1066,oles, and they are hid in prison houses: they are for a prey, and none delivereth; for a spoil, and none saith, Restore. 
Who among you will give ear to this? who will hearken and hear for the time to come? 
Who gave Jacob for a spoil, and Israel to the robbers? did not the LORD, he against whom we have sinned? for they would not walk in his ways, neither were they obedient unto his law. 
Therefore he hath poured upon him the fury of his anger, and the strength of battle: and it hath set him on fire round about, yet he knew not; and it burned him, yet he laid it not to heart. 
But now thus saith the LORD that created thee, O Jacob, and he that formed thee, O Israel, Fear not: for I have redeemed thee, I have called thee by thy name; thou art mine. 
When thou passest through the waters, I will be with thee; and through the rivers, they shall not overflow thee: when thou walkest through the fire, thou shalt not be burned; neither shall the flame kindle upon thee. 
For I am the LORD thy God, the Holy One of Israel, thy Saviour: I gave Egypt for thy rans
810,e LORD, having his uncleanness upon him, that soul shall be cut off from my presence: I am the LORD. 
What man soever of the seed of Aaron is a leper, or hath a running issue; he shall not eat of the holy things, until he be clean. And whoso toucheth any thing that is unclean by the dead, or a man whose seed goeth from him; 
Or whosoever toucheth any creeping thing, whereby he may be made unclean, or a man of whom he may take uncleanness, whatsoever uncleanness he hath; 
The soul which hath touched any such shall be unclean until even, and shall not eat of the holy things, unless he wash his flesh with water. 
And when the sun is down, he shall be clean, and shall afterward eat of the holy things; because it is his food. 
That which dieth of itself, or is torn with beasts, he shall not eat to defile
765,e righteousness. 
Let thine hand help me; for I have chosen thy precepts. 
I have longed for thy salvation, O LORD; and thy law is my delight. 
Let my soul live, and it shall praise thee; and let thy judgments help me. 
I have gone astray like a lost sheep; seek thy servant; for I do not forget thy commandments. 
In my distress I cried unto the LORD, and he heard me. 
Deliver my soul, O LORD, from lying lips, and from a deceitful tongue. 
What shall be given unto thee? or what shall be done unto thee, thou false tongue? 
Sharp arrows of the mighty, with coals of juniper. 
Woe is me, that I sojourn in Mesech, that I dwell in the tents of Kedar! 
My soul hath long dwelt with him that hateth peace. 
I am for peace: but when I speak, they are for war. 
I will
911,er the people, sanctify the congregation, assemble the elders, gather the children, and those that suck the breasts: let the bridegroom go forth of his chamber, and the bride out of her closet. 
Let the priests, the ministers of the LORD, weep between the porch and the altar, and let them say, Spare thy people, O LORD, and give not thine heritage to reproach, that the heathen should rule over them: wherefore should they say among the people, Where is their God? 
Then will the LORD be jealous for his land, and pity his people. 
Yea, the LORD will answer and say unto his people, Behold, I will send you corn, and wine, and oil, and ye shall be satisfied therewith: and I will no more make you a reproach among the heathen: 
But I will remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive him into a land barren and desolate, with his face toward the east sea, and his hinder part toward the utmost sea
757,re past, which were before thee, since the day that God created man upon the earth, and ask from the one side of heaven unto the other, whether there hath been any such thing as this great thing is, or hath been heard like it? 
Did ever people hear the voice of God speaking out of the midst of the fire, as thou hast heard, and live? 
Or hath God assayed to go and take him a nation from the midst of another nation, by temptations, by signs, and by wonders, and by war, and by a mighty hand, and by a stretched out arm, and by great terrors, according to all that the LORD your God did for you in Egypt before your eyes? 
Unto thee it was shewed, that thou mightest know that the LORD he is God; there is none else beside him. 
Out of heaven he made thee 
858,n sent to Huram the king of Tyre, saying, As thou didst deal with David my father, and didst send him cedars to build him an house to dwell therein, even so deal with me. 
Behold, I build an house to the name of the LORD my God, to dedicate it to him, and to burn before him sweet incense, and for the continual shewbread, and for the burnt offerings morning and evening, on the sabbaths, and on the new moons, and on the solemn feasts of the LORD our God. This is an ordinance for ever to Israel. 
And the house which I build is great: for great is our God above all gods. 
But who is able to build him an house, seeing the heaven and heaven of heavens cannot contain him? who am I then, that I should build him an house, save only to burn sacrifice before him? 
Send me now therefore a man cunning to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, and in iron,
807,tion, and maketh him families like a flock. 
The righteous shall see it, and rejoice: and all iniquity shall stop her mouth. 
Whoso is wise, and will observe these things, even they shall understand the lovingkindness of the LORD. 
O god, my heart is fixed; I will sing and give praise, even with my glory. 
Awake, psaltery and harp: I myself will awake early. 
I will praise thee, O LORD, among the people: and I will sing praises unto thee among the nations. 
For thy mercy is great above the heavens: and thy truth reacheth unto the clouds. 
Be thou exalted, O God, above the heavens: and thy glory above all the earth; 
That thy beloved may be delivered: save with thy right hand, and answer me. 
God hath spoken in his holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth
943,tood all these things? They say unto him, Yea, Lord. 
Then said he unto them, Therefore every scribe which is instructed unto the kingdom of heaven is like unto a man that is an householder, which bringeth forth out of his treasure things new and old. 
And it came to pass, that when Jesus had finished these parables, he departed thence. 
And when he was come into his own country, he taught them in their synagogue, insomuch that they were astonished, and said, Whence hath this man this wisdom, and these mighty works? 
Is not this the carpenter's son? is not his mother called Mary? and his brethren, James, and Joses, and Simon, and Judas? 
And his sisters, are they not all with us? Whence then hath this man all these things? 
And they were offended in him. But Jesus said unto them, A prophet is not without honour, save in his own country, and in his own house. 
And he did not many mighty works there because of their unbelief. 
At t
925, spued out the nations that were before you. 
For whosoever shall commit any of these abominations, even the souls that commit them shall be cut off from among their people. 
Therefore shall ye keep mine ordinance, that ye commit not any one of these abominable customs, which were committed before you, and that ye defile not yourselves therein: I am the LORD your God. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, and say unto them, Ye shall be holy: for I the LORD your God am holy. 
Ye shall fear every man his mother, and his father, and keep my sabbaths: I am the LORD your God. 
Turn ye not unto idols, nor make to yourselves molten gods: I am the LORD your God. 
And if ye offer a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD, ye shall offer it at your own will. 
It shall be eaten the same day ye offer it, and on the morrow: and if ought remain until the third d
894,e; 
But to the saints that are in the earth, and to the excellent, in whom is all my delight. 
Their sorrows shall be multiplied that hasten after another god: their drink offerings of blood will I not offer, nor take up their names into my lips. 
The LORD is the portion of mine inheritance and of my cup: thou maintainest my lot. 
The lines are fallen unto me in pleasant places; yea, I have a goodly heritage. 
I will bless the LORD, who hath given me counsel: my reins also instruct me in the night seasons. 
I have set the LORD always before me: because he is at my right hand, I shall not be moved. 
Therefore my heart is glad, and my glory rejoiceth: my flesh also shall rest in hope. 
For thou wilt not leave my soul in hell; neither wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
Thou wilt shew me the path of life: in thy presence is fulness of joy; at thy right hand there are p
944,t shall be forgiven him. 
Ye shall have one law for him that sinneth through ignorance, both for him that is born among the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born in the land, or a stranger, the same reproacheth the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from among his people. 
Because he hath despised the word of the LORD, and hath broken his commandment, that soul shall utterly be cut off; his iniquity shall be upon him. 
And while the children of Israel were in the wilderness, they found a man that gathered sticks upon the sabbath day. 
And they that found him gathering sticks brought him unto Moses and Aaron, and unto all the congregation. 
And they put him in ward, because it was not declared what should be done to him. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, The man shall be surely put to death: all the congregation shall stone him with ston
796, have we waited for thee; the desire of our soul is to thy name, and to the remembrance of thee. 
With my soul have I desired thee in the night; yea, with my spirit within me will I seek thee early: for when thy judgments are in the earth, the inhabitants of the world will learn righteousness. 
Let favour be shewed to the wicked, yet will he not learn righteousness: in the land of uprightness will he deal unjustly, and will not behold the majesty of the LORD. 
LORD, when thy hand is lifted up, they will not see: but they shall see, and be ashamed for their envy at the people; yea, the fire of thine enemies shall devour them. 
LORD, thou wilt ordain peace for us: for thou also hast wrought all our works in us. 
O LORD our God, other lords beside thee have had dominion over us: but by th
814,by fowl, or by any manner of living thing that creepeth on the ground, which I have separated from you as unclean. 
And ye shall be holy unto me: for I the LORD am holy, and have severed you from other people, that ye should be mine. 
A man also or woman that hath a familiar spirit, or that is a wizard, shall surely be put to death: they shall stone them with stones: their blood shall be upon them. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Speak unto the priests the sons of Aaron, and say unto them, There shall none be defiled for the dead among his people: 
But for his kin, that is near unto him, that is, for his mother, and for his father, and for his son, and for his daughter, and for his brother. 
And for his sister a virgin, that is nigh unto him, which hath had no husband; for her may he be defiled. 
But he 
849,body. 
And he took the cup, and gave thanks, and gave it to them, saying, Drink ye all of it; 
For this is my blood of the new testament, which is shed for many for the remission of sins. 
But I say unto you, I will not drink henceforth of this fruit of the vine, until that day when I drink it new with you in my Father's kingdom. 
And when they had sung an hymn, they went out into the mount of Olives. 
Then saith Jesus unto them, All ye shall be offended because of me this night: for it is written, I will smite the shepherd, and the sheep of the flock shall be scattered abroad. 
But after I am risen again, I will go before you into Galilee. 
Peter answered and said unto him, Though all men shall be offended because of thee, yet will I never be offended. 
Jesus said unto him, Verily I say unto thee, That this night, before the cock crow, 
1068,ly a stranger in Jerusalem, and hast not known the things which are come to pass there in these days? 
And he said unto them, What things? And they said unto him, Concerning Jesus of Nazareth, which was a prophet mighty in deed and word before God and all the people: 
And how the chief priests and our rulers delivered him to be condemned to death, and have crucified him. 
But we trusted that it had been he which should have redeemed Israel: and beside all this, to day is the third day since these things were done. 
Yea, and certain women also of our company made us astonished, which were early at the sepulchre; 
And when they found not his body, they came, saying, that they had also seen a vision of angels, which said that he was alive. 
And certain of them which were with us went to the sepulchre, and found it even so as the women had said: but him they saw not. 
Then he said unto them, O fools, and slow of heart to believe all that the prophets have spoken: 
Ought not Christ to have suffered these things, and to enter into his glory? 
And beginning a
927, that he will not slay his servant with the sword. 
And Solomon said, If he will shew himself a worthy man, there shall not an hair of him fall to the earth: but if wickedness shall be found in him, he shall die. 
So king Solomon sent, and they brought him down from the altar. And he came and bowed himself to king Solomon: and Solomon said unto him, Go to thine house. 
Now the days of David drew nigh that he should die; and he charged Solomon his son, saying, 
I go the way of all the earth: be thou strong therefore, and shew thyself a man; 
And keep the charge of the LORD thy God, to walk in his ways, to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his judgments, and his testimonies, as it is written in the law of Moses, that thou mayest prosper in all that thou doest, and whithersoever thou turnest thyself: 
That the LORD may continue his word which he spake concerning me, saying, If thy children take heed to the
927,multitude that is with him: for there be more with us than with him: 
With him is an arm of flesh; but with us is the LORD our God to help us, and to fight our battles. And the people rested themselves upon the words of Hezekiah king of Judah. 
After this did Sennacherib king of Assyria send his servants to Jerusalem, (but he himself laid siege against Lachish, and all his power with him,) unto Hezekiah king of Judah, and unto all Judah that were at Jerusalem, saying, 
Thus saith Sennacherib king of Assyria, Whereon do ye trust, that ye abide in the siege in Jerusalem? 
Doth not Hezekiah persuade you to give over yourselves to die by famine and by thirst, saying, The LORD our God shall deliver us out of the hand of the king of Assyria? 
Hath not the same Hezekiah taken away his high places and his altars, and commanded Judah and Jerusalem, saying, Ye shall worship before one altar, and burn incense upon it? 
Know 
955, 
But unto none of them was Elias sent, save unto Sarepta, a city of Sidon, unto a woman that was a widow. 
And many lepers were in Israel in the time of Eliseus the prophet; and none of them was cleansed, saving Naaman the Syrian. 
And all they in the synagogue, when they heard these things, were filled with wrath, 
And rose up, and thrust him out of the city, and led him unto the brow of the hill whereon their city was built, that they might cast him down headlong. 
But he passing through the midst of them went his way, 
And came down to Capernaum, a city of Galilee, and taught them on the sabbath days. 
And they were astonished at his doctrine: for his word was with power. 
And in the synagogue there was a man, which had a spirit of an unclean devil, and cried out with a loud voice, 
Saying, Let us alone; what have we to do with thee, thou Jesus of Nazareth? art thou come to destroy us? I know thee who thou art; the Holy One of God. 
And 
862,e the oracle; but they were not seen without. And there it is unto this day. 
There was nothing in the ark save the two tables which Moses put therein at Horeb, when the LORD made a covenant with the children of Israel, when they came out of Egypt. 
And it came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy place: (for all the priests that were present were sanctified, and did not then wait by course: 
Also the Levites which were the singers, all of them of Asaph, of Heman, of Jeduthun, with their sons and their brethren, being arrayed in white linen, having cymbals and psalteries and harps, stood at the east end of the altar, and with them an hundred and twenty priests sounding with trumpets:) 
It came even to pass, as the trumpeters and singers were as one, to make one sound to be heard in praising and thanking the LORD; and when they lifted u
918, and passed along by the north of Betharabah; and the border went up to the stone of Bohan the son of Reuben: 
And the border went up toward Debir from the valley of Achor, and so northward, looking toward Gilgal, that is before the going up to Adummim, which is on the south side of the river: and the border passed toward the waters of Enshemesh, and the goings out thereof were at Enrogel: 
And the border went up by the valley of the son of Hinnom unto the south side of the Jebusite; the same is Jerusalem: and the border went up to the top of the mountain that lieth before the valley of Hinnom westward, which is at the end of the valley of the giants northward: 
And the border was drawn from the top of the hill unto the fountain of the water of Nephtoah, and went out to the cities of mount Ephron; and the border was drawn to Baalah, which is Kirjathjearim: 
And the border compassed from Baalah westward un
890,n house upon the earth; against which the stream did beat vehemently, and immediately it fell; and the ruin of that house was great. 
Now when he had ended all his sayings in the audience of the people, he entered into Capernaum. 
And a certain centurion's servant, who was dear unto him, was sick, and ready to die. 
And when he heard of Jesus, he sent unto him the elders of the Jews, beseeching him that he would come and heal his servant. 
And when they came to Jesus, they besought him instantly, saying, That he was worthy for whom he should do this: 
For he loveth our nation, and he hath built us a synagogue. 
Then Jesus went with them. And when he was now not far from the house, the centurion sent friends to him, saying unto him, Lord, trouble not thyself: for I am not worthy that thou shouldest enter under my roof: 
Wherefore neither thought I myself worthy to come unto thee
926,e beard; 
Then the priest shall see the plague: and, behold, if it be in sight deeper than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair; then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a leprosy upon the head or beard. 
And if the priest look on the plague of the scall, and, behold, it be not in sight deeper than the skin, and that there is no black hair in it; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague of the scall seven days: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague: and, behold, if the scall spread not, and there be in it no yellow hair, and the scall be not in sight deeper than the skin; 
He shall be shaven, but the scall shall he not shave; and the priest shall shut up him that hath the scall seven days more: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the scall: and, behold, if the scall be not spread in the skin, nor be in sight deeper than the sk
862,rd, and all the Gentiles, upon whom my name is called, saith the Lord, who doeth all these things. 
Known unto God are all his works from the beginning of the world. 
Wherefore my sentence is, that we trouble not them, which from among the Gentiles are turned to God: 
But that we write unto them, that they abstain from pollutions of idols, and from fornication, and from things strangled, and from blood. 
For Moses of old time hath in every city them that preach him, being read in the synagogues every sabbath day. 
Then pleased it the apostles and elders with the whole church, to send chosen men of their own company to Antioch with Paul and Barnabas; namely, Judas surnamed Barsabas and Silas, chief men among the brethren: 
And they wrote letters by them after this manner; The apostles and elders and brethren send greeting unto the brethren which are o
776,st out the enemy from before thee; and shall say, Destroy them. 
Israel then shall dwell in safety alone: the fountain of Jacob shall be upon a land of corn and wine; also his heavens shall drop down dew. 
Happy art thou, O Israel: who is like unto thee, O people saved by the LORD, the shield of thy help, and who is the sword of thy excellency! and thine enemies shall be found liars unto thee; and thou shalt tread upon their high places. 
And Moses went up from the plains of Moab unto the mountain of Nebo, to the top of Pisgah, that is over against Jericho. And the LORD shewed him all the land of Gilead, unto Dan, 
And all Naphtali, and the land of Ephraim, and Manasseh, and all the land of Judah, unto the utmost sea, 
And the south, and the plain of the valley of J
941,s of Israel came; and the Levites took up the ark. 
And they brought up the ark, and the tabernacle of the congregation, and all the holy vessels that were in the tabernacle, these did the priests and the Levites bring up. 
Also king Solomon, and all the congregation of Israel that were assembled unto him before the ark, sacrificed sheep and oxen, which could not be told nor numbered for multitude. 
And the priests brought in the ark of the covenant of the LORD unto his place, to the oracle of the house, into the most holy place, even under the wings of the cherubims: 
For the cherubims spread forth their wings over the place of the ark, and the cherubims covered the ark and the staves thereof above. 
And they drew out the staves of the ark, that the ends of the staves were seen from the ark before the oracle; but they were not seen without. And there it is unto this day. 
There was nothing in the ark save the two tables which 
1014,adocia, in Pontus, and Asia, 
Phrygia, and Pamphylia, in Egypt, and in the parts of Libya about Cyrene, and strangers of Rome, Jews and proselytes, 
Cretes and Arabians, we do hear them speak in our tongues the wonderful works of God. 
And they were all amazed, and were in doubt, saying one to another, What meaneth this? 
Others mocking said, These men are full of new wine. 
But Peter, standing up with the eleven, lifted up his voice, and said unto them, Ye men of Judaea, and all ye that dwell at Jerusalem, be this known unto you, and hearken to my words: 
For these are not drunken, as ye suppose, seeing it is but the third hour of the day. 
But this is that which was spoken by the prophet Joel; 
And it shall come to pass in the last days, saith God, I will pour out of my Spirit upon all flesh: and your sons and your daughters shall prophesy, and your young men shall see visions, and your old men shall dream dreams: 
And on my servants and on my handmaidens I will pour out in those days of my Spirit
824, tabernacle, and all the pins of the court round about. 
And of the blue, and purple, and scarlet, they made cloths of service, to do service in the holy place, and made the holy garments for Aaron; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he made the ephod of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen. 
And they did beat the gold into thin plates, and cut it into wires, to work it in the blue, and in the purple, and in the scarlet, and in the fine linen, with cunning work. 
They made shoulderpieces for it, to couple it together: by the two edges was it coupled together. 
And the curious girdle of his ephod, that was upon it, was of the same, according to the work thereof; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they wrought onyx stones inclosed in
965,last time. 
They went out from us, but they were not of us; for if they had been of us, they would no doubt have continued with us: but they went out, that they might be made manifest that they were not all of us. 
But ye have an unction from the Holy One, and ye know all things. 
I have not written unto you because ye know not the truth, but because ye know it, and that no lie is of the truth. 
Who is a liar but he that denieth that Jesus is the Christ? He is antichrist, that denieth the Father and the Son. 
Whosoever denieth the Son, the same hath not the Father: he that acknowledgeth the Son hath the Father also. 
Let that therefore abide in you, which ye have heard from the beginning. If that which ye have heard from the beginning shall remain in you, ye also shall continue in the Son, and in the Father. 
And this is the promise that he hath promised us, even eternal life. 
These things have I written unto you concerning them that seduce you. 
But
862,nd all his days they departed not from following the LORD, the God of their fathers. 
Moreover Josiah kept a passover unto the LORD in Jerusalem: and they killed the passover on the fourteenth day of the first month. 
And he set the priests in their charges, and encouraged them to the service of the house of the LORD, 
And said unto the Levites that taught all Israel, which were holy unto the LORD, Put the holy ark in the house which Solomon the son of David king of Israel did build; it shall not be a burden upon your shoulders: serve now the LORD your God, and his people Israel, 
And prepare yourselves by the houses of your fathers, after your courses, according to the writing of David king of Israel, and according to the writing of Solomon his son. 
And stand in the holy place according to the divisions of the families of the fathers of your brethr
1051,o be ye holy in all manner of conversation; 
Because it is written, Be ye holy; for I am holy. 
And if ye call on the Father, who without respect of persons judgeth according to every man's work, pass the time of your sojourning here in fear: 
Forasmuch as ye know that ye were not redeemed with corruptible things, as silver and gold, from your vain conversation received by tradition from your fathers; 
But with the precious blood of Christ, as of a lamb without blemish and without spot: 
Who verily was foreordained before the foundation of the world, but was manifest in these last times for you, 
Who by him do believe in God, that raised him up from the dead, and gave him glory; that your faith and hope might be in God. 
Seeing ye have purified your souls in obeying the truth through the Spirit unto unfeigned love of the brethren, see that ye love one another with a pure heart fervently: 
Being born again, not of corruptible seed, but of incorruptible, by the word of God, which liveth and abideth for ever. 
For all flesh is as grass, a
856, the earth? Turn from thy fierce wrath, and repent of this evil against thy people. 
Remember Abraham, Isaac, and Israel, thy servants, to whom thou swarest by thine own self, and saidst unto them, I will multiply your seed as the stars of heaven, and all this land that I have spoken of will I give unto your seed, and they shall inherit it for ever. 
And the LORD repented of the evil which he thought to do unto his people. 
And Moses turned, and went down from the mount, and the two tables of the testimony were in his hand: the tables were written on both their sides; on the one side and on the other were they written. 
And the tables were the work of God, and the writing was the writing of God, graven upon the tables. 
And when Joshua heard the noise of the people as they shouted, he said unto Moses, There is a noise of war in the camp. 
And h
1062,eat God and our Saviour Jesus Christ; 
Who gave himself for us, that he might redeem us from all iniquity, and purify unto himself a peculiar people, zealous of good works. 
These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee. 
Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work, 
To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men. 
For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice and envy, hateful, and hating one another. 
But after that the kindness and love of God our Saviour toward man appeared, 
Not by works of righteousness which we have done, but according to his mercy he saved us, by the washing of regeneration, and renewing of the Holy Ghost; 
Which he shed on us abundantly through Jesus Christ our Saviour; 
That being justified by his grace, we should be made heirs according to the hope of eternal life. 
This is a faithful saying, a
1074,son, and the dead is thy son. And this said, No; but the dead is thy son, and the living is my son. Thus they spake before the king. 
Then said the king, The one saith, This is my son that liveth, and thy son is the dead: and the other saith, Nay; but thy son is the dead, and my son is the living. 
And the king said, Bring me a sword. And they brought a sword before the king. 
And the king said, Divide the living child in two, and give half to the one, and half to the other. 
Then spake the woman whose the living child was unto the king, for her bowels yearned upon her son, and she said, O my lord, give her the living child, and in no wise slay it. But the other said, Let it be neither mine nor thine, but divide it. 
Then the king answered and said, Give her the living child, and in no wise slay it: she is the mother thereof. 
And all Israel heard of the judgment which the king had judged; and they feared the king: for they saw that the wisdom of God was in him, to do judgment. 
So king Solomon was king over all Israel. 
And these were the princes which he h
834,ey be divided into two kingdoms any more at all. 
Neither shall they defile themselves any more with their idols, nor with their detestable things, nor with any of their transgressions: but I will save them out of all their dwellingplaces, wherein they have sinned, and will cleanse them: so shall they be my people, and I will be their God. 
And David my servant shall be king over them; and they all shall have one shepherd: they shall also walk in my judgments, and observe my statutes, and do them. 
And they shall dwell in the land that I have given unto Jacob my servant, wherein your fathers have dwelt; and they shall dwell therein, even they, and their children, and their children's children for ever: and my servant David shall be their prince for ever. 
Moreover I will make a covenant of peace with them; it shall be an e
942,son of Josiah king of Judah came this word from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD; Stand in the court of the LORD's house, and speak unto all the cities of Judah, which come to worship in the LORD's house, all the words that I command thee to speak unto them; diminish not a word: 
If so be they will hearken, and turn every man from his evil way, that I may repent me of the evil, which I purpose to do unto them because of the evil of their doings. 
And thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD; If ye will not hearken to me, to walk in my law, which I have set before you, 
To hearken to the words of my servants the prophets, whom I sent unto you, both rising up early, and sending them, but ye have not hearkened; 
Then will I make this house like Shiloh, and will make this city a curse to all the nations of the earth. 
So the priests and the prophets and all the people heard Jeremiah speaking these words in the house of th
914,s vanity, and it is an evil disease. 
If a man beget an hundred children, and live many years, so that the days of his years be many, and his soul be not filled with good, and also that he have no burial; I say, that an untimely birth is better than he. 
For he cometh in with vanity, and departeth in darkness, and his name shall be covered with darkness. 
Moreover he hath not seen the sun, nor known any thing: this hath more rest than the other. 
Yea, though he live a thousand years twice told, yet hath he seen no good: do not all go to one place? 
All the labour of man is for his mouth, and yet the appetite is not filled. 
For what hath the wise more than the fool? what hath the poor, that knoweth to walk before the living? 
Better is the sight of the eyes than the wandering of the desire: this is also vanity and vexation of spirit. 
That which hath been is named already, and it is known that it is m
889, even. 
And he that eateth of the carcase of it shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even: he also that beareth the carcase of it shall wash his clothes, and be unclean until the even. 
And every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth shall be an abomination; it shall not be eaten. 
Whatsoever goeth upon the belly, and whatsoever goeth upon all four, or whatsoever hath more feet among all creeping things that creep upon the earth, them ye shall not eat; for they are an abomination. 
Ye shall not make yourselves abominable with any creeping thing that creepeth, neither shall ye make yourselves unclean with them, that ye should be defiled thereby. 
For I am the LORD your God: ye shall therefore sanctify yourselves, and ye shall be holy; for I am holy: neither shall ye defile yourselves with any manner of creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth. 
For I am the
948, thou make for them, for glory and for beauty. 
And thou shalt put them upon Aaron thy brother, and his sons with him; and shalt anoint them, and consecrate them, and sanctify them, that they may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And thou shalt make them linen breeches to cover their nakedness; from the loins even unto the thighs they shall reach: 
And they shall be upon Aaron, and upon his sons, when they come in unto the tabernacle of the congregation, or when they come near unto the altar to minister in the holy place; that they bear not iniquity, and die: it shall be a statute for ever unto him and his seed after him. 
And this is the thing that thou shalt do unto them to hallow them, to minister unto me in the priest's office: Take one young bullock, and two rams without blemish, 
And unleavened bread, and cakes unleavened tempered with oil, and wafers unleavened anointed with oil: of wheaten flour shalt thou make them. 

1069, dead body, nor defile himself for his father, or for his mother; 
Neither shall he go out of the sanctuary, nor profane the sanctuary of his God; for the crown of the anointing oil of his God is upon him: I am the LORD. 
And he shall take a wife in her virginity. 
A widow, or a divorced woman, or profane, or an harlot, these shall he not take: but he shall take a virgin of his own people to wife. 
Neither shall he profane his seed among his people: for I the LORD do sanctify him. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron, saying, Whosoever he be of thy seed in their generations that hath any blemish, let him not approach to offer the bread of his God. 
For whatsoever man he be that hath a blemish, he shall not approach: a blind man, or a lame, or he that hath a flat nose, or any thing superfluous, 
Or a man that is brokenfooted, or brokenhanded, 
Or crookbackt, or a dwarf, or that hath a blemish in his eye, or be scurvy, or scabbed, or hath his stones broken; 
No man that hath a blemish of the seed of Aaron the priest shall come nigh to
898,oked through a window, and saw king David leaping and dancing before the LORD; and she despised him in her heart. 
And they brought in the ark of the LORD, and set it in his place, in the midst of the tabernacle that David had pitched for it: and David offered burnt offerings and peace offerings before the LORD. 
And as soon as David had made an end of offering burnt offerings and peace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of the LORD of hosts. 
And he dealt among all the people, even among the whole multitude of Israel, as well to the women as men, to every one a cake of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine. So all the people departed every one to his house. 
Then David returned to bless his household. And Michal the daughter of Saul came out to meet David, and said, How glorious was the king of Israel to day, who uncovered himself to day in the eyes of the h
753,t the fig tree said unto them, Should I forsake my sweetness, and my good fruit, and go to be promoted over the trees? 
Then said the trees unto the vine, Come thou, and reign over us. 
And the vine said unto them, Should I leave my wine, which cheereth God and man, and go to be promoted over the trees? 
Then said all the trees unto the bramble, Come thou, and reign over us. 
And the bramble said unto the trees, If in truth ye anoint me king over you, then come and put your trust in my shadow: and if not, let fire come out of the bramble, and devour the cedars of Lebanon. 
Now therefore, if ye have done truly and sincerely, in that ye have made Abimelech king, and if ye have dealt well with Jerubbaal and his house, and have done unto him accor
894,rs: and he died. 
Now these are the generations of the sons of Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth: and unto them were sons born after the flood. 
The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and Tubal, and Meshech, and Tiras. 
And the sons of Gomer; Ashkenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah. 
And the sons of Javan; Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim. 
By these were the isles of the Gentiles divided in their lands; every one after his tongue, after their families, in their nations. 
And the sons of Ham; Cush, and Mizraim, and Phut, and Canaan. 
And the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabtah, and Raamah, and Sabtechah: and the sons of Raamah; Sheba, and Dedan. 
And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be a mighty one in the earth. 
He was a mighty hunter before the LORD: wherefore it is said, Even as Nimrod the mighty hunter before the LORD. 
And the beginning of his kingd
780,d populous: 
And the Egyptians evil entreated us, and afflicted us, and laid upon us hard bondage: 
And when we cried unto the LORD God of our fathers, the LORD heard our voice, and looked on our affliction, and our labour, and our oppression: 
And the LORD brought us forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand, and with an outstretched arm, and with great terribleness, and with signs, and with wonders: 
And he hath brought us into this place, and hath given us this land, even a land that floweth with milk and honey. 
And now, behold, I have brought the firstfruits of the land, which thou, O LORD, hast given me. And thou shalt set it before the LORD thy God, and worship before the LORD thy God: 
And thou shalt rejoice in every good thing which the LORD thy God hath given unto
1055, for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and the meat offering thereof, and their drink offerings. 
And on the third day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish; 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fourth day ten bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish: 
Their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the fifth day nine bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without 
1033,will give it you for an heritage: I am the LORD. 
And Moses spake so unto the children of Israel: but they hearkened not unto Moses for anguish of spirit, and for cruel bondage. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Go in, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, that he let the children of Israel go out of his land. 
And Moses spake before the LORD, saying, Behold, the children of Israel have not hearkened unto me; how then shall Pharaoh hear me, who am of uncircumcised lips? 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, and gave them a charge unto the children of Israel, and unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring the children of Israel out of the land of Egypt. 
These be the heads of their fathers' houses: The sons of Reuben the firstborn of Israel; Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi: these be the families of Reuben. 
And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin, and Zohar, and Shaul the son of a Canaanitish woman: these are the families of Simeon. 
And these are the names of the sons of Levi accordi
931, the brim. 
And he saith unto them, Draw out now, and bear unto the governor of the feast. And they bare it. 
When the ruler of the feast had tasted the water that was made wine, and knew not whence it was: (but the servants which drew the water knew;) the governor of the feast called the bridegroom, 
And saith unto him, Every man at the beginning doth set forth good wine; and when men have well drunk, then that which is worse: but thou hast kept the good wine until now. 
This beginning of miracles did Jesus in Cana of Galilee, and manifested forth his glory; and his disciples believed on him. 
After this he went down to Capernaum, he, and his mother, and his brethren, and his disciples: and they continued there not many days. 
And the Jews' passover was at hand, and Jesus went up to Jerusalem. 
And found in the temple those that sold oxen and sheep and doves, and the changers of money sitting: 
And when he had made a
721,acrifices, and there they presented the provocation of their offering: there also they made their sweet savour, and poured out there their drink offerings. 
Then I said unto them, What is the high place whereunto ye go? And the name whereof is called Bamah unto this day. 
Wherefore say unto the house of Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Are ye polluted after the manner of your fathers? and commit ye whoredom after their abominations? 
For when ye offer your gifts, when ye make your sons to pass through the fire, ye pollute yourselves with all your idols, even unto this day: and shall I be enquired of by you, O house of Israel? As I live, saith the Lord GOD, I will not be enquired of by you. 
And that which cometh
730, much hindered from coming to you. 
But now having no more place in these parts, and having a great desire these many years to come unto you; 
Whensoever I take my journey into Spain, I will come to you: for I trust to see you in my journey, and to be brought on my way thitherward by you, if first I be somewhat filled with your company. 
But now I go unto Jerusalem to minister unto the saints. 
For it hath pleased them of Macedonia and Achaia to make a certain contribution for the poor saints which are at Jerusalem. 
It hath pleased them verily; and their debtors they are. For if the Gentiles have been made partakers of their spiritual things, their duty is also to minister unto them in carnal things. 
When therefore I h
1069,ly, and to stone them, 
They were ware of it, and fled unto Lystra and Derbe, cities of Lycaonia, and unto the region that lieth round about: 
And there they preached the gospel. 
And there sat a certain man at Lystra, impotent in his feet, being a cripple from his mother's womb, who never had walked: 
The same heard Paul speak: who stedfastly beholding him, and perceiving that he had faith to be healed, 
Said with a loud voice, Stand upright on thy feet. And he leaped and walked. 
And when the people saw what Paul had done, they lifted up their voices, saying in the speech of Lycaonia, The gods are come down to us in the likeness of men. 
And they called Barnabas, Jupiter; and Paul, Mercurius, because he was the chief speaker. 
Then the priest of Jupiter, which was before their city, brought oxen and garlands unto the gates, and would have done sacrifice with the people. 
Which when the apostles, Barnabas and Paul, heard of, they rent their clothes, and ran in among the people, crying out, 
And saying, Sirs, why do ye these things? We also are men of l
730,e not that the friendship of the world is enmity with God? whosoever therefore will be a friend of the world is the enemy of God. 
Do ye think that the scripture saith in vain, The spirit that dwelleth in us lusteth to envy? 
But he giveth more grace. Wherefore he saith, God resisteth the proud, but giveth grace unto the humble. 
Submit yourselves therefore to God. Resist the devil, and he will flee from you. 
Draw nigh to God, and he will draw nigh to you. Cleanse your hands, ye sinners; and purify your hearts, ye double minded. 
Be afflicted, and mourn, and weep: let your laughter be turned to mourning, and your joy to heaviness. 
Humble yourselves in the sight of the Lord, and he shall lift you up. 
Speak not evil one
1037,found them sleeping for sorrow, 
And said unto them, Why sleep ye? rise and pray, lest ye enter into temptation. 
And while he yet spake, behold a multitude, and he that was called Judas, one of the twelve, went before them, and drew near unto Jesus to kiss him. 
But Jesus said unto him, Judas, betrayest thou the Son of man with a kiss? 
When they which were about him saw what would follow, they said unto him, Lord, shall we smite with the sword? 
And one of them smote the servant of the high priest, and cut off his right ear. 
And Jesus answered and said, Suffer ye thus far. And he touched his ear, and healed him. 
Then Jesus said unto the chief priests, and captains of the temple, and the elders, which were come to him, Be ye come out, as against a thief, with swords and staves? 
When I was daily with you in the temple, ye stretched forth no hands against me: but this is your hour, and the power of darkness. 
Then took they him, and led him, and brought him into the high priest's house. And Peter followed afar off. 
And
901, all the men of the tower of Shechem were gathered together. 
And Abimelech gat him up to mount Zalmon, he and all the people that were with him; and Abimelech took an axe in his hand, and cut down a bough from the trees, and took it, and laid it on his shoulder, and said unto the people that were with him, What ye have seen me do, make haste, and do as I have done. 
And all the people likewise cut down every man his bough, and followed Abimelech, and put them to the hold, and set the hold on fire upon them; so that all the men of the tower of Shechem died also, about a thousand men and women. 
Then went Abimelech to Thebez, and encamped against Thebez, and took it. 
But there was a strong tower within the city, and thither fled all the men and women, and all they of the city, and shut it to them, and gat them up to the top of the tower. 
And Abimelech came unto the tower, and fought agai
904,ts of the earth. 
He fashioneth their hearts alike; he considereth all their works. 
There is no king saved by the multitude of an host: a mighty man is not delivered by much strength. 
An horse is a vain thing for safety: neither shall he deliver any by his great strength. 
Behold, the eye of the LORD is upon them that fear him, upon them that hope in his mercy; 
To deliver their soul from death, and to keep them alive in famine. 
Our soul waiteth for the LORD: he is our help and our shield. 
For our heart shall rejoice in him, because we have trusted in his holy name. 
Let thy mercy, O LORD, be upon us, according as we hope in thee. 
I will bless the LORD at all times: his praise shall continually be in my mouth. 
My soul shall make her boast in the LORD: the humble shall hear thereof, and be glad. 
O magnify the LORD with me, and let us exalt his name together. 
I sought the LORD, and he 
1037, that is perfect shall be as his master. 
And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but perceivest not the beam that is in thine own eye? 
Either how canst thou say to thy brother, Brother, let me pull out the mote that is in thine eye, when thou thyself beholdest not the beam that is in thine own eye? Thou hypocrite, cast out first the beam out of thine own eye, and then shalt thou see clearly to pull out the mote that is in thy brother's eye. 
For a good tree bringeth not forth corrupt fruit; neither doth a corrupt tree bring forth good fruit. 
For every tree is known by his own fruit. For of thorns men do not gather figs, nor of a bramble bush gather they grapes. 
A good man out of the good treasure of his heart bringeth forth that which is good; and an evil man out of the evil treasure of his heart bringeth forth that which is evil: for of the abundance of the heart his mouth speaketh. 
And why call ye me, Lord, Lord, and do not the things which I say? 
Whosoever cometh to me, and heareth my saying
932, the Lord Jesus, both Jews and Greeks. 
And God wrought special miracles by the hands of Paul: 
So that from his body were brought unto the sick handkerchiefs or aprons, and the diseases departed from them, and the evil spirits went out of them. 
Then certain of the vagabond Jews, exorcists, took upon them to call over them which had evil spirits the name of the LORD Jesus, saying, We adjure you by Jesus whom Paul preacheth. 
And there were seven sons of one Sceva, a Jew, and chief of the priests, which did so. 
And the evil spirit answered and said, Jesus I know, and Paul I know; but who are ye? 
And the man in whom the evil spirit was leaped on them, and overcame them, and prevailed against them, so that they fled out of that house naked and wounded. 
And this was known to all the Jews and Greeks also dwelling at Ephesus; and fear fell on them all, and the name of the Lord Jesus was magnified. 
And many that believed
983,nt all that the LORD had spoken with him in mount Sinai. 
And till Moses had done speaking with them, he put a vail on his face. 
But when Moses went in before the LORD to speak with him, he took the vail off, until he came out. And he came out, and spake unto the children of Israel that which he was commanded. 
And the children of Israel saw the face of Moses, that the skin of Moses' face shone: and Moses put the vail upon his face again, until he went in to speak with him. 
And Moses gathered all the congregation of the children of Israel together, and said unto them, These are the words which the LORD hath commanded, that ye should do them. 
Six days shall work be done, but on the seventh day there shall be to you an holy day, a sabbath of rest to the LORD: whosoever doeth work therein shall be put to death. 
Ye shall kindle no fire throughout your habitations upon the sabbath day. 
And Moses spake unto all the congregation of the children of Israel, saying, This is
845,m, Buy those things that we have need of against the feast; or, that he should give something to the poor. 
He then having received the sop went immediately out: and it was night. 
Therefore, when he was gone out, Jesus said, Now is the Son of man glorified, and God is glorified in him. 
If God be glorified in him, God shall also glorify him in himself, and shall straightway glorify him. 
Little children, yet a little while I am with you. Ye shall seek me: and as I said unto the Jews, Whither I go, ye cannot come; so now I say to you. 
A new commandment I give unto you, That ye love one another; as I have loved you, that ye also love one another. 
By this shall all men know that ye are my disciples, if ye have love one to another. 
Simon Peter said unto him, Lord, whither goest thou? Jesus answered him, Whither I go, thou canst not f
1042,spass offering. 
All the males among the children of Aaron shall eat of it. It shall be a statute for ever in your generations concerning the offerings of the LORD made by fire: every one that toucheth them shall be holy. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
This is the offering of Aaron and of his sons, which they shall offer unto the LORD in the day when he is anointed; the tenth part of an ephah of fine flour for a meat offering perpetual, half of it in the morning, and half thereof at night. 
In a pan it shall be made with oil; and when it is baken, thou shalt bring it in: and the baken pieces of the meat offering shalt thou offer for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And the priest of his sons that is anointed in his stead shall offer it: it is a statute for ever unto the LORD; it shall be wholly burnt. 
For every meat offering for the priest shall be wholly burnt: it shall not be eaten. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron and to his sons, saying, This is the law of the sin offering: In the place wh
795,brels, and with cymbals, and with trumpets. 
And when they came unto the threshingfloor of Chidon, Uzza put forth his hand to hold the ark; for the oxen stumbled. 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzza, and he smote him, because he put his hand to the ark: and there he died before God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon Uzza: wherefore that place is called Perezuzza to this day. 
And David was afraid of God that day, saying, How shall I bring the ark of God home to me? 
So David brought not the ark home to himself to the city of David, but carried it aside into the house of Obededom the Gittite. 
And the ark of God remained with the family of Obededom in his house three months. And the LORD blessed the house of Obededom, and all that he had
1048, thou son of man, with the breaking of thy loins; and with bitterness sigh before their eyes. 
And it shall be, when they say unto thee, Wherefore sighest thou? that thou shalt answer, For the tidings; because it cometh: and every heart shall melt, and all hands shall be feeble, and every spirit shall faint, and all knees shall be weak as water: behold, it cometh, and shall be brought to pass, saith the Lord GOD. 
Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy, and say, Thus saith the LORD; Say, A sword, a sword is sharpened, and also furbished: 
It is sharpened to make a sore slaughter; it is furbished that it may glitter: should we then make mirth? it contemneth the rod of my son, as every tree. 
And he hath given it to be furbished, that it may be handled: this sword is sharpened, and it is furbished, to give it into the hand of the slayer. 
Cry and howl, son of man: for it shall be upon my people, it shall be upon all the princes of Israel: terrors by reason of the sword shall be upon my people: smite the
900,nd he hath violently taken away his tabernacle, as if it were of a garden: he hath destroyed his places of the assembly: the LORD hath caused the solemn feasts and sabbaths to be forgotten in Zion, and hath despised in the indignation of his anger the king and the priest. 
The LORD hath cast off his altar, he hath abhorred his sanctuary, he hath given up into the hand of the enemy the walls of her palaces; they have made a noise in the house of the LORD, as in the day of a solemn feast. 
The LORD hath purposed to destroy the wall of the daughter of Zion: he hath stretched out a line, he hath not withdrawn his hand from destroying: therefore he made the rampart and the wall to lament; they languished together. 
Her gates are sunk into the ground; he hath destroyed and broken her bars: her king and her princes are among the Gentiles: the law is no more; her prophets also find no vision fro
775,nder the sun. 
Again, I considered all travail, and every right work, that for this a man is envied of his neighbour. This is also vanity and vexation of spirit. 
The fool foldeth his hands together, and eateth his own flesh. 
Better is an handful with quietness, than both the hands full with travail and vexation of spirit. 
Then I returned, and I saw vanity under the sun. 
There is one alone, and there is not a second; yea, he hath neither child nor brother: yet is there no end of all his labour; neither is his eye satisfied with riches; neither saith he, For whom do I labour, and bereave my soul of good? This is also vanity, yea, it is a sore travail. 
Two are better than one; because they have a good reward for their labour. 
For if they fall, the one will lift 
971,laughter. 
Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through him that loved us. 
For I am persuaded, that neither death, nor life, nor angels, nor principalities, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come, 
Nor height, nor depth, nor any other creature, shall be able to separate us from the love of God, which is in Christ Jesus our Lord. 
I say the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing me witness in the Holy Ghost, 
That I have great heaviness and continual sorrow in my heart. 
For I could wish that myself were accursed from Christ for my brethren, my kinsmen according to the flesh: 
Who are Israelites; to whom pertaineth the adoption, and the glory, and the covenants, and the giving of the law, and the service of God, and the promises; 
Whose are the fathers, and of whom as concerning the flesh Christ came, who is over all, God blessed for ever. Amen. 
Not as though the word of God hath taken none effect. For they are n
775,word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things. 
Be not deceived; God is not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that shall he also reap. 
For he that soweth to his flesh shall of the flesh reap corruption; but he that soweth to the Spirit shall of the Spirit reap life everlasting. 
And let us not be weary in well doing: for in due season we shall reap, if we faint not. 
As we have therefore opportunity, let us do good unto all men, especially unto them who are of the household of faith. 
Ye see how large a letter I have written unto you with mine own hand. 
As many as desire to make a fair shew in the flesh, they constrain you to be circumcised; only lest they should suffer persecution for the cross of Christ. 
For neither they themselves who are circ
729,was nothing in the ark save the two tables which Moses put therein at Horeb, when the LORD made a covenant with the children of Israel, when they came out of Egypt. 
And it came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy place: (for all the priests that were present were sanctified, and did not then wait by course: 
Also the Levites which were the singers, all of them of Asaph, of Heman, of Jeduthun, with their sons and their brethren, being arrayed in white linen, having cymbals and psalteries and harps, stood at the east end of the altar, and with them an hundred and twenty priests sounding with trumpets:) 
It came even to pass, as the trumpeters and singers were as one, to make one sound to be heard in prais
748, fold there. 
But wild beasts of the desert shall lie there; and their houses shall be full of doleful creatures; and owls shall dwell there, and satyrs shall dance there. 
And the wild beasts of the islands shall cry in their desolate houses, and dragons in their pleasant palaces: and her time is near to come, and her days shall not be prolonged. 
For the LORD will have mercy on Jacob, and will yet choose Israel, and set them in their own land: and the strangers shall be joined with them, and they shall cleave to the house of Jacob. 
And the people shall take them, and bring them to their place: and the house of Israel shall possess them in the land of the LORD for servants and handmaids: and they shall take them captives, whose captives
930,k with us, lest we die. 
And Moses said unto the people, Fear not: for God is come to prove you, and that his fear may be before your faces, that ye sin not. 
And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near unto the thick darkness where God was. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Thus thou shalt say unto the children of Israel, Ye have seen that I have talked with you from heaven. 
Ye shall not make with me gods of silver, neither shall ye make unto you gods of gold. 
An altar of earth thou shalt make unto me, and shalt sacrifice thereon thy burnt offerings, and thy peace offerings, thy sheep, and thine oxen: in all places where I record my name I will come unto thee, and I will bless thee. 
And if thou wilt make me an altar of stone, thou shalt not build it of hewn stone: for if thou lift up thy tool upon it, thou hast polluted it. 
Neither shalt thou go up by steps unto mine altar, that thy nakedness be not discover
1052,ot thou into their secret; unto their assembly, mine honour, be not thou united: for in their anger they slew a man, and in their selfwill they digged down a wall. 
Cursed be their anger, for it was fierce; and their wrath, for it was cruel: I will divide them in Jacob, and scatter them in Israel. 
Judah, thou art he whom thy brethren shall praise: thy hand shall be in the neck of thine enemies; thy father's children shall bow down before thee. 
Judah is a lion's whelp: from the prey, my son, thou art gone up: he stooped down, he couched as a lion, and as an old lion; who shall rouse him up? 
The sceptre shall not depart from Judah, nor a lawgiver from between his feet, until Shiloh come; and unto him shall the gathering of the people be. 
Binding his foal unto the vine, and his ass's colt unto the choice vine; he washed his garments in wine, and his clothes in the blood of grapes: 
His eyes shall be red with wine, and his teeth white with milk. 
Zebulun shall dwell at the haven of the sea; and he shall be for an haven of ships; and his
857,th; but it shall not be as the former, or as the latter. 
For the ships of Chittim shall come against him: therefore he shall be grieved, and return, and have indignation against the holy covenant: so shall he do; he shall even return, and have intelligence with them that forsake the holy covenant. 
And arms shall stand on his part, and they shall pollute the sanctuary of strength, and shall take away the daily sacrifice, and they shall place the abomination that maketh desolate. 
And such as do wickedly against the covenant shall he corrupt by flatteries: but the people that do know their God shall be strong, and do exploits. 
And they that understand among the people shall instruct many: yet they shall fall by the sword, and by flame, by captivity, and by spoil, many days. 
Now when they shall fall, they shall be holpen with a little help: but
806, heard that it was known unto us, and God had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned all of us to the wall, every one unto his work. 
And it came to pass from that time forth, that the half of my servants wrought in the work, and the other half of them held both the spears, the shields, and the bows, and the habergeons; and the rulers were behind all the house of Judah. 
They which builded on the wall, and they that bare burdens, with those that laded, every one with one of his hands wrought in the work, and with the other hand held a weapon. 
For the builders, every one had his sword girded by his side, and so builded. And he that sounded the trumpet was by me. 
And I said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, The work is great and large, and we are separ
1022,th brought unto my lord, let it even be given unto the young men that follow my lord. 
I pray thee, forgive the trespass of thine handmaid: for the LORD will certainly make my lord a sure house; because my lord fighteth the battles of the LORD, and evil hath not been found in thee all thy days. 
Yet a man is risen to pursue thee, and to seek thy soul: but the soul of my lord shall be bound in the bundle of life with the LORD thy God; and the souls of thine enemies, them shall he sling out, as out of the middle of a sling. 
And it shall come to pass, when the LORD shall have done to my lord according to all the good that he hath spoken concerning thee, and shall have appointed thee ruler over Israel; 
That this shall be no grief unto thee, nor offence of heart unto my lord, either that thou hast shed blood causeless, or that my lord hath avenged himself: but when the LORD shall have dealt well with my lord, then remember thine handmaid. 
And David said to Abigail, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which sen
833, of Israel, the LORD God of your fathers, the God of Abraham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, hath sent me unto you: this is my name for ever, and this is my memorial unto all generations. 
Go, and gather the elders of Israel together, and say unto them, The LORD God of your fathers, the God of Abraham, of Isaac, and of Jacob, appeared unto me, saying, I have surely visited you, and seen that which is done to you in Egypt: 
And I have said, I will bring you up out of the affliction of Egypt unto the land of the Canaanites, and the Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, unto a land flowing with milk and honey. 
And they shall hearken to thy voice: and thou shalt come, thou and the elders of Israel, unto the king of Egypt, and ye shall say unto him, The LORD God of the He
725,hy fields for thy cattle, that thou mayest eat and be full. 
Take heed to yourselves, that your heart be not deceived, and ye turn aside, and serve other gods, and worship them; 
And then the LORD's wrath be kindled against you, and he shut up the heaven, that there be no rain, and that the land yield not her fruit; and lest ye perish quickly from off the good land which the LORD giveth you. 
Therefore shall ye lay up these my words in your heart and in your soul, and bind them for a sign upon your hand, that they may be as frontlets between your eyes. 
And ye shall teach them your children, speaking of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou walkest by the way, when thou liest down, and when thou rises
912,s holy. 
Make a joyful noise unto the LORD, all ye lands. 
Serve the LORD with gladness: come before his presence with singing. 
Know ye that the LORD he is God: it is he that hath made us, and not we ourselves; we are his people, and the sheep of his pasture. 
Enter into his gates with thanksgiving, and into his courts with praise: be thankful unto him, and bless his name. 
For the LORD is good; his mercy is everlasting; and his truth endureth to all generations. 
I will sing of mercy and judgment: unto thee, O LORD, will I sing. 
I will behave myself wisely in a perfect way. O when wilt thou come unto me? I will walk within my house with a perfect heart. 
I will set no wicked thing before mine eyes: I hate the work of them that turn aside; it shall not cleave to me. 
A froward heart shall depart from me: I will not know a wicked person. 
Whoso privily slandereth his neighbour, him will I cut off: 
729,ves, but unto us they did minister the things, which are now reported unto you by them that have preached the gospel unto you with the Holy Ghost sent down from heaven; which things the angels desire to look into. 
Wherefore gird up the loins of your mind, be sober, and hope to the end for the grace that is to be brought unto you at the revelation of Jesus Christ; 
As obedient children, not fashioning yourselves according to the former lusts in your ignorance: 
But as he which hath called you is holy, so be ye holy in all manner of conversation; 
Because it is written, Be ye holy; for I am holy. 
And if ye call on the Father, who without respect of persons judgeth according to every man's work, pass the time of your soj
767,the way of his own coast to Bethshemesh, then he hath done us this great evil: but if not, then we shall know that it is not his hand that smote us: it was a chance that happened to us. 
And the men did so; and took two milch kine, and tied them to the cart, and shut up their calves at home: 
And they laid the ark of the LORD upon the cart, and the coffer with the mice of gold and the images of their emerods. 
And the kine took the straight way to the way of Bethshemesh, and went along the highway, lowing as they went, and turned not aside to the right hand or to the left; and the lords of the Philistines went after them unto the border of Bethshemesh. 
And they of Bethshemesh were reaping their wheat harvest in the valley: and they lifted up their eyes, an
937,alone in his appointed times. 
What shall one then answer the messengers of the nation? That the LORD hath founded Zion, and the poor of his people shall trust in it. 
The burden of Moab. Because in the night Ar of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; because in the night Kir of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; 
He is gone up to Bajith, and to Dibon, the high places, to weep: Moab shall howl over Nebo, and over Medeba: on all their heads shall be baldness, and every beard cut off. 
In their streets they shall gird themselves with sackcloth: on the tops of their houses, and in their streets, every one shall howl, weeping abundantly. 
And Heshbon shall cry, and Elealeh: their voice shall be heard even unto Jahaz: therefore the armed soldiers of Moab shall cry out; his life shall be grievous unto him. 
My heart shall cry out for Moab; his fugitives shall flee unto Zoar, an heifer of three years old: for by th
970, dead also. 
And David said unto the young man that told him, How knowest thou that Saul and Jonathan his son be dead? 
And the young man that told him said, As I happened by chance upon mount Gilboa, behold, Saul leaned upon his spear; and, lo, the chariots and horsemen followed hard after him. 
And when he looked behind him, he saw me, and called unto me. And I answered, Here am I. 
And he said unto me, Who art thou? And I answered him, I am an Amalekite. 
He said unto me again, Stand, I pray thee, upon me, and slay me: for anguish is come upon me, because my life is yet whole in me. 
So I stood upon him, and slew him, because I was sure that he could not live after that he was fallen: and I took the crown that was upon his head, and the bracelet that was on his arm, and have brought them hither unto my lord. 
Then David took hold on his clothes, and rent them; and likewise all the men that were with him: 
And they mourned, and wept, and fasted until eve
767,idings, how that the promise which was made unto the fathers, 
God hath fulfilled the same unto us their children, in that he hath raised up Jesus again; as it is also written in the second psalm, Thou art my Son, this day have I begotten thee. 
And as concerning that he raised him up from the dead, now no more to return to corruption, he said on this wise, I will give you the sure mercies of David. 
Wherefore he saith also in another psalm, Thou shalt not suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
For David, after he had served his own generation by the will of God, fell on sleep, and was laid unto his fathers, and saw corruption: 
But he, whom God raised again, saw no corruption. 
Be it known unto you therefore, men and brethren, that through this man is p
1006,are escaped of the house of Jacob, shall no more again stay upon him that smote them; but shall stay upon the LORD, the Holy One of Israel, in truth. 
The remnant shall return, even the remnant of Jacob, unto the mighty God. 
For though thy people Israel be as the sand of the sea, yet a remnant of them shall return: the consumption decreed shall overflow with righteousness. 
For the Lord GOD of hosts shall make a consumption, even determined, in the midst of all the land. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD of hosts, O my people that dwellest in Zion, be not afraid of the Assyrian: he shall smite thee with a rod, and shall lift up his staff against thee, after the manner of Egypt. 
For yet a very little while, and the indignation shall cease, and mine anger in their destruction. 
And the LORD of hosts shall stir up a scourge for him according to the slaughter of Midian at the rock of Oreb: and as his rod was upon the sea, so shall he lift it up after the manner of Egypt. 
And it shall come to
730,e plead my cause, and execute judgment for me: he will bring me forth to the light, and I shall behold his righteousness. 
Then she that is mine enemy shall see it, and shame shall cover her which said unto me, Where is the LORD thy God? mine eyes shall behold her: now shall she be trodden down as the mire of the streets. 
In the day that thy walls are to be built, in that day shall the decree be far removed. 
In that day also he shall come even to thee from Assyria, and from the fortified cities, and from the fortress even to the river, and from sea to sea, and from mountain to mountain. 
Notwithstanding the land shall be desolate because of them that dwell therein, for the fruit of their doings. 
Feed thy people with t
1043, wholly burnt. 
For every meat offering for the priest shall be wholly burnt: it shall not be eaten. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron and to his sons, saying, This is the law of the sin offering: In the place where the burnt offering is killed shall the sin offering be killed before the LORD: it is most holy. 
The priest that offereth it for sin shall eat it: in the holy place shall it be eaten, in the court of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
Whatsoever shall touch the flesh thereof shall be holy: and when there is sprinkled of the blood thereof upon any garment, thou shalt wash that whereon it was sprinkled in the holy place. 
But the earthen vessel wherein it is sodden shall be broken: and if it be sodden in a brasen pot, it shall be both scoured, and rinsed in water. 
All the males among the priests shall eat thereof: it is most holy. 
And no sin offering, whereof any of the blood is brought into the tabernacle of the congregation to reconcile withal in the holy place, shall be eaten: it shall b
762,od twelve years, which had spent all her living upon physicians, neither could be healed of any, 
Came behind him, and touched the border of his garment: and immediately her issue of blood stanched. 
And Jesus said, Who touched me? When all denied, Peter and they that were with him said, Master, the multitude throng thee and press thee, and sayest thou, Who touched me? 
And Jesus said, Somebody hath touched me: for I perceive that virtue is gone out of me. 
And when the woman saw that she was not hid, she came trembling, and falling down before him, she declared unto him before all the people for what cause she had touched him, and how she was healed immediately. 
And he said unto her, Daughter, be of good comfort: thy faith hath made thee whole; go in
853,unto whom the inhabitants of Jerusalem have said, Get you far from the LORD: unto us is this land given in possession. 
Therefore say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Although I have cast them far off among the heathen, and although I have scattered them among the countries, yet will I be to them as a little sanctuary in the countries where they shall come. 
Therefore say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even gather you from the people, and assemble you out of the countries where ye have been scattered, and I will give you the land of Israel. 
And they shall come thither, and they shall take away all the detestable things thereof and all the abominations thereof from thence. 
And I will give them one heart, and I will put a new spirit within you; and I will take the stony heart out of their flesh, and will give them an heart of flesh: 
That they ma
822,Woe, woe, woe, to the inhabiters of the earth by reason of the other voices of the trumpet of the three angels, which are yet to sound! 
And the fifth angel sounded, and I saw a star fall from heaven unto the earth: and to him was given the key of the bottomless pit. 
And he opened the bottomless pit; and there arose a smoke out of the pit, as the smoke of a great furnace; and the sun and the air were darkened by reason of the smoke of the pit. 
And there came out of the smoke locusts upon the earth: and unto them was given power, as the scorpions of the earth have power. 
And it was commanded them that they should not hurt the grass of the earth, neither any green thing, neither any tree; but only those men which have not the seal of God in their foreheads. 
And to them it was given that they should not kill t
767, sight of Moses, and in the sight of all the congregation of the children of Israel, who were weeping before the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And when Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the priest, saw it, he rose up from among the congregation, and took a javelin in his hand; 
And he went after the man of Israel into the tent, and thrust both of them through, the man of Israel, and the woman through her belly. So the plague was stayed from the children of Israel. 
And those that died in the plague were twenty and four thousand. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the priest, hath turned my wrath away from the children of Israel, while he was zealous for my sake among them, that
868,RD this day to be thy God, and to walk in his ways, and to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his judgments, and to hearken unto his voice: 
And the LORD hath avouched thee this day to be his peculiar people, as he hath promised thee, and that thou shouldest keep all his commandments; 
And to make thee high above all nations which he hath made, in praise, and in name, and in honour; and that thou mayest be an holy people unto the LORD thy God, as he hath spoken. 
And Moses with the elders of Israel commanded the people, saying, Keep all the commandments which I command you this day. 
And it shall be on the day when ye shall pass over Jordan unto the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee, that thou shalt set thee up great stones, and plaister them with plaister: 
And thou shalt write upon them all the words of this law, when thou art passed over
770, afar off for the fear of her torment, saying, Alas, alas that great city Babylon, that mighty city! for in one hour is thy judgment come. 
And the merchants of the earth shall weep and mourn over her; for no man buyeth their merchandise any more: 
The merchandise of gold, and silver, and precious stones, and of pearls, and fine linen, and purple, and silk, and scarlet, and all thyine wood, and all manner vessels of ivory, and all manner vessels of most precious wood, and of brass, and iron, and marble, 
And cinnamon, and odours, and ointments, and frankincense, and wine, and oil, and fine flour, and wheat, and beasts, and sheep, and horses, and chariots, and slaves, and souls of men. 
And the fruits that thy soul lusted after are departed from thee, and all t
954,ye fall into divers temptations; 
Knowing this, that the trying of your faith worketh patience. 
But let patience have her perfect work, that ye may be perfect and entire, wanting nothing. 
If any of you lack wisdom, let him ask of God, that giveth to all men liberally, and upbraideth not; and it shall be given him. 
But let him ask in faith, nothing wavering. For he that wavereth is like a wave of the sea driven with the wind and tossed. 
For let not that man think that he shall receive any thing of the Lord. 
A double minded man is unstable in all his ways. 
Let the brother of low degree rejoice in that he is exalted: 
But the rich, in that he is made low: because as the flower of the grass he shall pass away. 
For the sun is no sooner risen with a burning heat, but it withereth the grass, and the flower thereof falleth, and the grace of the fashion of it perisheth: so also shall the rich man fade away in his ways. 
Blessed is the man tha
893,en, and half the tribe of Manasseh, have received their inheritance beyond Jordan on the east, which Moses the servant of the LORD gave them. 
And the men arose, and went away: and Joshua charged them that went to describe the land, saying, Go and walk through the land, and describe it, and come again to me, that I may here cast lots for you before the LORD in Shiloh. 
And the men went and passed through the land, and described it by cities into seven parts in a book, and came again to Joshua to the host at Shiloh. 
And Joshua cast lots for them in Shiloh before the LORD: and there Joshua divided the land unto the children of Israel according to their divisions. 
And the lot of the tribe of the children of Benjamin came up according to their families: and the coast of their lot came forth between the children of Judah and the children of Joseph. 
And their border on the north side
1061, the spirit of counsel and might, the spirit of knowledge and of the fear of the LORD; 
And shall make him of quick understanding in the fear of the LORD: and he shall not judge after the sight of his eyes, neither reprove after the hearing of his ears: 
But with righteousness shall he judge the poor, and reprove with equity for the meek of the earth: and he shall smite the earth: with the rod of his mouth, and with the breath of his lips shall he slay the wicked. 
And righteousness shall be the girdle of his loins, and faithfulness the girdle of his reins. 
The wolf also shall dwell with the lamb, and the leopard shall lie down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling together; and a little child shall lead them. 
And the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie down together: and the lion shall eat straw like the ox. 
And the sucking child shall play on the hole of the asp, and the weaned child shall put his hand on the cockatrice' den. 
They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain: for the earth 
1032,a young man's feet, whose name was Saul. 
And they stoned Stephen, calling upon God, and saying, Lord Jesus, receive my spirit. 
And he kneeled down, and cried with a loud voice, Lord, lay not this sin to their charge. And when he had said this, he fell asleep. 
And Saul was consenting unto his death. And at that time there was a great persecution against the church which was at Jerusalem; and they were all scattered abroad throughout the regions of Judaea and Samaria, except the apostles. 
And devout men carried Stephen to his burial, and made great lamentation over him. 
As for Saul, he made havock of the church, entering into every house, and haling men and women committed them to prison. 
Therefore they that were scattered abroad went every where preaching the word. 
Then Philip went down to the city of Samaria, and preached Christ unto them. 
And the people with one accord gave heed unto those things which Philip spake, hearing and seeing the miracles which he did. 
For unclean spirits, crying with loud voice, c
922,hrough? 
And the LORD saith, Because they have forsaken my law which I set before them, and have not obeyed my voice, neither walked therein; 
But have walked after the imagination of their own heart, and after Baalim, which their fathers taught them: 
Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will feed them, even this people, with wormwood, and give them water of gall to drink. 
I will scatter them also among the heathen, whom neither they nor their fathers have known: and I will send a sword after them, till I have consumed them. 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, Consider ye, and call for the mourning women, that they may come; and send for cunning women, that they may come: 
And let them make haste, and take up a wailing for us, that our eyes may run down with tears, and our eyelids gush out with waters. 
For a voice of wailing is heard out of Zion, How are we spoiled! we are greatl
905, Joseph was made known to his brethren; and Joseph's kindred was made known unto Pharaoh. 
Then sent Joseph, and called his father Jacob to him, and all his kindred, threescore and fifteen souls. 
So Jacob went down into Egypt, and died, he, and our fathers, 
And were carried over into Sychem, and laid in the sepulchre that Abraham bought for a sum of money of the sons of Emmor the father of Sychem. 
But when the time of the promise drew nigh, which God had sworn to Abraham, the people grew and multiplied in Egypt, 
Till another king arose, which knew not Joseph. 
The same dealt subtilly with our kindred, and evil entreated our fathers, so that they cast out their young children, to the end they might not live. 
In which time Moses was born, and was exceeding fair, and nourished up in his father's house three months: 
And when he was cast out, Pharaoh's daughter took him up, and nourished him
866, and have brought Agag the king of Amalek, and have utterly destroyed the Amalekites. 
But the people took of the spoil, sheep and oxen, the chief of the things which should have been utterly destroyed, to sacrifice unto the LORD thy God in Gilgal. 
And Samuel said, Hath the LORD as great delight in burnt offerings and sacrifices, as in obeying the voice of the LORD? Behold, to obey is better than sacrifice, and to hearken than the fat of rams. 
For rebellion is as the sin of witchcraft, and stubbornness is as iniquity and idolatry. Because thou hast rejected the word of the LORD, he hath also rejected thee from being king. 
And Saul said unto Samuel, I have sinned: for I have transgressed the commandment of the LORD, and thy words: because I feared the people, and obeyed their voice. 
Now therefore, I pray thee, pardon my sin, and turn again with me, th
906, four corners thereof: his horns shall be of the same: and thou shalt overlay it with brass. 
And thou shalt make his pans to receive his ashes, and his shovels, and his basons, and his fleshhooks, and his firepans: all the vessels thereof thou shalt make of brass. 
And thou shalt make for it a grate of network of brass; and upon the net shalt thou make four brasen rings in the four corners thereof. 
And thou shalt put it under the compass of the altar beneath, that the net may be even to the midst of the altar. 
And thou shalt make staves for the altar, staves of shittim wood, and overlay them with brass. 
And the staves shall be put into the rings, and the staves shall be upon the two sides of the altar, to bear it. 
Hollow with boards shalt thou make it: as it was shewed thee in the mount, so shall they make it. 
And thou shalt make the court of the tabernacle: for the south side southward 
724,a faintness into their hearts in the lands of their enemies; and the sound of a shaken leaf shall chase them; and they shall flee, as fleeing from a sword; and they shall fall when none pursueth. 
And they shall fall one upon another, as it were before a sword, when none pursueth: and ye shall have no power to stand before your enemies. 
And ye shall perish among the heathen, and the land of your enemies shall eat you up. 
And they that are left of you shall pine away in their iniquity in your enemies' lands; and also in the iniquities of their fathers shall they pine away with them. 
If they shall confess their iniquity, and the iniquity of their fathers, with their trespass which they trespassed against me, and t
976,t me round about. 
Arise, O LORD; save me, O my God: for thou hast smitten all mine enemies upon the cheek bone; thou hast broken the teeth of the ungodly. 
Salvation belongeth unto the LORD: thy blessing is upon thy people. Selah. 
Hear me when I call, O God of my righteousness: thou hast enlarged me when I was in distress; have mercy upon me, and hear my prayer. 
O ye sons of men, how long will ye turn my glory into shame? how long will ye love vanity, and seek after leasing? Selah. 
But know that the LORD hath set apart him that is godly for himself: the LORD will hear when I call unto him. 
Stand in awe, and sin not: commune with your own heart upon your bed, and be still. Selah. 
Offer the sacrifices of righteousness, and put your trust in the LORD. 
There be many that say, Who will shew us any good? LORD, lift thou up the light of thy countenance upon us. 
Thou hast put gladness in my heart, more than in the time that their corn and their wine increased. 

742,he seed of the blessed of the LORD, and their offspring with them. 
And it shall come to pass, that before they call, I will answer; and while they are yet speaking, I will hear. 
The wolf and the lamb shall feed together, and the lion shall eat straw like the bullock: and dust shall be the serpent's meat. They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain, saith the LORD. 
Thus saith the LORD, The heaven is my throne, and the earth is my footstool: where is the house that ye build unto me? and where is the place of my rest? 
For all those things hath mine hand made, and all those things have been, saith the LORD: but to this man will I look, even to him that is poor and of a contrite spirit, and trembleth at my word. 
He that 
886,saying, It is written, That man shall not live by bread alone, but by every word of God. 
And the devil, taking him up into an high mountain, shewed unto him all the kingdoms of the world in a moment of time. 
And the devil said unto him, All this power will I give thee, and the glory of them: for that is delivered unto me; and to whomsoever I will I give it. 
If thou therefore wilt worship me, all shall be thine. 
And Jesus answered and said unto him, Get thee behind me, Satan: for it is written, Thou shalt worship the Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou serve. 
And he brought him to Jerusalem, and set him on a pinnacle of the temple, and said unto him, If thou be the Son of God, cast thyself down from hence: 
For it is written, He shall give his angels charge over thee, to keep thee: 
And in their hands they shall bear thee up, lest at any time thou dash thy foot agains
848, have I to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son of God most high? I beseech thee, torment me not. 
(For he had commanded the unclean spirit to come out of the man. For oftentimes it had caught him: and he was kept bound with chains and in fetters; and he brake the bands, and was driven of the devil into the wilderness.) 
And Jesus asked him, saying, What is thy name? And he said, Legion: because many devils were entered into him. 
And they besought him that he would not command them to go out into the deep. 
And there was there an herd of many swine feeding on the mountain: and they besought him that he would suffer them to enter into them. And he suffered them. 
Then went the devils out of the man, and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a steep place into the lake, and were choked. 
When they that fed them saw what was do
769,should delight himself with God. 
Therefore hearken unto me ye men of understanding: far be it from God, that he should do wickedness; and from the Almighty, that he should commit iniquity. 
For the work of a man shall he render unto him, and cause every man to find according to his ways. 
Yea, surely God will not do wickedly, neither will the Almighty pervert judgment. 
Who hath given him a charge over the earth? or who hath disposed the whole world? 
If he set his heart upon man, if he gather unto himself his spirit and his breath; 
All flesh shall perish together, and man shall turn again unto dust. 
If now thou hast understanding, hear this: hearken to the voice of my words. 
Shall even he that hateth right govern? and wilt thou condemn him that is most j
1034,vest. 
Go your ways: behold, I send you forth as lambs among wolves. 
Carry neither purse, nor scrip, nor shoes: and salute no man by the way. 
And into whatsoever house ye enter, first say, Peace be to this house. 
And if the son of peace be there, your peace shall rest upon it: if not, it shall turn to you again. 
And in the same house remain, eating and drinking such things as they give: for the labourer is worthy of his hire. Go not from house to house. 
And into whatsoever city ye enter, and they receive you, eat such things as are set before you: 
And heal the sick that are therein, and say unto them, The kingdom of God is come nigh unto you. 
But into whatsoever city ye enter, and they receive you not, go your ways out into the streets of the same, and say, 
Even the very dust of your city, which cleaveth on us, we do wipe off against you: notwithstanding be ye sure of this, that the kingdom of God is come nigh unto you. 
But I say unto you, that it shall be more tolerable in that day for Sodom, than for that ci
789,r cometh to consecrate himself with a young bullock and seven rams, the same may be a priest of them that are no gods. 
But as for us, the LORD is our God, and we have not forsaken him; and the priests, which minister unto the LORD, are the sons of Aaron, and the Levites wait upon their business: 
And they burn unto the LORD every morning and every evening burnt sacrifices and sweet incense: the shewbread also set they in order upon the pure table; and the candlestick of gold with the lamps thereof, to burn every evening: for we keep the charge of the LORD our God; but ye have forsaken him. 
And, behold, God himself is with us for our captain, and his priests with sounding trumpets to cry alarm against you. O children of Israel, fight ye not against the LORD God of your fathers;
1002,f small power, they were dismayed and confounded: they were as the grass of the field, and as the green herb, as the grass on the housetops, and as corn blasted before it be grown up. 
But I know thy abode, and thy going out, and thy coming in, and thy rage against me. 
Because thy rage against me, and thy tumult, is come up into mine ears, therefore will I put my hook in thy nose, and my bridle in thy lips, and I will turn thee back by the way by which thou camest. 
And this shall be a sign unto thee, Ye shall eat this year such as groweth of itself; and the second year that which springeth of the same: and in the third year sow ye, and reap, and plant vineyards, and eat the fruit thereof. 
And the remnant that is escaped of the house of Judah shall again take root downward, and bear fruit upward: 
For out of Jerusalem shall go forth a remnant, and they that escape out of mount Zion: the zeal of the LORD of hosts shall do this. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD concerning the king of Assyr
730,n the tops of the mulberry trees, that then thou shalt bestir thyself: for then shall the LORD go out before thee, to smite the host of the Philistines. 
And David did so, as the LORD had commanded him; and smote the Philistines from Geba until thou come to Gazer. 
Again, David gathered together all the chosen men of Israel, thirty thousand. 
And David arose, and went with all the people that were with him from Baale of Judah, to bring up from thence the ark of God, whose name is called by the name of the LORD of hosts that dwelleth between the cherubims. 
And they set the ark of God upon a new cart, and brought it out of the house of Abinadab that was in Gibeah: and Uzzah and Ahio, the sons of Abinadab, drave the new ca
1063,ried to heaven. 
And the LORD sent an angel, which cut off all the mighty men of valour, and the leaders and captains in the camp of the king of Assyria. So he returned with shame of face to his own land. And when he was come into the house of his god, they that came forth of his own bowels slew him there with the sword. 
Thus the LORD saved Hezekiah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem from the hand of Sennacherib the king of Assyria, and from the hand of all other, and guided them on every side. 
And many brought gifts unto the LORD to Jerusalem, and presents to Hezekiah king of Judah: so that he was magnified in the sight of all nations from thenceforth. 
In those days Hezekiah was sick to the death, and prayed unto the LORD: and he spake unto him, and he gave him a sign. 
But Hezekiah rendered not again according to the benefit done unto him; for his heart was lifted up: therefore there was wrath upon him, and upon Judah and Jerusalem. 
Notwithstanding Hezekiah humbled himself for the pride of his heart, both he and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, s
1000,dip thy morsel in the vinegar. And she sat beside the reapers: and he reached her parched corn, and she did eat, and was sufficed, and left. 
And when she was risen up to glean, Boaz commanded his young men, saying, Let her glean even among the sheaves, and reproach her not: 
And let fall also some of the handfuls of purpose for her, and leave them, that she may glean them, and rebuke her not. 
So she gleaned in the field until even, and beat out that she had gleaned: and it was about an ephah of barley. 
And she took it up, and went into the city: and her mother in law saw what she had gleaned: and she brought forth, and gave to her that she had reserved after she was sufficed. 
And her mother in law said unto her, Where hast thou gleaned to day? and where wroughtest thou? blessed be he that did take knowledge of thee. And she shewed her mother in law with whom she had wrought, and said, The man's name with whom I wrought to day is Boaz. 
And Naomi said unto her daughter in law, Bless
823,ies and their suburbs. 
And the lot came out for the families of the Kohathites: and the children of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot out of the tribe of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of the tribe of Benjamin, thirteen cities. 
And the rest of the children of Kohath had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh, ten cities. 
And the children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe of Naphtali, and out of the half tribe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen cities. 
The children of Merari by their families had out of the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun, twelve cities. 
And the chi
733, is the fig tree withered away! 
Jesus answered and said unto them, Verily I say unto you, If ye have faith, and doubt not, ye shall not only do this which is done to the fig tree, but also if ye shall say unto this mountain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea; it shall be done. 
And all things, whatsoever ye shall ask in prayer, believing, ye shall receive. 
And when he was come into the temple, the chief priests and the elders of the people came unto him as he was teaching, and said, By what authority doest thou these things? and who gave thee this authority? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, I also will ask you one thing, which if ye tell me, I in like wise will tell you by what authority I do these thi
816,h justify yourselves before men; but God knoweth your hearts: for that which is highly esteemed among men is abomination in the sight of God. 
The law and the prophets were until John: since that time the kingdom of God is preached, and every man presseth into it. 
And it is easier for heaven and earth to pass, than one tittle of the law to fail. 
Whosoever putteth away his wife, and marrieth another, committeth adultery: and whosoever marrieth her that is put away from her husband committeth adultery. 
There was a certain rich man, which was clothed in purple and fine linen, and fared sumptuously every day: 
And there was a certain beggar named Lazarus, which was laid at his gate, full of sores, 
And desiring to be fed with the crumbs which fell from the rich man's table: moreover the dogs came and licke
945, hill, much people met him. 
And, behold, a man of the company cried out, saying, Master, I beseech thee, look upon my son: for he is mine only child. 
And, lo, a spirit taketh him, and he suddenly crieth out; and it teareth him that he foameth again, and bruising him hardly departeth from him. 
And I besought thy disciples to cast him out; and they could not. 
And Jesus answering said, O faithless and perverse generation, how long shall I be with you, and suffer you? Bring thy son hither. 
And as he was yet a coming, the devil threw him down, and tare him. And Jesus rebuked the unclean spirit, and healed the child, and delivered him again to his father. 
And they were all amazed at the mighty power of God. But while they wondered every one at all things which Jesus did, he said unto his disciples, 
Let these sayings sink down into your ears: for the Son of man shall be delivered into the hands of men. 
But they understood not this
1008,s servants, nor the people of the land, did hearken unto the words of the LORD, which he spake by the prophet Jeremiah. 
And Zedekiah the king sent Jehucal the son of Shelemiah and Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest to the prophet Jeremiah, saying, Pray now unto the LORD our God for us. 
Now Jeremiah came in and went out among the people: for they had not put him into prison. 
Then Pharaoh's army was come forth out of Egypt: and when the Chaldeans that besieged Jerusalem heard tidings of them, they departed from Jerusalem. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto the prophet Jeremiah saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; Thus shall ye say to the king of Judah, that sent you unto me to enquire of me; Behold, Pharaoh's army, which is come forth to help you, shall return to Egypt into their own land. 
And the Chaldeans shall come again, and fight against this city, and take it, and burn it with fire. 
Thus saith the LORD; Deceive not yourselves, saying, The Chaldeans shall surely dep
747,is fists? who hath bound the waters in a garment? who hath established all the ends of the earth? what is his name, and what is his son's name, if thou canst tell? 
Every word of God is pure: he is a shield unto them that put their trust in him. 
Add thou not unto his words, lest he reprove thee, and thou be found a liar. 
Two things have I required of thee; deny me them not before I die: 
Remove far from me vanity and lies: give me neither poverty nor riches; feed me with food convenient for me: 
Lest I be full, and deny thee, and say, Who is the LORD? or lest I be poor, and steal, and take the name of my God in vain. 
Accuse not a servant unto his master, lest he curse thee, and thou be found guilty. 
There is a generation that curseth
749,none understood it. 
In the first year of Darius the son of Ahasuerus, of the seed of the Medes, which was made king over the realm of the Chaldeans; 
In the first year of his reign I Daniel understood by books the number of the years, whereof the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah the prophet, that he would accomplish seventy years in the desolations of Jerusalem. 
And I set my face unto the Lord God, to seek by prayer and supplications, with fasting, and sackcloth, and ashes: 
And I prayed unto the LORD my God, and made my confession, and said, O Lord, the great and dreadful God, keeping the covenant and mercy to them that love him, and to them that keep his commandments; 
We have sinned, and have committed iniquity, and have done wickedl
1035,he children of Dan set forward, which was the rereward of all the camps throughout their hosts: and over his host was Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Asher was Pagiel the son of Ocran. 
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Naphtali was Ahira the son of Enan. 
Thus were the journeyings of the children of Israel according to their armies, when they set forward. 
And Moses said unto Hobab, the son of Raguel the Midianite, Moses' father in law, We are journeying unto the place of which the LORD said, I will give it you: come thou with us, and we will do thee good: for the LORD hath spoken good concerning Israel. 
And he said unto him, I will not go; but I will depart to mine own land, and to my kindred. 
And he said, Leave us not, I pray thee; forasmuch as thou knowest how we are to encamp in the wilderness, and thou mayest be to us instead of eyes. 
And it shall be, if thou go with us, yea, it shall be, that what goodness the LORD shall do unto us, the same wi
1008,ient waiting for Christ. 
Now we command you, brethren, in the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, that ye withdraw yourselves from every brother that walketh disorderly, and not after the tradition which he received of us. 
For yourselves know how ye ought to follow us: for we behaved not ourselves disorderly among you; 
Neither did we eat any man's bread for nought; but wrought with labour and travail night and day, that we might not be chargeable to any of you: 
Not because we have not power, but to make ourselves an ensample unto you to follow us. 
For even when we were with you, this we commanded you, that if any would not work, neither should he eat. 
For we hear that there are some which walk among you disorderly, working not at all, but are busybodies. 
Now them that are such we command and exhort by our Lord Jesus Christ, that with quietness they work, and eat their own bread. 
But ye, brethren, be not weary in well doing. 
And if any man obey not our word by this epistle, note that man, a
793,it. 
The burden of Moab. Because in the night Ar of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; because in the night Kir of Moab is laid waste, and brought to silence; 
He is gone up to Bajith, and to Dibon, the high places, to weep: Moab shall howl over Nebo, and over Medeba: on all their heads shall be baldness, and every beard cut off. 
In their streets they shall gird themselves with sackcloth: on the tops of their houses, and in their streets, every one shall howl, weeping abundantly. 
And Heshbon shall cry, and Elealeh: their voice shall be heard even unto Jahaz: therefore the armed soldiers of Moab shall cry out; his life shall be grievous unto him. 
My heart shall cry out for Moab; his fugitives shall flee unto Zoar, an heifer of three years old: for by the mounting up of Lu
1064,and to Solomon, and to Israel his people. 
Thus Solomon finished the house of the LORD, and the king's house: and all that came into Solomon's heart to make in the house of the LORD, and in his own house, he prosperously effected. 
And the LORD appeared to Solomon by night, and said unto him, I have heard thy prayer, and have chosen this place to myself for an house of sacrifice. 
If I shut up heaven that there be no rain, or if I command the locusts to devour the land, or if I send pestilence among my people; 
If my people, which are called by my name, shall humble themselves, and pray, and seek my face, and turn from their wicked ways; then will I hear from heaven, and will forgive their sin, and will heal their land. 
Now mine eyes shall be open, and mine ears attent unto the prayer that is made in this place. 
For now have I chosen and sanctified this house, that my name may be there for ever: and mine eyes and mine heart shall be there perpetually. 
And as for thee, if thou wilt walk before me, as David thy father walked, and do according to a
728,g, Ye shall not give your daughters unto their sons, nor take their daughters unto your sons, or for yourselves. 
Did not Solomon king of Israel sin by these things? yet among many nations was there no king like him, who was beloved of his God, and God made him king over all Israel: nevertheless even him did outlandish women cause to sin. 
Shall we then hearken unto you to do all this great evil, to transgress against our God in marrying strange wives? 
And one of the sons of Joiada, the son of Eliashib the high priest, was son in law to Sanballat the Horonite: therefore I chased him from me. 
Remember them, O my God, because they have defiled the priesthood, and the covenant of the priesthood, and of the Levites. 
Thu
926,he hath given thee. 
Beware that thou forget not the LORD thy God, in not keeping his commandments, and his judgments, and his statutes, which I command thee this day: 
Lest when thou hast eaten and art full, and hast built goodly houses, and dwelt therein; 
And when thy herds and thy flocks multiply, and thy silver and thy gold is multiplied, and all that thou hast is multiplied; 
Then thine heart be lifted up, and thou forget the LORD thy God, which brought thee forth out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage; 
Who led thee through that great and terrible wilderness, wherein were fiery serpents, and scorpions, and drought, where there was no water; who brought thee forth water out of the rock of flint; 
Who fed thee in the wilderness with manna, which thy fathers knew not, that he might humble thee, and that he might prove thee, to do thee good at thy latter end; 
And thou say in thine heart, My power
766, the three brake through the host of the Philistines, and drew water out of the well of Bethlehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and brought it to David: but David would not drink of it, but poured it out to the LORD. 
And said, My God forbid it me, that I should do this thing: shall I drink the blood of these men that have put their lives in jeopardy? for with the jeopardy of their lives they brought it. Therefore he would not drink it. These things did these three mightiest. 
And Abishai the brother of Joab, he was chief of the three: for lifting up his spear against three hundred, he slew them, and had a name among the three. 
Of the three, he was more honourable than the two; for he was their captain: howbeit he attained not to the first three. 
B
942,. 
But he that sinneth against me wrongeth his own soul: all they that hate me love death. 
Wisdom hath builded her house, she hath hewn out her seven pillars: 
She hath killed her beasts; she hath mingled her wine; she hath also furnished her table. 
She hath sent forth her maidens: she crieth upon the highest places of the city, 
Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: as for him that wanteth understanding, she saith to him, 
Come, eat of my bread, and drink of the wine which I have mingled. 
Forsake the foolish, and live; and go in the way of understanding. 
He that reproveth a scorner getteth to himself shame: and he that rebuketh a wicked man getteth himself a blot. 
Reprove not a scorner, lest he hate thee: rebuke a wise man, and he will love thee. 
Give instruction to a wise man, and he will be yet wiser: teach a just man, and he will increase in learning. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: and the knowled
732,he King of the Jews; but that he said, I am King of the Jews. 
Pilate answered, What I have written I have written. 
Then the soldiers, when they had crucified Jesus, took his garments, and made four parts, to every soldier a part; and also his coat: now the coat was without seam, woven from the top throughout. 
They said therefore among themselves, Let us not rend it, but cast lots for it, whose it shall be: that the scripture might be fulfilled, which saith, They parted my raiment among them, and for my vesture they did cast lots. These things therefore the soldiers did. 
Now there stood by the cross of Jesus his mother, and his mother's sister, Mary the wife of Cleophas, and Mary Magdalene. 
When Jesus therefore saw his
1032,n so doing. 
And he overtook them, and he spake unto them these same words. 
And they said unto him, Wherefore saith my lord these words? God forbid that thy servants should do according to this thing: 
Behold, the money, which we found in our sacks' mouths, we brought again unto thee out of the land of Canaan: how then should we steal out of thy lord's house silver or gold? 
With whomsoever of thy servants it be found, both let him die, and we also will be my lord's bondmen. 
And he said, Now also let it be according unto your words: he with whom it is found shall be my servant; and ye shall be blameless. 
Then they speedily took down every man his sack to the ground, and opened every man his sack. 
And he searched, and began at the eldest, and left at the youngest: and the cup was found in Benjamin's sack. 
Then they rent their clothes, and laded every man his ass, and returned to the city. 
And Judah and his brethren came to Joseph's house; for he was yet there: and they fell before him on the ground. 
And Joseph 
814,d against Jabin the king of Canaan, until they had destroyed Jabin king of Canaan. 
Then sang Deborah and Barak the son of Abinoam on that day, saying, 
Praise ye the LORD for the avenging of Israel, when the people willingly offered themselves. 
Hear, O ye kings; give ear, O ye princes; I, even I, will sing unto the LORD; I will sing praise to the LORD God of Israel. 
LORD, when thou wentest out of Seir, when thou marchedst out of the field of Edom, the earth trembled, and the heavens dropped, the clouds also dropped water. 
The mountains melted from before the LORD, even that Sinai from before the LORD God of Israel. 
In the days of Shamgar the son of Anath, in the days of Jael, the highways were unoccupied, and the travellers walked through byways. 
The inhabitants of the villages ceased, they ceased
825,to Aaron, and unto Miriam, Come out ye three unto the tabernacle of the congregation. And they three came out. 
And the LORD came down in the pillar of the cloud, and stood in the door of the tabernacle, and called Aaron and Miriam: and they both came forth. 
And he said, Hear now my words: If there be a prophet among you, I the LORD will make myself known unto him in a vision, and will speak unto him in a dream. 
My servant Moses is not so, who is faithful in all mine house. 
With him will I speak mouth to mouth, even apparently, and not in dark speeches; and the similitude of the LORD shall he behold: wherefore then were ye not afraid to speak against my servant Moses? 
And the anger of the LORD was kindled against them; and he departed. 
And the cloud departed from off the tabernacle; and, behold, Miriam became
807,are crushed before the moth? 
They are destroyed from morning to evening: they perish for ever without any regarding it. 
Doth not their excellency which is in them go away? they die, even without wisdom. 
Call now, if there be any that will answer thee; and to which of the saints wilt thou turn? 
For wrath killeth the foolish man, and envy slayeth the silly one. 
I have seen the foolish taking root: but suddenly I cursed his habitation. 
His children are far from safety, and they are crushed in the gate, neither is there any to deliver them. 
Whose harvest the hungry eateth up, and taketh it even out of the thorns, and the robber swalloweth up their substance. 
Although affliction cometh not forth of the dust, neither doth trouble spring out of the ground; 
Yet man is born unto trouble, as the s
1040,n went up thither to the brasen altar before the LORD, which was at the tabernacle of the congregation, and offered a thousand burnt offerings upon it. 
In that night did God appear unto Solomon, and said unto him, Ask what I shall give thee. 
And Solomon said unto God, Thou hast shewed great mercy unto David my father, and hast made me to reign in his stead. 
Now, O LORD God, let thy promise unto David my father be established: for thou hast made me king over a people like the dust of the earth in multitude. 
Give me now wisdom and knowledge, that I may go out and come in before this people: for who can judge this thy people, that is so great? 
And God said to Solomon, Because this was in thine heart, and thou hast not asked riches, wealth, or honour, nor the life of thine enemies, neither yet hast asked long life; but hast asked wisdom and knowledge for thyself, that thou mayest judge my people, over whom I have made thee king: 
Wisdom and knowledge is granted unto thee; and I will give thee riches, and wealth, and honour,
943,t. 
And I will make my covenant between me and thee, and will multiply thee exceedingly. 
And Abram fell on his face: and God talked with him, saying, 
As for me, behold, my covenant is with thee, and thou shalt be a father of many nations. 
Neither shall thy name any more be called Abram, but thy name shall be Abraham; for a father of many nations have I made thee. 
And I will make thee exceeding fruitful, and I will make nations of thee, and kings shall come out of thee. 
And I will establish my covenant between me and thee and thy seed after thee in their generations for an everlasting covenant, to be a God unto thee, and to thy seed after thee. 
And I will give unto thee, and to thy seed after thee, the land wherein thou art a stranger, all the land of Canaan, for an everlasting possession; and I will be their God. 
And God said unto Abraham, Thou shalt keep my covenant therefore, thou, and thy seed after thee in their genera
909,better things of you, and things that accompany salvation, though we thus speak. 
For God is not unrighteous to forget your work and labour of love, which ye have shewed toward his name, in that ye have ministered to the saints, and do minister. 
And we desire that every one of you do shew the same diligence to the full assurance of hope unto the end: 
That ye be not slothful, but followers of them who through faith and patience inherit the promises. 
For when God made promise to Abraham, because he could swear by no greater, he sware by himself, 
Saying, Surely blessing I will bless thee, and multiplying I will multiply thee. 
And so, after he had patiently endured, he obtained the promise. 
For men verily swear by the greater: and an oath for confirmation is to them an end of all strife. 
Wherein God, willing more abundantly to shew unto the heirs of promise the immutability of his counsel, con
865,time at his own charges? who planteth a vineyard, and eateth not of the fruit thereof? or who feedeth a flock, and eateth not of the milk of the flock? 
Say I these things as a man? or saith not the law the same also? 
For it is written in the law of Moses, thou shalt not muzzle the mouth of the ox that treadeth out the corn. Doth God take care for oxen? 
Or saith he it altogether for our sakes? For our sakes, no doubt, this is written: that he that ploweth should plow in hope; and that he that thresheth in hope should be partaker of his hope. 
If we have sown unto you spiritual things, is it a great thing if we shall reap your carnal things? 
If others be partakers of this power over you, are not we rather? Nevertheless we have not used this power; but suffer all things, lest we should hinder the gospel of Christ. 
Do ye not know that they which minist
781, and put a space betwixt drove and drove. 
And he commanded the foremost, saying, When Esau my brother meeteth thee, and asketh thee, saying, Whose art thou? and whither goest thou? and whose are these before thee? 
Then thou shalt say, They be thy servant Jacob's; it is a present sent unto my lord Esau: and, behold, also he is behind us. 
And so commanded he the second, and the third, and all that followed the droves, saying, On this manner shall ye speak unto Esau, when ye find him. 
And say ye moreover, Behold, thy servant Jacob is behind us. For he said, I will appease him with the present that goeth before me, and afterward I will see his face; peradventure he will accept of me. 
So went the present over before him: and himself lodged that night in the company. 
And
1077,the woman which was ready to be delivered, for to devour her child as soon as it was born. 
And she brought forth a man child, who was to rule all nations with a rod of iron: and her child was caught up unto God, and to his throne. 
And the woman fled into the wilderness, where she hath a place prepared of God, that they should feed her there a thousand two hundred and threescore days. 
And there was war in heaven: Michael and his angels fought against the dragon; and the dragon fought and his angels, 
And prevailed not; neither was their place found any more in heaven. 
And the great dragon was cast out, that old serpent, called the Devil, and Satan, which deceiveth the whole world: he was cast out into the earth, and his angels were cast out with him. 
And I heard a loud voice saying in heaven, Now is come salvation, and strength, and the kingdom of our God, and the power of his Christ: for the accuser of our brethren is cast down, which accused them before our God day and night. 
And they overcame him by the blood of the Lamb, and by the word of their testim
902, said unto them, Wherefore do ye, Moses and Aaron, let the people from their works? get you unto your burdens. 
And Pharaoh said, Behold, the people of the land now are many, and ye make them rest from their burdens. 
And Pharaoh commanded the same day the taskmasters of the people, and their officers, saying, 
Ye shall no more give the people straw to make brick, as heretofore: let them go and gather straw for themselves. 
And the tale of the bricks, which they did make heretofore, ye shall lay upon them; ye shall not diminish ought thereof: for they be idle; therefore they cry, saying, Let us go and sacrifice to our God. 
Let there more work be laid upon the men, that they may labour therein; and let them not regard vain words. 
And the taskmasters of the people went out, and their officers, and they spake to the people, saying, Thus saith Pharaoh, I will not give you straw. 
Go ye, get 
969, are ambassadors for Christ, as though God did beseech you by us: we pray you in Christ's stead, be ye reconciled to God. 
For he hath made him to be sin for us, who knew no sin; that we might be made the righteousness of God in him. 
We then, as workers together with him, beseech you also that ye receive not the grace of God in vain. 
(For he saith, I have heard thee in a time accepted, and in the day of salvation have I succoured thee: behold, now is the accepted time; behold, now is the day of salvation.) 
Giving no offence in any thing, that the ministry be not blamed: 
But in all things approving ourselves as the ministers of God, in much patience, in afflictions, in necessities, in distresses, 
In stripes, in imprisonments, in tumults, in labours, in watchings, in fastings; 
By pureness, by knowledge, by long suffering, by kindness, by the Holy Ghost, by love unfeigned, 
By the word of truth, by the power of God, by the armour of righteousness on th
985,e cleansed from my sin? 
I will answer thee, and thy companions with thee. 
Look unto the heavens, and see; and behold the clouds which are higher than thou. 
If thou sinnest, what doest thou against him? or if thy transgressions be multiplied, what doest thou unto him? 
If thou be righteous, what givest thou him? or what receiveth he of thine hand? 
Thy wickedness may hurt a man as thou art; and thy righteousness may profit the son of man. 
By reason of the multitude of oppressions they make the oppressed to cry: they cry out by reason of the arm of the mighty. 
But none saith, Where is God my maker, who giveth songs in the night; 
Who teacheth us more than the beasts of the earth, and maketh us wiser than the fowls of heaven? 
There they cry, but none giveth answer, because of the pride of evil men. 
Surely God will not hear vanity, neither will the Almighty regard it. 
Although thou sayest thou shalt not see him, yet judgment is before him; therefore trust thou in him
935,pon the altar round about. 
And he cut the ram into pieces; and Moses burnt the head, and the pieces, and the fat. 
And he washed the inwards and the legs in water; and Moses burnt the whole ram upon the altar: it was a burnt sacrifice for a sweet savour, and an offering made by fire unto the LORD; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he brought the other ram, the ram of consecration: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram. 
And he slew it; and Moses took of the blood of it, and put it upon the tip of Aaron's right ear, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe of his right foot. 
And he brought Aaron's sons, and Moses put of the blood upon the tip of their right ear, and upon the thumbs of their right hands, and upon the great toes of their right feet: and Moses sprinkled the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he took the fat, and the rump, and all the fat that was upon the i
861,rites, and unto the land of them, whom he destroyed. 
And the LORD shall give them up before your face, that ye may do unto them according unto all the commandments which I have commanded you. 
Be strong and of a good courage, fear not, nor be afraid of them: for the LORD thy God, he it is that doth go with thee; he will not fail thee, nor forsake thee. 
And Moses called unto Joshua, and said unto him in the sight of all Israel, Be strong and of a good courage: for thou must go with this people unto the land which the LORD hath sworn unto their fathers to give them; and thou shalt cause them to inherit it. 
And the LORD, he it is that doth go before thee; he will be with thee, he will not fail thee, neither forsake thee: fear not, neither be dismayed. 
And Moses wrote this law, and delivered it unto the priests the sons of Levi, which bare the ark o
1051,d that Jacob obeyed his father and his mother, and was gone to Padanaram; 
And Esau seeing that the daughters of Canaan pleased not Isaac his father; 
Then went Esau unto Ishmael, and took unto the wives which he had Mahalath the daughter of Ishmael Abraham's son, the sister of Nebajoth, to be his wife. 
And Jacob went out from Beersheba, and went toward Haran. 
And he lighted upon a certain place, and tarried there all night, because the sun was set; and he took of the stones of that place, and put them for his pillows, and lay down in that place to sleep. 
And he dreamed, and behold a ladder set up on the earth, and the top of it reached to heaven: and behold the angels of God ascending and descending on it. 
And, behold, the LORD stood above it, and said, I am the LORD God of Abraham thy father, and the God of Isaac: the land whereon thou liest, to thee will I give it, and to thy seed; 
And thy seed shall be as the dust of the earth, and thou shalt spread abroad to the west, and to the east, and to the north, and to the south: and i
794,nother's burdens, and so fulfil the law of Christ. 
For if a man think himself to be something, when he is nothing, he deceiveth himself. 
But let every man prove his own work, and then shall he have rejoicing in himself alone, and not in another. 
For every man shall bear his own burden. 
Let him that is taught in the word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things. 
Be not deceived; God is not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that shall he also reap. 
For he that soweth to his flesh shall of the flesh reap corruption; but he that soweth to the Spirit shall of the Spirit reap life everlasting. 
And let us not be weary in well doing: for in due season we shall reap, if we faint not. 
As we have therefore opportunity, let us do good unto all men, especially unto them wh
739,is multitude, saith the Lord GOD. 
And it came to pass in the twelfth year, in the twelfth month, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, take up a lamentation for Pharaoh king of Egypt, and say unto him, Thou art like a young lion of the nations, and thou art as a whale in the seas: and thou camest forth with thy rivers, and troubledst the waters with thy feet, and fouledst their rivers. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will therefore spread out my net over thee with a company of many people; and they shall bring thee up in my net. 
Then will I leave thee upon the land, I will cast thee forth upon the open field, and will cause all the fowls of the heaven to remain upon thee, and I 
984,ction? thy sorrow is incurable for the multitude of thine iniquity: because thy sins were increased, I have done these things unto thee. 
Therefore all they that devour thee shall be devoured; and all thine adversaries, every one of them, shall go into captivity; and they that spoil thee shall be a spoil, and all that prey upon thee will I give for a prey. 
For I will restore health unto thee, and I will heal thee of thy wounds, saith the LORD; because they called thee an Outcast, saying, This is Zion, whom no man seeketh after. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will bring again the captivity of Jacob's tents, and have mercy on his dwellingplaces; and the city shall be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain after the manner thereof. 
And out of them shall proceed thanksgiving and the voice of them that make merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few; I will also glorify them, and they shall not be small. 
Their children also shall be as afo
872,ternal life; and I will raise him up at the last day. 
For my flesh is meat indeed, and my blood is drink indeed. 
He that eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood, dwelleth in me, and I in him. 
As the living Father hath sent me, and I live by the Father: so he that eateth me, even he shall live by me. 
This is that bread which came down from heaven: not as your fathers did eat manna, and are dead: he that eateth of this bread shall live for ever. 
These things said he in the synagogue, as he taught in Capernaum. 
Many therefore of his disciples, when they had heard this, said, This is an hard saying; who can hear it? 
When Jesus knew in himself that his disciples murmured at it, he said unto them, Doth this offend you? 
What and if ye shall see the Son of man ascend up where he was before? 
It is the spirit that quickeneth; the flesh profiteth nothing: the wor
882,my God, mine Holy One? we shall not die. O LORD, thou hast ordained them for judgment; and, O mighty God, thou hast established them for correction. 
Thou art of purer eyes than to behold evil, and canst not look on iniquity: wherefore lookest thou upon them that deal treacherously, and holdest thy tongue when the wicked devoureth the man that is more righteous than he? 
And makest men as the fishes of the sea, as the creeping things, that have no ruler over them? 
They take up all of them with the angle, they catch them in their net, and gather them in their drag: therefore they rejoice and are glad. 
Therefore they sacrifice unto their net, and burn incense unto their drag; because by them their portion is fat, and their meat plenteous. 
Shall they therefore empty their net, and not spare continually to slay the nations? 
I will stand upon my watch, and set me upon th
931,aldea all their evil that they have done in Zion in your sight, saith the LORD. 
Behold, I am against thee, O destroying mountain, saith the LORD, which destroyest all the earth: and I will stretch out mine hand upon thee, and roll thee down from the rocks, and will make thee a burnt mountain. 
And they shall not take of thee a stone for a corner, nor a stone for foundations; but thou shalt be desolate for ever, saith the LORD. 
Set ye up a standard in the land, blow the trumpet among the nations, prepare the nations against her, call together against her the kingdoms of Ararat, Minni, and Ashchenaz; appoint a captain against her; cause the horses to come up as the rough caterpillers. 
Prepare against her the nations with the kings of the Medes, the captains thereof, and all the rulers thereof, and all the land of his dominion. 
And the land shall tremble and sorrow: for every purpose of the LORD shall be performed ag
791,y would shoot from the wall? 
Who smote Abimelech the son of Jerubbesheth? did not a woman cast a piece of a millstone upon him from the wall, that he died in Thebez? why went ye nigh the wall? then say thou, Thy servant Uriah the Hittite is dead also. 
So the messenger went, and came and shewed David all that Joab had sent him for. 
And the messenger said unto David, Surely the men prevailed against us, and came out unto us into the field, and we were upon them even unto the entering of the gate. 
And the shooters shot from off the wall upon thy servants; and some of the king's servants be dead, and thy servant Uriah the Hittite is dead also. 
Then David said unto the messenger, Thus shalt thou say unto Joab, Let not this thing displease thee, for the sword devoureth one as well 
766,. 
Rejoice with them that do rejoice, and weep with them that weep. 
Be of the same mind one toward another. Mind not high things, but condescend to men of low estate. Be not wise in your own conceits. 
Recompense to no man evil for evil. Provide things honest in the sight of all men. 
If it be possible, as much as lieth in you, live peaceably with all men. 
Dearly beloved, avenge not yourselves, but rather give place unto wrath: for it is written, Vengeance is mine; I will repay, saith the Lord. 
Therefore if thine enemy hunger, feed him; if he thirst, give him drink: for in so doing thou shalt heap coals of fire on his head. 
Be not overcome of evil, but overcome evil with good. 
Let every soul be subject unto the higher powers. For there is no power but
814,and out of the fire went forth lightning. 
And the living creatures ran and returned as the appearance of a flash of lightning. 
Now as I beheld the living creatures, behold one wheel upon the earth by the living creatures, with his four faces. 
The appearance of the wheels and their work was like unto the colour of a beryl: and they four had one likeness: and their appearance and their work was as it were a wheel in the middle of a wheel. 
When they went, they went upon their four sides: and they turned not when they went. 
As for their rings, they were so high that they were dreadful; and their rings were full of eyes round about them four. 
And when the living creatures went, the wheels went by them: and when the living creatures were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up. 
Whithersoeve
836,n house, and made booths for his cattle: therefore the name of the place is called Succoth. 
And Jacob came to Shalem, a city of Shechem, which is in the land of Canaan, when he came from Padanaram; and pitched his tent before the city. 
And he bought a parcel of a field, where he had spread his tent, at the hand of the children of Hamor, Shechem's father, for an hundred pieces of money. 
And he erected there an altar, and called it EleloheIsrael. 
And Dinah the daughter of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob, went out to see the daughters of the land. 
And when Shechem the son of Hamor the Hivite, prince of the country, saw her, he took her, and lay with her, and defiled her. 
And his soul clave unto Dinah the daughter of Jacob, and he loved the damsel, and spake kindly unto the damsel. 
And Shechem spake unto his father Hamor,
1008,of slumber, eyes that they should not see, and ears that they should not hear;) unto this day. 
And David saith, Let their table be made a snare, and a trap, and a stumblingblock, and a recompence unto them: 
Let their eyes be darkened, that they may not see, and bow down their back alway. 
I say then, Have they stumbled that they should fall? God forbid: but rather through their fall salvation is come unto the Gentiles, for to provoke them to jealousy. 
Now if the fall of them be the riches of the world, and the diminishing of them the riches of the Gentiles; how much more their fulness? 
For I speak to you Gentiles, inasmuch as I am the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office: 
If by any means I may provoke to emulation them which are my flesh, and might save some of them. 
For if the casting away of them be the reconciling of the world, what shall the receiving of them be, but life from the dead? 
For if the firstfruit be holy, the lump is also holy: and if the root be holy, so are t
1023,mmuned with them, and with all the family of the house of his mother's father, saying, 
Speak, I pray you, in the ears of all the men of Shechem, Whether is better for you, either that all the sons of Jerubbaal, which are threescore and ten persons, reign over you, or that one reign over you? remember also that I am your bone and your flesh. 
And his mother's brethren spake of him in the ears of all the men of Shechem all these words: and their hearts inclined to follow Abimelech; for they said, He is our brother. 
And they gave him threescore and ten pieces of silver out of the house of Baalberith, wherewith Abimelech hired vain and light persons, which followed him. 
And he went unto his father's house at Ophrah, and slew his brethren the sons of Jerubbaal, being threescore and ten persons, upon one stone: notwithstanding yet Jotham the youngest son of Jerubbaal was left; for he hid himself. 
And all the men of Shechem gathered together, and all the house of Millo, and went, and made Abimelech king, by the
900, a sign and for a witness unto the LORD of hosts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because of the oppressors, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one, and he shall deliver them. 
And the LORD shall be known to Egypt, and the Egyptians shall know the LORD in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea, they shall vow a vow unto the LORD, and perform it. 
And the LORD shall smite Egypt: he shall smite and heal it: and they shall return even to the LORD, and he shall be intreated of them, and shall heal them. 
In that day shall there be a highway out of Egypt to Assyria, and the Assyrian shall come into Egypt, and the Egyptian into Assyria, and the Egyptians shall serve with the Assyrians. 
In that day shall Israel be the third with Egypt and with Assyria, even a blessing in the midst of the land: 
Whom the LORD of hosts shall bless, saying, Blessed be 
918,all be brought forth to the king of Babylon's princes, and those women shall say, Thy friends have set thee on, and have prevailed against thee: thy feet are sunk in the mire, and they are turned away back. 
So they shall bring out all thy wives and thy children to the Chaldeans: and thou shalt not escape out of their hand, but shalt be taken by the hand of the king of Babylon: and thou shalt cause this city to be burned with fire. 
Then said Zedekiah unto Jeremiah, Let no man know of these words, and thou shalt not die. 
But if the princes hear that I have talked with thee, and they come unto thee, and say unto thee, Declare unto us now what thou hast said unto the king, hide it not from us, and we will not put thee to death; also what the king said unto thee: 
Then thou shalt say unto them, I presented my supplication before the king, that he would not cause me to return to Jonathan's house, to die ther
986, chief went down, and came to David in the harvest time unto the cave of Adullam: and the troop of the Philistines pitched in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David was then in an hold, and the garrison of the Philistines was then in Bethlehem. 
And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of the water of the well of Bethlehem, which is by the gate! 
And the three mighty men brake through the host of the Philistines, and drew water out of the well of Bethlehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and brought it to David: nevertheless he would not drink thereof, but poured it out unto the LORD. 
And he said, Be it far from me, O LORD, that I should do this: is not this the blood of the men that went in jeopardy of their lives? therefore he would not drink it. These things did these three mighty men. 
And Abishai, the brother of Joab, the son of Zeruiah, was chief among three. And he lifted up his spear against three hundred, and slew them, and had the name among t
1014,carried the ark of God again to Jerusalem: and they tarried there. 
And David went up by the ascent of mount Olivet, and wept as he went up, and had his head covered, and he went barefoot: and all the people that was with him covered every man his head, and they went up, weeping as they went up. 
And one told David, saying, Ahithophel is among the conspirators with Absalom. And David said, O LORD, I pray thee, turn the counsel of Ahithophel into foolishness. 
And it came to pass, that when David was come to the top of the mount, where he worshipped God, behold, Hushai the Archite came to meet him with his coat rent, and earth upon his head: 
Unto whom David said, If thou passest on with me, then thou shalt be a burden unto me: 
But if thou return to the city, and say unto Absalom, I will be thy servant, O king; as I have been thy father's servant hitherto, so will I now also be thy servant: then mayest thou for me defeat the counsel of Ahithophel. 
And hast thou not there with thee Zadok and Abiatha
893, thou shalt bind this line of scarlet thread in the window which thou didst let us down by: and thou shalt bring thy father, and thy mother, and thy brethren, and all thy father's household, home unto thee. 
And it shall be, that whosoever shall go out of the doors of thy house into the street, his blood shall be upon his head, and we will be guiltless: and whosoever shall be with thee in the house, his blood shall be on our head, if any hand be upon him. 
And if thou utter this our business, then we will be quit of thine oath which thou hast made us to swear. 
And she said, According unto your words, so be it. And she sent them away, and they departed: and she bound the scarlet line in the window. 
And they went, and came unto the mountain, and abode there three days, until the pursuers were returned: and the pursuers sought them throughout all the way, but found them not. 
So th
818,the covenant of the LORD, which he made with our fathers, when he brought them out of the land of Egypt. 
And Solomon stood before the altar of the LORD in the presence of all the congregation of Israel, and spread forth his hands toward heaven: 
And he said, LORD God of Israel, there is no God like thee, in heaven above, or on earth beneath, who keepest covenant and mercy with thy servants that walk before thee with all their heart: 
Who hast kept with thy servant David my father that thou promisedst him: thou spakest also with thy mouth, and hast fulfilled it with thine hand, as it is this day. 
Therefore now, LORD God of Israel, keep with thy servant David my father that thou promisedst him, saying, There shall not fail thee a man in my sight to sit on the throne of Israel; so that thy children take heed
1080, depart away. 
And I will strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up and down in his name, saith the LORD. 
Open thy doors, O Lebanon, that the fire may devour thy cedars. 
Howl, fir tree; for the cedar is fallen; because the mighty are spoiled: howl, O ye oaks of Bashan; for the forest of the vintage is come down. 
There is a voice of the howling of the shepherds; for their glory is spoiled: a voice of the roaring of young lions; for the pride of Jordan is spoiled. 
Thus saith the LORD my God; Feed the flock of the slaughter; 
Whose possessors slay them, and hold themselves not guilty: and they that sell them say, Blessed be the LORD; for I am rich: and their own shepherds pity them not. 
For I will no more pity the inhabitants of the land, saith the LORD: but, lo, I will deliver the men every one into his neighbour's hand, and into the hand of his king: and they shall smite the land, and out of their hand I will not deliver them. 
And I will feed the flock of slaughter, even you, O poor of the flock. And I took unto me two staves; the one I called Beaut
959, I had pity for mine holy name, which the house of Israel had profaned among the heathen, whither they went. 
Therefore say unto the house of Israel, thus saith the Lord GOD; I do not this for your sakes, O house of Israel, but for mine holy name's sake, which ye have profaned among the heathen, whither ye went. 
And I will sanctify my great name, which was profaned among the heathen, which ye have profaned in the midst of them; and the heathen shall know that I am the LORD, saith the Lord GOD, when I shall be sanctified in you before their eyes. 
For I will take you from among the heathen, and gather you out of all countries, and will bring you into your own land. 
Then will I sprinkle clean water upon you, and ye shall be clean: from all your filthiness, and from all your idols, will I cleanse you. 
A new heart also will I give you, and a new spirit will I put within you: and I will take away the stony heart out of your flesh, and I will give 
924,irst up, and was chief. 
And David dwelt in the castle; therefore they called it the city of David. 
And he built the city round about, even from Millo round about: and Joab repaired the rest of the city. 
So David waxed greater and greater: for the LORD of hosts was with him. 
These also are the chief of the mighty men whom David had, who strengthened themselves with him in his kingdom, and with all Israel, to make him king, according to the word of the LORD concerning Israel. 
And this is the number of the mighty men whom David had; Jashobeam, an Hachmonite, the chief of the captains: he lifted up his spear against three hundred slain by him at one time. 
And after him was Eleazar the son of Dodo, the Ahohite, who was one of the three mighties. 
He was with David at Pasdammim, and there the Philistines were gathered together to battle, where was a parcel of ground full of barley; and the people fled from befo
751,g, even an offering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 
And the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, which is by the flanks, and the caul above the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away. 
And the priest shall burn them upon the altar: it is the food of the offering made by fire for a sweet savour: all the fat is the LORD's. 
It shall be a perpetual statute for your generations throughout all your dwellings, that ye eat neither fat nor blood. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a soul shall sin through ignorance against any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and sha
1046,: for they are the rejoicing of my heart. 
I have inclined mine heart to perform thy statutes alway, even unto the end. 
I hate vain thoughts: but thy law do I love. 
Thou art my hiding place and my shield: I hope in thy word. 
Depart from me, ye evildoers: for I will keep the commandments of my God. 
Uphold me according unto thy word, that I may live: and let me not be ashamed of my hope. 
Hold thou me up, and I shall be safe: and I will have respect unto thy statutes continually. 
Thou hast trodden down all them that err from thy statutes: for their deceit is falsehood. 
Thou puttest away all the wicked of the earth like dross: therefore I love thy testimonies. 
My flesh trembleth for fear of thee; and I am afraid of thy judgments. 
I have done judgment and justice: leave me not to mine oppressors. 
Be surety for thy servant for good: let not the proud oppress me. 
Mine eyes fail for thy salvation, and for the word of thy righteousness. 
Deal with thy servant according unto thy mercy, and teach me thy statutes. 
I am thy servant
1068,pardon thee for this? thy children have forsaken me, and sworn by them that are no gods: when I had fed them to the full, they then committed adultery, and assembled themselves by troops in the harlots' houses. 
They were as fed horses in the morning: every one neighed after his neighbour's wife. 
Shall I not visit for these things? saith the LORD: and shall not my soul be avenged on such a nation as this? 
Go ye up upon her walls, and destroy; but make not a full end: take away her battlements; for they are not the LORD's. 
For the house of Israel and the house of Judah have dealt very treacherously against me, saith the LORD. 
They have belied the LORD, and said, It is not he; neither shall evil come upon us; neither shall we see sword nor famine: 
And the prophets shall become wind, and the word is not in them: thus shall it be done unto them. 
Wherefore thus saith the LORD God of hosts, Because ye speak this word, behold, I will make my words in thy mouth fire, and this people wood, and it shall devour them. 
Lo, I will bring a nation upon you from
780,ion. 
A wise man will hear, and will increase learning; and a man of understanding shall attain unto wise counsels: 
To understand a proverb, and the interpretation; the words of the wise, and their dark sayings. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of knowledge: but fools despise wisdom and instruction. 
My son, hear the instruction of thy father, and forsake not the law of thy mother: 
For they shall be an ornament of grace unto thy head, and chains about thy neck. 
My son, if sinners entice thee, consent thou not. 
If they say, Come with us, let us lay wait for blood, let us lurk privily for the innocent without cause: 
Let us swallow them up alive as the grave; and whole, as those that go down into the pit: 
We shall find all precious substance, we shall fill our 
936,d should sojourn in a strange land; and that they should bring them into bondage, and entreat them evil four hundred years. 
And the nation to whom they shall be in bondage will I judge, said God: and after that shall they come forth, and serve me in this place. 
And he gave him the covenant of circumcision: and so Abraham begat Isaac, and circumcised him the eighth day; and Isaac begat Jacob; and Jacob begat the twelve patriarchs. 
And the patriarchs, moved with envy, sold Joseph into Egypt: but God was with him, 
And delivered him out of all his afflictions, and gave him favour and wisdom in the sight of Pharaoh king of Egypt; and he made him governor over Egypt and all his house. 
Now there came a dearth over all the land of Egypt and Chanaan, and great affliction: and our fathers found no sustenance. 
But when Jacob heard that there was corn in Egypt, he sent out our fathers first. 
And at the second time Joseph was ma
1069,ven above, and in earth beneath. 
Now therefore, I pray you, swear unto me by the LORD, since I have shewed you kindness, that ye will also shew kindness unto my father's house, and give me a true token: 
And that ye will save alive my father, and my mother, and my brethren, and my sisters, and all that they have, and deliver our lives from death. 
And the men answered her, Our life for yours, if ye utter not this our business. And it shall be, when the LORD hath given us the land, that we will deal kindly and truly with thee. 
Then she let them down by a cord through the window: for her house was upon the town wall, and she dwelt upon the wall. 
And she said unto them, Get you to the mountain, lest the pursuers meet you; and hide yourselves there three days, until the pursuers be returned: and afterward may ye go your way. 
And the men said unto her, We will be blameless of this thine oath which thou hast made us swear. 
Behold, when we come into the land, thou shalt bind this line of scarlet thread in the window which thou didst let us down by: and th
840,tions, and of the sacrifice of the peace offerings; 
Which the LORD commanded Moses in mount Sinai, in the day that he commanded the children of Israel to offer their oblations unto the LORD, in the wilderness of Sinai. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take Aaron and his sons with him, and the garments, and the anointing oil, and a bullock for the sin offering, and two rams, and a basket of unleavened bread; 
And gather thou all the congregation together unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And Moses did as the LORD commanded him; and the assembly was gathered together unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And Moses said unto the congregation, This is the thing which the LORD commanded to be done. 
And Moses brought Aaron and his sons, and washed them with water. 
And he put upon him the 
916,hey lean upon the LORD, and say, Is not the LORD among us? none evil can come upon us. 
Therefore shall Zion for your sake be plowed as a field, and Jerusalem shall become heaps, and the mountain of the house as the high places of the forest. 
But in the last days it shall come to pass, that the mountain of the house of the LORD shall be established in the top of the mountains, and it shall be exalted above the hills; and people shall flow unto it. 
And many nations shall come, and say, Come, and let us go up to the mountain of the LORD, and to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for the law shall go forth of Zion, and the word of the LORD from Jerusalem. 
And he shall judge among many people, and rebuke strong nations afar off; and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, and their spears into pruninghooks: nation shall not lift up a swor
729,of the twelve, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and the scribes and the elders. 
And he that betrayed him had given them a token, saying, Whomsoever I shall kiss, that same is he; take him, and lead him away safely. 
And as soon as he was come, he goeth straightway to him, and saith, Master, master; and kissed him. 
And they laid their hands on him, and took him. 
And one of them that stood by drew a sword, and smote a servant of the high priest, and cut off his ear. 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, Are ye come out, as against a thief, with swords and with staves to take me? 
I was daily with you in the temple teaching, and ye took me not: but the scriptures must be fu
786,me unto me again, saying, 
What mean ye, that ye use this proverb concerning the land of Israel, saying, The fathers have eaten sour grapes, and the children's teeth are set on edge? 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, ye shall not have occasion any more to use this proverb in Israel. 
Behold, all souls are mine; as the soul of the father, so also the soul of the son is mine: the soul that sinneth, it shall die. 
But if a man be just, and do that which is lawful and right, 
And hath not eaten upon the mountains, neither hath lifted up his eyes to the idols of the house of Israel, neither hath defiled his neighbour's wife, neither hath come near to a menstruous woman, 
And hath not oppressed any, but hath restored to the debtor his pledge, hath spoiled none by violence, hath given
1041,drinking, and making merry. 
And Solomon reigned over all kingdoms from the river unto the land of the Philistines, and unto the border of Egypt: they brought presents, and served Solomon all the days of his life. 
And Solomon's provision for one day was thirty measures of fine flour, and threescore measures of meal, 
Ten fat oxen, and twenty oxen out of the pastures, and an hundred sheep, beside harts, and roebucks, and fallowdeer, and fatted fowl. 
For he had dominion over all the region on this side the river, from Tiphsah even to Azzah, over all the kings on this side the river: and he had peace on all sides round about him. 
And Judah and Israel dwelt safely, every man under his vine and under his fig tree, from Dan even to Beersheba, all the days of Solomon. 
And Solomon had forty thousand stalls of horses for his chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen. 
And those officers provided victual for king Solomon, and for all that came unto king Solomon's table, every man in his month: they lacked nothing. 
Barley also and str
855,ry, because ye have borne the shame of the heathen: 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; I have lifted up mine hand, Surely the heathen that are about you, they shall bear their shame. 
But ye, O mountains of Israel, ye shall shoot forth your branches, and yield your fruit to my people of Israel; for they are at hand to come. 
For, behold, I am for you, and I will turn unto you, and ye shall be tilled and sown: 
And I will multiply men upon you, all the house of Israel, even all of it: and the cities shall be inhabited, and the wastes shall be builded: 
And I will multiply upon you man and beast; and they shall increase and bring fruit: and I will settle you after your old estates, and will do better unto you than at your beginnings: and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Yea, I will cause men to walk upon you, even my people Israel; and they s
976, 
And their nobles have sent their little ones to the waters: they came to the pits, and found no water; they returned with their vessels empty; they were ashamed and confounded, and covered their heads. 
Because the ground is chapt, for there was no rain in the earth, the plowmen were ashamed, they covered their heads. 
Yea, the hind also calved in the field, and forsook it, because there was no grass. 
And the wild asses did stand in the high places, they snuffed up the wind like dragons; their eyes did fail, because there was no grass. 
O LORD, though our iniquities testify against us, do thou it for thy name's sake: for our backslidings are many; we have sinned against thee. 
O the hope of Israel, the saviour thereof in time of trouble, why shouldest thou be as a stranger in the land, and as a wayfaring man that turneth aside to tarry for a night? 
Why shouldest thou be as a man astonied, as a mighty man that cannot save? yet thou, O LORD, art in the midst o
969,m thou hast set over us because of our sins: also they have dominion over our bodies, and over our cattle, at their pleasure, and we are in great distress. 
And because of all this we make a sure covenant, and write it; and our princes, Levites, and priests, seal unto it. 
Now those that sealed were, Nehemiah, the Tirshatha, the son of Hachaliah, and Zidkijah, 
Seraiah, Azariah, Jeremiah, 
Pashur, Amariah, Malchijah, 
Hattush, Shebaniah, Malluch, 
Harim, Meremoth, Obadiah, 
Daniel, Ginnethon, Baruch, 
Meshullam, Abijah, Mijamin, 
Maaziah, Bilgai, Shemaiah: these were the priests. 
And the Levites: both Jeshua the son of Azaniah, Binnui of the sons of Henadad, Kadmiel; 
And their brethren, Shebaniah, Hodijah, Kelita, Pelaiah, Hanan, 
Micha, Rehob, Hashabiah, 
Zaccur, Sherebiah, Shebaniah, 
Hodijah, Bani, Beninu. 
The chief of the people; Parosh, Pahathmoab, Elam, Zatthu, Bani, 
Bunni, Azgad, Bebai, 
Adonijah, Bigvai, Adin, 
Ater, Hizkijah, Azzur, 
Hodijah,
896,r all the things that they had heard and seen, as it was told unto them. 
And when eight days were accomplished for the circumcising of the child, his name was called JESUS, which was so named of the angel before he was conceived in the womb. 
And when the days of her purification according to the law of Moses were accomplished, they brought him to Jerusalem, to present him to the Lord; 
(As it is written in the law of the LORD, Every male that openeth the womb shall be called holy to the Lord;) 
And to offer a sacrifice according to that which is said in the law of the Lord, A pair of turtledoves, or two young pigeons. 
And, behold, there was a man in Jerusalem, whose name was Simeon; and the same man was just and devout, waiting for the consolation of Israel: and the Holy Ghost was upon him. 
And it was revealed unto him by the Holy Ghost, that he should not see death, before he ha
884,ou? 
And she said unto him, Give me a blessing: for thou hast given me a south land; give me also springs of water. And Caleb gave her the upper springs and the nether springs. 
And the children of the Kenite, Moses' father in law, went up out of the city of palm trees with the children of Judah into the wilderness of Judah, which lieth in the south of Arad; and they went and dwelt among the people. 
And Judah went with Simeon his brother, and they slew the Canaanites that inhabited Zephath, and utterly destroyed it. And the name of the city was called Hormah. 
Also Judah took Gaza with the coast thereof, and Askelon with the coast thereof, and Ekron with the coast thereof. 
And the LORD was with Judah; and he drave out the inhabitants of the mountain; but could not drive out the inhabitants of the valley, because they had chariots of iron. 
And they gave Hebron unto Cale
969,and thine inheritance, which thou broughtest forth out of Egypt, from the midst of the furnace of iron: 
That thine eyes may be open unto the supplication of thy servant, and unto the supplication of thy people Israel, to hearken unto them in all that they call for unto thee. 
For thou didst separate them from among all the people of the earth, to be thine inheritance, as thou spakest by the hand of Moses thy servant, when thou broughtest our fathers out of Egypt, O LORD God. 
And it was so, that when Solomon had made an end of praying all this prayer and supplication unto the LORD, he arose from before the altar of the LORD, from kneeling on his knees with his hands spread up to heaven. 
And he stood, and blessed all the congregation of Israel with a loud voice, saying, 
Blessed be the LORD, that hath given rest unto his people Israel, according to all that he promised: there hath not failed one word of all his good promise, which he promised by the hand
945,s: and their hearts inclined to follow Abimelech; for they said, He is our brother. 
And they gave him threescore and ten pieces of silver out of the house of Baalberith, wherewith Abimelech hired vain and light persons, which followed him. 
And he went unto his father's house at Ophrah, and slew his brethren the sons of Jerubbaal, being threescore and ten persons, upon one stone: notwithstanding yet Jotham the youngest son of Jerubbaal was left; for he hid himself. 
And all the men of Shechem gathered together, and all the house of Millo, and went, and made Abimelech king, by the plain of the pillar that was in Shechem. 
And when they told it to Jotham, he went and stood in the top of mount Gerizim, and lifted up his voice, and cried, and said unto them, Hearken unto me, ye men of Shechem, that God may hearken unto you. 
The trees went forth on a time to anoint a king over them; and they said unto the olive tree, Reign thou over u
789,rother's house. 
And his name shall be called in Israel, The house of him that hath his shoe loosed. 
When men strive together one with another, and the wife of the one draweth near for to deliver her husband out of the hand of him that smiteth him, and putteth forth her hand, and taketh him by the secrets: 
Then thou shalt cut off her hand, thine eye shall not pity her. 
Thou shalt not have in thy bag divers weights, a great and a small. 
Thou shalt not have in thine house divers measures, a great and a small. 
But thou shalt have a perfect and just weight, a perfect and just measure shalt thou have: that thy days may be lengthened in the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee. 
For all that do such things, and all that do unrighteously, are an abomination unto the LORD thy Go
